Summary
"Close to local schools ideal for families, Ripon Grammar school rated Outstanding by Ofsted. Call to find out more about this family friendly development at Bishop's Glade"
"A rare development/investment opportunity comprising a substantial period residence (current use Care Home C2), three adjoining apartments with age restrictions, gardens and parking - in all over 8500 sq. ft located in one of Ripon's most sought after neighbourhoods. UNCONDITIONAL OFFE..."
A stunning recently updated detached four-bedroom Coach House with private and secure enclosed gardens located in a convenient position on the outskirts of the cathedral city of Ripon. No chain involved.
A stunning period family home with a self-contained annexe within walking distance of Ripon city centre
"A building plot overlooking open countryside with planning consent for the erection of five detached residential 'PassivHaus' designed dwellings, offering an excellent opportunity to create stunning homes. "
An executive styled detached family home boasting quality appointments and proportions throughout with Ripon and all its amenities including excellent schools in walking distance and the region’s road network in striking distance.
"A charming five bedroom Victorian semi detached family home filled with period features, including high ceilings, deep skirting's, curved staircase, wooden floors and ornate and fire places. The property also has the advantage of a separate self contained one bedroom annex making this a very flex..."
An impressive and skilfully extended four bedroom detached family home with (1816 sq ft) with garaging and extensive gardens amounting to over 0.25 acres incorporating a substantial detached outbuilding (1062 sq ft) with many potential non-residential uses.
"A fabulous opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious and extensively extended four bedroom detached family home which sits in tucked away secluded position with surrounding mature gardens, three reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, utility, ground floor WC, double garage, parking for multip..."
"Enter the Edlingham to find an air of opulence. From the magnificent entrance hall which offers a peek into the spacious rooms downstairs and galleried upstairs landing, to the stunning vaulted ceiling in the family area of the kitchen, with skylights and French doors illuminating the spa"
"This grand, thoughtfully designed five-bedroom property is truly spacious and offers everything you could wish for in a large family home. 
Double doors from the hallway lead into a light and roomy lounge, a perfect space for relaxing, while"
"***PLOT 125 The Dunstanburgh** *** AVAILABLE AUTUMN 2023*** This stunning, five-bedroom family home is truly spacious and offers everything you could wish for in a property. Situated at the top of the new Bish..."
"***PLOT 131 The Dunstanburgh** *** AVAILABLE SUMMER 2023*** This stunning, five-bedroom family home is truly spacious and offers everything you could wish for in a property. Situated at the top of the new Bish..."
An attractive and enlarged detached family home boasting a most generous plot occupying a peaceful approach on the South side of this well served Cathedral city with amenities in walking distance and the region’s motorway network easily accessible.
"A great opportunity to purchase a city centre investment and development opportunity. This substantial building is offered as a ground floor shop with basement and offices, 2 x 3 bedroom self-contained apartments and a building plot with consent for three town houses. The purch..."
"Field View House is a detached family home occupying a desirable, highly convenient cul-de-sac position within minutes walk of Ripon centre, benefits from having a large rear garden backing onto open land."
"Situated in a desirable Residential Area in the West of the Historic Cathedral City of Ripon sits this fantastic Four Bedroom Detached Home which offers spacious accommodation throughout and benefits from a lovely well stocked rear garden, double garage and is within easy walking distance of the ..."
"*** NEW PRICE AND NO CHAIN ***A substantial detached family home, situated on a generous plot and located in a highly sought after area on the south side of the city, ideally placed for amenities and just seconds away from open countryside. The house has been completely transformed over ..."
"SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED HOUSE WITH SEVEN GARAGES *** VIEWING LAUNCH DAY SATURDAY 18TH MARCH, CONTACT US TO BOOK YOUR VIEWING SLOT *** A substantial detached family home, revealing a spacious interior with light and airy accommodation arranged over three floors, whilst also enjoying lovely v..."
"A fabulous modern detached family home beautifully improved over the last few years, offering flexible accommodation set over two floors with three reception rooms, a spacious dining kitchen, walk in pantry, a ground floor bathroom, master bedroom with en suite and two further bedrooms/ study/dre..."
***BUYER INCENTIVE***An attractive executive styled detached family home occupying a peaceful head of cul-de-sac location on the outskirts of this attractive and well served Cathedral City with the region’s motorway network in striking distance. 
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! STUNNING 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED, gas central heating, double glazing, MODERN BREAKFAST KITCHEN,..."
"A substantial detached family home, situated on a generous plot and located in a highly sought after area on the south side of the city. The house has been completely transformed since its original build, undergoing a substantial extension, which has created a fantastic open plan living ..."
"A substantially extended and reconfigured detached family home, now revealing extremely spacious and flexible accommodation throughout. The house is situated on a generous plot and located on a sought after cul-de-sac to the south side of the city, ideally placed for amenities and just s..."
"This spacious modern three bedroom, three bathroom terraced, home is located close to the centre of Ripon and features accommodation split over three levels, gardens front and rear, and enclosed driveway."
A luxury two bed cottage with a private patio at the front and back of the property. This cottage also comes with a separate kitchen/diner with views of the gardens and courtyard.
"*** Unexpectedly back on the market view today ***A stunning extended three double bedroom detached bungalow which has been beautifully renovated throughout to a very high standard, offering spacious modern interiors, dining kitchen, stunning lounge extension over looking the garden, master bedro..."
"*** NEW PRICE *** A lovely detached bungalow, revealing deceptively spacious and meticulously maintained accommodation arranged over two floors. The property has been extended to the rear with the addition of a good size conservatory, whilst a full length loft conversation has added an additional..."
"***PLOT 116 - THE SETTLE V1** Available Spring 2023 Situated at the top of the new Bishops Glade development in Ripon, this beautiful new detached 4 bedroom energy efficient family home is sure to appeal to a variety of buyers. Located on the edge of this highly sought after..."
"Harron Homes Big March Move, £99 Reservation Fee, Stamp Duty Paid, Legal Fees Paid & Removals
Families will adore this spacious, four bedroom detached family home with integral garage and classic design features.
The large welcoming hallwa"
A great opportunity to purchase a city centre investment and development opportunity. This substantial building is offered as a ground floor shop with basement and offices. There are 2 x 3 bedroom self-contained apartments above. Situated in the very centre of Ripon adjacent t...
We are delighted to welcome to market this rarely available great INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY which is located in the heart of Ripon City Centre. This Grade 2 Listed property has been broken up into three apartments with the top two which are near completion and needing some work doing to fi...
"NEW PRICE - Located on a highly desirable development, this modern detached family home has been meticulously maintained by the current owner. The air of quality flows throughout the house and no expense has been spared, with quality materials used and a high end finish. A ground floor e..."
"A spacious and beautifully presented four bedroom detached property with attractive garden and double garage, forming part of this popular development in Ripon. "
This cleverly enlarged and remodelled four bedroom detached former lodge with delightful gardens enjoys a convenient setting on the sought after northern fringes of Ripon. NO ONWARD CHAIN
"An attractive and significantly enlarged four bedroom detached family home enjoying a peaceful cul-de-sac position within a popular and most fashionable, well served location of this attractive Cathedral city. NO CHAIN."
"A very well presented and well maintained four bedroom detached property offering spacious and bright accommodation set over two floors with a lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, ground floor WC/cloaks, en-suite to master bedroom, house bathroom, rear enclosed garden, garage and driveway with pa..."
"An extremely well presented and well maintained four bedroom detached family home set in this popular location with two reception rooms, dining kitchen, ground floor WC with utility area, master bedroom with en-suite bathroom, rear enclosed garden, driveway and single attached garage. "
"A well presented detached family home, offering spacious and flexible accommodation, whilst also being situated on a sought after development to the west of the city. The house is situated on a larger than average size plot for the development, offering good size gardens and plenty of parking."
"Located in a highly desirable area, this stone built detached bungalow occupies a fantastic mature plot, whilst also revealing a spacious, light and airy interior. The substantial bungalow has been well maintained and much loved, revealing immaculate accommodation throughout. Whilst alre..."
"A very well presented four bedroom detached family home with lounge, dining kitchen and utility room, ground floor WC, rear conservatory, master bedroom with en-suite, rear enclosed garden attached garage and parking for multiple cars all set within this prime location on the edge of the city cen..."
"An eye catching semi-detached home, substantially extended and now revealing spacious and well kept accommodation. The extra space has also brought with it flexibility and the house now offers three reception rooms and four bedrooms. Extending to approximately 1700 square foot in total, the accom..."
"EXCITING DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY *** 360 TOUR *** Davis and Lund are pleased to offer an imposing 17th century, grade II listed semi-detached house which has been sectioned off into apartments/bedsits (done in the 1970’s). The property is ripe for refurbishment. The substantial property is curren..."
"A well presented four bedroom detached house, located in a cul de sac position on the outskirts of Ripon. This ideal family home benefits from a 'L' shaped lounge/dining room, with an attractive fireplace, breakfast kitchen with breakfast bar, separate utility and downstairs WC. To the f..."
"***PLOT 106 - THE CONISBOROUGH - DUE SPRING 2023*** SHOW HOME AVAILABLE FOR VIEWINGS SATURDAY 11 MARCH - PLEASE PHONE FOR A VIEWING SLOT Move in to a ready home with a 5 star moving service from an award winning developer, including a DIY professional and VIP removals service <..."
The Conisbrough is a classic townhouse with lots of natural light with a calm feel. At the heart of the home is the open plan kitchen and dining area which you can personalise with a range of stylish kitchen units to choose from. The dining area can be completed with a comfortable seating area an
An end two floor cottage with a private patio at the front and back of the property. This cottage also comes with a separate kitchen/diner with stunning views of the garden and courtyard.
"Two-bedroom apartment situated in the converted Stables in a secluded part of the village, with stairs leading up to the apartment. It features a spacious open plan design, with en-suites to both double bedrooms. "
"*Incentive - £9,000 cashback on an agreed sale - This is equivalent to One Year's Service Charge* *The Incentive is payable on completion* A suberb one-bedroom, first floor apartment, with stunning views over the gardens, which is one of the largest one beds in the complex at 91.8 sq..."
"Incentive - £9,000 cashback on an agreed sale* *This is payable on completion Stylish one bedroom first floor apartment in the original building of this luxury retirement village which boasts beautifully landscaped and mantained grounds."
"**PLOT 99 - THE CONISBROUGH** SHOW HOME AVAILABLE FOR VIEWINGS SATURDAY 11 MARCH - PLEASE PHONE FOR A VIEWING SLOT **Move In April** **Reserve For £99** **Deposit Boost Worth £18,974** **Upgraded Specification, Includes Flooring, Integrated Appliances ..."
"Incentive - £9,000 cashback on an agreed sale payable on completion Forming part of a magnificent retirement complex, a superb one-bedroom, first floor apartment, with stunning views over the gardens, which is one of the largest one beds in the complex at 91.8m (9..."
First floor large one bed apartment with duel aspect. This apartment has views over the front of The Red House and courtyard.
"A superb refurbished one-bedroom ground floor apartment, 79.2m² (853ft²), private patio with bistro table and chairs, on to a lovely communal garden area. This immaculate property includes floor-to-ceiling fitted wardrobes in the bedroom and new carpets throughout. Located in The Stables, this ap..."
"A superb refurbished one-bedroom ground floor apartment, 79.2m² (853ft²), private patio with bistro table and chairs, on to a lovely communal garden area. This immaculate property includes floor-to ceiling fitted wardrobes in the bedroom and new carpets throughout. Located in The S..."
"A superb refurbished one-bedroom ground floor apartment, 79.2m² (853ft²), private patio with bistro table and chairs, on to a lovely communal garden area. This immaculate property includes floor-to-ceiling fitted wardrobes in the bedroom and new carpets throughout. Located in The Stable..."
"A spacious and well planned three double bedroom town house with fitted kitchen, lounge two en-suites rear garden and parking all set in a lovely small development of similar properties all set within this private court yard development positioned to the rear of the Cathedral. Comprisin..."
"A lovely modern townhouse, situated on a small and highly regarded development, just a few minutes walk from the historic city centre and therefore offering ease of access to all the amenities that Ripon has to offer, including Ripon bus station and supermarkets close by, whilst the cathedral is ..."
"A charming semi-detached cottage, revealing a very well presented and surprisingly spacious interior. The cottage enjoys lovely open views to the front, whilst it is also situated on a good size plot, with mature gardens to three sides. The property has undergone a side and rear extensio..."
A beautifully presented semi-detached town house boasting generous accommodation over three storeys peacefully situated upon the site of the old college with the Cathedral City moments away.
"We are delighted to offer this superb Grade 11 Listed Cottage, situated in the heart of Ripon and enjoying the benefit of a South facing, walled, Kitchen garden and parking. The property has been fully modernised but still retains many of its original features. The property needs to be..."
A well very presented three bedroom detached property offering spacious and bright accommodation throughout finished in a neutral scheme with an attached double tandem style garage which provides a large area for use as a workshop/garage with rear paved garden and spacious driveway for multiple c...
"An excellent semi-detached family home offering typically generous proportions with contemporary open plan living space, stylish kitchen and bathroom, drive and garage, west facing rear garden, set in a sought-after cul-de-sac close to Ripon Grammar. No Chain."
"We are delighted to offer to market this attractive Mid-Terrace property now updated to meet today's living requirements whilst retaining the charm of its period features. The refurbishments include: a full re-wire, new double glazing, a loft conversion to create a Master Bedroom, conv..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this Detached Bungalow with Two Bedrooms in St Olaves Close, a quiet cul-de-sac on the South Side of Ripon. The Bungalow benefits from Garden to the Front and Rear, Driveway Parking and a Garage."
"Located in one of Ripon’s most sought-after areas, this three bedroom semi-detached house offers spacious family accommodation and a lovely outlook with views over fields and woodland. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac and tucked away from the road, the house boasts three good size bedrooms..."
A stunning one bed apartment with a Juliet balcony overlooking grounds and trees.
"A spacious three bedroom semi-detached bungalow, offering versatile and deceptive accommodation arranged over two floors. A loft conversion has completely transformed the accommodation, adding two double bedrooms, a store room and landing/study area. There is still the scope to add an upstairs sh..."
"A spacious three/four bedroom detached bungalow, situated at the head of a cul de sac on the outskirts of the city centre. This fantastic home benefits from an entrance hall leading to all internal accommodation, including a lounge, dining room, conservatory, fitted kitchen, house bathroom and se..."
Located is a quiet cul-de-sac is this attractive and spacious Detached Home with Four Bedrooms. The property benefits from a Living Room opening into the Dining Room with patio doors leading to the Rear Garden and a Master Bedroom with walk through Dressing Area and En-suite Bathroom. ...
"This fantastic apartment boasts a private ground floor position within this attractive and gated development boasting beautiful communal grounds, parking and a personal entry door whilst being only a moment’s stroll from this attractive Cathedral City. "
"A NEARLY NEW, SOUTH FACING, two bedroom, TWO BATHROOM apartment on the FIRST FLOOR of a McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living development approximately 170 YARDS from Ripon's SHOPS AND AMENITIES and QUAINT CITY CENTRE."
"INCENTIVES AVAILABLE - An exciting opportunity to purchase an immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached house, situated in a sought after residential area on the south side of the city. The property has just undergone a light refurbishment, including fresh décor and floor coveri..."
"NEW PRICE *** DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY*** An exciting development opportunity, located in the centre of Ripon and sure to be of interest to investors. Originally two properties, the buildings were combined and utilised as a successful restaurant/takeaway for many years. Full planning permissi..."
We are delighted to welcome this well-presented Three-Storey Terraced property to the market. The property benefits from Three Good Sized Bedrooms with the Master Bedroom having an En-suite shower room. There is the possibility of coverting the Master Bedroom on the Second Floor into 2x rooms to ...
"A three bedroom detached bungalow well presented and spacious throughout situated on the popular South side of the historic City of Ripon. The property benefits from a lovely enclosed rear garden, driveway, garage, double glazing, gas central heating and briefly comprises: Entrance hall, lounge, ..."
"A spacious three bedroom first floor apartment, located within gated grounds, with well maintained communal gardens. This first floor modern apartment can be accessed via a lift or stairs and benefits from versatile living space including a fitted dining kitchen, lounge with double doors leading ..."
"A delightful semi-detached family home offering traditionally planned accommodation and exciting potential for modernisation, occupying a prime position in a sought after and convenient area close to countryside, schools and amenities."
"A delightful three bedroom period cottage, revealing a charming and spacious interior, which has been extended over the years. Set back from the road, the cottage enjoys a lovely setting, whilst also being handily located, just a short walk from the city centre. Unusually for a central p..."
MODERN THREE BEDROOM HOUSE ON THE SOUTH SIDE OF RIPON
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK*** FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY *** STUNNING 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME, IDEAL FOR YOUNG / GROWING FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating, double gl..."
"This elegant one bed apartment features a flexible, open plan living space with the benefit of views of the gardens at The Red House."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a substantial terrace house, currently split into two flats. The front entrance leads to both flats. To the ground floor there is a one bedroom apartment with a dining kitchen, lounge, bathroom and rear door leading into the rear yard. The first floor comprises..."
"NEW PRICE AND NO CHAIN - A spacious semi detached bungalow, set in a small cul-de-sac and located in a highly desirable area just off Harrogate Road, offering the opportunity to modernise to personal taste. Originally a three bedroom property, the third bedroom and hallway have been open..."
"Spacious town house in a convenient location with a patio garden and parking. Just a short walk from Ripon City Centre. En-suite to bedroom one, open-plan kitchen-living room, patio garden and private parking for one car"
"A lovely two bedroom semi-detached bungalow, offering spacious accommodation and good size gardens. The property has been extended with the addition of a conservatory to the rear and whilst it has been well maintained, the bungalow does now offer the scope to update to personal taste in ..."
"An attractive property offering a great opportunity for modernisation to create a superb family home in a convenient location, with spacious accommodation including two reception rooms, three good bedrooms, garden and driveway. No chain."
"A two bedroom detached bungalow offering spacious living accommodation with a fitted dining kitchen, lounge, recently installed shower room, two bedrooms, rear conservatory which leads to an attached garage which is currently used as a utility/ storage room and occasional living space. C..."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY A fantastic modern three bedroom terraced home situated close to the centre of Ripon with spacious living areas split over three floors and enclosed car port to the rear. Sitting within walking distance of local amenities and schools this house is part of the pop...
"We are pleased to welcome this well-presented Town House with accommodation over Three Floors, to the market. The property benefits from a Master Bedroom with Ensuite and the location being in a quiet cul-de-sac, just a short walk from the city centre."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom semi detached bungalow with a dining kitchen, spacious lounge, house bathroom, rear enclosed garden, good sized garage and driveway with parking for multiple cars. Comprising of entrance hallway, lounge with large front window and fireplace, fitted k..."
MODERN RETIREMENT LIVING IN THE HEART OF RIPON
"A very well presented and beautifully maintained three bedroom property offering spacious accommodation with lounge, fitted dining kitchen, spacious hallway, modern house bathroom, rear enclosed paved garden, a front lawn garden and parking. Comprising; entrance hallway with stairs to t..."
"Offered with no onward chain and forming part of this magnificent Grade II listed building which is within easy walking distance of all the city centre amenities, this spacious three bedroom apartment with allocated parking space occupies a first floor position with impressive south facing aspect..."
"An attractive individually designed Mews House, revealing a spacious and quirky interior, with three bedrooms, open plan living accommodation and even a multi-purpose mezzanine level."
"*** Reduced to sell***A two bedroom detached bungalow offered with no onward chain with spacious dining kitchen, lounge, modern style bathroom, rear low maintenance garden and parking. Comprising: side entrance in to the spacious dining kitchen which is fitted with white units with plent..."
"BRAND NEW. A full residential, detached, modular bungalow on the delightful Cathedral View development in Ripon. Over 55's. Convenient and peaceful location. Pet friendly. Garden space to be included for each plot. Two private parking spaces"
"A traditional style three bedroom end of terrace house, located on a quiet cul de sac near the centre of Ripon. This lovely 'tucked away' property benefits from accommodation over three floors, including a fitted dining kitchen, a house bathroom and a spacious lounge with ornate coal effect gas f..."
"A well maintained two bedroom semi detached house, located on the edge of Ripon. The property benefits from an entrance porch, leading into a hall, with access to the lounge, which boasts an electric fire and a spacious dining kitchen, leading into the rear porch. To the first floor the are two g..."
"Modern, full residential, detached bungalow on the delightful Cathedral View development in Ripon.
This Omar Middleton is a fully furnished park home. Cathedral View is an over 50's, full residential park. Convenient and Peaceful location"
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom duplex apartment located on Kirkby Road & within walking distance of all shops, amenities & schools. The property comprises of; Communal Hallway & Stairs, Private Entrance Hallway, Large Lounge, Dining Room / Snug, Kitchen / Diner, Two Large Bedrooms, House Ba..."
A GREAT INVESTMENT PROPERTY OR FIRST TIME BUYERS OPPORTUNITY!!! We are pleased to offer to the market a newly refurbished two bedroom mid terraced cottage within walking distance of the Historic Ripon City Centre and located conveniently to local amenities with easy access to commuter links. This...
A GREAT INVESTMENT PROPERTY OR FIRST TIME BUYERS OPPORTUNITY!!! We are pleased to offer to the market a newly refurbished two bedroom mid terraced cottage within walking distance of the Historic Ripon City Centre and located conveniently to local amenities and with easy access to commuter links. ...
An exciting opportunity to purchase this spacious one/two bedroom townhouse situated in a stunning converted chapel. Available immediately with no chain this property would make an ideal first time buy or investment.
"A centrally located two bedroom cottage, which reveals a well kept and surprisingly spacious interior. The property offers airy accommodation throughout, whilst also boasting a courtyard garden and outside storage. The house is situated just a short walk from the city centre and it offer..."
"A well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment with a modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge with french style doors and a modern shower room, all with direct access to the riverside gardens, Comprising; communal entrance to the building with security intercom. On entry to the apar..."
"A stunning three bedroomed duplex apartment with designated parking space, conveniently situated in the heart of Ripon Cathedral City."
"*** NEW PRICE *** A beautifully presented ground floor apartment, located in a highly desirable area, just a short walk from the city centre. The apartment occupies the ground floor of an attractive period property, which has been converted to produce just two apartments, both with their own priv..."
"A Well Presented Mid-Terrace property with Two Bedroom. The property is located in a quiet cul-de-sac, close to Ripon Bypass. The property benefits from Allocated Parking and a low-maintenance Garden to the Rear."
We are delighted to welcome to market this well-presented Two Bedroom Apartment which benefits from patio doors which open out from the Living Room onto a Balcony Area and further space with a Mezzanine Home Office above the Master Bedroom. The property is just a short walk away from Ripon City ...
"An attractive purpose built first floor apartment enjoying a tranquil setting at the very heart of this attractive well served and increasingly popular Cathedral city boasting superb amenities including restaurants, cinema and café’s. "
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU** A spacious two bedroom first floor apartment, situated in Williamson House, an iconic building located just a short walk from the city centre and enjoying a lovely riverside setting. The building was converted in 2002, creating a number..."
A beautifully presented first floor apartment boasting high ceilings and a most peaceful location at the heart of this Cathedral City.
"An internal appraisal is a must to appreciate this stunning, one-bedroom apartment which offers spacious and characterful accommodation being part of the conversion of the library in the historic “Ripon College”. The apartment is offered in excellent decorative order and is individua..."
A conveniently and peacefully located period terrace home offering well-proportioned accommodation over two storeys now in need of some refurbishment with the Cathedral city in walking distance and excellent access to the region's road network.
"A spacious two bedroom first floor apartment in the centre of Ripon for the over 55s. Accessed through a communal entrance hall with a lift to all floors, this fantastic home benefits from an open private entrance hall, with two storage cupboards, a modern fitted shower room, a fitted breakfast k..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, a one double bedroom semi detached house, located towards to bottom of Clotherholme Road in a cul de sac position. This spacious home benefits from a fitted kitchen, with built in oven and hob, a spacious lounge and a conservatory with doors leading into the..."
"NEW PRICE!!! Perfectly situated within close proximity of Ripon Centre this well presented two bedroom first floor apartment benefits from being light, modern and spacious throughout, double glazing gas, central heating in a superb location. Briefly comprises: Double glazed front door leading int..."
"An attractive later Victorian terraced house revealing bright, attractive and easily managed accommodation, yard with useful outbuilding, delightfully situated in a backwater location close to Ripon centre. "
"NEW PRICE AND NO CHAIN - A spacious ground floor apartment, forming part of a purpose built development and occupying a handy central location. The apartment does now offer the scope to modernise to personal taste, whilst double glazing and gas central heating are already in place. The d..."
"An opportunity to purchase a Ground Floor Flat with Two Bedrooms, within easy walking distance of Ripon City centre. The property has been a well-loved home and is now in need of a little updating. Accommodation Comprises: Sitting Room, Two Bedrooms, Kitchen, Bathroom. To the Outside, t..."
"Close to open countryside yet within easy reach of Ripon, New Park offers you an exciting opportunity to acquire a DETACHED 20ft x 26ft SONATA 11 PARK HOME on the beautifully maintained and ideally located Quarry Moor Park site. The property is five years old and benefits from having two parking ..."
*** Priced to sell*** No chain ** A very spacious two double bedroom first floor apartment which now requires modernisation throughout. Set on the edge of lovely open playing fields and within easy walking distance of the city centre. Comprising; entrance door with stairs to the first...
"NO CHAIN - VIEWING RECOMMENDED! A bright and versatile purpose built top floor apartment with lift within this pleasant riverside development, allocated parking space, conveniently situated for amenities and city life."
"75% SHARE OF A RETIREMENT APARTMENT – A purpose built one bedroom retirement apartment, offered on a 75% share basis and located on a highly desirable development. Situated just off the College Lawns, the upper floor apartment offers lovely open woodland views. The interior is neutrally ..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this original two bedroom terrace cottage which now requires fully modernising throughout having been in the same family for over 40 years. Set in a quiet position just off princess road with a front porch, lounge with open fireplace, kitchen area with Bel..."
"A centrally located one bedroom ground floor apartment, situated just a short walk from the city centre and benefitting from a private courtyard garden. The spacious apartment reveals an immaculate and neutrally decorated interior, feeling light and airy throughout. On the groun..."
"FANTASTIC NEW PRICE!!! New Park offers you an exciting opportunity to acquire a Detached PARK HOME approx 20 ft x 22 ft on the beautifully maintained and ideally located Quarry Moor Park site. Close to open countryside yet within easy reach of Ripon. Accommodation comprising: Lounge, kitchen, inn..."
"An infrequent opportunity to acquire a piece of land which subject to the required reports and application could be a building plot for a detached dwelling or log cabins on the outskirts of Ripon, a beauty spot looking onto green belt fields."
Pattinson Auction are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom top floor apartment situated in the heart of Ripon city centre. Attractively priced - Ideal First Time Buy - Two Bedrooms - Separate Kitchen - Third Floor - Family Bathroom - City Centre Location - Easy Access to Amenities...
Salford Apartments with 6% rental returns 900m from Spinningfields business district.A628
"Mr Investa are pleased to present this impressive and substantial investment opportunity to acquire 18 units within a popular and consistently fully occupied development producing £117,000 per annum amongst 1 bedroom and 2 bedroom well proportioned apartments. Option to split the 18 units into sm..."
"Exclusive three double bedroom apartment in the heart of Spinningfields. Completely one of a kind with two parking spaces, this is not one to miss."
An incredible opportunity to purchase the sole Penthouse apartment in this stunning and exciting City Centre development. This stunning 3 bedroom duplex apartment will be a truly outstanding example of its type and has state of the art facilities and amenities both onsite and nearby.
"A gorgeous three-bedroom, two bath penthouse apartment perched on the top of Leftbank. Situated in a fantastic location with enviable views over the City, this is the perfect Pied a Terre."
"An executive high specification two bedroom, three bathroom penthouse situated on the banks of the River Irwell. This property offers versatile accommodation set across three floors with the benefit of two private terraces offering views of the city and beyond. Secure allocated parking ..."
"**EWS1 FORM IN PLACE, MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME ** ONLINE VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE** This breath-taking penthouse apartment offers three floors of incredible space and style with unique finishings in one of the city's most iconic developments. The Edge is situated along the banks of the River Irwell ju..."
Hunters Manchester are delighted to introduce this gorgeous 6 bed terraced HMO property which is a great investment to add to the portfolio. On the ground floor there is a shared kitchen/diner which is well lit. The property has been designed to include 5 double bedrooms all equiped wit...
"Duplex penthouse apartment located on levels 24 & 25 of The Heart in MediaCity. This is a stunning and unique property with a high specification throughout. With four double bedrooms split over two levels, the lower floor comprises a large living area, separate dining room/kitchen, utili..."
"EWS1 Certified. Perched on the 16th & 17th Top Floor of NV Buildings, a truly stunning, state of the art, executive Duplex Penthouse Apartment, extending to approx 2755 sq ft. Affording magnificent panoramic views over Manchester City Centre, surrounding landmarks and the distant Pennine Hills"
"PENTHOUSE: Exquisite Duplex Penthouse situated on the 12th and 13th floors of a stunning new build development in Manchester City Centre. This unique Penthouse boasts two large private south facing roof terraces, a wrap around balcony and floor to ceiling windows throughout. "
"In our opinion this elegant five bed, double fronted detached house is the quintessential family home. The spacious accommodation is well presented and has a lovely homely feel, whilst also offering very comfortable and flexible living areas with the potential for annex style living to the rear i..."
Hunters Worsley are delighted to offer for sale this simply stunning 7 bedroom detached family home packed full of original features and comes with two out buildings! We believe this property is suited for a forever family home. Viewing is essential to fully appreciate the size and condi...
"Imposing Five Bedroom Semi-Detached Family Home complete with Self Contained Studio Flat. Internally, the spacious accommodation is set over three floors and extends to: Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Dining Room, Lounge, Study, Kitchen/Diner, Utility, Guest W.C, Five Double Bedrooms, Master with..."
"*** EWS1 CERTIFICATE NOW IN PLACE *** 2 BED DUPLEX APARTMENT WITH PARKING. A stunning, spacious two bedroom duplex river-facing apartment in the highly sought after The Edge development. Located on the banks of the River Irwell, next to The 5 star Lowry Hotel, only a short walk to the city's main..."
"A Fabulous Penthouse Duplex with stunning views from a spacious balcony, this property must be seen to be appreciated! Enjoying three double bedrooms, two allocated parking spaces and a top floor location within this highly sought after building, this stunning home welcomes buyers using a mortgag..."
ONE OF A KIND! HUGE 25th TOP FLOOR DUPLEX 3-Bed 1-Office CORNER ASPECT PENTHOUSE with CANAL VIEW BALCONY in One Regent. TWO Allocated PARKING Spaces. Communal Garden. 1636 Sq Ft. EWS1 Form Available. Subject to Contract. Lease Info: 250 Years Lease from 2017 Service Charge: Approx...
"An impressive sized five bedroom detached character house, with charming period features that was previously used as guest accommodation over four storeys."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this extremely rare investment opportunity; located in the increasingly popular postcode area of 'M7' Salford, Manchester. Originally a huge Victorian house, the property has been split into 5 self contained apartments and was let out as such fo..."
Stunning dual aspect apartment in the highly acclaimed Leftbank development.
"*** LUXURY LIVING - NEW BUILD APARTMENTS in LEAFY SALFORD *** *** COMPLETION BY MARCH 2023 *** Martin and Co along with Dream Homes Construction are proud to introduce six New Luxury Apartments currently under construction, in this affluent area of Salford, Greater Manchester. Situated on Uppe..."
Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this stunning 5 double bedroom period property in Salford's most sought-after postcode - M7. The spacious mid-terrace home is set over 4 floors including a large basement that is in great condition and is currently being used as a workspace. The ...
" No chain involved! A rare opportunity to purchase this Impressive period semi detached house, situated in a tree-lined sought-after location, south-facing, set in approximately 0.8 acres. This family home has been occupied by the current vendors for many years and has retained an array of orig..."
"NO CHAIN. Overlooking the waterfront of St Francis Basin to the rear, an impressive, refurbished, extensive 3 storey neo Georgian style end Town House with Four Bedrooms, combi gas central heating boiler system, uPVC double glazing, high specification Kitchen and Bathrooms."
* MUST BE SEEN TO BE FULLY APPRECIATED * DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS * A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME SITUATED ON ONE OF SWINTON'S MOST DESIRABLE ROADS.
"Exclusive Greengate Manchester apartments starting from just £210,000 - view floor plans today! A224"
"Located in M3 in the heart of the city, just an 8-minute walk to Manchester Victoria Station. A222"
UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY! Prime Salford Location! Mr Investa are pleased to bring to the market these 3 commercial garage units and a plot of land which is currently used as a car park with PREVIOUS PLANNING APPROVED TO BUILD 6 APARTMENTS OVER 3 FLOORS.
"***3 BEDROOM LUXURY DUPLEX APARTMENT
*** MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE
***OPEN HOUSE JULY 27TH***
***REF KYNA"
A deceptively spacious and family friendly three bedroom detached home situated upon one of Swinton's most desirable roads boasting a luxurious internal finish
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to introduce this stunning duplex, Penthouse which benefits from both a large roof terrace and a full width balcony. Both of which showcase spectacular views. This beautiful apartment is positioned on teh 14th Floor. This popular development which is positione..."
"This development is in an ideal location, nestled between Manchester City Centre and Salford - within striking distance of everything that Manchester has to offer. This is the last remaining 3-bedroom apartment which is designed to the highest standard to provide residents with luxury..."
"BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT. TOP FLOOR THREE BEDROOM APARTMENT. Tenanted Investment, renting out for £1,750 pcm. Physical viewings welcome, Virtual tour available. Prime city centre location in the much sought after Embankment west developement. Benefits from first class on site facilties such as..."
"Hunters Manchester are proud to introduce this high specification luxury fully furnished apartment. With this three bedroom duplex apartment, measuring at approximately 2160 sq. ft, you will find a property that truly ticks every single box! Here you are located just off Chapel Street, one of..."
"**STUNNING THROUGHOUT**DETACHED** Downstairs the property comprises of two separate reception rooms, Utility room, and a great size L-shaped kitchen/ dining with French doors leading onto the garden. The upstairs benefits from 3 substantial bedrooms with an en-suite to the main, and on..."
Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this immaculately presented 4 bedroom town house within short walking distance of Manchester City Centre. Irwell Riverside is an award winning development built by Urban Splash and designed by award winning architects Shedkm. Despite being located so ...
"A STYLISH TOWNHOUSE, located within a PRESTIGIOUS GATED DEVELOPMENT, a stones throw away of the River Irwell, and within easy reach of Manchester City Centre, offered for sale with NO CHAIN. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, a stunning open plan living area incorporating a design..."
"Bentley Hurst are proud to offer this oustanding two bedroom apartment for sale in, The Edge. EWS1 Form Available - Mortgage Buyers Welcome. A splendid two bedroom, two bathroom apartment situated on the 15th floor with gorgeous views of the River Irwell. Virtual Tour Available."
"THREE BEDROOM PENTHOUSE DUPLEX, THE HEART, MEDIACITYUK, LARGE ROOF TERRACE, WITH CANAL AND SOUTH FACING VIEWS, BUUILT IN KITCHEN, LEASEHOLD, AVAILABLE NOW."
"Luxury Manchester property with experienced management and 6% yields. A desirable location, huge potential growth and below-market prices make this a perfect buy to let opportunity. A165"
"A SUBSTANTIAL, EXTENDED period property that benefits from FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, THREE RECEPTION ROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS, a SHOWER ROOM, a CELLAR, a driveway providing plenty of off-road parking and a 38FT GARAGE. This property must be seen to fully appreciate its size, secure your viewing today!"
Salford Apartments with 6% rental returns 900m from Spinningfields business district. A621
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this stunning two double bedroom corner aspect apartment situated on the 6th floor of The Edge in a highly sought-after location on the outskirts of Manchester City Centre. As well as being sold with no onward chain, this close to 1,200 sq ft pro..."
"A fantastic detached property located in a Leafy cul-de-sac position just off the popular Radcliffe Park Road in Salford. The property is located close to excellent transport links into Media City, Salford Quays and Manchester City Centre and walking distance to Salford Royal Hospital and well-r..."
You won't find deals like these ones in the area; our prices are 34% below local comparable prices! Request a free virtual tour today! A232
You won't find deals like these ones in the area; our prices are 34% below local comparable prices! Request a free virtual tour today! A210
"Invest from £174,995 in below market value apartments in Greater Manchester. 6% returns projected.A620"
"Salford Quays Waterfront Apartments: Developed in collaboration with a local award-winning development company, with a strong portfolio in residential property, these apartments will offer 6% rental returns. A101"
"Luxurious duplex two bedroom apartment with parking included, in the highly acclaimed Leftbank development."
"PENTHOUSE LIVING! Located on the top floor of the development, this fantastic penthouse apartment benefits from being corner position and offers stunning views from the south west facing living area. Offering buyers a range of exclusive services and amenities making work, life and play seamless...."
"Ideally Located Salford Investment Opportunity: Situated within an enviable part of Salford, where over £1 billion is being invested into regeneration projects, including MediaCityUK, this property development is not one to be missed. A100"
"Completed Residential Property Available: Ideal Manchester property investment, providing buyers with a minimum annual rental income of £7,797. A1188"
"Key features Well presented throughout having undergone extensive renovation restoring original features Ideal for large families Fantastic development potential for investors Great size cellar with potential for conversion Five double bedrooms Two reception rooms Two bathrooms..."
"Request Free Info Pack Today! These ultra-modern apartments offer a high rental yield of 6%, meaning you could be earning a projected rental income starting from £10,797.A225"
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BED DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED ON A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT *** IDEAL FPROPERTY FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS, FAMILIES & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** EASY ACCESS TO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE *** EARLY & INTERNAL VIEWING IS H..."
"*MORTGAGE BUYERS INVITED* Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale THE ORIGINAL SHOW APARTMENT on the 7th floor of Leftbank in the heart of Spinningfields. The apartment is one of the larger styles and boats unrestricted river views from two balconies, speaker system built in, walk in wa..."
Attract high demand and generate 6% rental returns with this Manchester city centre investment. Luxury apartments in one of Manchester's most fashionable districts. A157
"EWS1 Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. A large TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT positioned on the 15TH FLOOR of an ICONIC DEVELOPMENT close to Manchester City Centre sat on the banks of the River Irwell. Finished to an incredibly HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT, the property benefits ..."
"BUY-TO-LET PROPERTY | RESIDENTIAL APARTMENTS: Northill Apartments stand central in Salford Quays, offering residents incredible views of the city and the development is placed in a convenient and walkable location to all the best amenities Salford has to offer."
"Completed residential investment opportunity for buy to let or buy to live purposes. Prices start from £174,995.A619"
A SUPERB FAMILY HOME WITH OFF ROAD PARKING IN SALFORD If you are looking for the perfect family home with spacious interiors then look no further! This bright four bedroom property is being welcomed to the market in a popular area of Salford. Situated just a short drive to the centre of ...
"Brand new corner apartment on the 21st floor. Completed August 2022, Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof garden with s..."
"6% Rental Returns: Luxurious Greater Manchester one, two and three-bedroom apartments, townhouses and duplex units starting from £275,000. A lucrative buy to let residential investment opportunity in a thriving northern city.A99"
"*** Unbeatable Rental NET Yields of 10.72%*** THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS."
**SOUGHT AFTER AREA** **CLOSE TO SALFORD ROYAL HOSPITAL** **NO VENDOR CHAIN** **STUNNING LANDSCAPED GARDENS** Stunning detached three bedroom bungalow with garage in a prime location. EPC GRADE E. COUNCIL TAX BAND C. 
"Completed Spacious Luxury Three Bedroom Unit Located in near Media City, Manchester. Perfect Opportunity for Owner Occupiers. Residents can Benefit from a Communal Area and Workspace."
"**NO CHAIN** This spacious three bedroom family home has been refurbished throughout to an excellent specification. Situated close to excellent transport links to Salford Quays/Media City and the city centre this property is sure to impress. Comprising inviting entrance hall, lounge with bay wind..."
"*** LUXURY LIVING - NEW BULID APARTMENTS in LEAFY SALFORD *** Martin and Co along with Dream homes construction are proud to introduce six New Luxury Apartments CURRENTLY UNDER CONSTRUCTION, in this affluent area of Salford, Greater Manchester. Situated on Upper Park Road. These incredible r..."
Rothmore Property are delighted to release a limited number of luxury apartments. This is beautiful high spec development where nothing has been overlooked with the finish of each apartment.
"***DECIEVINGLY SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME*** This fantastic family home is situated in the popular area of Swinton, with local schools, amenities, and great transport links with the East Lancashire Road nearby taking you straight into City Centre. The home comprises; entrance hallway, large ..."
***NEW DEVELOPMENT*** ***HIGH SPECIFICATION*** ***AMAZING TRANSPORT CONNECTIONS*** ***CENTRAL MEDIACITYUK LOCATION***
"*** LUXURY LIVING - NEW BULID APARTMENTS in LEAFY SALFORD *** *** COMPLETION BY MARCH 2023 *** Martin and Co along with Dream homes construction are proud to introduce six New Luxury Apartments currently under construction, in this affluent area of Salford, Greater Manchester. Situated on Upp..."
"Luxury townhouse offering generous accommodation over three floors, roof terrace, garden and allocated parking space. Located just off Chapel Street within walking distance of Manchester city centre and Spinningfields. Beautifully presented and finished to a high standard throughout, this is..."
"Brand new, corner 2 bedroom apartment on the 21st floor with city centre views . Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof g..."
"*** Marvellous Period Property with Huge Potential - No Chain involved, Approx 1830 square feet *** A rare opportunity to purchase an impressive period semi-detached home, situated a highly desirable and sought-after Salford location and retaining fantastic character, high ceilings and..."
"The next level in luxe city living, Blackfriars Street apartments occupy a prime riverside location in the very heart of Manchester. The luxurious apartments at Blackfriars Apartments are ideally set in the centre of Manchester and feature opulent décor, amazing amenities, and unmatched comfort."
***NEW DEVELOPMENT*** ***HIGH SPECIFICATION ****BEST POSSIBLE LIVING EXPERIENCE *** ***AMAZING TRANSPORT CONNECTIONS*** ***CENTRAL MEDIACITYUK LOCATION***
"Modern Manchester Apartments: Newoff-plan investmentswith waterfront views and ease-of-access to Manchester's city centre, including bars, restaurants, and shops. A 6% rental return, with prices starting from £275,000. A98"
"*** Stunning Modern three Storey End Town House With Superb Versatile Living Space, Private Landscaped Gardens, Allocated Gated Parking And Situated within a Much Sought After Residential Location on the Outskirts of Manchester City Centre *** Located within a popular and highly conv..."
" **OFF-PLAN INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITIES** 2024 and 2025 Completions. Luxury City Centre Apartments in the Heart of Manchester. World Class Facilities, Stylish Modern Design, Fantastic Transport Links. Deposits from 10% and High Rental Yields from 5-7%. Price range from £200,000-£500..."
"EXTENDED FAMILY HOME! HOME ESTATE AGENTS are thrilled to offer for sale this extended, four bedroom detached property located on the popular Radcliffe Park Road. Within a short walk to both Lightoaks Park and Oakwood park along with a choice of primary schools situated closeby, the property offer..."
"Completed Residential Property Available: Ideal Manchester property investment, providing buyers with a minimum annual rental income of £7,797. A1200"
Apartments with 11.7% price growth forecast in hotspot area of Greater Manchester. Near MediaCityUK and Spinningfields. A618
SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM HOUSE - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - THREE RECEPTION ROOMS - DETACHED GARAGE - CALL BELVOIR TODAY!
Found in the centre of Salford; it offers extremely high 6% rental returns at 34% below local comparable prices. Invest today! A223
"Off-Plan Manchester Apartments: Luxury, stylish apartments with state-of-the-art facilities, including an onsite gym, private lounge area, extensive gardens, and parking/bicycle storage. Prices starting at £275,000.A97"
High Rental Returns: A below market value investment opportunity in an ideally located Salford area.A1199
Apartments with 11.7% price growth forecast in hotspot area of Greater Manchester. Near MediaCityUK and Spinningfields. A617
"Brand new apartment on the 20th floor. Completed August 2022, Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof garden with stunning..."
Stylish waterside apartment in the heart of Media City UK! This high specification three bedroom apartment benefits from a large private balcony with fantastic views.
"Northwood are delighted to market this four bedroom semi detached property which oozes character. Offering fantastic living space and ideally situated for a range of amenities including shops, schools and transport links and only a short distance to Manchester City Centre it would make an idea..."
" Integrated Appliances. Carpet & Vinyl Package. .Plot 358: The Eaton is a fantastic family home, boasting four great-sized bedrooms, a separate dining room and a convenient integral garage."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a stunning three double bedroom period end terrace house positioned in a quiet cul de sac within the highly prized Fire Station Square Development, that provides a picturesque setting yet still within walking distance to Salford University, Manchester City Centre and..."
**EWS1 FORM AVAILABLE - Mortgage Buyers Invited*** Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this stunning 3rd floor luxury TWO BEDROOM apartment within the NV Buildings on Salford Quays. Offering extremely spacious and well-presented accommodation with a full-width south-facing bal...
EWS1 CERTIFICATE NOW AVAILABLE- NV Buildings - Two Bedrooms- 7th floor- Front Facing - Two Bathrooms- Chain Free- Available now.
Rothmore Invest are delighted to release a limited number of luxury apartments in Salford central. This is beautiful high spec development where nothing has been overlooked with the finish of each apartment.
"This soon to be completed developments comprise one, two & three- bedroom apartments & duplexes offering an array of great amenities: resident workspace, gymnasium, yoga studios, cinema room & terrace garden"
"* CHAIN-FREE * EXTENDED TO THE SIDE * Ideally located on a CUL-DE-SAC in a DESIRABLE RESIDENTIAL AREA, this FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME features 4 GENEROUS..."
"AN IMPRESSIVE SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME Having been presented and updated to the highest standard throughout with an abundance of indoor and outdoor space, neutral decoration and situated within the most sought after location, this enviable three bedroom semi detached property is being proudl..."
"***EXCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT*** The next level in luxe city living, Blackfriars Street apartments occupy a prime riverside location in the very heart of Manchester, comprising 380 impeccable apartments, townhouses and penthouses across two striking towers."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Salford.
"This is a newly completed development that is Manchester's newest and most exciting place to live. The development is nestled next to the city centre, just a short 8-minute walk away from Deansgate and Victoria Train Station. This development offers an onsite gym, concierge and commu..."
MEDIA CITY - BOUTIQUE DEVELOPMENT - 20 UNITS AVAILABLE - EXCLUSIVE TO ROTHMORE PROPERTY - 5% NET RETURNS - Don't miss out - Enquire NOW for more details.
Attract high demand and generate 6% rental returns with this Manchester city centre investment. Luxury apartments in one of Manchester's most fashionable districts. A156
"*** Superb Traditional Bay Fronted Four Storey Semi- Detached Home With 4 Double Bedrooms, 2 Large Reception Rooms, Spacious Basement Level and Stunning Gardens, Situated Within a Much Sought After and Highly Convenient Location *** This fabulous period home is finished to the highest ..."
"*** INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** Wilburn Basin is a highly sought after modern development located within walking distance to Castlefield and Spinningfields, and offers superb resident facilities including a Gym and Swimming Pool, and has 24 hour concierge. RENTAL INCOME is &poun..."
"Sell Well Are Delighted To Offer For Sale This Unique, Spacious Freehold Detached Period Style House Nestled On A Huge Plot. With extensive gardens at the front, side and rear, this substantial detached property is an ideal family home with bags of potential and a fantastic investment opportunity..."
"Below Market Value Manchester Investment: Luxury residential apartments, townhouses and duplexes starting at just £275,000, and with a 6% rental yield. A96"
"STUNNING TOP FLOOR THREE BEDROOM CORNER APARTMENT LOCATED IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT *** HALF A MILE FROM BOTH SALFORD CENTRAL STATION & CORNBROOK TRAM STOP *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** MASTER BEDROOM E..."
"A superb and stylish luxury apartment situated on the premium 12th floor, occupying a enviable corner aspect with a full width and 6ft wide waterside balcony. Boasting open plan living, two bedrooms, en-suite and contemporary bathroom and ready to move in condtion offered w..."
"This impressive four bedroom semi detached family home benefits from double storey side and rear extension. Met with a double driveway this property oozes size, space and specification. Upon entry you are welcomed with a hallway in which you can go right through the living room with patio doors. ..."
"Excellent established 6-bed all en-suite HMO located in Salford, with a great flow throughout. Ample local amenities and transport links into Manchester city centre and further afield."
"*** Internal Viewing A Must - Fabulous Traditional Bay Fronted Four Storey Semi- Detached Home With Extensive Rear Garden and Double Driveway, 4 Double Bedrooms (Master with En-Suite) and 2 Large Reception Rooms, Popular Residential Setting with Easy Access into Manchester *** This stu..."
"*** FAMILY HOME *** NO CHAIN *** FREEHOLD *** We are delighted to bring to market this stunning property located on this leafy quiet cul de sac in Salford. Internally, the rooms are generous throughout and briefly comprise of entrance hallway, bay fronted morning room, lounge, kitchen/..."
Chic apartments completed in Salford near to Manchester city centre with 6% rental returns.A616
"A much sought-after waterfront development designed with the modern professional in mind. Prices from £210,000 for a 1-bed! 34% below local comparable prices. A221"
"Invest from £174,995 in below market value apartments in Greater Manchester. 6% returns projected. A615"
"Salford Quays Waterfront Apartments: Developed in collaboration with a local award-winning development company, with a strong portfolio in residential property, these apartments will offer 6% rental returns. A95"
"Manchester Regeneration Area: A completed Manchester residential apartment with waterfront views, offering from £7,797 annual rental income and high capital growth potential in the years to come.A1198"
"***UNBEATABLE RENTAL NET YIELDS OF 10.72%***THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS."
COMPLETED / Newly built / Media City / Enquire for more details
"A much sought-after waterfront development designed with the modern professional in mind. Prices from £210,000 for a 1-bed! 34% below local comparable prices. A227"
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND OWNER OCCUPIERS** This stunning development offers investors and cash buyers an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Yield of 6% and it is managed by a leading management company in Manchester, Zenith."
"Limited Riverside Development Offering 1,2 and 3 bedrooms - Parking - 6% returns - 999 leasehold ownership."
This is a newly completed development that is Manchester's newest and most exciting place to live. This apartment comprises of an open plan living room with a modern fitted kitchen and floor-to-ceiling windows. Two double bedrooms with the master benefitting from an en-suite shower roo...
A stunning two beds apartment with dual aspect window view. Good opportunity for Investor! 
Rothmore Invest are delighted to release a limited number of beautiful off-plan units in an investor only development in Salford. This is beautiful high spec development where nothing has been overlooked with the finish of each apartment.
"Michigan Towers is a ground breaking development by a multi-award winning developer that is set to change the Manchester skyline. This 3 bedroom apartment is perfect for first time buyers and investors alike, and access to amenities include a 5-star gym, multiple rooftop terraces, a 24/7 conci..."
"Spacious 3 Bedroom Media City Apartment ** 2 Years 6% Net Assured Rent ** 2 Years Free Lettings and Management ** Completion Q4 2024 ** Stunning Media City Views ** Prime Manchester Location ** Gym, Cinema Room and 24hr Concierge. Parking Available with certain units."
"Welcome to Uptown! A luxury development situated on the banks of Manchester's River Irwell. Uptown delivers the convenience of city living from a stylish waterfront location, offering an enviable modern lifestyle in Manchester's most sustainable new residential building."
Briscombe are Delighted to Off For Sale this Spacious 4/5 Bedroom Property.
"**IDEAL FAMILY LOCATION** STOP! Available with NO VENDOR CHAIN is this DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS, THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, situated on a GENEROUS PLOT! Ideally located within walking distance of SALFORD ROYAL HOSPITAL, close to Light Oaks school and well-kept local parks, this property is e..."
"* CHAIN-FREE * A SUPERB INVESTMENT / DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY * Ideally located in a DESIRABLE RESIDENTIAL LOCATION overlooking Clifton Country Park, this FANTASTIC property features a DETACHED 3 BEDROOM bungalow & GARAGE with LARGE GARDENS to 3 sides occupying a SPACIOUS PLOT, POTENTIALLY SUI..."
*** No Chain Involved - Superb Modern Detached Family Home Situated Within a Quiet Cul-de-Sac Setting in a Highly Sought After and Convenient Residential Location Close to Manchester City Centre *** This wonderful property is situated in a popular setting within the fabulous area of ...
"High Rental Yield and Growth Potential: Situated in a premium Manchester location, these luxury apartments overlook both the city's unspoilt rural areas and the iconic River Irwell.A30"
"This well proportioned 5 bedroomed terraced house is a perfect investment opportunity, situated in an established residential area, conveniently positioned for access to all the usual local amenities. The property benefits from a gas fired central heating system and double glazing. Externally th..."
Hunters in Manchester are delighted to introduce to the market this fantastic duplex apartment in the popular Edge development. The property comes equiped with two large terrace balconies and high cielings on the top floor with floor to ceiling windows allowing ample natural light into the proper...
You won't find deals like these ones in the area; our prices are 34% below local comparable prices! Request a free virtual tour today! A220
Aubrey Lee & Co are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroomed Semi Detached family home located at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac and a corner plot offering ample space for extension (subject to the usual permissions).
"Attention Investors: View info pack and floor plans today for 1 and 2-bedroom residential apartments in Salford, Manchester. Invest from £174,995. A647"
"Fully Managed, Completed Property Development: An incredible modern property investment opportunity, managed by an experienced local rental agent.A1197"
"Stunning three bedroom semi-detached period property overlooking Light Oaks Park. This spacious home has been beautifully refurbished throughout and extended to the rear to provide the perfect family home. Situated in a quiet, leafy, residential part of Salford, and with close proximity..."
"Local Blackfriars is a gated community comprising 380 apartments, across two striking towers. These are architecturally blended into a Grade II-listed former public house - the Black Friar - which has been repurposed as a gateway entrance."
"Available with no onward chain is this spacious four bedroom detached modern property, located on a quiet cul-de-sac within a popular development. A perfect family home, just a short walk from Buile Hill park, with easy access to good local schooling and transport links throughout Manchester."
"STOP AND TAKE A LOOK AT THIS STUNNING PERIOD PROPERTY! Full of character, this LARGE THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED family home features TWO SPACIOUS REC..."
"Riverside Apartments comprises one, two and three-bedroom contemporary apartments all designed to the highest standard to provide residents with luxury waterside living. Capped off with a gymnasium, residents’ lounge, coworking space, concierge services, a dedicated post room and..."
This stylish residential apartment in one of Manchester's most popular developments comes with 6% rental returns and significant capital growth potential. A155
"*LUXURY APARTMENT* CURRENTLY TENANTED - £1900PCM A gorgeous, modern two bedroom apartment available in The Lightbox, Media City. Situated on the 18th Floor with gorgeous water views from the wrap around corner balcony."
"Ideally Located Salford Investment Opportunity: Situated within an enviable part of Salford, where over £1 billion is being invested into regeneration projects, including MediaCityUK, this property development is not one to be missed. A94"
"*** No Chain Involved - Internal Viewing A Must *** Superb Individual Detached Family Home With Exceptionally Well Proportioned and Highly Versatile Living Space, Private Low Maintenance Landscaped Gardens, Ample Driveway Parking And Detached Double Garage, Situated within a Much Soug..."
"Request Free Info Pack Today! These ultra-modern apartments offer a high rental yield of 6%, meaning you could be earning a projected rental income starting from £10,797. A219"
"Annual Rental Income Starting at £7,797: Completed and fully managed apartments available in a thriving area of Manchester, with plenty of surrounding regeneration to come. A1196"
Apartments with 11.7% price growth forecast in hotspot area of Greater Manchester. Near MediaCityUK and Spinningfields. A646
"6% Rental Returns: Luxurious Greater Manchester one, two and three-bedroom apartments, townhouses and duplex units starting from £275,000. A lucrative buy to let residential investment opportunity in a thriving northern city. A93"
"Highly sought-after modern development located within walking distance to Spinningfields, and offers superb resident facilities including a Gym and yoga studios along with a 24 hour concierge."
"A stunning TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM apartment positioned in the 12TH FLOOR of a striking WATERSIDE DEVELOPMENT offered with a RECENTLY UPGRADED KITCHEN, a private WRAP-AROUND BALCONY, SECURE ALLOCATED PARKING and 24-HOUR ON-SITE CONCIERGE. 
"
Splendid three bedrooms two bathrooms with underground car parking space is available for mortgage and cash buyer.
"A stunning two double bedroom, two bathroom apartment located on the 13th floor of The Edge; one of Manchester’s most desirable residential developments. The development is EWS1 certified and so is available to buyers requiring a mortgage. Early and internal viewing is highly recommended. The ..."
"Salford Quays Waterfront Apartments: Developed in collaboration with a local award-winning development company, with a strong portfolio in residential property, these apartments will offer 6% rental returns. A83"
"1 Platinum Tower is an iconic new tower development at the very heart of the MediaCityUK. We are following on from the success of X1 Media City, our first development at the UK's leading digital and media centre."
Light and airy 2 bedroom flat with a spacious roof terrace and communal garden.
***COMPLETED DEVELOPMENT*** Blackfriars Road apartments occupy a prime M3 location in the very heart of Manchester
**NO CHAIN** A fabulous period Detached abode is situated in a highly popular residential suburb of Salford. The property itself overlooks Lightoaks Park and has excellent transport links with easy access to Salford Quays and Manchester City Centre as well as a selection of Ofsted Primary &a...
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this superb apartment within the newly constructed Laurence Pace. Situated within walking distance of the city centre, Manchester Cathedral, Victoria Trains station.. This exclusive development comes fully equipped with the latest facilities incl..."
"***NO VENDOR CHAIN***Take a look at this EXCEPTIONALLY PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME, overlooking De La Salle playing fields and ideally located..."
"EWS1 FORM AVAILABLE / MORTGAGE AND CASH BUYERS INVITED Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this stunning, larger than average 9th floor apartment in the stunning Edge development, right on the cusp of Central Manchester and Spinningfields. LUXURY AND LOCATION! The apartment block of..."
"EWS1 Certified. INVESTORS ONLY. Positioned on the 14th floor of NV Buildings, west facing, overlooking Media City and the Huron/Erie Basin, an impressive, well maintained, luxury apartment of approx. 1,009 sq ft with electric wet central heating, double glazing, air conditioning, 24 hour concierge"
Rothmore Property are delighted to release a limited number of luxury apartments. This is beautiful high spec development where nothing has been overlooked with the finish of each unit.
"Michigan Towers is a ground breaking development by a multi-award winning developer that is set to change the Manchester skyline. This 2 bedroom apartment is perfect for first time buyers and investors alike, and access to amenities include a 5-star gym, multiple rooftop terraces, a 24/7 conci..."
***PRIME CENTRAL LOCATION*** Blackfriars Road apartments occupy a prime M3 location in the very heart of Manchester.
"A true property to give any investor piece of mind, placed in the heart of Manchester."
This BRAND NEW development falling at the edge of Manchester's City centre holds LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS that are to offer a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first century lifestyle in its entirety. ONLY 20% DEPOSIT REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTORS
***EWS1 FORM AVAILABLE (A1 RATING)*** A rare opportunity to purchase a superb luxury apartment within the landmark NV Buildings. Offering extremely spacious and well-presented accommodation with a full-width south-facing balcony overlooking the waterfront. Situated on the 11th floor the apartment...
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this superb fourth floor, courtyard facing apartment. A spacious and superbly presented two-bedroom apartment. Situated in the EWS1 approved and prestigious 'The Edge' development. The property comprises; two double bedrooms, the main bedroom com..."
*** ATTENTION INVESTORS / X1 Manchester Waters Block E / Two Bedroom Apartment / 10 Years building Warranty / Ground Rent £395 per unit / Service Charge Estimated £1.90 SQFT Per Annum / Tenure 240 years lease from 2017 / TARGETED COMPLETION Q4 2023 ***
"An fabulous extended four bedroom semi-detached home on a sought after estate. Located on the popular Westwood estate in Swinton and close to good local schools, amenities and the transport network. This four bedroom extended semi-detached property is immaculately present..."
"READY TO MOVE IN This corner position, seventh floor two bedroom apartment benefits from south facing views and a high specification throughout. Offering buyers a range of exclusive services and amenities, High Definition is stunning new development which makes work, life and play seamless. Set..."
"Exclusive Greengate Manchester apartments starting from just £210,000 - view floor plans today! A218"
"Luxury Manchester property with experienced management and 6% yields. A desirable location, huge potential growth and below-market prices make this a perfect buy to let opportunity. A154"
"***DETACHED***CORNER PLOT***NO CHAIN***COMMUNAL GYM / SWIMMING POOL / SAUNA*** This fantastic family home comprises of entrance hallway, spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen / diner, W/C, utility room, conservatory and a second reception room currently used as a 4th bedroom. Upstairs..."
"Clive Anthony are delighted to offer for sale this well presented spacious two double bedroom second floor apartment occupying its own floor with its own landing which is one of eight in a converted period property. It is well situated for local shops, public transport links and with easy access ..."
"Orlando Reid is delighted to offer this amazing new development in central Manchester with a range of 2 apartments. With construction due to be finished in August 2022, get in touch now to secure some of the last remaining units. These exceptionally bright and spacious 2 apartments ..."
**STUNNING PERIOD PROPERTY** **NOT OVERLOOKED FROM THE REAR** **LARGE MODERN KITCHEN** **CLOSE TO GOOD SCHOOLS** This stunning period property will be ideal for a family that is looking for their forever home. Call the office now to book a viewing. COUNCIL TAX BAND C. EPC GRADE D.
A STUNNING EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN A QUIET CLIFTON LOCATION CLOSE TO THE MARINA AND COUNTRY PARK.
"A SPACIOUS FOUR-BEDROOM, SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR AREA OF SWINTON Nestled in the heart of a popular area of Swinton, on an attractive leafy lane with close proximity to Grosvenor Road Primary School and Victoria Park, this four-bedroom, semi-detached family home is being we..."
"Modern Manchester Apartments: Newoff-plan investmentswith waterfront views and ease-of-access to Manchester's city centre, including bars, restaurants, and shops. A 6% rental return, with prices starting from £275,000.A92"
"Completed residential investment opportunity for buy to let or buy to live purposes. Prices start from £174,995.A630"
"This stunning duplex apartment is located in Salford Quays and comprises of a huge open plan living/dining room that leads to the large fully fitted kitchen with integrated fridge/freezer, dishwasher, oven and microwave oven. There are also two double bedrooms located on the first floor with ensu..."
"New Release Property Investment from RWinvest: Fully furnished and with prices starting from £175,000, these modern, luxury apartments feature stunning interiors and waterfront views.A29"
"Luxury Manchester Apartment Opportunity: The chance to secure a premium Manchester investment opportunity with a minimum annual rental income of £7,797.A1195"
"Invest from £174,995 in below market value apartments in Greater Manchester. 6% returns projected.A629"
"Off-Plan Manchester Apartments: Luxury, stylish apartments with state-of-the-art facilities, including an onsite gym, private lounge area, extensive gardens, and parking/bicycle storage. Prices starting at £275,000.A91"
***Penthouse Apartment****NEW LAUNCH FOR 2023 - 5% NET RETURNS - MEDIA CITY - BOUTIQUE DEVELOPMENT - 20 UNITS AVAILABLE - EXCLUSIVE TO ROTHMORE PROPERTY - Don't miss out - Enquire NOW for more details.
This BRAND NEW development of ***LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS*** offers a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first-century lifestyle in its entirety ***ONLY 20% DEPOSIT IS REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTORS****
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this superb fifth floor apartment. A spacious and superbly presented two-bedroom apartment. Situated in the EWS1 approved and prestigious 'The Edge' development. The property comprises; two double bedrooms, the main bedroom comes with fitted ward..."
"Brand new apartment! Completed August 2022, Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof garden with stunning city and river vi..."
"The Edge is a highly sought after waterside development, benefitting from a high specification throughout and an internal design influenced by the world renowned designer Ben De Lisi. Conveniently located along the banks of the River Irwell, the development offers easy access to the areas range o..."
"Brand new, 2 double bedroom apartment with balcony. Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof garden with stunning city and ..."
"**STUNNING APARTMENT** ESTIMATED YIELDS UP TO 5%** GORGEOUS VIEWS OF GARDEN WALKWAYS** ESTIMATED COMPLETION Q1 2023** LOCATED IN THE HEART OF MEDIACITYUK**
"
"Modern student development with apartments from just £100,000. Offering rental yields of 6% and experienced property management for a hands-off investment. A1156"
"A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE-BEDROOM, DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH GORGEOUS INTERIORS Beautifully presented and situated in a highly sought after area of Salford, this bright, three bedroom home is located perfectly for accessing local amenities as well as well regarded schools, major comm..."
Exclusive opportunity to invest in a luxury property located at the very heart of thriving MediaCityUK. Strong tenant demand and convenient location. Five stars facilities. **CHERRY PICKED INVESTORS PROPERTY**
"STOP! Located on a POPULAR ESTATE with BREATHTAKING VIEWS over Swinton Golf Course is this STUNNING, EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME! This beautifully presented property benefits from a 20FT KITCHEN DINER, contemporary three-piece family bathroom and an ensuite."
"An elegant, spacious top floor apartment with three bedrooms set just outside of Spinningfields. "
** LARGER THAN AVERAGE FLAT WITH PRIVATE TERRACE & PARKING SPACE INCLUDED ** A unique two bedroom dual aspect flat boasting generous proportions at the top of a converted Georgian terrace opposite Peel Park. This stunning property is a stone's throw away from Salford University and a 10 minute wa...
"AN OUTSTANDING FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME Having been presented and maintained to the highest standard throughout with added two storey extension, modern fixtures and fittings, two bathrooms and spacious rooms throughout, this enviable four bedroom semi detached property is being proudly welcom..."
"LOCAL Crescent offers its residents a premium living experience in Salford’s up-and-coming district, ‘The Crescent’. Leashold 250 Years Managment company Local Manchester Service Charge £2437 Ground Rent £250 Our state-of-the-art apartment ..."
"LOCAL Crescent offers its residents a premium living experience in Salford’s up-and-coming district, ‘The Crescent’. Our state-of-the-art apartment complex houses an array of exclusive amenities including a heated pool & spa, cinema room, rooftop garden, solarium,..."
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline. "
"COMPLETE AND READY TO MOVE IN TO! Novella combines striking design and quality with first-class amenities, including 24 hour concierge, communal lounges, gym and wellness suite, private dining area, work spaces, bike store and 6th floor podium roof garden with stunning city and river views."
"Homemove Sales and lettings are pleased to offer this well presented, three bedroom apartment FOR SALE is positioned on the 9th floor of a popular residential building close to Manchester City Centre, Salford Quays and MediaCityUK."
"**CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** **TO BE SOLD WITH TENANTS IN-SITU** **ACHIEVING £2,295PCM INC BILLS** **CLOSE TO WEASTE METROLINK** Are you an investor looking for a HMO without the hassle of finding new tenants? Well take a look at this five bedroom, mid terrace in excellent condition that alre..."
Rothmore Property are delighted to release a limited number of beautiful off-plan units in an investor development in Salford. This is beautiful high spec development where nothing has been overlooked with the finish of each apartment.
This BRAND NEW development of ***LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS*** offers a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first-century lifestyle in its entirety ***ONLY 20% DEPOSIT REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTORS***
!!!Completed and Ready to Move in!!!Blackfriars Road apartments occupy a prime M3 location in the centre of Salford and Manchester. Bespoke designs and a commitment to the highest quality set these homes apart from the competition. Book a viewing today.
"These beautiful apartments are located within the popular upcoming area of Blackfriars. The accommodation within these flats consists of generous open plan reception rooms, fitted kitchens with integrated appliances including a washer-dryer, and spacious double bedrooms and a large bathroom. All ..."
**STUNNING APARTMENT** ESTIMATED YIELDS UP TO 5%** GORGEOUS VIEWS OF GARDEN WALKWAYS** ESTIMATED COMPLETION Q1 2023** LOCATED IN THE HEART OF MEDIACITYUK**
"ATTENTION ALL INVESTORS BRAND NEW LAUNCH: X1- Michigan Towers Media City, Manchester- New Launch of 1316 residential apartments built by the award winning X1 Developments. Strong Regeneration area and good early bird pricing. 6% Net Return. Fully managed investment with strong price growth potential"
***LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS*** Offering a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first-century lifestyle in its entirety ***ONLY 20% DEPOSIT IS REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTORS***
"The next level in luxe city living, Blackfriars Street apartments occupy a prime riverside location in the very heart of Manchester. These luxurious apartments are ideal for today's market offering larger-than-average apartments and fantastic 5-star hotel-style luxury facilities."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - Luxury 1, 2 & 3 bed apartments set on the banks of the River Irwell in Manchester City Centre. Amenities include STATE OF THE ART GYM, co-working RESIDENTS LOUNGE and RIVERSIDE TERRACES. Parking is available an extra cost."
*** Stunning Semi-Detached Home Situated Within a Much Sought After Location Within Close Proximity of Salford Royal Hospital *** This fabulous traditional semi-detached property offers well-proportioned accommodation ideally suited to modern family lifestyles. and simply must be seen ...
Blackfriars Street apartments occupy a prime riverside location in the very heart of Manchester.
"A well-presented 5 bedroom town house situated on a quaint and sought-after development with superb transport links to the City centre and surrounding towns. In brief, this well-appointed property comprises; an entrance hallway, lounge/bedroom five, modern fitted kitchen/diner and WC to the gr..."
"A Stunning Family Home Occupying A Superior Elevated Position On A Spacious Corner Plot With A Real Sense Of Space. Having been extended, this spacious freehold detached property is ready to move into and must be viewed to be appreciated. This is one not to miss! Located in sought-after area in P..."
"*CITY CENTRE DUPLEX* Have you ever wanted the best of both worlds, having a house and being in the city centre, this property is as close as you can get. A duplex apartment set over two floors with a garage in the heart of the city centre on the doorstep of Spinningfields. A real must see property!"
"Aubrey Lee & Co are pleased to bring to the market this End Terraced three bedroomed house set over four floors, the property requires some general cosmetic updating which has been taken into account with the marketing price. Situated between Griffin Street & Cliff Avenue."
"The next generation of luxury city centre living, This development comprising apartments and various communal facilities for residents offers the perfect opportunity to feel part of a community still within the city centre of Manchester. The development will be completed in 2025. With ..."
"Below-market Manchester investment. Based in a sought-after location with plenty of amenities nearby, generate high interest and attractive returns with these luxury apartments. A164"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this spacious and well-presented three-bedroom detached house located in a highly sought-after area of Salford. The family home has been well looked after over the years, has a large driveway suitable for three cars, a great size rear garden whic..."
"Below Market Value Manchester Investment: Luxury residential apartments, townhouses and duplexes starting at just £275,000, and with a 6% rental yield. A90"
"Welcome to an extremely well presented three-bed townhouse. The property is located within range of a host of amenities, great transport links. Externally the property is impressive and has fantastic kerbside appeal. The property boasts a driveway that provides off-roa..."
"OVER 5% NET YIELD! Mr Investa are pleased to present to the market this 4th Floor, Corner Positioned, 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH PRIVATE BALCONY & PARKING INCLUDED! FULLY FURNISHED."
"Completed Residential Property Available: Ideal Manchester property investment, providing buyers with a minimum annual rental income of £7,797. A1194"
This BRAND NEW development falling at the edge of Manchester's City centre holds LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS. They offer an exceptional range of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first century lifestyle in its entirety. ONLY 20% DEPOSIT REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTOR
Investors only - tenanted until November 2023. Luxury two bedroom apartment with parking included in the highly sought after Leftbank development.
" Located right in the heart of Salford Quays, Millennium Tower combines the hustle and bustle of Media City with the family side of the Quays. Close to an abundance of amenities, it also has a tram stop within very close proximity and easy access to some of Manchester's most iconic walkways ..."
"READY TO MOVE IN TO NOW! A high specification two bedroom apartment, located on the 6th floor of the development which benefits from uninterrupted views from the large floor to ceiling windows. Offering buyers a range of exclusive services and amenities making work, life and play seamless; High D..."
"Q4 2024 Completion. Gym, Cinema, Lounge and Communal Gardens. One, Two and Three bed units available. The perfect opportunity for both investors and owner occupancy."
"** 2 Years 6% Net Assured Rent ** 2 Years Free Lettings and Management ** Completion Q4 2024 ** Stunning Media City Views ** Prime Manchester Location ** Gym, Cinema Room and 24hr Concierge. Parking Available with certain units."
"Peter Anthony are delighted to bring to market this fantastic THREE BEDROOM Victorian terrace on Moorfield Road. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, good size living room with bay fronted windows, second reception room that is currently used as an office, a spacious kitche..."
A VERY SPACIOUS AND CHARACTERFUL FIVE BEDROOM PERIOD TERRACED HOUSE SPREAD OVER FOUR FLOORS.
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented three-bedroom semi-detached house located in a highly sought-after area of Salford. Since completed in 2021, the property has only ever been owner-occupied meaning it has always been perfectly kept, as well as benefitt..."
Offered to the market with no onward chain. C & R City are delighted to bring to the market this well presented two-bedroom apartment situated in Local Crescent. Local Crescent was developed by the renowned developer Salboy and offers its residence a premium living experience with state-of-the-ar...
Found in the centre of Salford; it offers extremely high 6% rental returns at 34% below local comparable prices. Invest today! A217
X1 Michigan Towers captures the essence of city living while offering the very best of a tranquil quayside location. Whatever your mood you will not struggle to find something to keep you entertained or relaxed after a long day. The stunning exterior and interior design makes an impression to all...
Manchester riverside apartments in a prime city centre location. Generate 6% rental returns and high growth with this buy to let investment. A163
High Rental Returns: A below market value investment opportunity in an ideally located Salford area. A1193
"Salford Quays Waterfront Apartments: Developed in collaboration with a local award-winning development company, with a strong portfolio in residential property, these apartments will offer 6% rental returns. A89"
Chic apartments completed in Salford near to Manchester city centre with 6% rental returns. A627
"*** No Chain Involved - Simply Must Be Viewed *** Stunning Extended Traditional Semi-Detached Family Home With Exceptionally Well Proportioned Living Space, Private Landscaped Gardens, Ample Parking And Situated within a Much Sought After Residential Location *** Situated ..."
**No Onward Chain** C & R City are delighted to present this beautiful two bedroom property in the prestigious Leftbank Development. Leftbank is the only prestigious apartment block within the highly sought after Spinningfields district of the city centre. This tenth floor rear aspect apartment i...
"Affinity Living Riverside is a newly completed building forming part of an exclusive development situated in a prime city centre location with tranquil waterside appeal. The bustling city of Manchester is on your doorstep with its famous shopping facilities, bars, restaurants, and various hot spo..."
A Reconfigured Unique and Deceptively Spacious Family Home Massively Reduced by Motivated Sellers ... definitely worth a viewing !!  … situated in the highly sought-after location of the family-friendly Nightingale Gardens estate     (that is built on the grounds of the f...
"Spacious 2 Bedroom Media City Apartment ** 2 Years 6% Net Assured Rent ** 2 Years Free Lettings and Management ** Completion Q4 2024 ** Stunning Media City Views ** Prime Manchester Location ** Gym, Cinema Room and 24hr Concierge. Parking Available with certain units."
"An 8th floor well presented Two Double Bedroom Two Bath Apartment with Views over the Quays in the Heart of MediaCity UK. , Balcony with Water views,No Chain, Leasehold property ."
*** EXCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT*** ***HIGH SPECIFICATION*** ***AMAZING TRANSPORT CONNECTIONS*** ***CENTRAL MEDIACITYUK LOCATION***
"This spacious and modern apartment is nestled next to the city centre, just a short 10 minute walk away from the Northern Quarter and Victoria Train Station. This development offers an onsite gym, concierge and communal lounge."
"Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this exceptional 5th floor two-bedroom apartment perfect for entertaining, benefits from a superb roof terrace over 700 sqft, of additional space and wrap around balcony area extending around the Living/kitchen/dining area. The apartment briefly compr..."
"EWS1 Certified. A beautifully presented, 2nd floor character apartment of approx 893 sq ft in landmark development/conversion, The Dock Office. High specification, tastefully appointed interior with custom built kitchen with integral Siemens appliances. Two secure designated parking spaces."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOOM TOWN HOUSE SPREAD OVER THREE FLOORS *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, FAMILIES, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM, DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM, FAMILY BATHROOM & MASTER BEDROOM EN SUITE *** CLOSE TO ..."
"Local Blackfriar is a super high-tech and incredibly high standard purpose built development in Salford created by Salboy. Approximatlyn725 sq ft. of sheer outstanding luxury living , open plan hallway to a vast living area with a high-tech fitted kitchen and balcony off. Two double bedrooms wit..."
"STUNNING THREE BED SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, FAMILIES, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION *** CLOSE TO AN ARRAY OF LOCAL AMENITIES *** EASY ACCESS TO A580 STRAIGHT INTO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE ..."
"Waterhouse are proud to present this stunning large one bedroom apartment in the New development of Local Crescent. A desirable development with on site concierge, indoor heated swimming pool, steam room, saunas, gym, laundry room, cinema, the list goes on in such an exclusive development. "
***LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS*** Offering a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first-century lifestyle in its entirety **ONLY 20% DEPOSIT REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTORS***
"Sell Well Are Excited To Bring To The Market This Spacious Freehold Extended Semi-Detached House With Three Double Bedrooms. Located in a highly desirable area of Salford within walking distance of Salford Royal Hospital. With a full width, double storey extension to the rear there is bags of spa..."
"A lovely three bedroom bay fronted period semi detached family home. The property is situated close to excellent schools, plenty of places to shop and many bus routes that will provide quick access into the City Centre. This fabulous three bedroom property is well presente..."
This ideally located two bedroom apartment in Greengate is perfect for professionals working in Manchester's thriving city centre.
Offered for sale with NO CHAIN.
Fabulous Three Storey Town House in a highly desirable area of Prestwich/Salford approx 1205s q feet.
"X1 Platinum Tower is an iconic new tower development at the very heart of the MediaCityUK. We are following on from the success of X1 Media City, our first development at the UK's leading digital and media centre."
BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT | RESIDENTIAL APARTMENTS: MediaCityUK investment opportunity. X1 Media City Tower 4 includes a selection of spacious studio apartments across the 26 floors of this development in one of the UK's best buy-to-let markets.
Imperial Gardens 5% NET RETURNS - MEDIA CITY - BOUTIQUE DEVELOPMENT - 20 UNITS AVAILABLE - EXCLUSIVE TO ROTHMORE PROPERTY - Don't miss out - Enquire NOW for more details.
"Stunning two bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 22nd floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, open plan living/dining/kitchen area with fully fitted and integrated kitchen, modern bathroom with power shower..."
"ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH PARKING. An excellent, very spacious one bedroom apartment in the prestigious Leftbank development. Located in the heart of Manchester, Spinningfields is a vibrant destination with international fashion brands, restaurants and bars, serving both an affluent business and..."
"LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES with ***Unbeatable Rental NET Yields of 10.72%*** THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS."
"Stunning two bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 15th floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, open plan living/dining/kitchen area with fully fitted and integrated kitchen, modern bathroom with power shower..."
Luxury LARGE penthouse studio apartment in X1 The Campus Block A for sale. Close to Salford University and great transport links into the city. Cash Buyers only please. 
"MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME Ascend Properties are delighted to offer this stunning two bedroom apartment on the 5th floor in the amazing Blackfriars development. The next level in luxe city living, Local Blackfriars is a gated community comprising 380 apartments, townhouses and pen..."
"O'Connor Bowden are proud to offer this stunning 2 bedroom property in Local Crescent, taking high end city living to new heights. Located within the newly developed Salford Crescent, this is a development with no equal. Encompassing all aspects of modern living, the development is built very muc..."
"LARGE TERRANCE - EWS1 certificate in place - A most appealing tenth floor city facing two bedroom apartment for SALE in the highly sought after Abito building, Salford Quays. Includes 1 x parking space. This apartment is creatively designed making the most of the light and space with ..."
"This impressive, extra large design, top/2nd floor apartment has electric heating, uPVC double glazing, intercom entry and alarm system. The apartment has been refurbished and has an attractive separate kitchen and a large bathroom. There is exclusive use of a designated garage."
**RECENTLY RENOVATED** **PACK YOUR BAGS AND MOVE IN** **DOWNSTAIRS WC** **ULTRA MODERN KITCHEN** **INTEGRATED APPLIANCES** Immaculately presented family home in an ideal location. This property won't be around for long so call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND B. EPC GRADE D.
"Brand new 2 bedroom apartment in the heart of Media City. Great transport into Manchester City Centre, and being in Salford Quays provides plenty of open space, fresh air and a gorgeous view over the River Irwell."
"A stunning three bedroom extended semi-detached family home in a popular area with NO CHAIN. This property is located on a quiet cul-de-sac in Pendlebury and is close to good local schools, amenities and the transport network. This fabulous extended three bedroom semi-detac..."
"Premier Residential Lettings is proud to bring to market this third floor furnished 2 bed property in the impressive Local Crescent development, Salford."
"OVER 5% NET YIELD!! GREAT LOCATION! A stunning buy-to-let investment property with THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS & A PARKING SPACE! Located on the 4th floor of this impressive development. Ideally positioned within walking distance to Manchester City Centre and a short distance to Salford ..."
"Peter Anthony are delighted to bring to market this fantastic THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED property situated on Princeton Close. The property comprises of an entrance hall with a downstairs WC, a spacious living room, kitchen diner, two double bedrooms, a third smaller room which could ..."
"Do Not Miss This Outstanding Extended Freehold Semi Detached In Swinton! Sell Well are delighted to offer for sale this truly gorgeous semi-detached, just off Lancaster Road. The vendors have gone to great lengths to present a beautiful family home which really does have a lovely feel to it and t..."
"* PERFECT FOR FAMILIES & FIRST TIME BUYERS ALIKE! * Well presented throughout, & IDEALLY LOCATED in a POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA, this FANTASTIC MODERN..."
"AN OUTSTANDING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME With an abundance of indoor and outdoor space, neutral decor and being beautifully presented throughout, this fantastic three bedroom semi detached property is being proudly welcomed to the market in the highly regarded location of S..."
"***Investors only*** - 999 Year Lease - Completing 2024 - 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments available - Experienced developer & Construction Team - An area perfect for High Rental Yields and huge Capital Growth potential! X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagshi..."
Beautiful two double bedroom apartment in the desirable Local Blackfriars development.
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this seventh floor, courtyard facing, two-bedroom, one bathroom apartment. Situated in the EWS1 approved and prestigious development 'The Edge’ Perfectly located on the doorstep of Manchester City centre. With Deansgate in walking distance. The p..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this two double bedroom terrace house located on Evans Street, which is a lovely and quiet pedestrianised street only a 5-minute walk from Manchester City Centre. The spacious property is being sold with no onward chain, has a large rear garden w..."
"*** ATTENTION INVESTORS / PRICES FROM £199,995 UPWARDS / AWARD WINNING DEVELOPER WITH 36 COMPLETED PROJECTS / SERVICE CHARGE £1.88 SQ FT / GROUND RENT £395 PER ANNUM / 1, 2 AND 3 BEDROOM APARTMENTS AVAILABLE / SET FOR COMPLETION Q1 2023 / LOCATED IN THE HEART OF MEDIA CITY & SALFORD QUAYS / 10 MI..."
MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME due to mortgage companies lending criteria amendments following the Building Safety Act 2022. Full Funding from Developer in Place. A fantastic apartment with views over the financial district at Spinningfields and a location close to a great selection of cosmo...
"Stylish student investment property with 6% yields. Invest in a desirable Manchester location from just £100,000.A1152"
Postcode M5 4YG. 2 beds 2 baths furnished. Well established area for young working professionals.
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline. Our new development features four iconic towers, each with unique façades with a stunning architectural design."
Completed - 999 years leasehold - New Build - Tripple Aspect - Floor to Ceiling Windows
7th Floor 2-Bed Apartment with CANAL VIEW BALCONY in the One Regent development. Communal Garden. 678 Sq Ft. EWS1 Form Available. Subject to Contract. EWS1 B1 Rated. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Available to both Investors and Owner-Occupants. Projected 5.45% Rental Yield @ &pou...
"Below-market Manchester investment. Based in a sought-after location with plenty of amenities nearby, generate high interest and attractive returns with these luxury apartments. A153"
A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DORMER BUNGALOW ON A GENEROUS PLOT.
"For Sale By Online Auction. Starting Bid £275,000. Terms and conditions apply. We welcome to the market this two bedroom luxury apartment is available within the Prestigious NV Building on Salford Quays. The apartment is finished to the highest of standard and was developed by the re-owne..."
"Located in M3 in the heart of the city, just an 8-minute walk to Manchester Victoria Station. A216"
"A FANTASTIC, THREE BEDROOMED HOME WITH ENVIABLE GARDENS, ON A SUPERB SIZED PLOT WITH PARKING."
BUY TO LET/ COMPLETING SOON / CONTACT US FOR MORE DETAILS/ Stunning Manchester development located a short 10 minute walk from the city centre district of Spinningfields. 
"Ideally Located Salford Investment Opportunity: Situated within an enviable part of Salford, where over £1 billion is being invested into regeneration projects, including MediaCityUK, this property development is not one to be missed. A88"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this three-bedroom semi-detached house located on Longmead Road in a highly sought-after area of Salford. The spacious property was fully renovated back in 2014, has a good size yard to the rear with outbuildings for storage, two large reception ..."
"Luxurious Manchester Property Development: Offering investors a 6% rental return, this northern property investment is designed to an extremely high standard. A28"
"A much sought-after waterfront development designed with the modern professional in mind. Prices from £210,000 for a 1-bed! 34% below local comparable prices. A215"
10% DISCOUNTED WITH 7% YIELD! HEATED SWIMMING POOL & SAUNA & SPA & GYM & CINEMA ROOM! 2nd Floor 2-Bed Apartment WITH BALCONY in the POPULAR Crescent development. 699 Sq Ft. Subject to Contract. EWS1 A2 Rated. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Available to both Investors and...
"*** Internal Viewing A Must - Fabulous Extended Traditional Semi-Detached Home With Superb Living Space, Private Landscaped Gardens, Extensive Driveway Parking and Detached Garage, Situated Within a Popular and Highly Convenient Residential Setting *** Situated within the much sought a..."
"**AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE AND CASH BUYERS** A stunning modern two-bedroom 4th floor apartment offering a private terrace. In addition to 2 large double bedrooms, this property offers 2 bathrooms one of which is en-suite. An extremely bright and beautiful contemporary interior co..."
" 17th floor fully furnished apartment, 3 bedrooms with stunning views, local amenities nearby. "
"A STUNNING SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A CONVENIENT LOCATION, SOLD WITH NO CHAIN DELAY! Flowing internally with neutrally finished, contemporary styled interiors, this three-bedroom, semi-detached family home is being welcomed to the property market in the heart of a popular and conveni..."
"***BRAND NEW LAUNCH*** ***FANTASTIC INVESTOR OPPORTUNITY*** X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline."
"A fabulous three bedroom semi-detached home on a sought after estate. Located on the popular Westwood estate in Swinton and close to good local schools, amenities and the transport network. This lovely three bedroom semi-detached property offers excellent family living ac..."
" Two double bedroom + 2 bathrooms apartment situated in the superb downtown development. The apartment briefly comprises: spacious living area, contemporary kitchen with range of appliances, large double bedroom and a superb bathroom. "
"*** Fabulous Traditional Four Storey Period Terraced Home With Superb Versatile Living Space of Approx 1,958 Square Feet, Gardens Front and Rear, Off Road Parking and With No Chain Involved, Situated Within a Much Sought After Location *** Situated in an enviable spot overlooking the..."
Ideal family home | Well presented throughout | Detatched | 3 Bedrooms | 2 Reception rooms | Sought-after location | Easy access to Manchester City Centre | Approx 3 miles to Manchester | Close to Schools. EPC C.
EWS1 form with A2 rating - Fantastic location - Immaculately presented - Upgraded throughout - Top floor - Floor to ceiling windows - Two double bedrooms - Two bathrooms - Balcony - Walking distance to Salford Central train station - Stone throw to Deansgate - Vacant possession
"STOP! Just a FIVE MINUTE WALK TO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE, with OFF-ROAD PARKING and a LARGE, PRIVATE GARDEN is this THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME!"
Are you looking for a property you can pack your bags and move into? Well LOOK NO FURTHER! This three bedroom semi-detached property may just be the one!
"***CELLARS***4 BEDROOM***IN NEED OF MODERNISATION*** This 4 bedroom end terraced home is offered with no onward chain. This spacious property comprises of entrance hallway, a front lounge with large bay window, a rear reception room and a fitted kitchen with access to the paved rear ga..."
Stunning Manchester development located a short 10 minute walk from the city centre district of Spinningfields
"EWS1 Form in Place Mortgage Buyers Welcome The ultimate in luxury waterside living, Downtown is one of the most desirable and sought-after residences within the Manchester locality. Standing out from other City Centre apartment developments, Downtown has been inspired by li..."
Luxury 2 double bedroom apartment in the desirable Leftbank development on the banks on the River Irwell. Enviably located in the heart of the Spinningfields business and leisure district and offering a good investment opportunity. Further benefits include a good-sized balcony and concierge facil...
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *TURN KEY* Stunning new student property ideally located for the University of Salford. The home has been fully renovated and offers 4 high quality en-suite rooms with a communal Lounge and Kitchen. Fully furnished to a high standard and with tenancy in situ fro
"Two bedroom apartment for sale in the stunning new Michigan Towers development. Overlooking the Salford Quays and MediacityUK district in Manchester, Michigan Towers represents an exceptional buy to let investment opportunity. "
C & R City are pleased to bring to the market this fabulous two bedroom fourth floor apartment in the extremely popular Vimto Gardens development. Being just minutes away from Deansgate and Spinningfields this property is ideal for the inner city worker or the commuter with great transport links ...
"EWS1 Form In Place. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. A spacious two bedroom top floor penthouse apartment of the ever popular Fusion development. Boasting over 900 square foot of internal space coupled with a secure designated parking space and a mass of outside space, the apartment leaves lit..."
"This two bedroom apartment benefits from a high specification throughout, with the addition of a private balcony, with water views. Ideally located and with a range of bars, restaurants and other amenities on site; Media City UK neighbours with the BBC, ITV and University of Salford. As well as..."
"Cash Purchasers Only! Located in the modern Adelphi Wharf. With three double bedrooms, including master with an ensuite shower room and an open plan living and kitchen area. Fully fitted and integrated kitchen. Other benefits include secure underground parking, outside balcony overloo..."
A fantastic twelfth floor two bedroom two bathroom apartment located in Salford Quays benefiting from stunning views across the Quays with allocated car parking.
"***COMPLETED DEVELOPMENT*** NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS. THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS,SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. Rental Net Yields of 10.72%"
Salford Apartments with 6% rental returns 900m from Spinningfields business district. A472
5% NET RETURNS - MEDIA CITY - BOUTIQUE DEVELOPMENT - 20 UNITS AVAILABLE - EXCLUSIVE TO ROTHMORE PROPERTY - Don't miss out - Enquire NOW for more details.
"*For a limited time get up to £10,000 Deposit contribution, or choose a stylish Furniture pack for your brand new Home, along with up to £5000 Deposit Contribution.* Spacious 2 bed Apartments Remaining at The Boathouse, in the Heart of Salford Quays, a new and exciting Development just a stone..."
"A fantastic corner position two bedroom apartment located on the 10th floor within the Number One building at MediaCity:UK, Salford Quays. The property boasts a full width balcony providing stunning views of the Media City Plaza and skyline beyond"
"The Boathouse is an Exciting new Development in the popular Salford Quays Area *Up to £10,000 deposit contribution available for a limited time at The Boathouse!*"
**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND CASH BUYERS** This stunning development offers investors and end users an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Yield of up to 6% NET and managed by a leading management company in Manchester.
"EWS1 available - Mortgages invited! This immaculately presented fifth floor apartment enjoys two bedrooms, two bathrooms and excellent transport links. Situated within this popular modern development, residents benefit from a concierge, gym, bookable cinema room, meeting rooms and bike store..."
"**SPANNING OVER FOUR FLOORS** **IMMACULATE THROUGHOUT** **CLOSE TO BUILE HILL PARK AND SALFORD QUAYS** Take a look at this stunning five bedroomed, detached property which has been finished to a very high standard and would not fail to impress any kind of buyer. EPC GRADE E"
***COMPLETION Q4 2024*** ***STUNNING VIEWS***.***PRIME LOCATION*** ***CONTEMPORARY MEDIACITYUK LIVING***
"SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME FOR SALE! FOUR BEDROOM SEMII DETACHED HOUSE LOCATED CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS, SHOPS AND TRANSPORT LINKS."
"*** Spectacular 20th Floor Luxury Penthouse Apartment Situated within a Breath-Taking Development on the Fringe of Manchester City Centre, With Well Proportioned Living Space and With The Added Benefit of No Chain *** This stunning development is situated where Salford meets Mancheste..."
"2 Bedroom, 2 Bathroom Property for Sale, Tenant in place - Great investment opportunity in Manchester City Centre."
"A stunning three bedroom, semi detached dorma bungalow with amazing views. Situated in a popular and convenient location in Clifton. The property enjoys an elevated position and has lovely views over Clifton Country Park and The Irwell Valley. The property is also ideally located fo..."
"A well presented three bedroom modern family home in Salford, Manchester. Located on a new development within an easy distance to Manchester City Centre and Salford University. Levens Street is ideal for those looking for convenience and excellent transport links. This mod..."
"City Centre living, with private balcony providing magnificent views and an allocated parking space! This well presented 3 bedroom apartment is situated on the 8th floor and comprises large 'T' shaped entrance hall, leading to the open plan kitchen/lounge/dining area. 3 bedrooms and a family bat..."
" *** INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** The RENTAL INCOME is £1350 PCM / £16,200 PA, representing a 6.2% YIELD. CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED UNTILNOVEMBER 2023. Wilburn Basin is a highly sought after modern development located within walking distance to Castlefield and Sp..."
"Aubrey Lee & Co are happy to bring to the market this 3 bedroom mid terraced house located in a much sought after area off Leicester Road, local shops, schools, transport links and places of worship are all within easy access. The property is currently tenanted but can be sold with vacant possession"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached house in a highly sought-after Salford location. The property has been extended to the rear, has a driveway for off-road parking, a good size rear garden, has recently had a brand-new roof fitted and is ..."
"SALFORD QUAYS WATERFRONT VIEWS! CASH BUYER ONLY. 2-Bed Apartment WITH PARKING in the City Lofts development. No EWS1 Form Available. Cash Buyer Only. Available to both Investors and Owner-Occupants. Tenanted rolling contract £1,300 per month Lease Info: 250 Ye..."
"Occupying a sought after position on the 2nd floor overlooking the waterfront of St Louis Basin to the rear, an extensive refurbished purpose built apartment with combi gas central heating boiler system, UPVC double glazing and designated garage. Impressive accommodation."
"AN IMMACULATE TWO BEDROOM PROPERTY ON A SOUGHT AFTER ESTATE IN PENDLEBURY If you are looking to find the perfect family home then look no further. This property is immaculately presented with two spacious bedrooms, an open plan kitchen and dining room, a spacious living room and a good s..."
"Hunters in Manchester are delighted to present this amazing two bedroom apartment in the highly desirable Alto development. The property briefly comprises of two generously sized double bedrooms, with the primary bedroom benefitting from an en suite shower room. There is a spacious open plan livi..."
"This EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED property is ideally located within WALKING DISTANCE OF SALFORD ROYAL HOSPITAL! An ideal family home, benefitting from a series of renovations within the past five years, including a new kitchen, partial new windows, a new bathroom and conservatory!"
"Pure Investor are delighted to present X1 The Gateway, Manchester. With a sleek, modern design, a luxurious finish and set in a desirable location; this unit boasts 2 bedrooms, 2 bathrooms, stunning views across the Quays and a car parking space."
"Back to Market: This completed development offers luxury investment properties from the below market value price of £174,995. Just 0.4 miles from Manchester Piccadilly station, they are in a prime area of the city centre. A1164"
"*£10,000 Deposit Contribution Available at The Boathouse Apartments* Spacious 2 Bed Apartments Available now in the Heart of Salford Quays!"
"A property with views like no other. Beyond Property are proud to present a fabulous two-bedroom luxury apartment located on the twenty-second floor in this spectacular waterside development The Heart, MediaCity. This unique two double bedroom apartment has high specification t..."
A stunning two bedroom apartment located on the 13th floor of the Heart Development at MediaCityUK Salford Quays. The apartment occupies an enviable position with fantastic skyline views and further benefits from a large balcony.
"EWS1 approved - Hunters Manchester are delighted to introduce for sale this beautiful one bedroom apartment in The Edge with superb river views Right in the heart of the city, a 60 second walk to Deansgate, the hub of Manchester`s shopping and night life. Enjoy the cultures of Manchester includi..."
"Sell Well are excited to offer for sale this impressive, spacious semi-detached house with a superior corner plot position! Enter into a welcoming entrance hall with stairs to the first floor and access to the dining room, kitchen and WC. A lovely dining room with bay window is open to a spacious..."
EWS1 CERTIFIED *VIEWS VIEWS *FUL LENGTH BALCONY* BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT COMPLETED MAY 2022. 19th Floor. Open plan kitchen / lounge - Dinner  & 2 Bedrooms with both with balcony & views across Salford Quays. 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS
"Stunning two bedroom apartment at The Edge on the banks of the River Irwell. This property offers a private terrace and a secure allocated car parking space, 24 hour concierge and EWS1 form in place. The area around Clowes Street is primarily residential, with a mix of housing,..."
"Located in 'The Edge', one of the city centre's most desirable apartment blocks is this TWO BEDROOM apartment with views over the River Irwell. EWS1 certified (B1) - Offered with no onward chain this would be an ideal purchase for any first time buyer, professional couple or buy to let investor. "
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Attention Investors Rented at £1250 pcm until September 2023 Providing a 5.9% Yield. Wilburn Basin is positioned where Manchester meets Salford, a 5 minute stroll from Castlefield district of Manchester City Centre. As the name would ..."
"***BRAND NEW LAUNCH*** FANTASTIC Investor Opportunity! X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline. X1's new development features four iconic towers, each with a unique and stunning architectural design, located in Media City UK."
***BRAND NEW LAUNCH*** ***FANTASTIC INVESTOR OPPORTUNITY*** ***FLAGSHIP DEVELOPMENT***
"Do Not Miss This Outstanding Extended Freehold Semi Detached In Swinton! Sell Well are delighted to offer for sale this truly gorgeous semi-detached, just off Barton Road. It is rare that properties are presented to such a high standard and the vendors have gone to great lengths to present a beau..."
"Merchants Quay is arguably one of the best locations with the highly coveted Salford Quays. The home of Media City UK the BBC , ITV the award winning Lowry Theatre and Outlet Mall and just awesome to live. This dual aspect ground floor apartment is immaculate and faces the more favoured water asp..."
BENTLEY HURST ARE PROUD TO PRESENT THIS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED ON BUCKFIELD AVENUE IN SALFORD. PERFECTLY LOCATED BETWEEN SALFORD QUAYS AND MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE BOTH WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF THE PROPERTY TO ENJOY ALL OF THE AMENITIES THEY HAVE TO OFFER AS WELL AS AMAZING ...
A fabulous three bedroom semi-detached family home. Situated on a lovely estate just off Manchester Road and being ideally positioned for the areas fantastic amenities and transport links and also within close proximity to Clifton Country Park. This stunning three bedroom s...
"EWS1 IN PLACE B1 RATING Currently tenanted at £1300 PCM until June 22nd 2022 This superb apartment makes an ideal investment being minutes from the city centre and Salford Quays. In brief the property comprises of : Entrance hallway, living area with open plan ki..."
"*IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR A PERFECT HOME FOR OWNER OCCUPIERS - CURRENTLY RENTED AT £1400PCM* Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this stunning TWO BED TWO BATH apartment on the third floor in The Bridge, just a stones throw away from Deansgate and Spinningfields. The apa..."
"FANTASTIC DETACHED FAMILY HOME features 3 GENEROUS BEDROOMS and a family bathroom to the first floor, whilst the ground floor comprises of an entrance..."
You won't find deals like these ones in the area; our prices are 34% below local comparable prices! Request a free virtual tour today! A214
"This extended semi-detached True Bungalow located within a desirable area of Clifton. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, shower room, two bedrooms and a loft room. Further benefits include gas central heating, double glazing driveway ..."
Manchester riverside apartments in a prime city centre location. Generate 6% rental returns and high growth with this buy to let investment. A152
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT! Three-bedroom, two-bath, 9th floor luxury apartment in X1 Media City Tower 1, Salford Quays."
"*** Fabulous Extended Traditional Three Storey Terraced Home With Wonderful Versatile Living Space, Gardens Front and Rear, Off Road Parking and With No Chain Involved, Situated Within a Much Sought After Location *** Situated in an superb location overlooking the open spaces of Vict..."
"Occupying a superb position overlooking Central Bay & Mariners Canal, a well presented, brightly appointed, 2nd floor apartment with electric heating, double glazing and designated garage. Ideal for owner occupier or property investor with rental potential of £1,000 to £1,050 pcm (f)"
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this second floor, courtyard facing, two-bedroom, one bathroom apartment. Situated in the EWS1 approved and prestigious development 'The Edge’ Perfectly located on the doorstep of Manchester City centre. With Deansgate in walking distance. The pr..."
"Located On A Quiet Cul-De-Sac Walking Distance To Media City, The Lowry And Manchester City Centre Is This Three Double Bedroom, Modern Freehold Property! Enter into a spacious versatile L shaped open plan living and dining room with space for a possible home office or children's play area wi..."
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Stunning 17th floor apartment in the luxury City Loft development perfectly located in the heart of Salford Quays. The property offers 2 double bedrooms, ensuite and main bathroom together with Juliet balcony offering stunning views over MediaCity and beyond. A secure alloc..."
"STOP! Take a look at this SPACIOUS and EXTENDED FAMILY HOME that benefits from a WRAP-AROUND single storey extension to the ground floor almost doubling the living space on offer in this great home. The property features a two-car driveway, downstairs W.C, open plan kitchen diner and available wi..."
SALFORD QUAYS WATERFRONT VIEWS! 7% RENTAL YIELD! CASH BUYER ONLY. 2-Bed Apartment WITH PARKING in the City Lofts development. 775 Sq Ft. Subject to Contract. No EWS1 Form Available. Cash Buyer Only. Available to both Investors and Owner-Occupants. Currently 7.20% Rental Yiel...
"DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE IN THE HEART OF SALFORD! Well maintained, this beautiful three bedroom, mid terraced home is being proudly welcomed to the market in the heart of Salford. This is the perfect family home. This property boasts three bright bedrooms, a living ..."
**FOUR BED HMO** **SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU** **£1906.68PCM RENTAL INCOME INC BILLS** **SINGLE TENANCY AGREEMENT** **CLOSE TO SALFORD UNIVERSITY** A great opportunity to purchase a working small HMO. Call now to book your viewing. COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D.
A beautiful corner apartment set on the seventh floor with city views. 
"Hunters Worsley are excited to bring to the market this excellent investment property generating a total yield of 6.4% based on asking price. The building has a monthly income of £1350 and includes a ground floor cafe & a one bedroom duplex apartment with converted loft room, benefiting from cont..."
A stunning two bedroom apartment located on the 16th floor of the Heart Development at MediaCityUK Salford Quays. The apartment occupies an enviable position with fantastic skyline views and further benefits from a large balcony.
"**CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** **TO BE SOLD WITH TENANTS IN-SITU** **ACHIEVING £1,700PCM** **CLOSE TO WEASTE METROLINK** Are you an investor looking for a small HMO without the hassle of finding new tenants? Well take a look at this four bedroom, mid terrace in excellent condition that already ..."
SPACIOUS FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - TWO BATHROOMS - UNDERFLOOR HEATING - EXTERIOR GARAGE - CALL BELVOIR TODAY!
"EWS1 form available - B1 rating. A superb 2 bedroom apartment located in the landmark Heart building boasting spectacular views over Salford Quays and far beyond. The apartment consists of entrance hall, open plan living/kitchen with wraparound balcony, 2 bedrooms (1 ensuite) and a separate bathr..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000*"
"Request Free Info Pack Today! These ultra-modern apartments offer a high rental yield of 6%, meaning you could be earning a projected rental income starting from £10,797.A213"
"Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this beautiful 9th floor one bedroom apartment has an excellent wrap around balcony, and is superbly presented throughout. There is wooden flooring throughout, lovely fully fitted kitchen with appliances, open plan lounge with access to the balcony. ..."
"Stunning two bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 23rd floor with stunning views across Manchester and comprises laminated flooring throughout, open plan living/dining/kitchen area with fully fitted and integrated kitch..."
"CASH BUYER ONLY. Off-plan Luxury Apartment completing 2024, offering a FREE furniture pack and 6% Rental Return. State-of-the-art facilities, residents gym and spa. Located in one of Manchester's most up and coming areas, Greengate. Enquire for further details."
"We are proud to offer for sale this 2 bedroom 2 bathroom apartment which offers a stylish interior, this lovely apartment located on the mid floor of this new development. Wilburn Basin is a highly sought after modern development located within walking distance to Castlefield and Spinni..."
BRAND NEW APARTMENT WITH > 6.5% RENTAL YIELD! 5th Floor 1-Bed Apartment WITH STUNNING INTERIORS in the BRAND NEW Fifty5ive development. 419 Sq Ft. Fully Furnished. Gym & Cinema Room & Top Floor Roof Terrace. EWS1 Form Available. 
"AN ENVIABLE, STYLISH THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY Having been presented and maintained to the highest standard throughout with immaculate presentation, spacious rooms and modern fixtures and fittings, this enviable three bedroom property is being proudly welcomed to the market in the highly r..."
"Mr Investa are delighted to offer this STUNNING TWO BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM CORNER/DUAL ASPECT APARTMENT WITH WATER VIEWS & PARKING located on the 9th floor of this impressive development. Offering immediate income, this makes the perfect addition to any investment portfolio. EWS1 Form in place."
"WOW! A simply STUNNING two double bedroom, two bathroom, 21st floor CORNER POSITIONED apartment featuring dual aspect South-East facing windows with views over The Quays & Manchester City Centre. This beautifully presented apartment is available for investors and owner occupiers alike."
"*** EWS1 FIRE SAFETY CERTIFICATE IN PLACE - SUITABLE FOR MORTGAGE PURCHASERS *** 2 BED APARTMENT. An excellent, spacious two bedroom apartment at Rivergate House, Wilburn Basin. Located on the inner ring road, only a short walk to Spinningfields, Castlefield & Deansgate. *** VIDEO VIEWING AVA..."
Tenanted Investment opportunity with no onward chain in Media City.
"St.LAWRNCE QUAY, TWO BEDROOMS, GROUND FLOOR, TENANTED, PARKING, LEASEHOLD,"
CANAL VIEW! 2nd Floor 2-Bed Apartment in the Riverside Lowry Wharf development. 624 Sq Ft. Fully Furnished. PARKING. 24-Hour Concierge. EWS1 Form Available. Available to both Investors and Owner-Occupants. Currently 4.78% Rental Yield @ £995 PCM.
"For investment only tenanted until August 2022 achieving £1225 PCM. Lancaster House in Whitworth Street, Manchester, England, is a former packing and shipping warehouse built between 1905 and 1910 for Lloyd's Packing Warehouses Limited, which had, by merger, become the dominant commerc..."
"Are you looking for a THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME, within WALKING DISTANCE OF SALFORD ROYAL HOSPITAL? Well LOOK NO FURTHER! Ideally situated close to ex..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - Four bed HMO in a fantastic location. The property has undergone a full renovation to create this stunning property. The property in brief benefits from a spacious open plan dining/living area, four bedrooms, a shower room and separate toilet. The property is let for ..."
"A perfect opportunity to purchase this 3-bedroom home which is ideally located within easy reach of local amenities and transport links. The home benefits from gardens to the front and rear, as well as a useful outhouse. Internally the property is well presented with a light and airy living..."
"WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 9%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1830+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the skyline. This development features four iconic towers, each with unique facades with a stunning design. Each tower is set within a modern landscaped public realm, which features cafe spaces, restaura..."
"Just a short walk from Salford Quays/Media City, with excellent transport links to the City Centre is this STYLISH THREE BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE! This well-presented home is a credit to its current owner, featuring a modern fitted kitchen and an enclosed south facing terrace"
"3 Bedroom Apartment, 2 bath in Walker House, Saltra just off Ordsall Lane with Parking . location next to Exchange Quay Metro Stop, Nisa Supermarket and minutes walk to the Salford Quays. Available NOW No Chain.Leasehold Property. Viewing Essential"
"Exclusive Greengate Manchester apartments starting from just £210,000 - view floor plans today! A212"
**TO BE SOLD BY MODERN AUCTION - T&C's APPLY** **ONLINE BIDDING** **SUBJECT TO RESERVE PRICE** **BUYER FEES APPLY** Are you an investor looking for a property to turn into a HMO? Or a family that has outgrown their home? Well look no further as this four bed mid terrace would be perfect for y...
"CASH BUYERS ONLY, NO EWS1 CERT-FULL FUNDING FOR WORKS APPROVED A RARE AND UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A STUNNING DUPLEX APARTMENT FACING SALFORD QUAYS WATERFRONT WITH VIEWS TO MANCHESTER UNITED. UNDER GROUND PARKING, TENANTED, LEASEHOLD. *WATCH THE WALK THOUGH VIDEO*"
"This deceptively spacious property is ideally located in the Broughton area of Salford within easy walking distance of local shops, schools and places of worship. The accommodation on offer comprises briefly an entrance hallway, lounge with double glazed bay window to the front, good sized d..."
"A modern three bedroom family home in a popular area. Situated on a quiet, residential road within the popular Unity Quarter development in Salford, this wonderful semi detached property boasts a double driveway and is presented in immaculate condition. Manchester City Centre is ..."
" Clive Anthony are pleased to offer for sale this spacious and contemporary three bedroom semi detached family home. Located in a very desirable residential area with superb access into Manchester City Centre. Comprising of an entrance hall, downstairs WC, an attractive lounge and spacious open ..."
"Just a stone’s throw from Buile Hill park is this SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM PERIOD PROPERTY! With three large double bedrooms, a modern kitchen, separate utility and an abundance of space, this would be an IDEAL family home or investment!"
"6% Rental Returns: Luxurious Greater Manchester one, two and three-bedroom apartments, townhouses and duplex units starting from £275,000. A lucrative buy to let residential investment opportunity in a thriving northern city.A87"
"FIRST HOMES SCHEME AVAILABLE! This stunning two bedroom apartment is located on the 10th floor of the development and benefits from North facing views from the large floor to ceiling windows. High Definition is a fantastic new development in the heart of Media City UK. Offering buyers, a range..."
"Amazing location within 400m of Deansgate, opposite the Lowry Hotel, a unique rooftop penthouse apartment with terrace. The apartment is approx. 667 sq ft (62m²) with a rooftop terrace of 204 sq ft. Ideal for owner occupier or property investor with a rental potential of approx. £1200 to &p..."
**CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** **NEEDS MODERNISATION** **AMAZING POTENTIAL** Have you been searching for a property that needs work where you can completely transform into something amazing? EPC GRADE E
Downtown Asset Management present this opportunity to purchase a BRAND NEW spacious two double bedroom two bathroom apartment situated on the 2nd Floor of the newly completed DOWNTOWN development. The apartment briefly comprises; spacious living area open plan living area with floor to ceiling wi...
"For Sale With No Chain! Do Not Miss This Spacious End-Terrace Period Home That Is Ready To Move Into. This property is traditional, full of character and in a prime location just off Station Road in Swinton. Close to amenities, schools, parks and excellent commuter links on the doorstep making it..."
"THE PERFECT FAMILY HOME WITH OFF ROAD PARKING We are delighted to introduce to the market this spacious three bedroomed home. This property is filled with bright interiors, has three good sized bedrooms, a bright fitted kitchen, a spacious living and dining room, and an enclosed rear gar..."
WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 9%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1830+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"Request Free Info Pack Today! These ultra-modern apartments offer a high rental yield of 6%, meaning you could be earning a projected rental income starting from £10,797.A231"
"Modern Manchester Apartments: Newoff-plan investmentswith waterfront views and ease-of-access to Manchester's city centre, including bars, restaurants, and shops. A 6% rental return, with prices starting from £275,000.A86"
"** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"
"A luxury specification, two double bedroom, two bathroom 15th floor apartment in the Wilburn Basin development. Situated on the banks of the River Irwell, close to Spinningfields and Castlefield, the apartment offers a private balcony and far-reaching cityscape views."
"This high specification two bedroom, two bathroom apartment is located on the 20th floor of the NumberOne building in Media City:UK, Salford Quays. Furnished to a high standard and complete with a private balcony."
**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND CASH BUYERS** This stunning development offers investors and cash buyers an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Yield of up to 6% and it is managed by a leading management company in Manchester. 
"Exchange Point is one of two towers within Embankment West in the heart of the City. The development is ideally positioned between Greengate and the Corn Exchange. Living at Embankment West epitomises city centre living, whether it's grabbing a coffee from the on-site Embankment cafe, o..."
"ATTENTION ALL INVESTORS BRAND NEW LAUNCH: X1 - Michigan Towers Media City, ManchesterNew Launch of 1316 residential apartments built by the award winning X1 Developments with early bird pricing and exceptional offers for the first wave of investors. 6% Yield. Exclusive first release of Tower 1"
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the skyline.This development presents an exclusive opportunity to invest in a limited luxury collection of one, two and three bedroom apartments."
Berkeley Square is a BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT in Salford - COMPLETING Q2 2026 Call Now to Receive a Floor Plan and Info Pack
"EWS1 Form in place. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. ATTENTION INVESTORS! Rented at £1200pcm providing a 6.1% yield. Bridgewater Gate is a modern development located a short distance from Regent Road, providing excellent transport links to both Manchester City Centre and Sal..."
"Owner occupiers welcome to enquire! Two double bedroom, two bathroom luxury apartment in the highly sought after One Regent development."
"Hollies Lane - 3 double bedrooms, 1 en-suite and 1 master bathroom, Duplex apartment with parking, Recent refurbished. 100 meters to supermarket and doctors. 400 meters to Salford Quays Metro Stop. Leasehold. Available now with vacant possession. Viewing Highly recommended"
STUNNING 8TH FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT - ONE NOT TO BE MISSED
"Investors only, tenanted at £1,150pcm until July 2023. Two double bedroom apartment in the luxurious One Regent Development."
"Affordable two bedroom apartment, ideal for those looking to begin their property investment journey."
"2 BED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE WITH OFF ROAD PARKING. An excellent two bedroom semi-detached property within this popular residential area of Salford. Located within a ¼ mile of Manchester City Centre, this lovely semi-detached house was originally built by Wimpey Homes."
NEW LAUNCH FOR 2023 - 5% NET RETURNS - MEDIA CITY - BOUTIQUE DEVELOPMENT - 20 UNITS AVAILABLE - EXCLUSIVE TO ROTHMORE PROPERTY - Don't miss out - Enquire NOW for more details.
"FANTASTIC BUSINESS OPPORTUNITY! A Take Away with a two bedroom flat in a popular area of Swinton. There is a large space to the front suitable for numerous dining tables, serving area, WC and spacious kitchens to the rear and has recently undergone a transformation internal..."
"APARTMENT 1 Welcome to No.2 Bank Lane, a stunning new development of ten, two & three bedrooms apartments. These stunning new apartments find themselves right in the heart of Salford and just a short distance from Manchester City centre making them the perfect investment opportu..."
"*** No Chain Involved - Wonderful Modern Three Bedroomed Semi-Detached Home with Gardens, Garage and Ample Parking, Situated within a Much Sought After Residential Cul-de-Sac Location - Internal Viewing Essential *** Situated within a popular and highly convenient setting, this fabulo..."
"Off-Plan Manchester Apartments: Luxury, stylish apartments with state-of-the-art facilities, including an onsite gym, private lounge area, extensive gardens, and parking/bicycle storage. Prices starting at £275,000.A85"
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Attention Investors Rented at £1000pcm until September 2023 Providing a 5.2% Yield. Wilburn Basin is positioned where Manchester meets Salford, a 5 minute stroll from Castlefield district of Manchester City Centre. As the name would ..."
"GREAT PRICE! VACANT - NO ONWARD CHAIN! A BEAUTIFUL two double bedroom, two bathroom, 16th floor CORNER POSITIONED apartment, WITH PARKING, featuring dual aspect windows with far-reaching views. This beautifully presented apartment is ideal for investors and owner occupiers alike."
"*STUNNING WATERFRONT APARTMENT* *OVER 5% NET YIELD* Mr Investa are pleased to present this spacious two bedroom, two bathroom corner positioned apartment with DUAL ASPECT WINDOWS, PRIVATE BALCONY & ALLOCATED PARKING. This SUPERB INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is tenanted and GENERATING IMMEDIATE INCOME. ..."
"AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE BUYERS !! Qube are delighted to bring to the market this well proportioned three bedroom apartment in the modern Adelphi Wharf. Comprising of two spacious double bedrooms including master with an en-suite, one good sized single bedroom a stylish tiled bathroom a..."
"Location, location, location… A two bedroom, sixth floor apartment ready for you to move into. "
"* DESIRABLE LOCATION * Overlooking Clifton Country Park, this FANTASTIC PROPERTY features 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, spacious lounge & dining area, and a FITT..."
"Exclusive Greengate Manchester apartments starting from just £210,000 - view floor plans today! A230"
SUITABLE FOR OWNER OCCUPIERS OR INVESTORS- PERFECT INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY WITH POTENTIAL YIELD OF OVER 6%! Wonderful three bedroom apartment available. Enquire today!
"EARN INSTANT INCOME ON THIS ALREADY TENANTED INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - NOT SUITABLE FOR OWNER OCCUPIERS! Stylish and contemporary 3-bedroom apartment in the sought-after development Bridgewater Point in Salford, with access to communal terrace."
***LUXURY WATERSIDE APARTMENTS*** Offering a comprehensive suite of on-site amenities to allow residents to enjoy a twenty-first-century lifestyle in its entirety ***ONLY 20% DEPOSIT REQUIRED - GREAT FOR INVESTOR***
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, FULLY REFURBISHED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN!"
"A SUPERB FAMILY HOME WITH OFF ROAD PARKING IN SWINTON Keenans are proud to bring to the market this spacious family home. The property boasts bright interiors with two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, three good sized bedrooms, a modern three piece bathroom suite and an enclosed rear g..."
"Located close to Clifton Country Park and close to local amenities, public transport, and motorway networks, this fabulous dormer bungalow is well positioned and not to be missed! Situated in a cul-de-sac position, Wakefield Drive has been extended to create 2 generous bedrooms and a w..."
**TO BE SOLD BY MODERN AUCTION - T&C's APPLY** **ONLINE BIDDING** **SUBJECT TO RESERVE PRICE** **BUYER FEES APPLY** Are you an investor looking for a new BTL or a family that have outgrown their current house? Well this is a deceptively spacious family home with plenty of room for a growing f...
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** We are delighted to bring to the market this ready made 4 bedroomed HMO perfectly positioned for both Universities and Salford Royal Hospital. The property is currently fully occupied and currently generates an income of £1,875 per month presenting..."
"Hunters in Manchester are delighted to present to the market this fantastic duplex apartment designed with character and modern style, in this converted 19th Century grade 2 listed building. The development is located on Chapel Street in an area which has transformed over recent years into a popu..."
"Just a short walk from Langworthy tram stop is this THREE BEDROOM, BAY-FRONTED END TERRACE! Well-presented throughout, and benefitting from a 15FT MASTER BEDROOM and a STUNNING, 15FT FITTED KITCHEN. This property is an ideal first time home or investment, get in touch to secure your viewing!"
"MORTGAGE BUYER WELCOME EWS1 NOW IN PLACE. The Alto development is located off Chapel Street, Salford and consists of 4 distinct a-symmetric blocks which punctuate the skyline rising between 6 and 18 storeys. This two bedroom luxury apartment offer the perfect location within a short st..."
"Beyond Property are proud to present a fabulous two-bedroom luxury apartment located on the twenty-second floor in this spectacular waterside development The Heart, MediaCity. This unique two double bedroom apartment has high specification throughout, including living area with open pla..."
Sell Well are thrilled to be instructed with this much-loved semi-detached house set on a huge corner plot on Birch Drive in Swinton. Perfectly positioned set back from the road with a large gated driveway and garden to the front it is sure to attract immediate interest. This freehold property of...
EWS1 Certified. Adjacent to Media City. A luxury 18th floor high specification apartment of approx 603 sq ft with electric heating & double glazing. Presently let on fixed AST until Sept 2023 at £950 pcm. Available to owner occupiers and investors with a rental potential of £1050 ...
"Below Market Value Manchester Investment: Luxury residential apartments, townhouses and duplexes starting at just £275,000, and with a 6% rental yield. A84"
Found in the centre of Salford; it offers extremely high 6% rental returns at 34% below local comparable prices. Invest today! A229
"Last Chance to Invest: Don't miss out on apartments in this stunning completed development, offering onsite security, management, gym, parking and bike storage. Located in Manchester city centre, you can earn 6% rental returns. A1170"
"WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** DESIRABLE LOCATION** TWO PARKING BAYS AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** TWO BATHROOMS** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"
"***Investors only *** Two bedroom property is situated in Spinningfields location and comprises a high specification kitchen with all modern fitted appliances. The property is being sold as a buy to let investment, with tenants expected to pay £1200 PCM. Please contact us for further inf..."
Located within prime central Manchester the city is on your doorstep with Victoria Station just a short stroll away along with a host of other local amenities. This exclusive development comes fully equipped with the latest facilities including large communal areas and an onsite gym. &...
" ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH PARKING. An excellent, spacious one bedroom apartment in the prestigious Leftbank development. Located in the heart of Manchester, Spinningfields is a vibrant destination with international fashion brands, restaurants and bars, serving both an affluent business and res..."
"Hunters Worsley are excited to market this truly unique purpose built apartment at Red House, Pendlebury! The elegant property looks out onto trees from every window with distant views of Manchester City Centre & the Pennines and would be suitable for a first time buyer/professional looking for e..."
"Genesis City is pleased to introduce this 3-bedroom semi-detached property in Swinton, Manchester with a large garden with a lovely decking, perfect for use as an outdoor seating area."
"Do Not Miss This Substantial Double Bay Fronted Freehold Period Terrace With Three Double Bedrooms On Park Street In Swinton. Sell Well are thrilled to be instructed with this gorgeous period property which boasts many original features such as high ceilings and period cornices, along with bags o..."
"EWS1 Form - A1 Rating. 6th floor 2 bedroom apartment in the landmark NV Buildings on the Salford Quays waterfront, ideally situated for MediaCity, bars and restaurants, as well as offering easy access to the city centre via Metrolink. The property offers an open-plan living space, balcony with wa..."
Stunning 2 bedroom 2 bathroom apartment with large private terrace and allocated parking space. Comes with a tenant in place achieving £1250.00 per month. Great investment opportunity.
**CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS AND MEDIA CITY** **DOWNSTAIRS WC** **GARDENS AND DRIVEWAY** ** TO BE SOLD WITH NO CHAIN** Ideal investment purchase with tenants already situ. Call now to potentially extend your portfolio. COUNCIL TAX BAND B. EPC GRADE D.
"We are delighted to bring to the market this spacious two double bedroom Ground floor Apartment at Park Lane Court, just off Bury New Road, Salford. The apartment benefits from private access at the rear to the communal gardens and a private garage. In a convenient location, within walking distan..."
THREE BEDROOMED SEMI DETACHED HOME WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN! Keenans are delighted to present this three bedroomed semi detached home in a popular area of Swinton! Ideally positioned in a cul-de-sac location this property benefits from three bedrooms and a spacious ground floor area. The pr...
"An extended three bedroom semi-detached home on a sought after estate. Located on the popular Westwood estate in Swinton and close to good local schools, amenities and the transport network. This fabulous three bedroom extended semi-detached property offers excellent fami..."
"A beautifully presented semi detached situated in a popular and sought after area, ideally located close to many local amenities, schools and transport links. In brief this immaculate home which has been modernised and updated throughout comprises; entrance hallway, spacious ..."
"ATTENTION CASH BUYERS & INVESTORS !! Qube are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic three bedroom apartment in the modern Adelphi Wharf. Comprising of three spacious double bedrooms, including master with an en-suite, a stylish tiled bathroom and an open plan living and ..."
"Welcome to the prestigious Edge Development in the heart of Manchester City Centre! This stunning 2 bed, 1 bath, 7th floor apartment is the perfect place for anyone looking for the ultimate in city living. This apartment offers a spacious private balcony and comes equipped with 1 secure par..."
"Great value two double bedroom in the Alto apartments, ground floor, positioned in block D."
EWS1 form with B1 rating - Prestigious development 24 hr. concierge - One double bedroom with fitted wardrobe - First Floor - Secure parking - Generous balcony with river views - Tenanted on rolling contract achieving £910 pcm - Vacant possession available on request - No onward chain
* Secure Underground Parking * Large Balcony * 24 Hour Concierge Service * ESW1 Certificate Received * Open Plan Living / Kitchen Area * Walking Distance to City Centre * Fitted Wardrobes To Bedroom * Beautifully presented
"Located in M3 in the heart of the city, just an 8-minute walk to Manchester Victoria Station. A228"
"*** BUY TO LET INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** A bright and spacious, stylishly presented apartment, CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED generating £800 RENTAL INCOME PCM, representing a 4.4% GROSS YIELD. Springfield Court is a sought after development located within walking distance o..."
"***SEMI DETACHED***DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM*** This spacious family home is situated within the popular area of Swinton with easy access to local shops, transport links, and schools. The home comprises of entrance porch, open plan lounge / diner, fitted kitchen, and a further reception w..."
"Mortgage Buyers Invited! EWS1 Available! Fantastic modern eighth floor two bedroom, two bathroom apartment enjoying parking and a balcony. Virtual tour available online! Located in the popular area of Media City on The Quays, this two bedroom property provides an excellent opportu..."
"A two bedroom apartment in the Quebec Development which is accessible to the Manchester City Centres vibrant bars, restaurant and shopping facilities. It is also a quarter of a mile to Victoria Station which has train and tram links to the keen traveller. The property is comprises of an open pla..."
"Regeneration Zone Apartments: Luxury residential apartments in the regeneration zone of Ancoats, Manchester, just 10 minutes' walk to the trendy Northern Quarter. Earn maximum capital growth on initial list prices starting from £174,995. A1169"
"AN IMPRESSIVE THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED PROPERTY Having been presented and maintained beautifully throughout and being a complete blank canvas with no chain delay, this exceptional three bedroom mid terraced property is being proudly welcomed to the market in the highly regarded location of ..."
"VR 360 TOUR AVAILAVBLE Being Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £220,000 Welcome to the prestigious Edge Development in the heart of Manchester City Centre! This stunning 2 bed, 1 bath, 7th floor apartment is the perfect place f..."
"Genesis City are pleased to present this conveniently located 2 double bedroom , two bathroom apartment apartment is in a convenient location close by to supermarkets and restaurants. The property has allocated parking and located next to Media City"
"Hunters Worsley are elated to market this simply stunning mid-terrace in Salford! The property is a very high specification and includes a driveway & loft room. Ideal for any first time buyer/mover. Internally, there is a welcoming entrance hallway, an open plan living room / dining room with dou..."
NB. This property is exclusively available to OWNER OCCUPIERS for the first four weeks of marketing after which the property will additionally be marketed to PRIVATE LANDLORDS accredited by the relevant local authority or who are members of the National Landlords Association The prop...
" EWS1 Form Available - Mortgage Buyers Invited! Situated on the seventh floor of the this popular development with The Quays, this two bedroom property offers allocated parking and a sought after location on The Quays. Benefitting from excellent transport links and a wealth of loca..."
"!!!!!! ATTENTION INVESTORS LET AT £1310PCM UNTIL AUG 2023 - 7.1% YIELD!!!!! Ideally located within the Chapel Street regeneration area, the property offers access to a range of superb amenities as well as just a short stroll to the likes of Deansgate and the rest of the City Cent..."
"Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac is this SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM TERRACE! Offering plenty of space and a SOUTH FACING GARDEN. Just a short walk from Salford Royal Hospital, not overlooked to the rear and close to good local schooling, this property would be an ideal family home!"
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED TWO BED MID TERRACE PROPERTY *** MODERN & CONTEMPORARY INTERIOR THROUGHOUT *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS, FAMILIES & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKIING FOR A GOOD *** ONE MILE TO SALFORD CRESCENT TRAIN STATION *** CLOSE TO SALFORD TOWN CENTRE WITH ITS..."
This spacious modern build property is an ideal for investment being sold with a sitting tenant. The property has an excellent living space with a modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances and a downstairs WC. To the first floor are two well proportioned bedrooms and a contempo...
"A SPACIOUS SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN THE POPULAR M7 POSTCODE OF SALFORD. The house has been EXTENDED ACROSS THE GROUND FLOOR AT THE REAR AND THE FIRST FLOOR AT THE REAR, significantly increasing the square footage of the lounge and third bedroom."
"** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** *SALFORD QUAYS 2 BED - NO CHAIN* This 11th floor apartment is now fully EWS1 compliant and available to mortgage buyers. With great waterside views across Salford Quays, on-site gym and cinema room this is a sought after building in an amazing location!"
"A TWO BEDROOM, BAY-FRONTED, MID-TERRACED HOME WITH SUPERB POTENTIAL Offering a convenient location close to all local amenities as well as Langworthy Park, this two-bedroom, mid-terraced, bay-fronted home is being welcomed to the property market. Ideally suited for someone looking to ful..."
"Deansgate and Castlefield districts just across the river, residents are in a prime central location for some of Manchesters' best hotspots and transport. The property comprises an en-suite, two spacious bedrooms and a large kitchen/diner/living room."
"TENANT IN SITU Council Tax band C We are delighted to offer to the market three-bedroom end of terrace townhouse on Rake Lane, Clifton. The property has been beautifully maintained throughout and has plenty of space to be maintained over two floors. The property ..."
"***NO CHAIN*** TAKE A LOOK at this FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM property, with an ENSUITE IN EVERY BEDROOM, with the potential to either be used as a HMO subject to relevant permissions or for use as a residential home. Within walking distance of excellent transport links and well-kept local parks"
"Bridgewater Wharf is the new development from Fortis Developments in Greater Manchester, close to both Manchester and Salford city centres. Comprising 376 apartments spread over eight storeys, the development is a premium opportunity for investors looking for their next property. "
Limited number of fully managed and completed apartments available in Manchester's top area for price growth and regeneration. Investors receive 6% rental return for a high income buy to let opportunity. A1168
"LUXURIOUS TWO BEDROOM FOURTEENTH FLOOR APARTMENT WITH PARKING SPACE! Situated in the extremely popular X1 Media City development, with unrivalled amenities and transport links."
"Ideal for owner occupier or property investor with a rental potential of £1150 to £1200 pcm (f). An impressive 11th floor luxury executive apartment of approx. 639 sq ft including 2 secure designated parking spaces. Electric heating system, double glazing, concierge. Building Safety F..."
"***ATTENTION INVESTORS*** Superb 2 bedroom apartment with parking space in the popular Michigan Point development a short walk from MediaCity and with Metrolink stop outside. 20th floor corner position enjoying impressive panoramic views. The property comprises open-plan living area/kitchen, 2 do..."
"Ideally Located Salford Investment Opportunity: Situated within an enviable part of Salford, where over £1 billion is being invested into regeneration projects, including MediaCityUK, this property development is not one to be missed. A82"
EWS1 Form In Place - Mortgage Buyers Welcome Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented two double bedroom apartment situated in Block A of the ever popular Alto development that is being sold with no onward chain. Well positioned on the first floor of the d...
**SPANNING THREE FLOORS** **LOFT ROOM** **MODERN KITCHEN AND BATHROOM** **CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** Larger than average mid terrace property ideal for either a first time buyer or investor. Call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D.
"STOP! Take a look at this SPACIOUS, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM TERRACED PROPERTY! With an abundance of space, 14FT KITCHEN, 14FT MASTER BEDROOM and a DOWNSTAIRS W/C, this property is sure to be popular!"
"A beautiful one bedroom apartment located in one of Manchester`s most sought after developments. Property comprises of private entrance hall, open plan living room, fully fitted kitchen, large double bedroom, family bathroom and a 24hr concierge."
"This three bedroom semi-detached property offers excellent potential in a popular area of Swinton. Ideally located close to local schools, amenities and the transport network. In brief the property comprises: entrance hallway, living room, dining room and kitchen. Upstair..."
"Welcome to Alto: an ultra-modern development nestled in the nook of the River Irwell. Step inside and you'll see this lovely two bedroom apartment, with a contemporary design that stays bright under the sunny skies of Manchester. You'll have the comfort of high-quality fixtures and fitt..."
You won't find deals like these ones in the area; our prices are 34% below local comparable prices! Request a free virtual tour today! A226
Portfolio properties brings to market a rare sought after opportunity to buy a prime city centre apartment. 
Tenanted investment opportunity. Beautiful second floor apartment in the highly acclaimed One Regent development.
"* AVAILABLE NOW * Stunning 2 bed, 2 bath, 13th floor apartment in the heart of MediaCityUK. Modern design with great transport links around Manchester! "
Stunning 2 bedroom apartment in the heart of MediaCityUK. Modern design with great transport links around Manchester. New development.
"*MORE PHOTOS TO FOLLOW* CHAIN FREE and highly attractive fully refurbished spacious two double bedroom semi-detached property enjoying a convenient location on a modern estate. Generous accommodation comprises lounge with laminate flooring and modern decor, breakfast kitchen finished to e..."
This modern 2 bedroom semi-detached property is situated within a cul-de-sac in the highly popular Ordsall area. Benefits from gardens to the front and rear together with driveway parking. Presented to a high standard throughout making this a great opportunity for owner-occupiers and investors. E...
"Tenanted Investment opportunity with no onward chain in Media City. This 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom apartment. The property has a valid EWS1 and Property Management Agency in place. "
"Back to Market: This completed development offers luxury investment properties from the below market value price of £174,995. Just 0.4 miles from Manchester Piccadilly station, they are in a prime area of the city centre. A1167"
"This immaculately presented, two bedroom ground floor apartment is situated in a convenient location, close to both Primary & High Schools and local amenities. Transport links are on the doorstep providing access to both Manchester City Centre and Salford Quays. The apartment has ..."
"APARTMENT 3 Welcome to No.2 Bank Lane, a stunning new development of ten, two & three bedrooms apartments. These stunning new apartments find themselves right in the heart of Salford and just a short distance from Manchester City centre making them the perfect investment opportu..."
"Welcome to Alto: an ultra-modern development nestled in the nook of the River Irwell. Step inside and you'll discover a spacious and well presented 2 bedroom apartment, ideal for first time buyers or investors! The stylish accommodation comprises two double bedrooms, a large open pl..."
EWS1 form available - A1 rating. A 4th floor apartment within the iconic NV Buildings development in the heart of Salford Quays and MediaCity. Offering contemporary 2 bedroom accommodation with open-plan living space and a balcony enjoying a view of the Huron Basin. Further benefits include a sec...
"Good for investment or self-living, forecasting rent yield can be over 6.4%, middle level floor one bedroom apartment with nice view10 mins walk to Manchester City Centre5 minutes from Salford Central train stationFashionable decoration & functional designOn site gym, cinema room and launderette"
Fantastic two double bedroom apartment in the luxury Wilburn Basin development.
"6% Rental Returns: Luxurious Greater Manchester one, two and three-bedroom apartments, townhouses and duplex units starting from £275,000. A lucrative buy to let residential investment opportunity in a thriving northern city. A81"
"Manchester Regeneration Area: A completed Manchester residential apartment with waterfront views, offering from £7,797 annual rental income and high capital growth potential in the years to come. A1192"
"Completed and Tenanted Apartments: This is an unrivalled buy to let investment in the popular area of Ancoats in Manchester city centre. Invest from £174,995 and receive 6% rental returns. A1166"
"*** BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY *** A bright and spacious, stylishly presented apartment, CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED UNTIL September 2023, generating £975 RENTAL INCOME PCM, representing a 5.5% GROSS YIELD. The Riley Building is a canal side development located within walking ..."
**WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** DESIRABLE LOCATION** TWO PARKING BAYS AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** TWO BATHROOMS** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"An immaculate one bedroom apartment with internet, TV and TV licence included. Fully furnished to a high standard. Housed within the newly constructed Rivergate development in Salford, located only a short walk away from Manchester city centre. Tenanted."
Excellent 26th floor modern apartment in the highly sought after Michigan Point development.
"Cash Investors Only! Comprising of two spacious double bedrooms, including master with an en-suite, a stylish tiled bathroom and an open plan living and kitchen area with balcony. Within walking distance of the City centre and fantastic transport links - this is the perfect location. ..."
APARTMENTS READY TO MOVE IN TO! This stunning one bedroom apartment is located on the 5th floor of the development and benefits from west facing views from the large floor to ceiling windows. High Definition is a fantastic new development in the heart of Media City UK. Offering buyers a range...
"One bedroom apartment for sale in the stunning new Michigan Towers development. Overlooking the Salford Quays and MediacityUK district in Manchester, Michigan Towers represents an exceptional buy to let investment opportunity. "
"EWS1 form available - A1 Rating. Located on the 11th floor enjoying superb views across the water, a superb 1 apartment in the landmark NV Buildings, ideally situated for MediaCity, bars and restaurants, as well as offering easy access to the city centre via Metrolink. The property offers an open..."
MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME due to mortgage companies lending criteria amendments following the Building Safety Act 2022. Full Funding from Developer in Place. Positioned in the heart of Spinningfields is this stunning corner apartment located close to a great selection of cosmopolitan ba...
"Are you looking to put your own stamp on a property? Well LOOK NO FURTHER! This THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY may be perfect for you! Within walking distance of Salford Royal Hospital, catchment of good schools and close proximity to well-kept local parks, this would be a perfect family home!"
"*** TWO, TWO BEDROOM APARTMEMTS *** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY ***
Martin and Co and Martin Bond Auctions are pleased to present these two, two Bedroom Apartments in Salford M7.
**To be SOLD via online auction on Thursday 9th February at 10.00am. The auction will run ..."
A superb 2 bedroom apartment within the prestigious One Regent development offering easy access to the city centre and a good range of local amenities. The apartment features an open-plan living area incorporating kitchen and is presented to a high-standard. Concierge available. EWS1 form availab...
Postcode:M50 3DL Salford Quays1 beds 1 baths apartment at Northill
"A SPACIOUS, EXTENDED AND NICELY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH A LOFT ROOM."
"Fully Managed, Completed Property Development: An incredible modern property investment opportunity, managed by an experienced local rental agent.A1191"
"STOP! Situated within easy access of Salford Quays/Media City and the City Centre is this MODERN SEMI-DETACHED HOME that features a LARGE GARDEN PLOT, TWO DOULBE BEDROOMS & OFF-ROAD PARKING FOR MULTIPLE CARS, this would be an IDEAL first time home or investment!"
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to introduce this one bedroom serviced apartment within a stunning development based in the heart of Greengate, Manchester - with open plan living and floor to ceiling windows, creating a sophisticated and homely feeling. State of the art amenities on-site; s..."
"5th floor 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom Apartment for sale in Media City Tower A. Tenant in place. Great for investors!"
"TWO BED END TERRACE PROPERTY IN NEED OF MODERNISATION *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS, FAMILIES & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** CLOSE TO SALFORD TOWN CENTRE WITH ITS ARRAY OF SHOPS, SUPERMARKETS, BARS, RESTAURANTS & DELIS *** EASY ACCESS TO MANCHEST..."
"We are pleased to offer for a sale this mid terrace, two double bedroom house at Chimney Pot Park, an award winning development of contemporary townhouses. The property comprises two double..."
"This SUPERB TWO BEDROOM HOME is tastefully decorated throughout and situated on the popular, award-winning ‘Chimney Pot Park’ development! Located within WALKING DISTANCE TO SALFORD QUAYS/MEDIA CITY and Langworthy tram stop, with direct access to Salford Quays/Media City and the City Centre."
"Completed and Tenanted Apartments: This is an unrivalled buy to let investment in the popular area of Ancoats in Manchester city centre. Invest from £174,995 and receive 6% rental returns. A1165"
**CLOSE TO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE** **OFF-ROAD PARKING** **LARGE WRAP AROUND CONSERVATORY** Are you and your family on the hunt for a bigger property with off-road parking? Well look no further as this nicely presented and deceptively spacious end of terrace would be perfect for you. EPC GRADE D
"Tyron Ash Real Estate are proud to present the future of renting and one of the best investment opportunities in the U.K. Located in Media City, learn more about Co-Living by opening the full ad"
* CHAIN-FREE * A STUNNINGLY PRESENTED 2 BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT SITUATED IN A SUPERBLY RENNOVATED AND EXTENDED VICTORIAN MANSION HOUSE.
"STYLISH TWO BEDROOM PROPERTY located on the AWARD WINNING ‘CHIMNEY POT PARK’ DEVELOPMENT! Benefitting from a 23FT MODERN KITCHEN DINER with access to the GARDEN TERRACE, this property is sure to be popular!"
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Alto is a superb development offering luxurious, high specification surroundings and boasting an enviable location just a 5 minute stroll from Spinningfields and beyond. You'll never be too far away from the vast array of bars, shops and r..."
"Completed 1 Bedroom Unit near Media City, Manchester. Finished to an exceptional standard, this luxury development offers residents with the perfect space to work, relax and socialise. A fantastic development for both owner occupancy and as an investment."
**PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYER** **CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** **EASY ACCESS TO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE** Are you a first time buyer wanting to get on the property ladder or an investor looking for a new BTL opportunity? Call now to book a viewing. COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE C.
"EWS1 Available/Mortgage Buyers Invited. Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this stunning ONE BEDROOM apartment located on the second floor of The Edge, one of Salford's most prestigious apartment blocks. This apartment has so much to offer, dual aspect windows great sized living ac..."
Stunning one double bedroom apartment on the twelfth floor in the highly sought after One Regent development.
"Annual Rental Income Starting at £7,797: Completed and fully managed apartments available in a thriving area of Manchester, with plenty of surrounding regeneration to come. A1190"
"Comprising of 120 fully furnished, studio and 1-bedroom apartments, City Co-Living Media City offers investors a projected 6% rental return. If you’re looking for a hassle-free property investment, City Co-Living Media City is the development for you."
THE FIRST CO-LIVING INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN THE UK | 7% assured yield | On the gateway to Media City | Potential for a 12-year tenant | Fully furnished and fully managed | Perfect for hands-off investors
"City Co-Living Media City will be the first co-living development in Salford, offering high-quality self-contained apartments at the gateway to Media City. With a host of exclusive facilities and located in close proximity to the University of Salford and just a 10-minute walk from the UK’s large..."
**LUXURY APARTMENT** *VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE* CURRENTLY TENANTED - £1150PCM This stunning luxury one bedroom apartment in the highly sought after Lightbox development is situated on the 18th floor and offers fantastic views for residents to enjoy. The Lightbox development is loc...
"***Investor only*** - 999 Year Lease - Completing 2024 - 1, 2 and 3 bedroom apartments available - Experienced developer & Construction Team - An area perfect for High Rental Yields and huge Capital Growth potential! X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship..."
"Great investment opportunity! A splendid one bedroom apartment in a wonderful location, situated in Manchester M3 offering amazing comfortable living and convenience with simplicity. The apartment is presented in outstanding condition and fitted with all the required necessities."
"***JUST COMPLETED*** LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS. THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. Rental Net Yields of 10.72%"
"ATTENTION ALL INVESTORS BRAND NEW LAUNCH: X1- Michigan Towers Media City, Manchester- New Launch of 1316 residential apartments built by the award winning X1 Developments. Strong Regeneration area and good early bird pricing. 6% Net Return. Fully managed investment with strong price growth potentia"
"Michigan Towers is a ground breaking development by a multi-award winning developer that is set to change the Manchester skyline. This 1 bedroom apartment is perfect for first time buyers and investors alike, and access to amenities include a 5-star gym, multiple rooftop terraces, a 24/7 conci..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND END USERS* This stunning development offers investors and cash buyers an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Yield of 6% and it is managed by a leading management company in Manchester, Zenith."
"A modern one bedroom, unfurnished apartment located in one of Manchester's most popular developments, Embankment West. Laurence place benefits from a host of onsite facilities including a large resident lounge & co-working area, private meeting room, well-equipped gym, on site café a..."
"Stylish waterside apartments within Media City UK! This one bedroom apartment is located on the nineteenth floor and has been finished to a high standard throughout. The apartment also benefits from a private balcony, with stunning views."
"This stunning one bedroom apartment benefits from a private balcony, with fantastic water views. Situated on the 18th floor of the development. Ideally located and with a range of bars, restaurants and other amenities on site; Media City UK neighbours with the BBC, ITV and University of Salford."
"A deceptively spacious and well maintained mid terrace property in a popular residential area close to amenities and walking distance from Victoria Park. The freehold property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and courtyard to the rear. The accommodation briefly comprises: entranc..."
"AVAILABLE BEGINING OF DECEMBER! The Chimney Pot Park area was fully and comprehensively re-generated throughout 2007/8 by Urban Splash and is conveniently located within a few minutes walk of the Metrolink, local shops, public transport & motorway networks."
"We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £190,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts takes place The Energy Performance Cert..."
"*** OPEN DAY SATURDAY 19TH NOVEMBER 11AM - 1PM  PLEASE BOOK YOUR SLOT NOW *** The apartment is situated on the 4th floor and comprises spacious entrance hall, open plan lounge/dining area with access to outside balcony, opening onto a modern fully fitted and integrated kitchen, two do..."
Great one double bedroom apartment in the highly desirable Leftbank apartments.
Cash only purchase! Qube Residential are delighted to bring to the market this very well proportioned two bedroom apartment located at the ever popular and highly sought after Adelphi Wharf development. The apartment offers spacious living accommodation with 691sq ft. The apartment is...
"***Investor only*** Manchester property price growth. Nearly doubling the national average and 12 times higher than London, Manchester is expected to see a growth of 28.8% by 2025. The level of growth Manchester is experiencing is exceptional! Perfect Investment properties loca..."
"Investment Purchase with a Tenant in Situ! Ideally located in this popular area of Salford, with excellent transport links and local amenities, this third floor property offers an excellent investment opportunity, with two well-proportioned bedrooms and an open-plan reception situated within..."
**NICE for INVESTMENT or SELF-LIVING**2 BEDROOMS 2 BATHROOMS with 1 ENSUIT**1-MIN WALK to METROLINK and TESCO**WITH BALCONY and GYM ROOM**
"Luxurious Manchester Property Development: Offering investors a 6% rental return, this northern property investment is designed to an extremely high standard.A33"
A fantastic two bedroom period property in Salford. Ideally located bay fronted period property offered for sale. This spacious home features a paved rear yard ideal for seating area. The kitchen area has been recently upgraded and offers access to the rear yard. The second receptio...
"This spacious one bedroom apartment with parking is situated on the third floor of The NV buildings, which are located in the picturesque Salford Quays, just ten minutes away from the city centre. The property also benefits from being conveniently located near the Lowry mall, theatre, restaurants..."
* No chain * Iconic Development * Views of the water * Walking distance to media city * Secure parking * 24 hr. Concierge *
"* PERFECT FIRST HOME OR INVESTMENT ! * ATTRACTIVELY PRICED. This FANTASTIC HOME features 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, spacious lounge, modern kitchen and family bathroom. The property further benefits from GENEROUS GARDENS TO THE FRONT, SIDE & REAR. Positioned at the head of a CUL-DE-SAC in a POPULAR R..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic opportunity to purchase a top floor, three bedroom apartment, that boasts great views over The River Irwell, is being sold with no onward chain and is located in a highly sought-after Salford location on the outskirts of Manchester ..."
A WELL PRESENTED AND DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE that benefits from an approximately 80FT REAR GARDEN!
"Luxury Manchester Apartment Opportunity: The chance to secure a premium Manchester investment opportunity with a minimum annual rental income of £7,797.A1189"
CASH BUY ONLY - EWS1 B2 - AWAITING BUILDING SAFETY FUND CONFIRMATION This is an excellent opportunity to purchase a ground floor garden apartment that has been well maintained and upgraded by the current owner. Currently tenanted at £825 PCM the property in brief comp...
"Genesis City are pleased to present this conveniently located 1 bed apartment located a short distance from Manchester City Centre, Salford Quays and Old Trafford. A short walk to the city centre and close to Regent Road Retail Park, Cornbrook Tram Stop, M60 & M56."
"**SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT** **TO BUY WITH TENANTS** Are an investor looking for a new BTL? Well this very well presented, two bed apartment would be perfect for you. Call the office NOW to arrange your viewing. COUNCIL TAX BAND B. EPC GRADE C."
"Regeneration Zone Apartments: Luxury residential apartments in the regeneration zone of Ancoats, Manchester, just 10 minutes' walk to the trendy Northern Quarter. Earn maximum capital growth on initial list prices starting from £174,995. A1163"
"Completed student apartments. For high 6% rental yields, below-market value prices, and a prime Salford location, this is an unmissable buy to let investment. A1154"
"Attention Investors: View info pack and floor plans today for 1 and 2-bedroom residential apartments in Salford, Manchester. Invest from £174,995.A485"
"TWO BED SPACIOUS APARTMENT LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS *** TOP 5TH FLOOR APARTMENT WITH GREAT OUTLOOKING VIEWS *** ALLOCATED SECURE UNDER BUILDING PARKING ***WALKING DISTANCE TO ALL THE AMENITIES OF SALFORD QUAYS & MEDIA CITY, WITH ARRAY OF BARS, RESTAURANTS, SHOPS, DELI'S & GENERAL LOC..."
"AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE & INVESTMENT ! Qube residential are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful two bedroom, two bathroom third floor apartment. Located at the award winning Adelphi Development in Salford. The apartment is situated on the third floor and co..."
"Located on the banks of the River Irwell and adjacent to the historic quarter of Castlefield, Downtown is a prestigious “hotel-style” development, comprising 374 one, two and three bedroom apartments in Manchester. The Manhattan-inspired development has been specifically designed to e..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well proportioned one bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 12th floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, fully fitted and integrated kitchen, double bedroom, modern bath..."
"Waterhouse Estate Agents present this great TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMED apartment in the popular Fusion building. Positioned on the corner getting floods of light and stunning views, this is a more desirable apartment in the building."
"A fantastic furnished one bedroom apartment on the 10th floor with superb views. This distinctive curved development sits right on the waterfront at Salford Quays. NV Buildings is one of the most popular and iconic developments on the Quays and offers stylish accommodation, water views and fantas..."
"*MODERN PROPERTY INVESTMENT* This stunning development of 300 apartments spread across two towers is set to be one of Manchester's most iconic developments. Situated a mere 5-minute walk from the City Centre, apartments here will come with an Investor discount and 2 years 6% net rental guarantee"
IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A FANTASTIC DEVELOPMENT MOMENTS FROM MEDIA CITY! Beautiful two bedroom third floor apartment with parking.
"**AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE AND CASH BUYERS** VIEWINGS WELCOMED * CURRENTLY TENANTED, £900PCM* A Stunning one bedroom apartment located in Block A, Wilburn Basin on Ordsall Lane in Salford. The development is located perfectly just on the edge of the city centre with amazing local a..."
Completing Soon. Last remaining ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT at MEDIA CITY TOWER 3. 6% ASSURED Rental Yield. FREE Furniture Pack. Views across Media City. 35% Deposit Required.
"*** AVAILABLE NOW *** A superb one bedroom apartment situated on the ground floor of the recently completed DOWNTOWN development. The apartment briefly comprises; spacious living area, contemporary kitchen with range of appliances, large double bedroom and a superb 'jack & jill' bathroom. Fully F..."
"A spacious, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM apartment positioned on the THIRD FLOOR of a popular residential building, set within a secure GATED DEVELOPMENT with JULIETTE BALCONY overlooking COMMUNAL GARDENS and RESIDENTS PARKING. EWS1 Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. 
"
"EWS1 CERTIFIED. An attractively priced, 3rd floor apartment in landmark development, NV Buildings. Ideal for property investor or potentially owner occupier, presently let on a fixed term AST until 01.09.2023 at £950 pcm (f). Attractive accommodation approx. 534 sq ft. Designated parking sp..."
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting flagship development, which is set to change the skyline. This development features four iconic towers, each with unique facades with a stunning design. Each tower is set within a modern landscaped public realm, which features cafe spaces, restaurants, retail an..."
M5 4YE (well established area popular with young professionals). 1 double bed apartment situated in the newly completed superb downtown development.
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** This one-of-a-kind 12th floor apartment is situated right in the heart of MediaCityUK! Step inside the spacious entrance hall and you'll see that this popular pad has bags of style, with a fresh contemporary design throughout. Just down the hall you'll..."
"Cash Buyers Only Virtual Tour Online! The spacious, modern apartment is ideally located within a short walking distance of Arndale and Salford central station. Situated on the first floor, this property enjoys a spacious bedroom, balcony and modern fixtures and fittings. Upon..."
EWS1 Form Available. Attention Investors currently rented at £925pcm until July 2023 proving an attractive 6% yield. This superb apartment is located within the desirable development of Lowry Wharf and is a short 10 minute walk from the city centre and is also located near conve...
"EWS1 form available - B1 rating. In a prime MediaCity location, this superb contemporary apartment offers well-presented accommodation to include 2 bedrooms (1 ensuite), open-plan living room/kitchen opening onto a balcony and bathroom. Close to a range of shops, bars/restaurants and Metrolink st..."
**IMMACULATE THROUGHOUT** **BASEMENT CONVERSION** **CLOSE TO MEDIA CITY AND SALFORD QUAYS** **CLOSE TO LANGWORTHY TRAM STOP** This house will be perfect for a first time buyer and has been decorated to a high standard throughout. Call the office now to book a viewing. COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRA...
Aubrey Lee & Co are happy to bring to the market this two bedroom mid terraced house situated in a popular residential location offering easy access to local shops and transport links along with being a short distance from Salford University and Salford shopping precinct.
"Waterfront Apartments: A luxury Manchester property investment opportunity, overlooking the river Irwell and only a short drive away from the thriving MediaCityUK.A32"
"Beautifully presented, 5th floor luxury apartment including one secure designated parking space, approximately 676 Sq Ft, west facing in landmark development XQ7. Adjacent to Exchange Quay Metrolink Tram Station. Presently let on AST at £950 pcm until June 2023. Building Safety Fund confirmed."
"EWS1 from available. Mortgage buyers welcome. Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this well presented two-bedroom ground floor apartment situated in the popular Fusion development on Middlewood Street. As added benefits, the apartment is being sold with no onward chain, has South ..."
 Welcome to Albert Vaults! A stunning contemporary block of apartments in a highly sought after location ticking many boxes with great transport links! This stunning one bedroom apartment is available to let within the building. Call today and our agents will book you into a viewing. 
"**GREAT FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT** Situated in the popular area of Clifton with local amenities, transport links, and schools close by. This mid terrace house comprises entrance porch, lounge, and dining and kitchen area with sliding doors leading onto the rear garden. The first fl..."
"Purplebricks are pleased to bring to the market this well-presented studio apartment situated on the 11th floor of one of Manchester's most renowned developments - The Edge. The property currently has a tenant in place achieving £1,000/pcm, an external balcony with great views from the 11th floo..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT *** WALKING DISTANCE INTO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE *** IDEAL PROPERTY FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOUNG PROFESSIONALS & BUY TO LET LANDLORDS LOOKING FOR A GOOD RETURN *** CLOSE TO AN ARRAY OF LOCAL AMENITIES *** 0.5 ..."
"A fabulous two bedroom terrace property close to Victoria Park. This property is ideally located close to local schools, amenities and the transport network. Within walking distance to Swinton Precinct and Victoria Park. This two bedroom mid-terrace property benefits from ..."
"Buy to let - A two double bedroom, two bathroom, fourth floor apartment with juliette balcony and secure parking within the Steele House development off Ordsall Lane. Situated conveniently within walking distance of the city centre and Salford Quays."
"Available for Investors and 1st Time buyers-. Waterfront apartment in the Millennium Tower on Salford Quays. 14th floor 1 bedroom apartment with a luxury bathroom, fully fitted modern kitchen. No parking"
"Back to Market: This completed development offers luxury investment properties from the below market value price of £174,995. Just 0.4 miles from Manchester Piccadilly station, they are in a prime area of the city centre. A1161"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market this well presented, 5th floor apartment ideally located only a short stroll from Salford Quays. The two bedroom corner aspect apartment has a great size balcony with lovely views to enjoy a morning coffee, its own secure-allocated parking space..."
"Available for Investors and 1st Time buyers-. Waterfront apartment in the Millennium Tower on Salford Quays. 18th floor 1 bedroom apartment with a luxury bathroom, fully fitted modern kitchen, Balcony and Parking. NO Chain."
"INVESTMENT ONLY + CASH BUY ONLY. The Fresh Development is situated on Chapel Street opposite the Five Star Lowry Hotel and within a short stroll to both the city centre and Salford Central Train station. This spacious apartment is located on the 10th floor ,Consisting of a hallway, living area ,..."
"A simply stunning two bedroom apartment on Park Villa`s Great Clowes Street, Broughton. With great access into the City Centre - Victoria station just 1.4 miles away! And motorway links close by."
High Rental Returns: A below market value investment opportunity in an ideally located Salford area. A1187
"Fantastic Investor Opportunity with rental guarantee for 5 years: X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline. Exclusive opportunity to invest in limited luxury property located at the very heart of MediaCityUK. Strong tenant demand."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: A super apartment located in this attractive red-bricked mansion block, on the Wilson Basin. Fully Let and managed producing £11,700 per annum, generating a gross yield of circa 6.5%."
"Within walking distance of Manchester City Centre, with easy access to a fine array of local bars and restaurants along with excellent transport links..."
"Are you looking for a property you can put your own stamp on? Take a look at this deceptively spacious TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOME! Benefitting from a 17FT MODERN KITCHEN DINER and a HUGE 15FT MASTER BEDROOM, this property is sure to be popular!"
"* CHAIN-FREE * Ideally located in a DESIRABLE RESIDENTIAL AREA on the edge of Clifton Country Park, this SPACIOUS GROUND FLOOR apartment features 2 GENEROUS DOUBLE BEDROOMS, BAY-FRONTED LOUNGE & dining area, and fitted MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM."
Perfect Investment Listed Building Tenant in place - £950 Per Month- Immediate Income One of very few 2 bedroom apartments in the building! 
"Three bedroom mid terraced home located in a popular residential area offered to the market chain free.
The property is extended, has gardens to front and back and also benefits from having a garage."
"This is a very attractive property with moderate work required to bring it up to date. As such, it represents a great opportunity for any buyer seeking an excellent investment. A lovely semi-detached home in the town of Swinton, the property offers a range of benefits. From its highly practical ..."
"WOW, WOW, WOW, This is the perfect investment opportunity and is for Cash buy only with the option to retain the current tenant making this ideal investment property achieving £850 PCM."
"BRAND NEW bright and spacious 1 bed fully furnished apartment for £185,000 featuring a residents gym, spa, cinema room, private terrace, 24hr security and porter."
"Cash Offers only! This well proportioned brand new one bedroom apartment at the Award Winning Adelphi Wharf Development is ideal for either investment or first time buyers. Situated on the fourth floor, this wonderful apartment comprises newly carpeted entrance hall, spaciou..."
Apartments with 11.7% price growth forecast in hotspot area of Greater Manchester. Near MediaCityUK and Spinningfields. A481
"WOW, WOW, WOW, the only words that can be used for this little gem of a property as this is one that you wont want to miss as these rarely come to the market so is sure to be extremely popular, this property would suite a range of buyers. so if your looking for that perfect investment then here itis"
NO CHAIN! CALLING FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS. DON'T MISS OUT ON THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY!
"EWS1 form available - A1 rating. On the 9th floor of this popular development, a well-presented apartment comprising open-plan living area/kitchen with balcony, bedroom and bathroom along with secure allocated parking space. The apartment is situated in the heart of Salford Quays close to Metroli..."
"MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE STUDIO, WITH SECURE PARKING. An excellent, 16th floor studio apartment in the sought after The Edge development. The property comprises a spacious open plan living and dining room through to large corner (wrap around) balcony, open plan fully fitted kitchen area and luxurio..."
"Postcode:M50 3DL Apartment Northill Furness Quay SALFORD 11th Floor M50 3XZ
1 beds 1 baths apartment at Northill"
"X1 Michigan Towers is an exciting new flagship development, which is set to change the Manchester skyline. Our new development features four iconic towers, each with unique façades with a stunning architectural design. Each tower is set within a modern landscaped public realm,..."
"A one bedroom studio apartment in the sought after Edge apartments. The ultimate City Bolthole. Situated on Clowes street, next to the River Irwell, a few moments walk from Deansgate and all of the colourful delights that Manchester has to offer. The development is City living luxury,"
Limited number of fully managed and completed apartments available in Manchester's top area for price growth and regeneration. Investors receive 6% rental return for a high income buy to let opportunity. A1162
"BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT. Physical viewings welcome, Virtual tour available. Prime city centre location in the much sought after Embankment west developement. Benefits from first class on site facilties such as large Co workig area, Residents Gym, On site cafe and full time concierge."
"Manchester Regeneration Area: A completed Manchester residential apartment with waterfront views, offering from £7,797 annual rental income and high capital growth potential in the years to come.A1186"
"Below Market Value Investment: An affordable and exciting Manchester investment property, within walking distance of the city centre and transport links,offering a 6% rental return. A27"
"Completed residential investment opportunity for buy to let or buy to live purposes. Prices start from £174,995.A478"
"*** BUY TO LET INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** A bright and spacious, stylishly presented apartment, CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED UNTIL JULY 2023, generating £825 RENTAL INCOME PCM, representing a 5.5% GROSS YIELD. ‘The Fusion’ development is located within strolling..."
"MORTGAGE BUYERS INVITED - EWS1 AVAILABLE. INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this superb apartment on the fourth floor of this popular development, just a short stroll from the city centre. This lovely property features an entrance hallway with utility cupb..."
"*MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOMED* *GREAT INVESTMENT/FIRST TIME BUY* CURRENTLY TENANTED *PAY 700PCM - ENDS FEB 28TH*Fantastic one bedroom apartment located in Textile Apartments, previously a manufacturing warehouse , this converted building boasts stunning Victorian architecture and certainl..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well proportioned one bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 16th floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, fully fitted and integrated kitchen, double bedroom, modern bath..."
"VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE. Affinity Living Riverside is a newly completed building forming part of an exclusive development situated in a prime city centre location with tranquil waterside appeal. The bustling city of Manchester is on your doorstep with its famous shopping facilities, bars, restaurant..."
"EWS1 Certified. Situated on the 5th floor of landmark development, Millennium Tower, a luxury apartment with secure designated parking space, integrated balcony, electric underfloor heating and aluminium double glazing . Likely to appeal to owner occupier or property investor."
"X1 Michigan Towers is a modern new residential development in a prime waterfront location in the heart of MediaCityUK, Manchester. Comprised of 375 1-3 bedroom apartments and 2 bed townhouses, X1 Michigan Towers is set among a range of restaurants, cafes, retail and office spaces and offers u..."
"Calling all investors rental value of approximately £1200 PCM and first time buyers. University locality and in approximate distance to the BBC Media city. On offer is this splendid top floor three bed apartment with balcony in Salford .Comprising of hallway, four piece bathroom suite, in..."
"*** BUY TO LET INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** A bright and spacious, stylishly presented apartment, CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED UNTIL JUNE 2023, generating £750 RENTAL INCOME PCM, representing a 5.1% GROSS YIELD. Madison Court is located within SALFORD QUAYS, within strolling ..."
"Available for Mortgage Buyers & Investors ! Qube residential are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful two bedroom, ground floor apartment. Located at the award winning Adelphi Development in Salford. The apartment is situated on the ground floor and comprise..."
** MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME ** SUITABLE FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS ** An immaculate two bedroom apartment located on the ground floor of a well maintained development with outside garden area ideal for barbeques in the Summer months. The property is positioned close to Spinningfields and ...
"Fully Managed, Completed Property Development: An incredible modern property investment opportunity, managed by an experienced local rental agent. A1185"
"6% Rental Returns: Luxury Manchester city apartments, offering both stunning riverside views and ease of access to the city centre.A31"
"Seventh Floor spacious one bedroom apartment located in a fantastic building. Benefitting from a 24hr concierge service, residents gym, spa, cinema room and private terrace this property would make an ideal home or investment. Located only a few minutes walk to transport links into and out of the..."
"Attention investors! Modern 19th floor apartment with superb views across Salford Quays and balcony in this popular development with EWS1 form available. Comprising open-plan living area/kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom. Secure undercroft parking space included. Located close to Metrolink sto..."
"** ATTENTION BUY TO LET INVESTORS OR CASH PURCHASERS ** Get the best of city centre living with this peaceful waterfront retreat from your hectic urban life but at the same time be close enough to the cities of Salford and Manchester that the exciting lifestyle on offer there, is within easy rea..."
"Modern and luxurious one bed one bath apartment in Lightbox, Salford Quays. It offers stunning views of Manchester from the comfort of your home."
"A super stylish one bedroom apartment in Millennium Point, Salford Quays. An excellent location in close proximity to Media City, The Lowry and all of the delights that The Quays have to offer. "
"Carnaby Place is a collection of luxury apartments situated on Regent Road, within close proximity to supermarkets, Regent Retail Park and transport links into Manchester City Centre. The development is just a short 10 minute stroll into Manchester's central retail district with its bustling ..."
AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE BUYERS & CASH INVESTORS !! We are delighted to offer for sale this very well proportioned one bedroom apartment located on the seventh floor at the award winning Adelphi Wharf. This luxury apartment is fitted and finished to the highest standard and comprises...
"A fantastic thirteenth floor one bedroom apartment located in the Number One Development at MediaCityUK Salford Quays. The property benefits from an open plan kitchen lounge, Juliette balcony with views of media city, Spacious double bedroom, Family bathroom and a storage utility cupboard locate..."
2 bedroom property for Sale in Salford ! Tenant in place - recive immediate income!
"Attention landlords! Superb investment opportunity offering a gross yield of 6.3% within the ever-popular Millennium Tower development with EWS1 form in place (A1 rating). Comprising open-plan living area/kitchen with balcony, bedroom and bathroom along with secure allocated parking space. The ap..."
WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 9.7%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1380+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"EWS1 form available - B1 rating. A two bedroom two bathroom apartment in this popular development complete with car parking space. The accommodation can be found on the 5th floor and comprises; living/dining room, separate fitted kitchen, master bedroom with ensuite shower room, second bedroom an..."
** INVESTORS ONLY ** HMO MID TERRACE PROPERTY GENERATING £1275PCM ** GAS CENTRAL HEATING ** SALFORD LOCATION ** CLOSE TO TRANSPORT LINKS AND AMENITIES ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** A spacious three bedroom property located within a popular residential area of Salford close to amenities and transport link...
"The facilities include a CONCIERGE, a fully-fitted resident's GYM, PRIVATE OFF-ROAD PARKING, a private garden/courtyard, and STATE OF THE ART MEDIA SUITE!!!!!!!!"
A 2 bedroom apartment within this popular development ideal for both owner-occupiers and investors. Fantastic location within walking distance of the city centre and Salford University. Secure gated parking is included. Positioned close to Salford Cathedral and the Chapel Street area with great t...
"WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 9.7%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1380+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"
"Invest from £174,995 in below market value apartments in Greater Manchester. 6% returns projected.A476"
"Stunning ONE BEDROOM property, situated on the FIFTH FLOOR of this brand new development. Located on the banks of the River Irwell, this is an ideal
INVESTMENT as it´s close to MediaCity, making it attractive to TENANTS."
"A spacious bedroom apartment within the popular Adelphi Wharf development at the rear of the building taking advantage of the pleasant river views. Current tenancy in place at £975pcm until June 2023, offering an attractive yield to the investor. Convenient for Salford University and good t..."
"Boasting easy access to the City Centre, this two bedroom apartment makes City living easy. A bright and spacious open plan kitchen and living room with stylish breakfast bar, large double bedroom and double second bedroom with floor to ceiling mirrors in situ."
"EWS1 form available - B1 rating. A contemporary 2 double bedroom apartment on the 7th floor of this modern development ideally situated for Metrolink stops and within walking distance of MediaCity. In excellent decorative order, the property includes a balcony and the development offers a gym for..."
"*** CASH BUYERS ONLY *** A STYLISHLY PRESENTED apartment occupying an EIGHTH FLOOR position within a popular development, CENTRALLY LOCATED and offered for sale with CHAIN. 606 sq ft. The accommodation consists of an open plan living and dining area, modern kitchen full width balcony, ..."
"Completed and Tenanted Apartments: This is an unrivalled buy to let investment in the popular area of Ancoats in Manchester city centre. Invest from £174,995 and receive 6% rental returns. A1160"
A fantastic ninth floor one bedroom apartment located in Millennium Tower. The property is located in the heart of Salford Quays and is only a short walk from Media City UK.
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Current rent is £750 pcm, however the projected rental return based on current market is £900pcm which translates to a 6% yield. Offering a unique combination of idyllic location and uninterrupted views over Erie Basin in the v..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND CASH BUYERS** This stunning development offers investors and cash buyers an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Yield of 6% and it is managed by a leading management company in Manchester, Zenith."
**DRIVEWAY** **TO BE SOLD WITH NO CHAIN** **POTENTIAL TO BE SOLD WITH A TENANT** **CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS AND MEDIA CITY** Two bedroom semi detached home available close to Salford Quays requiring an upgrade to your individual style. Call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D.
Great value2 double bedrooms2 allocated parking spacesExcellent locationFamily bathroom & en-suiteFantastic transport linksConcierge serviceBalconyBuy to let opportunity
**TO BE SOLD WITH NO CHAIN** **CAN BE SOLD WITH TENANTS** **CLOSE TO SALFORD QUAYS** **TWO BATHROOMS** **TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS** Perfect terrace property close to Salford Quays with two bathrooms and a separate WC. Call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE C.
"* CHAIN-FREE * TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE situated in a QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION. To the ground floor the property offers an entrance porch, a G..."
"EWS1 Approved. Recently Refurbished Two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment. Modern Kitchen with Appliances, Recently redecorated and carpeted throughout. Allocated Parking Space. Attractive Communal Seating Areas. Close to Manchester Centre. No Vendor Chain"
"**WATCH THE WALK THRU VIDEO** This is an immaculately presented modern apartment with one double bedroom and one single bedroom or office space. Set back on Salford Quays the 4th floor apartment enjoys plenty of light with large windows.Tenanted, Leasehold. WINDOWS DO NOT OPEN. Parking."
EWS1 form available - B1 rating. A contemporary 2 double bedroom apartment (1 with ensuite) on the 3rd floor of this modern development ideally situated for Metrolink stops and within walking distance of MediaCity. The property includes a balcony and the development offers a gym for the use of re...
Modern studio student apartment with high rental yields and below-market value prices. A1159
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £170,000 - £180,000*"
"***FEW UNITS REMAIN*** Investment opportunity! Consisting of stylish apartments, townhouses, and duplexes and located in the popular Salford area, Middlewood Plaza is the ideal investment property for investors and tenants alike."
MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR SALE - SALFORD QUAYS
"*****No chain  *** Looking for a quick sale  Stunning two-bedroom apartment, located in a convenient location in Salford, Manchester. The property sits in a sought-after location with it being close to a number of local amenities including independent shops, parks, supermarkets..."
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to bring this two bed ground floor apartment in the Fusion development to the market for sale. The property is located a short walk from Chapel Street which is very close to prime Manchester city center locations. For convenience, the property is within a 5 minute..."
Two bedroom apartment on the third floor of Madison Court within the popular Broadway development ideally situated for the amenities of MediaCity and nearby Metrolink stops giving easy access to the city centre. Presented to a high standard with the benefit of a secure allocated parking space and...
EWS1 form with A1 rating - Owner occupier or buy to let investment opportunity - Tenanted until 16th June 2023 - Achieving £950 pcm on a fully furnished basis - 15th floor - One double bedroom - Secure allocated car parking space - Waterside development - No onward chain
"Located on the 9th (top) floor, a superb 1 bedroom apartment together with allocated parking space within the ever-popular Millennium Point development with EWS1 form in place (A1 rating). Comprising open-plan living area/kitchen with balcony, bedroom and bathroom. The apartment is situated in th..."
"EWS1 FORM APPROVED & PARKING INCLUDED - Manchester City Centre. We are delighted to offer for sale this contemporary, lift assisted apartment with two double bedrooms, located on the 2nd floor of the Fusion 8 apartments, part of the redevelopment close to Regent Road, the location offers easy acc..."
!!!!!! ATTENTION INVESTORS LET AT £950PCM UNTIL SEPT 2023 - 6.7% YIELD WITH A PROJECTED RENT OF £1000PM - 7% YIELD !!!!!!!!!! A two bedroom apartment that is set over 721 sqft. And situated within the desirable converted development of The Royal. Ideally located ...
A VERY WELL PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE WITH A SPACIOUS LOFT ROOM. THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF ALL LOCAL AMENITIES AND TRANSPORT LINKS
"!!!!!! ATTENTION INVESTORS LET AT £850PCM UNTIL SEPT 2023 - 6.0% YIELD WITH A PROJECTED RENT OF £1000PM - 7% YIELD !!!!! Ideally located within the Chapel Street regeneration area, the property offers access to a range of superb amenities as well as just a short stroll to t..."
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. This 15th floor apartment comes with secure allocated parking & is ideally situated for Salford Quays, yet still only a short Metrolink ride to the City Centre! Accommodation includes, an entrance hall leading to the open plan living lo..."
"*** BUY TO LET INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** A bright and spacious, stylishly presented apartment, CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED, generating £675 RENTAL INCOME PCM, representing a 4.8% GROSS YIELD. ‘The Fusion’ development is located within strolling distance of Cas..."
"Set within Media City UK, one of the most thriving and exciting developments within the UK. This one bedroom apartment is located on the 12th floor and benefits from a balcony providing stunning views of the Manchester Ship Canal."
"*** 2 BED TERRACE FOR SALE IN CHEETHAM *** Pearson Ferrier are delighted to offer this two bedroom terraced house For Sale located in Cheetham, Manchester. As you walk in through the front door, there is an open plan lounge with stairs leading to the first floor. We have a fully fitted k..."
A fantastic 1 bedroom apartment located on the fourteenth floor of the Heart Development at MediaCityUK. The property boasts a balcony with stunning views of the Manchester Ship Canal and beyond Mediacity uk is the UK's first purpose built creative media hub on a 200 acre site located within S...
"A fantastic one bedroom apartment located on the 16th floor of the Number One building at Media City UK. The apartment briefly comprises: private entrance hall, open plan living room with access to balcony, fully fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, double bedroom, bathroom with shower ove..."
"A most appealing second floor city facing studio apartment. This apartment is creatively designed making the most of the light and space with floor to ceiling windows, providing a spacious feel, all apartments have outside balconies. They are ideally located in the heart of the Quays wit..."
"EWS1 Form Available! Mortgages Invited! Offered to the market with no upward chain, this ground floor apartment offers two bedrooms and a modern kitchen within this popular location with excellent access and transport links. Upon entering the property, the entrance hall pro..."
"Virtual Tour Available Online! EWS1 Certificate Available - Mortgages Invited! This first floor apartment enjoys two bedrooms and two bathrooms and is ideally located with a wealth of local amenities and excellent access to the city centre. Upon entering the property, the ent..."
"Stylish student investment property with 6% yields. Invest in a desirable Manchester location from just £100,000.A1158"
This immaculate two bedroom apartment is located on the third floor of a popular purpose built development which stands opposite Middlewood Locks in a convenient area close to Manchester city centre and a short walk from amenities including Regent Road Retail Park. The property has been well main...
"Currently Rented until Jan 2024 at £920pm providing a yield At 6.5% EWS1 Form Available! The ultimate in luxury waterside living, Downtown is one of the most desirable and sought-after residences within the Manchester locality. With its iconic form, the development is a welcome ..."
**EWS1 FORM IN PLACE WITH B1 RATING** NO DOUBLING GROUND RENT**MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME** A spacious one bedroom apartment situated on the top floor of a modern purpose built development on the outskirts of Manchester city centre. The property is currently tenanted and would be an attractive ...
"X1 MEDIACITY Tower B, 4th Floor, One Bedroom Apartment, *WATCH THE WALK THRU VIDEO* with Stunning views across the Quays. Communal Gym, Cinema room & Wi-fi Area. Close to Harbour City Tramstop. Tenanted. Leasehold , No Parking."
"***JUST COMPLETED*** LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES, Unbeatable Rental NET Yields of 10.72%.THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS."
- Tenant in place - achieved £1150 per month - Balcony - Fully furnished - Facing Salford Quays - On site gym - Ideal for working professionals - Opposite Salford Quays Metrolink stop - EWS1 in place
"*** ATTENTION INVESTORS / X1 THE LANDMARK / THREE BEDROOM APARTMENT / TWO EN-SUITES / TERRACE & BALCONY / TWO YEARS 6% RENTAL ASSURANCE / FREE FURNITURE PACK / ON SITE FACILITIES INC GYM, CINEMA ROOM, & PRIVATE GARDEN / WALKING DISTANCE TO UNIVERSITY OF SALFORD & MANCHESTER BUSINESS DISTRICT / TA..."
"WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 10%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1380+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
"
Welcome to Albert Vaults! A stunning contemporary block of apartments in a highly sought after location ticking many boxes with great transport links! We have three different styles of one bedroom apartments available to let within the building. Call today and our agents will find what's ...
"CASH ONLY - NO SATISFACTORY EWS1 IN PLACE The Quebec Building is a fantastic purpose built development of apartments in a great location within a short stroll to Deansgate, the city centre and Salford Central train station. Currently tenanted achieving £950 PCM. "
*AVAILABLE NOW* This FIFTH FLOOR luxury TWO bedroom apartment comes fully furnished. This is a great location for those working close by or in Manchester City Centre as the SALFORD QUAYS TRAM STOP is opposite. CASH BUYERS ONLY.
"SUITABLE FOR INVESTORS AND CASH BUYERS ONLY. Number One Pink idiaCityUK is a 200-acre mixed-use property development on the banks of the Manchester Ship Canal in Salford and Trafford, Greater Manchester, England. The project was developed by Peel Media; its principal tenants are media organisatio..."
"A fabulous one-bedroom luxury apartment located on the eight floor in this spectacular waterside development The Heart, Media City. The one double bedroom apartment has high specification throughout, including a large living area with open plan dining room/kitchen, large bathroom, balc..."
"*Cash Buyers Only due to high amount of tenanted apartments in the block* Crossbank is a highly sought after, contemporary, high specification development. Ideally positioned in Salford, this boutique development is located less than 10 minutes from Manchester city centre. It recently completed a..."
"FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION. Starting Bid £165,000. Terms and Conditions apply. A spacious THREE BEDROOM apartment positioned on the FOURTH FLOOR of a popular GATED DEVELOPMENT with SECURE PARKING INCLUDED and to be sold with NO VENDOR CHAIN. Close by to SALFORD QUAYS amenities ..."
"Number One Media City is a quay side development within fashionable SALFORD QUAYS, occupying a 16th floor position. 455 sq ft. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, an open plan living and kitchen area, one double bedroom served by a modern bathroom. Currently let generati..."
"Philip Ellis are delighted to present this two bedroom Quasi semi detached property located in the heart of Swinton, Salford.A great size family property, set in a large plot, with plenty of options to extend. With a large reception room, fully fitted kitchen/diner, and good size bedrooms. This p..."
A spacious three bedroom apartment positioned on the fourth floor of a popular gated development with secure parking included and to be sold with no vendor chain. Close by to Salford Quays amenities including MediaCityUK. The property provides accommodation spanning 859 sq/ft and comprises: c...
"Genesis City is happy to present this lovely 2-bedroom terraced house in Salford Quays. With close proximity to both Salford Shopping Centre, MediaCity UK and ease of travel to the Trafford Centre, this property is perfect for those who prefer a more quiet environment with access to many facilities."
"A 9th floor one double bedroom, one bathroom apartment within Regent Plaza, a landlmark residential development on the edge of Regent Road, within touching distance of Manchester city centre and Salford Quays."
"Qube Residential are delighted to bring to the market this stylish well proportioned one bedroom apartment, located on the third floor at the ever popular Adelphi Wharf. Comprising of a spacious open plan living area, opening onto modern integrated kitchen, well proportioned double bed..."
"**Currently let with a 5.8% yield** Location, location, location! With looks straight out of a glossy style magazine, this classy, contemporary apartment with have you weak at the knees! "
WEEKS FROM COMPLETION** SERVICED LET NET YIELD OF 10%** DESIRABLE LOCATION** PARKING BAY AVAILABLE** GORGEOUS SPECIFICATION** PREDICTED SERVICED LET RETURNS OF £1380+ PCM** HIGH TENANT DEMAND** REPUTABLE DEVELOPER** GREAT CAPITAL GROWTH & RENTAL YIELD PREDICTIONS**
*AVAILABLE NOW * Stunning 1 bedroom apartment in the heart of MediaCityUK. Modern design with great transport links around Manchester. New development.
"***RENTAL YIELDS OF 10.72%*** NORTHILL APARTMENTS, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS. THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. "
"This 2nd floor apartment provides the perfect first time purchase, or superb investment with YIELDS OF 5.8% available. A delightful apartment in the brand new Middlewood Plaza development, which combines city living, & outside space, along with a range of amenities such as Regent ..."
"AN ENVIABLE SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITHIN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF SALFORD. With spacious rooms, two double bedrooms and two reception rooms, this fantastic two bedroom semi detached property is being proudly welcomed to the market in the highly regarded location of Salford. Situated con..."
"2nd floor apartment provides the perfect first time purchase, or superb investment with YIELDS OF 5.8% available. A delightful apartment in the brand new Middlewood Plaza development, which combines city living, & outside space, along with a range of amenities such as Regent Road ..."
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Rented at £950pcm until September 2023, providing a 6.9% yield. This spacious apartment is positioned on the second floor of a modern purpose built development which is located a few minutes’ walk from Deansgate and Market Stre..."
"EWS1 Form Available. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Offering a unique combination of idyllic location and views over Erie Basin in the vibrant Salford Quays, this exclusive apartment lets anyone with a dream of waterfront living find their perfect home. Transforming the skyline in Salford Qu..."
Tenanted one bedroom apartment for sale in the heart of Media City. Great investment opportunity.
"FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY YIELDING ABOVE 6% NET! A three bedroom apartment with Juliet balcony and parking space in a popular residential location, within easy reach of the city."
"Virtual Tour Available Online Offered to the market with no upward chain, this two bedroom terrace property is ideally located in this popular area of Salford, with a wealth of local amenities and transport links. Upon entering the property, the entrance hall provides access..."
 EWS1 Form Approved. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Clive Anthony are delighted to offer for sale this lift assisted spacious two bedroom apartment located on the fourth floor of the ever popular Fusion development with a secure designated parking space the apartment. Situated on the fringes of the C...
"One double bedroom with parking included! Investors only, currently tenanted on a fixed term."
"MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT just a short walk to MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE with excellent transport links throughout Manchester. Well-presented throughout, benefitting from an open plan lounge, dining and kitchen area and a BALCONY with views across the Manchester Skyline."
"ENDEAVOUR HOUSE, CASH BUYERS ONLY- NO EWS1 CERT AS OF YET, Two Bedrooms, Two Bathrooms , Fitted Kitchen, Tenanted."
"The contemporary Middlewood Plaza development has been designed to suit the needs of urban professionals working in both Salford and Manchester city centre. The one bedroom apartment will offer an appealing, environment to those wanting luxurious city centre living in an outstanding location. Wit..."
**TO BE SOLD WITH NO CHAIN** **CLOSE TO SALFORD UNIVERSITY** **TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** Ideal first time buy or buy to let opportunity with easy access to Manchester City Centre. Call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D.
"A 5th floor one double bedroom, one bathroom apartment within Regent Plaza, a landmark residential development on the edge of Regent Road, within touching distance of Manchester city centre and Salford Quays."
TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR SALE - SALFORD QUAYS
"Salford student apartments with below-market value prices, high capital growth potential, and 6% rental returns. A1157"
"A FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FIRST TIME HOME With an abundance of indoor and outdoor space, open plan kitchen and living area, two generously sized bedrooms and no chain delay, this impressive two bedroom mid terraced property is being proudly welcomed to the market in the high..."
"A stunning, extra large design, ground floor apartment in gated development, St James?s Park. Beautifully appointed throughout with uPVC double glazing and combi gas central heating boiler system. To the rear of the development is a secure perimeter car park with resident car parking."
"EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A two bedroom mid-terrace property to be sold with a sitting tenant. This property is located in a popular area of Salford and is close to local schools, amenities and the transport network. This two bedroom mid terrace property is to be s..."
"Cash Offers only! Qube Residential are delighted to bring to the market this stylish well proportioned one bedroom apartment, located on the fifth floor at the ever popular Adelphi Wharf. Comprising of a spacious living area, modern integrated kitchen, well proportioned doub..."
"The newest addition to the Greater Manchester skyline, X1 The Landmark will provide 191 stunning apartments to the thriving Salford rental market, offering a mix of apartments ranging from spacious studios to luxury 3-bed apartments, & even including a selection of ultra-exclusive two-storey ..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well proportioned one bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 5th floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, fully fitted and integrated kitchen, double bedroom, modern bathr..."
Delightful and contemporary one bedroom ground floor apartment within the popular Bridgewater Point development. The apartment is currently tenanted until June 2023 achieving £875pcm. This property is ideally situated for a number of transport links across the city and the Nort...
"This splendid 1 bedroom apartment is located in the desirable Salford Quays. Close to Media City, and ideal for commuters with the metrolink opposite, and close to motorway links. The accommodation comprises of a large open plan lounge/dining area, a high specification fully fitted kitchen"
"A MODERN and SPACIOUS apartment in Salford Quays, available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are proud to present this charming one bedroom 11th floor apartment in Salford Quays, available with no forward chain.The property is leasehold with 245 y..."
"SPACIOUS and MODERN one bed apartment in the heart of Media City with great transport links to the city centre. Tenant and management company in place , an investor can recieve immdiate income! The apartment comes fully furnished with a modern design and the building featur..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS AND CASH BUYERS** This stunning development offers investors and cash buyers an excellent opportunity to invest from just 30% deposit. Anticipated returns of 6% and it is managed by a leading management company in Manchester, Zenith. "
**TO BE SOLD BY MODERN AUCTION - T&C's APPLY** **ONLINE BIDDING** **SUBJECT TO RESERVE PRICE** **BUYER FEES APPLY** Are you an investor looking for a new opportunity. EPC GRADE D. COUNCIL TAX BAND B.
AVAILABLE NOW Stunning 1 bedroom apartment in the heart of MediaCityUK. Modern design with great transport links around Manchester
"Aubrey Lee & Co are happy to bring to the market this 1/2 bedroom 2nd Floor Apartment located in a popular location offering easy access to local shops, transport links and places of worship. The property has been finished to a high standard and needs to viewed to be appreciated."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - £850 PCM until July 2023 giving 6.37% yield* Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this stunning SECOND FLOOR apartment in X1 The Exchange, just a stones throw from Salford Quays. The apartment block has some fantastic amenities, including on site..."
"C & R City are delighted to bring to the market this spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment situated on Blackburn Street, Trinity Riverside, Salford, M3. The property briefly comprises of a hallway with two storage areas (one housing the boiler), a bright and spacious ‘L’ shaped loung..."
Aubrey Lee & Co are happy to bring to the market this nicely proportioned top floor (with lift to all floors) two bedroom apartment. Situated in a popular development offered good access to local shops and transport links. The property also has the benefit of a single garage.
"Aubrey Lee & Co are pleased to offer this spacious, well presented, two bedroomed, ground floor apartment occupying a pleasant yet very convenient location set back along Bury New Road."
"*** CASH BUYERS ONLY *** 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT. A spacious, ground floor apartment in the popular Spectrum development. Located on Blackfriars Road, Salford, only a short walk to Manchester's main street Deansgate, with all the shops, department stores, bars and restaurants it has to offer. Also co..."
"C & R City are pleased to bring to the market this very well presented, two bedroom, two bathroom first floor apartment with parking. The apartment is conveniently located approx 1 mile from Manchester City Centre and is within easy access of the inner ring road. The apartment is postioned on the..."
"*** IDEAL INVESTMENT PROPERTY IN EXCELLENT LOCATION - 2 BEDROOM MID-TERRACE WITH HUGE POTENTIAL TO IMPROVE - NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Situated ideally for Salford University and for commuting into Manchester city centre, this chain-free spacious 2-bedroom terraced property represents an ide..."
Exclusive New Release: Salford City Apartments. Award Winning Developer. 6% Net Rental Income.
"Shout out to all potential property investors and first time buyers! Here we have an excellent one bed apartment close to Manchester City Centre,"
"City Heights has a brilliant location perched upon the side of Victoria Bridge Street with enviable views over the River Irwell. If shopping and eating is your desire your neighbours are Harvey Nicholls . Located on the 14th floor and accessed via lift. Consisting of a hallway , living area with ..."
" Cardwells are delighted to offer to the market this two bed semi detached property on Malcolm Avenue. Tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac of similar properties and overlooking a well maintained green, this is a wonderful opportunity to create a fabulous family home. Situated off Manchester Road a..."
"First Time Buyers Or Investors Welcome - EWS1 in place! Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this TWO BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM sixth floor apartment is located a short distance from the city centre and offers gated car parking and very convenient access to the City Centre and surroundin..."
"Cash Buyers Only. Attention Investors rented at £775pcm until July 2023 providing a 6.2% yield. This second floor apartment is positioned within the Slater House development, which is set in a prime location equidistant to both Manchester City Centre and Salford Quays, making it ..."
EWS1 form with A1 rating - The ideal buy to let or first time buyer opportunity - Third floor - Studio + apartment - Fitted wardrobe space and `pull down` bed - Balcony - Concierge - Bicycle storage - Tenanted on periodic contract - Achieving £700 pcm - Vacant possession available on request
"NO EWS1 CERTIFACTE- This 2 bedroom apartment is well presented and enjoys plenty of sunlight with a secure gated parking space. Fully fitted kitchen with fridge/freezer, cooker/hob, washing machine. The bathroom has a bath and over power shower. Two bedrooms , one double / one single. Tenanted."
"Stylish student investment property with 6% yields. Invest in a desirable Manchester location from just £100,000. A1147"
** MORTGAGE BUYERS WELCOME ** SECURE ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE INCLUDED ** A charming one bedroom apartment occupying a top floor position in a popular conversion overlooking Chapel Street. The Chapel Street corridor has transitioned into a lively location and is now home to a selection of independ...
"*** INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** Sugar Mill Square is a highly sought after modern development located within a stones throw of Weaste Metrolink station, with easy access to Salford University and Manchester City Centre. The apartment is CURRENTLY LET AND MANAGED UNTIL OCTOBER 20..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to market this immaculately presented one bedroom apartment located in the heart of Media City UK. Situated on the 7th floor of Michigan Point, Tower B, the lovely apartment benefits from its elevated position and is immaculately presented throughout! In brief, the pr..."
"***Thompson's Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM, first floor apartment*** Perfectly positioned within walking distance to Weaste Metrolink Station making Salford Quays/Media City and Manchester Town Centre easily accessible. Well presented throughout, t..."
"EWS1 Available! Virtual Tour Available Online! Offered to the market with no upward chain, this stunning studio property is situated on the 15th floor of this popular building within Media City, with amazing views & a wealth of local amenities and transport links. Upon e..."
PRICE REDUCED FOR AN EARLY SALE. Adelphi Wharf is a purpose built development of spacious apartments is fantastic location. Strategically positioned within the corridor of both The Salford University and Media City UK the home of both the BBC and ITV. This immaculate second floor apartment offe...
"This is YOUR chance to secure a SPACIOUS, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM TERRACED PROPERTY, that is ideally located close to Salford University and benefits from excellent transport links to Manchester City Centre and Salford Quays/Media City!"
"*** CALLING ALL TO LET INVESTORS *** *** For sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £150,000 plus Reservation Fee *** This splendid bay fronted semi-detached house has been converted into a HMO is being sold with sitting tenants and therefore provides an..."
Hunters in Manchester are delighted to welcome to the market this modern one bedroom apartment to the market situated at Adelphi Wharf just off Chapel Street. The apartment comes with concierge at reception as well as a secure allocated parking space. The apartment comes with a large double bedro...
"*20th FLOOR!* Mr Investa are pleased to offer for sale this superb BUY-TO-LET investment opportunity with this one-bedroom apartment located on the 20th floor of this impressive development. Offering immediate income, this makes the perfect addition to any investment portfolio. EWS1 Form in place."
Hunters in Manchester are delighted to introduce to the market this two double bedroom apartment located next to Buile Hill Park in Salford. The property benefits from secure access and a parking space. The apartment is in a very peaceful setting whilst being a short drive away from the city cent...
- Sold with a tenant in place - Located in the heart of Salford Quays - Fully Furnished - Onsite gym open 24/7 - Overnight security - Opposite Salford Quays Metrolink stop 
"Suitable for investment with the current tenant paying £850 . Millennium Point is a purpose built luxury development of apartments, overlooking the picturesque North Bay. Salford Quays is the home of Media City, the home of British Broadcasting including the BBC and ITV. This gives you acce..."
**TWO RECEPTIONS OPEN PLAN** **CLOSE TO SALFORD UNIVERSITY** **EASY ACCESS TO MANCHESTER CITY CENTRE** **TO BE SOLD WITH NO CHAIN** Ideal first time buyer home or addition to any investors portfolio. Call now to book your viewing! COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D
"Modern student development with apartments from just £100,000. Offering rental yields of 6% and experienced property management for a hands-off investment. A1151"
"Mortgage Buyers Welcome !! This very well presented one bedroom apartment, located at the stunning Bridgewater Point, is ideal for investors and home owners alike. Situated on the fifth floor, this wonderful apartment is well proportioned with a spacious entrance hall, givin..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well proportioned one bedroom apartment at the brand new Northill Apartments Development, Salford Quays. The apartment is located on the 1st floor and comprises laminated flooring throughout, fully fitted and integrated kitchen, double bedroom, modern bathr..."
CASH BUYERS ONLY! VIDEO TOUR..... Jordan Fishwick are pleased to offer for sale this lovely second floor one bedroom apartment in Dandara's highly popular Spectrum development. This high specification apartment benefits from modern kitchen with integrated ...
**Investors Only* This 7th floor apartment provides ample natural light throughout. It is currently tenanted until November 2023 with the tenant paying £800.00 PCM achieving over a 6.2% yield. Salford Quays has benefited from extensive regeneration over the past twenty ...
One Bedroom Property for Sale in Media City on the 15th floor.
"NET YIELD 5.9% !! This well proportioned one bedroom apartment at the Award Winning Adelphi Wharf Development is ideal for investment buyers. Situated on the sixth floor, this wonderful apartment comprises newly carpeted entrance hall, spacious open plan living/dining, fully..."
"EWS1 Form Approved. Mortgage Buyers Welcome. Currently rented at £895pm until August 2023 providing a yield of 7.4%. A two bedroom apartment located in the ever popular Fusion development. With a secure designated parking space the apartment leaves little to be desired, making a..."
"Adelphi Wharf Phase One is a 206 unit residential apartment building based in Salford. A superb opportunity to purchase a FIRST floor mortgageable property in a great location close to Salford Central, Salford University and offers easy access into Manchester. In brief the property c..."
"Hunters Manchester are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom, modern apartment in The Bailey development located on New Bailey Street. Moments from Spinningfields and its array of restaurants and bars. Equally well positioned for major public transport links This property comprises, two do..."
"6% NET YIELD !! CASH BUYERS ONLY. This very well presented one bedroom apartment, located at the stunning Bridgewater Point, is ideal for investors and home owners alike. Situated on the fifth floor, this wonderful apartment is well proportioned with a spacious en..."
"OVER 5% NET YIELD!! *SUPERB INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A GREAT LOCATION* Mr Investa are pleased to present to the market this superb one bedroom apartment, located on the first floor of this impressive building. Ideally positioned with walking distance to Manchester City Centre and a short d..."
"**TO BE SOLD BY MODERN AUCTION - T&C's APPLY** **ONLINE BIDDING** **SUBJECT TO RESERVE PRICE** **BUYER FEES APPLY** Are you an investor looking for a property to turn into a HMO? Well look no further as this large, two bed mid terrace would be perfect for you. COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC GRADE D."
"CASH OFFERS AND INVESTORS ONLY. No EWS1. Currently let for £850pcm until May 2023. We are pleased to offer for sale this fourth floor, two-bedroom apartment in Salford just off Regents Road. The apartment comprises of two double bedrooms (one with en-suite), open plan lounge with ful..."
"This 7th floor apartment provides ample natural light throughout. It is currently tenanted until November 2023 with the tenant paying £750.00 PCM. Salford Quays has benefited from extensive regeneration over the past twenty years. Now a thriving business district, residential ar..."
"***RENTAL YIELDS OF 10.72%**** LOCATED IN THE HEART OF SALFORD QUAYS. THE PREVIOUS PHASES HAVE BEEN A TREMENDOUS SUCCESS, SHOWING THE HUGE DEMAND FOR PRIME LUXURY RESIDENTIAL HOMES IN SALFORD. Unbeatable Rental NET Yields of 10.72%."
"Location, location, location! This excellent one bed flat is a gem for first time buyers and property investors alike; set in the heart of media city you won`t find a better option for an easy convenient lifestyle and excellent transport links to the city centre. "
"ENDEAVOUR HOUSE, CASH INVESTOR BUYERS ONLY- NO EWS1 CERT AS OF YET, One Bedroom, one Bathrooms , Fitted Kitchen, Tenanted."
"*** INVESTORS *** FIRST TIME BUYERS *** Hepburn Court is a brilliant buy, an excellent opportunity for an investor or for your own purchase. Hepburn Court is chosen by many as one of the preferred developments within the Salford 6 area. It is a well maintained and lovely development. Sat jus..."
*EWS1 IN PLACE - MORTGAGE BUYERS INVITED* Jordan Fishwick are delighted to bring to the market this fourth floor apartment in the popular Fusion development on Middlewood Street in Salford. Perfectly situated for access to the M602 and Regent Road Retail Park and walking distance from the cit...
"Modern student development with apartments from just £100,000. Offering rental yields of 6% and experienced property management for a hands-off investment. A1146"
An immaculate two bedroom apartment situated on the third floor of a popular development just off Chapel Street in a convenient location close to Salford University and a short walk from Manchester city centre. The property is a short walk from Manchester city centre and provides easy access ...
"***SOLD WITH SITTING TENANTS ACHIEVING £995PCM*** Check out this superb 3 BEDROOM maisonette within WALKING DISTANCE to SALFORD QUAYS/MEDIA CITY! In a prime location facing LANGWORTHY TRAM STATION with direct access to the City Centre and Salford Quays/Media City, this would be an ideal investment!"
New Launch - 2 Bed Apartments with Stunning Views across Salford City Centre with 6% Net Rental Income to Investors.
"CASH BUYERS ONLY - Jordan FIshwick are pleased to offer for sale this well presented ONE BEDROOM fourth floor apartment, located in the newly completed Adelphi Wharf development, recently seen on The Circle UK. The apartment was completed in 2019 and has been lovingly maintained since built. The ..."
"Fantastic 1 bedroom apartment with PRIVATE TERRACE within this recently-completed development on the border of Salford Quays. Presented to a high standard, it comprises an open-plan living area/kitchen and double bedroom (both with access to terrace) along with shower room. On-site residents' gym..."
"Being Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £140,000 This very well presented one bedroom apartment, located at the stunning Bridgewater Point, is ideal for investors and home owners alike. Situated on the fifth floor, this won..."
This 12th floor studio apartment in Tower B Michigan Point sits in a desirable Salford Quays location close to all Media City has to offer. Harbour City tram stop (0.1m) is located directly outside the development offering excellent connectivity in and around Manchester. Boasting far reachi...
"422 Quebec Building, Bury Street, M3 7DU We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £137,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contrac..."
"NO CHAIN and ideal for owner occupier or property investor with a rental potential of £750 to £795 pcm. A purpose built, 1st floor apartment of approx 570 sq ft with exclusive use of designated parking space, electric heating system and uPVC double glazing."
INVESTORS & FIRST TIME BUYERS. TENANTED UNTIL MAY 2023 ACHIEVING £750 PCM. Millennium Point is a purpose built luxury apartment block that is located within the Salford Quays. This luxury mid-level apartment block overlooks Erie Basin giving the apartments a waterside locution. Accessed...
"Top floor! Investors only, stunning 26th floor one bedroom apartment in the highly sought after Michigan Point development."
"Jordan Fishwick are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £138,000 for 5, 33 Duke St, M7 1PR. Anyone wishing to place an offer on the property should contact Jordan Fishwick, 245 Deansgate, M3 4EN ) prior to exchange of contracts. No Chain. This two bedroom ..."
* CHAIN-FREE * A FANTASTIC FIRST HOME or INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * Ideally located in a DESIRABLE MODERN DEVELOPMENT
"Cash Offers or BTL investment only! This well proportioned brand new one bedroom apartment at the Award Winning Adelphi Wharf Development is ideal for either investment or first time buyers. Situated on the fifth floor, this wonderful apartment comprises newly carpeted entr..."
EWS1 form - The ideal buy to let or first time buyer opportunity - Studio + apartment - Fitted wardrobe space - Fitted `pull down` bed - Balcony - Concierge - Bicycle storage - Vacant possession - No onward chain
"BEING SOLD VIA SECURE SALE ONLINE BIDDING. TERMS & CONDITIONS APPLY. STARTING BID £140,000. An immaculate two bedroom apartment situated on the third floor of a popular development just off Chapel Street in a convenient location close to Salford University and a short walk from Manchester city ce..."
"Stunning two-bedroom flat in Salford, close to Salford city centre, shopping and entertainment.Prestwich Clough is located nearby for scenic walks and the property is ideally located for excellent local schools and connections to Manchester, the motorway and public transport network."
"EWS1 form available - B1 rating. Located in the heart of MediaCity, this superb modern studio apartment offers well-presented accommodation with balcony. 16th floor position with great views over the Quays. Close to a range of shops, bars/restaurants and Metrolink stop, this property is ideal for..."
"This very well presented one bedroom apartment, located at the stunning Bridgewater Point, is ideal for investors and home owners alike. Situated on the fifth floor, this wonderful apartment is well proportioned with a spacious entrance hall, giving access to an open plan living/dining area wh..."
Contemporary 1 bedroom apartment on the 14th floor of this landmark development with a range of residents' facilities. Great investment potential being tenanted until July 2023 providing a gross yield of circa 7%! Ideally situated for the amenities of Salford Quays and MediaCity with the adjacent...
"Salford student apartments with below-market value prices, high capital growth potential, and 6% rental returns. A1150"
THE FIRST CO-LIVING INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN THE UK | 7% yield guarantee | On the gateway to Media City | Potential for a 12-year tenant | Fully furnished and fully managed | Perfect for hands-off investors
"CASH OFFERS AND INVESTORS ONLY. NO EWS1. The apartment is currently let at £950 until July 2023. We are pleased to offer for sale this modern one bedroom apartment located on the seventh floor of The Bayley development. This property comprises, one large double bedro..."
FULLY AVAILABLE FOR MORTGAGE BUYERS !! We are delighted to offer for sale this very well proportioned studio apartment located at the award winning Adelphi Wharf. This luxury apartment is fitted and finished to the highest standard and comprises a spacious living and dining area with a...
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY !! 5.6% NET YIELD !! CASH BUYERS ONLY. Fantastic investment opportunity !! This well proportioned brand new one bedroom apartment at the Award Winning Adelphi Wharf Development is ideal for either investment or first time buyers. Situated on ...
We are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful one bedroom apartment presented in immaculate condition and only a short walk to Deans The property is located just off Trinity Way in a modern and well maintained development. Perfect for young professionals commuting into the city centre...
"Fantastic investment opportunity !! This well proportioned brand new one bedroom apartment at the Award Winning Adelphi Wharf Development is ideal for either investment or first time buyers. Situated on the 1st floor, this wonderful apartment comprises newly carpeted entrance hall, spa..."
"Aubrey Lee & Co are happy to bring to the market this nicely presented, bright 2nd floor apartment located in a popular location offering easy access to local shops and transport networks. The property also has the benefit of a garage."
"City Co-Living is the first tenant-centric co-living offering in the UK. Created exclusively by leading residential developer Beech Holdings and operated by our award-winning in-house lettings and property management team, City Co-Living will revolutionise the UK rental market, and take renting i..."
"City Co-Living MediaCity have so much to offer residents within it gates, but it’s location at the Gateway to Media City and Salford Quays is on only a 10-minute walk to the UK’s largest media and tech hub. A renowned waterfront destination, Media City and Salford Quays is home to over 250 bu..."
"MEDIA CITY LOCATION Virtual Tour Available Online! Offered to the market with no upward chain this second floor, well presented studio apartment enjoys a fabulous Media City Location with Salford Quays. Upon entering the property, the entrance hall leads through to a spaciou..."
"*ATTRACTIVELY PRICED WITH PRIVATE BALCONY!* *5% NET YIELD* Mr Investa are pleased to present to the market this FANTASTIC ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT located on the 2nd floor of an impressive building, X1 The Gateway. This popular development stands in a prime location within close proximity to Manches..."
"SOLD VIA SECURE SALE ONLINE BIDDING. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £135.000. TENANTED UNTIL NOVEMBER 2023 ** EWS1 FORM IN PLACE, SUITABLE FOR MORTGAGE BUYERS ** This stunning one bedroom apartment is located on the first floor of a modern Salford Quays development which is a short walk f..."
"Connells bring to the market this two bedroom, first floor flat in Woodbury House, The Crescent, Salisbury. The property has a large open plan lounge kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom. There is also an allocated parking space."
"A large portion of a fine extended Georgian house that has been completely restored and tastefully modernised with gated parking, double garage and large south facing walled rear garden, situated just a short walk from the Cathedral and town centre"
Immaculate Family House with stunning views located in one of the preeminent residential locations in Salisbury. 
"An executive 5 bedroom detached family home which has been completely refurbished and extended giving 3,000 sq ft of stunning accommodation with a quarter acre plot on Bouverie Avenue South."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a character family home in approaching 3/4s of an acre, in probably the best road in Salisbury, with exceptional potential to create a fabulous family home."
** VIRTUAL VIEWING TOUR AVAILABLE FOR THIS PROPERTY** A fine double-fronted Grade II Listed city centre home overlooking The Greencroft and St Edmunds Church yard.
FIRST LAUNCH OF VIEWINGS SATURDAY 11th March EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THIS STUNNING HOME... We are thrilled to offer to the market this four bedroom detached executive style home. This property has been renovated and improved throughout under the current vendors. Upon entering the prop...
"A contemporary double fronted four bedroom detached family home, with attractive views of Wiltshire countryside."
"** VIRTUAL VIEWING TOUR AVAILABLE FOR THIS PROPERTY** A beautifully presented 4 bedroom contemporary family home, with a Grade II Listed barn outbuilding and attractive walled gardens."
"A selection of three stunning town houses, built to an exacting standard throughout by renowned award winning developer Bluestone Homes. All three homes have been beautifully created and finished to an impeccable standard exuding both elegance and style creating contemporary open plan living. T..."
An outstanding edge of city centre development of just three substantial four bedroom homes completed by a quality award winning developer which are finished to an exacting standard.
An outstanding edge of city centre development of just three substantial four bedroom homes completed by a quality award winning developer which are finished to an exacting standard. EPC: B
"Architecturally Designed Stylish Re-Development to Provide Almost 3,000sqft of Large Light Flexible Accommodation Arranged over Three Floors, in one of the Preeminent Residential Salisbury Locations. Rare and Exciting Opportunity to Purchase an Exceptional Property Off-Plan and be Invo..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a substantial five-bedroom family home in a seriously sought after residential road on the northern edge of Salisbury city centre with extensive gardens and stunning views.
"No. 12 The Hamptons, is a detached five bedroom home as part of a bespoke development of both four & five bedroom homes in the Bishopdown area of historic Salisbury."
"*NO ONWARDS CHAIN* A charming four bedroom detached family home, with substantial accommodation and delightful rear garden."
Black Horse House is a former mid 19th century Coaching Inn which has been converted and transformed into an exceptional town house with elegant accommodation and a detached self-contained annexe.
A substantial five/ six bedroom detached family house set within a sought-after residential location and benefiting from views across the city towards Salisbury Cathedral Spire. Viewing is recommended.
"An attractive and stylish four bedroom family home situated in the popular location of East Harnham. The accommodation includes three reception rooms, a kitchen diner, two en-suites and a double garage."
"Stylish two bedroom apartment with private garden, close to excellent transport links with easy access to all day to day necessities."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A stunning 2-bed apartment on the second floor of this wonderful city centre building, which has been subject to an extensive refurbishment programme."
"An attractive, detached character property situated on Castle Road. The property provides generous and stylish accommodation with three reception rooms, kitchen, cloakroom, utility room, four bedrooms and a family bathroom. There are also two garages, a workshop and front and rear gardens."
"No. 13 The Hamptons, is a detached four bedroom home as part of a bespoke development of both four & five bedroom homes in the Bishopdown area of historic Salisbury."
"An impressive family home, situated in 0.34 acres of land with a stunning and well maintained rear garden."
"A detached, five bedroom house.The ground floor accommodation consists of an entrance hall, cloakroom, study, lounge, dining room, new kitchen and utility room. The first floor offers five bedrooms - two with en-suites and a family bathroom. There is a landscaped garden and a double garage."
VIRTUAL TOUR - Substantial five bedroom semi-detached home with Cathedral views. Offering spacious accommodation over three floors with single garage and driveway.
An exceptionally well appointed detached family home situated in this popular residential location in Harnham. The property has superbly flowing accommodation which has been refurbished to a high standard in recent years to create a wonderful family living environment. On the ground floor the pro...
A classic period townhouse set over three floors together with approximately 100 foot rear garden ** GARAGE ** PARKING ** STUDIO **
"Extended, detached family home occupying an elevated position. ** FOUR BEDROOMS ** PRIVATE GARDEN ** SINGLE GARAGE ** VIEWS **"
Three storey town house in the Cathedral Close.
"An exceptionally well appointed detached family residence situated in the popular Hampton Park development. Occupying a corner plot position at the end of a cul de sac the property enjoys an enviable location with direct access onto the country park. The accommodation includes four bedrooms, the ..."
"A superbly appointed, light and airy two-bedroom apartment situated within an enviable position within the historic Salisbury Cathedral Close and enjoying a direct view of the West front of Salisbury Cathedral. Viewing is essential. EPC: C"
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Boasting an excellent position, sizeable accommodation, and a generous plot, properties of this criteria are seldom available to the market. This three-bedroom detached family home comprises a homely sitting room with its integrated wood burner, a bright and welcomin..."
"An exceptionally well appointed four bedroom family home situated in this popular location off of the Castle Road. The accommodation includes two reception rooms including an extended living room, a beautifully fitted kitchen, four bedrooms, a newly fitted bathroom, driveway parking and a south f..."
"A modern, detached family home in a small cul-de-sac in a popular developement to the north of the city."
"Large executive detached bungalow with large vaulted ceiling extension and feature glass gable. Set in this select small development very close to the city centre and countryside the property offer spacious accommodation which includes three bedrooms, master en-suite, sitting room, large open pla..."
"Fox and Sons are delighted to bring to market this well apointed family home in the sought after location of Laverstock. With an enormous amount of benefits including, two reception rooms, three double bedrooms, summer house and garage just to name a few this property is a MUST SEE!!!"
"Live in style in this THREE BEDROOM semi-detached house with a PRIVATE GARDEN, on an EXCLUSIVE NEW OVER 55'S COMMUNITY. Features a DOWNSTAIRS TOILET, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and a host of ON-SITE NON-PROFIT FACILITIES."
"A bright & spacious 4 bedroom link detached house set in a quiet cul de sac. With 3 good sized receptions rooms, this well cared for home offers comfortable & flexible accommodation. The sunny garden backs onto a country park and is within easy reach of local amenities and Salisbury. "
A well proportioned 3 bedroom detached bungalow within a large corner plot located in the popular area of Laverstock.
Modern town house with EXCEPTIONAL SPACE and parking within walking distance of the city centre. ** QUALITY FITTINGS & FINISHINGS ** NO CHAIN ** PVCU DOUBLE GLAZING
"A well presented detached home located within a very popular residential area within comfortable walking distance of the Salisbury City centre. Offering good-sized accommodation throughout, with the benefits of an integral garage and off-street parking"
"Fox and Sons are proud to bring to the market this three bedroom family home in the sought after location of Harnham. With public transport links on your door step, only a short distance from the city center and walking distance to local amenities."
"Located just a SHORT WALK from Salisbury city centre, this SPACIOUS APARTMENT sits in an EXCLUSIVE OVER 55s COMMUNITY. With UNDER-FLOOR HEATING, WALK-IN shower, ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, generous bedrooms and an ON-SITE NON-PROFIT bistro, bar and homeowners lounge, you can retire in style."
A DETACHED chalet style BUNGALOW in a popular residential CUL DE SAC. ** LARGE GARDEN ** GARAGE & OFF ROAD PARKING ** FOUR BEDROOMS ** EN SUITE ** NO ONWARD CHAIN **
A detached family home situated at the end of a small close ** FOUR BEDROOMS ** DOUBLE GARAGE ** VIEWS TO THE CATHEDRAL ** CONSERVATORY **
"A lovely mid-twentieth century, four bedroom detached home set within a cul-de-sac and situated in a sought-after village within a fifteen-minute walk from Salisbury town centre.  This lovely home is presented in good order throughout and is set on a generous plot with potential to extend and imp..."
A superbly positioned 3 bedroom semi-detached property with parking and a garage on Mill Road close to the train station and City centre. No forward chain! 
"A substantial semi detached family home situated in this popular residential street to the west of Salisbury City. The property has recently been comprehensively renovated including being re-wired, new heating system installed and data points throughout the property. The accommodation includes an..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a four bedroom detached house in the very popular location of Bishopdown. The impressive accommodation includes a lounge, a dining room, kitchen, utility room and an office/study. The master bedroom has an en-suite and there is parking and a generous rear garden."
"Live in this 3 BEDROOM APARTMENT in Avon Villa a restored Grade-II listed Edwardian building which forms part of an EXCLUSIVE RETIREMENT COMMUNITY FOR OVER 55s. Features include FLOOR TO CEILING WINDOWS, VILLEROY & BATHROOM fittings, UNDERFLOOR HEATING and BUILT-IN ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES."
"Comprising four bedrooms, kitchen, open living area, utility room with downstairs WC, bathroom, en suit to bedroom one, off road parking and private, mature garden."
"Experience a new way of living in this TWO BEDROOM semi-detached house with a PRIVATE GARDEN, in an EXCLUSIVE OVER 55s COMMUNITY in Salisbury. Features a DOWNSTAIRS TOILET, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, EN-SUITE, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and ON-SITE FACILITIES."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Occupying an unparalleled position for those looking for convenient access to the Salisbury train station, this substantial five-bedroom family home boasts spacious accommodation with copious storage solutioned throughout. The ground-floor comprises a light and welco..."
"A handsome period freehold building on a charming residential street off Wyndham Park. Currently arranged as 5 flats which are registered as an HMO, and with an adjoining studio flat which requires modernising. "
"Rarely available opportunity to purchase a character house, currently a HOUSE OF MULTIPLE OCCUPANCY but with potential to convert to 3 flats or a wonderful home, within EASY WALKING TO THE CITY CENTRE."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Set within one of Salisbury's most sought-after residential locations, this recently redecorated four-bedroom family home offers a spacious and well-proportioned accommodation alongside the charismatic features of a Victorian property. The ground floor comprises a si..."
"Every Step of The Way is delighted to bring to the market this beautiful Victorian style end of terrace home, offering approximately 1,310 sq ft of spacious accommodation. The property has been beautifully presented and is light and airy throughout and benefits from high ceilings and well-propor..."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Positioned within a comfortable walking distance of the Salisbury city centre, this substantial four-bedroom period family home offers its accommodation over three floors and boasts off-street parking seldom found in properties of this type. The ground floor comprises..."
"***NO FORWARD CHAIN*** Fox & Sons are delighted to offer this stunning, luxury two bedroom apartment, situated in a highly sought after location in central Salisbury. The very spacious accommodation features high ceilings & sash windows. There is a garage and parking space to the rear."
An elegant two bedroom first floor flat in a converted period house. ** COMMUNAL GARDENS ** GARAGE ** CITY CENTRE ** NO CHAIN **
Home and income potential. A 3 bedroom semi detached house requiring improvements with one bedroom annex. No onward chain.
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Situated in a quiet western quadrant of the popular Harnham district, this three-bedroom family home has been lovingly-maintained since its construction in 1966. Prospective buyers will benefit from the property's proximity to the Harnham Town Path which offers a sce..."
A well presented THREE bedroom detached house with a conservatory extension and quietly situated in a popular cul de sac. ** EN-SUITE ** OFF ROAD PARKING ** GARDENS
An extended detached three bedroom bungalow in excellent order throughout. ** LARGE GARDEN ** OFF-ROAD PARKING **
"A substantial two storey, three double bedroom family home with 150ft west facing rear garden. Located on the west side of the city is great family home, generous accommodation which includes, cloakroom, sitting room, dining room, conservatory, new kitchen, three double bedrooms and bathroom. Oth..."
"Connells are pleased to bring to the market this well proportioned, three bedroom semi-detached house in the ever popular location of Harnham. The property offers three reception rooms, kitchen, downstairs cloakroom, three bedrooms, family bathroom and good size garden."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Seldom available on the market is this excellently-positioned three-bedroom detached house. Offering a range of good-sized accommodation with the added benefits of off-street parking and a garage, this property will make an ideal family home with scope for future impr..."
"A handsome period home located on a prime city centre road offering enormous potential. 14 Wyndham Road is a classic bay fronted semi detached villa which has been lovingly maintained by its current owners, but could benefit from some updating in certain areas."
Connells offer to the market this first floor one double bed retirement flat situated inside the ring road.
A superbly presented 3 bedroom mid terraced late Victorian home located just a short walk from the City centre in Harnham. 
"A charming refurbished Victorian house located in this prime residential area near the market square. This is a great opportunity to buy a lovely town house within walking distance of the city centre. On the ground floor there is a reception hall, sitting room, dining room and fitted kitc..."
A brand new two bedroom mews style barn with private lift. Located in centre of Salisbury.
 ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A bright and spacious three-bedroom detached chalet bungalow which has been meticulously modernised and features tasteful styling throughout. The accommodation boasts a range of welcoming spaces which are lit by copious spotlights and a variety of large Velux windows ...
"Beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the desirable Riverdown Park development of Bishopdown. This home has been very well maintained by the current owners and offers an array of benfits such as a downstairs cloakroom, conservatory and two allocated parking spaces."
"Stunning two bedroom, ground floor apartment with stylish accommodation and private, generous rear garden."
A well presented THREE BEDROOM semi detached house with a CONSERVATORY EXTENSION and LONG BACK GARDEN ** NO ONWARD CHAIN **
A superbly located 3 bedroom semi-detached family home within a short walk through the Cathedral Close into Salisbury and with no forward chain. 
"Having been tastefully updated by the current owners, this three-bedroom home is offered to the market with the additional benefit of no forward chain. The accommodation comprises a useful entrance hall, complete with a cloakroom before then leading into the main sitting area. Here, a brilliant f..."
"A three bedroom, semi detached house comprising of an entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen and cloakroom on the ground floor. The first floor offers three bedrooms and a bathroom/wetroom. There is driveway parking and a garage, front and rear gardens. No onward chain."
"A beautifully converted 2 bedroom first floor apartment within this development of a Grade II* Listed building, with a modern extension."
"Located just a SHORT WALK from Salisbury city centre, this SPACIOUS APARTMENT EXCLUSIVELY FOR OVER 55s challenges your thoughts of what retirement living is like with ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING, WALK-IN shower, generous bedrooms and an ON-SITE NON-PROFIT bistro & owners' lounge"
"Situated within a SHORT WALK of Salisbury city centre with convenient bus routes close by, this SPACIOUS home features ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING & accessible WALK-IN SHOWER. Homeowners also enjoy ON-SITE NON-PROFIT bistro, lounge & manicured gardens."
"An immaculately presented semi-detached house situated within a highly sought after residential development in Harnham. The property boasts spacious accommodation which includes an entrance hall, cloakroom, living room, kitchen/diner with French doors leading to the garden, master bedroom with en..."
"With your own PRIVATE BALCONY to enjoy valuable outdoor space, this SPACIOUS APARTMENT boasts floods of natural light, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING, WALK-IN accessible shower, BUILT-IN ENERGY EFFICIENT APPLIANCES and an EXCLUSIVE ON-SITE bistro, bar and homeowners lounge."
"Enjoy your outdoor space with a PRIVATE BALCONY in this SPACIOUS APARTMENT EXCLUSIVELY FOR OVER 55s. Features include generously sized bedrooms, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING, WALK-IN accessible shower, ENERGY-EFFICENT APPLIANCES and an ON-SITE NON-PROFIT bistro, bar and homeowners lounge."
Extremely well designed apartments with a superior specification and located in the Salisbury’s historic city centre.
"An appealing mid-terrace townhouse located a short distance from Salisbury city centre, available with no onward chain."
"A well presented and deceptive townhouse located within a prime city centre location. 90 Gigant Street is a versatile home laid out over three floors which can easily yield four bedrooms and two reception rooms. The house has a number of features only appreciated by a viewing, these include the 5..."
"Comprising three double bedrooms, lounge, family bathroom and additional shower room, conservatory to the rear and modern fitted kitchen. The property benefits from driveway parking and a well stocked, West facing rear garden."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A lovely two-bedroom detached bungalow offering well-presented accommodation throughout which is set on a generous plot. The property comprises a kitchen with integrated appliances and a range of built-in storage, a dining room which flows through to the cosy sitting ..."
"A particularly spacious city centre home offered in good order, but with huge potential to personalize. 66 St Edmunds Church Street is an interesting property with far greater frontage than a normal terraced property, therefore providing more generously proportioned rooms. The house also benefits..."
An extremely characterful and deceptively spacious three bedroom period house with generous garden being situated within close proximity to Churchill Gardens and Salisbury city centre. No Chain
"This is a lovely terraced house originally constructed around 1900 of brick elevations beneath a tiled roof which has been recently refurbished and improved. The property has gas fired central heating as well as double glazed windows and the accommodation briefly comprises - sitting room, dining ..."
"A two bedroom, coach house style first floor apartment with lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom. The property benefits from a car port with two parking spaces."
"An attractive bay fronted Victorian terrace of good size situated within walking distance of the City Centre and train station on a no through road. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout which comprises of an entrance hallway, large dual aspect living and dining room with bay wind..."
"This modern three bedroom detached family home has undergone modernisation and improvement over recent years, set in a sought after cul de sac location in Salisbury giving easy access to the City Centre. The well presented accommodation on the ground floor comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, stu..."
"A modern 3 bedroomed semi-detached family home with private garden, garage and parking."
An extended THREE bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow in a popular suburb. ** OFF ROAD PARKING ** PLEASANT REAR GARDEN ** GAS CENTRAL HEATING
"A rare opportunity to acquire this period property converted into two self contained dwellings. 13a/13b Longland were created in 2008 to a high standard, and comprise a one bedroom garden flat and two double bedroom maisonette. Both properties are double glazed with gas heating and benefit from m..."
A superb end terrace family home together with part-walled garden. ** THREE BEDROOMS ** WEST FACING GARDEN ** TWO OFF-ROAD PARKING SPACES **
A well appointed and substantial four bedroom period townhouse situated on the immediate fringe of Salisbury city centre and boasting far-reaching city views and to Salisbury Cathedral and Spire. Offered with no onward chain.
"Situated within a SHORT WALK of Salisbury city centre with convenient bus routes close by, this SPACIOUS home features ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING & accessible WALK-IN SHOWER. Homeowners also enjoy EXCLUSIVE bistro, lounge and manicured gardens while being part of a community."
"A three bedroom terraced town house in the sought after location of College Street, Salisbury. The property offers a lounge, dining room, kitchen, three double bedrooms and a bathroom. There is an enclosed patio garden to the rear of property. Situated opposite Wyndham Park providing lovely views."
A very rare opportunity to purchase an end of terrace house in need of renovation ** TWO BEDROOMS ** LARGE GARDEN ** BUILDING PLOT POTENTIAL **
An exceptional top floor flat offering over 106 sq.m. of accommodation and with great views. ** THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS ** DOUBLE GLAZING ** COMMUNAL GARDENS ** PARKING SPACE AND GARAGE ** SHARE OF FREEHOLD **
"Boatwrights are delighted to bring to market this beautifully renovated three-bedroom home in the centre of Salisbury. The property has been extensively and lovingly refurbished by the current owners and is offered with no onward chain. The ground floor comprises two good sized reception rooms, i..."
"A substantial five bedroom Victorian townhouse situated near Salisbury city centre, a short 10 minute level walk to the market square. The accommodation totalling approximately 1520 sqft extends over three floors with accommodation including two reception rooms, a kitchen, two bathrooms, rear gar..."
A detached bungalow in need of refurbishment and occupying a prominent corner plot position. ** NO CHAIN ** POPULAR SALISBURY SUBURB **
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A unique opportunity for prospective buyers to acquire a special penthouse flat within easy reach of the Salisbury city centre. It offers a sizeable and versatile accommodation, seldom found in properties of this type. The interior offers a kitchen/breakfast room whic..."
"THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME SET OVER THREE FLOORS - Benefits include single integral garage, driveway parking, spacious kitchen / diner, en suite shower to main bedroom"
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A beautifully refurbished two-bedroom apartment, boasting the largest plot in the building, set in a prime central position for prospective buyers to benefit from the wide range of amenities on its doorstep. Queens House was tastefully rejuvenated in 2016 and has bee..."
"Located in this sought after and quiet area is this spacious three bedroom semi detached bungalow. The accommodation includes hallway, newly fitted kitchen, large open plan lounge diner, conservatory, comprehensive shower room and three bedrooms. Other benefits include south facing garden, garage..."
OPEN DAY - SATURDAY 25TH FEBRUARY - CALL NOW TO BOOK VIEWING 50% SOLD - One & Two Bedroom Apartments. Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 new apartments.
"***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR***OFF STREET PARKING***A lovingly updated three-bedroom semi-detached property, situated within a fifteen minute walking distance from the Salisbury city centre for prospective buyers to benefit from the array of amenities the historic city has to offer. The interior has b..."
"This stylish, Georgian home is ideal for those with families or commuting to London. Having been newly redecorated throughout, the property benefits from a modern bathroom, utility room and spacious, well maintained rear garden, perfect for Summer evenings."
"An ideal opportunity to purchase this second floor apartment available at a retirement development close to the city centre that maintains the independence of residents, with support when required.Features include an on-site restaurant, communal gardens and lift access."
"Light airy and spacious two bedroom retirement apartment located in this exclusive retirement complex located next to the beautiful Elizabeth Gardens in the heart of Salisbury. The spacious apartment has a generous entrance hall, two bedrooms, ample storage, sitting room and kitchen diner. The pr..."
A conveniently situated four bedroom three-storey townhouse situated within a Mews type setting on the southern side of Salisbury city centre and benefiting from allocated off-road parking. Viewing is recommended. 
"This SPACIOUS home EXCLUSIVELY for OVER 55s boasts floods of natural light, ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, UNDER-FLOOR HEATING & an accessible WALK-IN SHOWER & ON-SITE NON-PROFIT homeowners bistro, lounge & manicured gardens. All this is just a SHORT WALK from Salisbury city centre & local amenities."
A new 2 bed ground floor apartment from Ludlow Properties with spacious accommodation and a superb finish. Close to City Centre and private parking space. Nicholas Court comprises 6 properties in total. 2 Reservations already!
"An ideal opportunity to purchase this quiet and secluded second floor apartment available at a retirement development close to the city centre that maintains the independence of residents, with support when required.Features include an on-site restaurant, communal gardens and lift access."
"A Grade ll* listed house which is situated in the city centre in Exeter Street. The property comprises of an entrance porch, sitting room, large hall, cloakroom, kitchen/diner, conservatory, two bedrooms and a shower room. There is a garden and garage to the rear of the property."
"A well located three bedroom semi detached house, within close proximity to Laverstock village and benefiting from generous accommodation with an enclosed rear courtyard. EPC: "
" **WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR**Discover retirement living to the full at Castle Gate in Salisbury. CALL US NOW - Exclusively designed for the over 60s, this stunning new development of 24 one and two bedroom retirement apartments is located on Endless Street, in the heart of Salis..."
"Experience a new way of living in this spacious GROUND FLOOR 1 BEDROOM apartment in an exclusive new over 55s development. Features include FLOOR TO CEILING WINDOWS, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES and more."
"An impressive and spacious ground floor apartment in a Grade II Listed building, located in the heart of the city centre."
"A light and airy, well presented, third floor three bedroom flat with no onward chain, far reaching views, lift access, secure undercroft parking space and storage cage."
Connells bring to the market this modern two bedroom terraced property in the sought after location Harnham which has recently become available after a very popular launch of The Cooper style properties.
A period terraced property believed to date from the 1850s. ** THREE BEDROOMS **HIGH CEILINGS ** FIREPLACES ** SASH WINDOWS **
"River Avon frontage in a quiet city centre location that backs on to the developing Salisbury River Park Scheme. A charming two double bedroom house which benefits from deceptively spacious accommodation arranged over two floors which comprises of an entrance hall with under stairs storage, open ..."
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this stunning one bedroom second floor apartment, which is situated within this much sought after development, Sarum Lodge. The apartment offers deceptively spacious accommodation and benefits from carpets, curtains and a gorgeous electric ..."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** This immaculately presented retirement apartment presents the perfect opportunity for those looking for an independent, yet secure lifestyle in the heart of the city. With all the added benefits of an in-house Lodge Manager, communal gardens and reception space. This ..."
"Versatile bungalow within walking distance of the city centre, generous semi detached two double bedroom, two reception, entrance porch, hallway, bathroom and kitchen which offers good size accommodation throughout. Private enclosed rear garden, modern gas central heating, modern double glazing a..."
A recently redecorated three bedroom townhouse which is situated within level walking distance of Salisbury's Guildhall and Market Square. Available with no onward chain.
"Experience a new way of living in this spacious GROUND FLOOR 1 BEDROOM apartment in an exclusive new over 55s community. Features include FLOOR TO CEILING WINDOWS, VILLEROY & BOCH EN-SUITE BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES and more."
"Developer incentive £5,000 towards Stamp Duty, or £5,000 John Lewis vouchers Celeste at Every Step of The Way is delighted to offer to the market these luxury new build apartments, situated in a prominent location in the heart of Salisbury. There are 14 apartments in total rangi..."
"The property was originally built in the 1930's of rendered elevations under a tiled roof and has been extended to the rear and refurbished in recent years. KARNDEAN flooring has been put down in the living area, the kitchen has been refurbished as well as the bathroom and the garden has been lan..."
"An attractive three bedroom home quietly located in this no-through road a short distance from the city centre and railway station. 19 Hartington Road is quietly tucked away along a private pathway, the setting belies the central location. The property itself is double glazed with gas heating but..."
" **WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR** PROPERTY OF THE MONTH - MOVE FOR FREE, CALL US FOR FURTHER DETAILS. Exclusively designed for the over 70s, our stunning new development of one and two bedroom retirement apartments is located on Endless Street, in the heart of Salisbury just a few hundred feet from t..."
"Two bedroom end terraced home conveniently located for the City centre, well presented with two parking spaces."
"£5,000 incentive towards Stamp Duty or John Lewis vouchers Celeste at Every Step of The Way is delighted to offer to the market these luxury new build apartments, situated in a prominent location in the heart of Salisbury. There are 14 apartments in total ranging from one- and two-bedroo..."
"We are pleased to offer this spacious two bedroom link semi-detached house set in a sought after location, giving easy access to Salisbury City Centre.  On the ground floor the house consists of; entrance hallway, kitchen, lounge / dining room measuring 15'6"" max x 11'10""max and sun room. On the ..."
"50% ALREADY RESERVED. Prices from £150,000 - £310,000 Choice of 62 new apartments with lift. Level walk to city centre."
"A superb bright and MODERN one bedroom RETIREMENT APARTMENT, situated on the FIRST FLOOR. This apartment has neutral décor to coordinate with your furnishings and is beautifully presented throughout."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Situated within the popular residential Riverdown Park estate, this immaculately-presented two-bedroom mid-terrace offers a fantastic opportunity for first time buyers or those looking to create/expand their Buy-to-Let portfolio. The property offers a kitchen with a ..."
"A stunning refurbished Edwardian townhouse located on the edge of the city. This superb home has undergone a thorough schedule of renovation in recent years, accommodation includes entrance hallway, sitting room, dining room, comprehensive kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom with shower cubicl..."
"A recently refurbished two bedroom house with attractive kitchen and bathroom, large lounge/diner, two bedrooms and rear garden. Conveniently situated just outside the ring road, within easy access to the railway station, Waitrose and Sarum St.Pauls Primary School."
"A modern, well maintained, two bedroom terraced house in Riverdown Park, Salisbury. The property offers an entrance hall, kitchen, cloakroom, lounge, two bedrooms (one with en-suite shower room), and family bathroom. There is front garden, rear garden and allocated parking space."
Apartment 13 is a stunning two bedroom apartment benefiting from outside space with views of Salisbury Cathedral.
Delightful end terrace character house with garden and recently installed windows and doors. ** GAS CENTRAL HEATING ** THREE BEDROOMS ** NO CHAIN
 ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Situated in a sought-after central position within easy reach of the Salisbury city centre and all of the amenities it has to offer. This three-bedroom mid-terrace property offers prospective buyers with a fantastic opportunity to create their ideal family home. The ...
This is a particularly spacious ground floor self contained apartment within a conversion of a Victorian period property. Originally a pair of semi detached houses built by two brothers for their own individual occupation. The rooms are mostly double aspect and feature the period high ceilings an...
" ***WATCH THE VIEO TOUR*** Situated on a quiet yet central location in the Salisbury city centre, prospective buyer will benefit from the range of amenities on Guilder Lane's doorstep. The accommodation comprises a good-sized reception room, the kitchen, and an auxiliary storage space which cou..."
A characterful terraced town house over three floors with 2 double bedrooms and private garden.
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A conveniently-positioned two-bedroom family home with accommodation generously spread over three floors. The property comprises a good-sized reception room with both sitting and dining areas, and a kitchen with integrated appliances on the ground floor. Upstairs th..."
"Fox and Sons bring to market this charming mid-terrace, offering two double bedrooms, characterful features, a highly sought after location in close proximity to Salisbury City Centre and enclosed rear garden. Offered with no onward chain. BOOK TO VIEW TODAY!"
"Extremely well presented two bedroom end terrace home with a garage and parking. Downstairs the accommodation comprises of a newly fitted kitchen and a spacious living/dining room with access to a private rear garden. Upstairs there is a master bedroom with a built in cupboard, family bathroom an..."
"This very well-presented two-bedroom home is located in the ever-popular Salisbury suburb of Harnham, close to the District Hospital, City centre and countryside. The accommodation comprises a useful entrance hall before leading into the large sitting dining area. An under-stair storage cupboard ..."
An exceedingly rare opportunity to purchase an exceptional two bedroom apartment situated in Salisbury’s iconic Market Square where a market has been held every week for the last 600 years.
"Live in style in this THREE BEDROOM semi-detached house with a PRIVATE GARDEN, on an EXCLUSIVE NEW OVER 55s COMMUNITY. Features a DOWNSTAIRS TOILET, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and a host of ON-SITE NON-PROFIT FACILITIES."
A well presented TWO bedroom house on the outskirts of Salisbury city centre near to the Salisbury District Hospital. ** PARKING ** GARDEN **
"Developer incentive £5,000 towards Stamp Duty, or £5,000 John Lewis vouchers Celeste at Every Step of The Way is delighted to offer to the market these luxury new build apartments, situated in a prominent location in the heart of Salisbury. There are 14 apartments in total rangin..."
An attractive Victorian house situated in the City Centre with river frontage. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout which is arranged over three floors and includes two reception rooms and three bedrooms. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and ...
Two bed second floor apartment with far reaching views over the River Avon and beyond– Ideal first time or investment purchase . Parking option available to buy.
FIRST FLOOR TWO BEDROOM CITY CENTRE APARTMENT - Split across two levels and tastefully refurbished with high-spec fittings
"A beautifully presented two bedroom home quietly located within this mature development in West Harnham. 59 Wellworthy Drive is a modern property, built some 16 years ago, and owned by the seller from new. The property has been enhanced and well maintained but offers some scope for personalisatio..."
"Located just s SHORT WALK from Salisbury city centre, this SPACIOUS APARTMENT sits in an EXCLUSIVE OVER 55s COMMUNITY. With UNDER-FLOOR HEATING, WALK-IN shower, ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES, generous bedrooms and an ON-SITE NON-PROFIT bistro, bar and homeowners lounge, you can retire in style."
A new 1 bed bungalow from Ludlow Properties with spacious accommodation and a superb finish. Close to City Centre and private garden. Nicholas Court comprises 6 properties in total. 2 Reservations already! KEYS on 59
"Two Bedrooms from £250,000! Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon"
"We are pleased to offer to market this three bedroom mid terrace property set in a popular and central Salisbury location. The accommodation comprises on the ground floor of; entrance hallway, lounge measuring 12'3"" max x 10'5"" max, dining room, kitchen and downstairs bathroom. On the first floor..."
"A beautifully converted 1 bedroom first floor apartment within this development of a Grade II* Listed building, with a modern extension."
A THREE bedroom terraced house in need of some updating. ** DOUBLE GLAZING ** GAS CENTRAL HEATING ** GARDENS **
"Stylish two bedroom first floor apartment, close to excellent transport links with easy access to all day to day necessities."
"A 50% share in a pre-loved TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED house on a quiet CUL DE SAC with a PRIVATE GARDEN in an EXCLUSIVE OVER 55'S COMMUNITY. Features a DOWNSTAIRS TOILET, TWO ENSUITES, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES & a host of ON-SITE FACILITIES."
Spacious RETIREMENT HOUSE for the over 55's with two double bedrooms and 2 en suites. Situated in this sought after retirement community. Shared ownership.
"Coming Soon * Phase Two* The Ramparts is a thoughtfully designed collection of modern flats situated in a vibrant area of Salisbury, close to excellent transport links."
"Ewemove - A two-bedroom semi-detached house within walking distance of the town centre. The property also has the benefit of off-road parking, rear garden and gas central heating. The property is fully double glazed. Interactive Virtual Tour available on request."
"A fabulous conversion of a Grade II* listed Georgian property, located in the heart of Salisbury City Centre."
"An attractive two double bedroom spacious apartment located in this sought after quiet location on the edge of the city centre. The property forms part of an elegant and substantial Victorian house, with substantial entrance and grounds, the accommodation includes large sitting room with views ov..."
50% RESERVED. Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new one and two bedroom apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon.
Apartment 10 accommodates two bedrooms situated on the second floor with lift access from the ground floor.
"Ideal investment opportunity. A beautifully appointed 2 bedroom apartment with a proven rental income, currently used as a busy Air BnB."
 ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Situated in a quiet quadrant of the Salisbury city centre is this charming two-bedroom end-of-terrace cottage. The accommodation oozes period features including exposed timber beams throughout and authentic wood flooring on the upper levels. The ground floor comprises...
"An attractive three bedroom property situated in the City centre within close proximity to local shops, amenities and within walking distance to the train station. Light and spacious accommodation comprising of two reception rooms, three double bedrooms, fully fitted kitchen and a private courtya..."
A character terrace house in a side road location and offered in excellent order throughout. ** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** GAS CENTRAL HEATING ** PRETTY PAVED GARDEN **
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A unique two-bedroom property offering cosy accommodation imbued with natural light from an array of Velux windows above. The interior comprises an introductory sitting area, with exposed timber beams above, linked to a kitchen with integrated appliances and characte..."
"A stylish first floor apartment with allocated parking, one double bedroom and spacious open plan kitchen/living room, created in recent years within a small development of similar converted dwellings inside the City Ring Road. EPC: E"
 ***EXCELLENT BUY-TO-LET OPPORTUNITY*** This two-bedroom mid-terrace is positioned within a sough-after quadrant of the Salisbury city centre boasting a close proximity to the range of amenities on its doorstep. The property comprises an open-plan sitting/dining room and a kitchen with integrate...
Apartment 3 accommodates two bedrooms with a large open plan kitchen/living space including a Juliet balcony
"CASH BUYERS ONLY - A three bed detached house which now requires substantial modernisation, accommodation includes two reception rooms, kitchen, utility/cloakroom, three bedrooms, bathroom and generous garden. Sold with vacant possession. "
"A TWO bedroom end of terrace house benefiting from gas central heating, PVCu double glazing and a side garden. ** LARGE DETACHED GARAGE ** PARKING ** NO CHAIN **"
"A well located 2 bedroom semi-detached property with off road parking just a short distance from the City centre. rental potential £875,000 per month "
A spacious 2 bedroom 2 storey maisonette with roof terrace conveniently located within walking distance of Salisbury city centre and railway station.
A new 1 bed bungalow from Ludlow Properties with spacious accommodation and a superb finish. Close to City Centre. Nicholas Court comprises 6 properties in total. 2 Reservations already!
"A 50% shared in a pre-loved 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT in an exclusive new over 55's development. Features include 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, EN-SUITE BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and more. 1 YEARS RENT & 1 YEARS SERVICE CHARGE INCLUDED!"
"Located on a popular Harnham development, this beautifully presented two apartment is an attractive option for both first time buyers and investors.
"
A newly refurbished two-bedroom apartment situated within this desirable and convenient location and benefiting from a GARAGE and nearby access to Salisbury city centre. EPC: C
"Connells bring to market this neutral and modern two bedroom flat in the popular area of Spire View Salisbury. Comprising a large open plan living/dining and kitchen, two double bedrooms and a bathroom."
A GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT FLAT situated within the main block of this popular modern development within walking distance of the city centre. ** ONE BEDROOM ** COMMUNAL GARDENS ** NO ONWARD CHAIN **
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this stunning one bedroom first floor apartment. The ex-show home property offers deceptively spacious accommodation and is presented in fantastic order throughout. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining roo...
"Attractive one bedroom, first floor apartment, is set within a much sought after modern development on the edge of the River Avon. No onward chain. EPC: C "
A well presented TWO BEDROOM first floor apartment in a popular location close to the city centre. ** PVCu DOUBLE GLAZING ** ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE ** NO CHAIN **
"This spacious one bedroom ground floor apartment is located within the heart of Salisbury city centre, a short walk from an abundance of shops, restaurants, bars and cafes.
"
"Set amid a pleasant city centre development, this two bedroom top floor apartment consists of: an entrance hallway, lounge / dining room, two double bedrooms, a modern kitchen, bathroom and benefits from ample storage and a garage.  Three Cuppes Lane would make an ideal investment property with a..."
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this wonderful apartment, which is situated on the ground floor of this much sought after development, Sarum Lodge. The property is presented in fabulous order throughout and simply must be viewed. The Lounge is a striking room, w..."
"We are pleased to offer market this very well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment set in the popular Spire View development.  The accommodation comprises; security entrance system, entrance hallway with storage, lounge / dining room measuring 16'7"" with a bay window, modern kitchen, two ..."
"Fox and Sons offer this one bedroom luxurious retirement property, located in the heart of Salisbury. This property boasts spacious living accomodation, modern kitchen and bathroom, * Water rates and heating are included in the service charge*"
"Detached house, quietly situated in a private courtyard in the heart of the city ** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** DOUBLE GLAZING ** OUTSIDE STORE **"
"50% ALREADY RESERVED. Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new one and two bedroom, apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon"
A spacious and recently modernised City Centre ground floor one bedroom apartment with its own private garden and with no forward chain. 
"A deceptively spacious first floor city centre apartment situated in a popular residential development with the benefit of a garage. The property boasts generous room sizes throughout with the accommodation comprising an entrance hall, large living room, kitchen, two double bedrooms and modern ba..."
A well presented first floor apartment offered with vacant possession ** TWO BEDROOMS ** DOUBLE GLAZING ** GAS HEATING ** ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE ** INVESTORS ONLY **
A great opportunity to purchase a two bedroom ground floor leasehold apartment which would make an ideal investment opportunity or for a first time buyer.
A well presented RETIREMENT flat situated within this popular modern development within walking distance of the city centre. ** TWO BEDROOMS ** COMMUNAL GROUNDS **
"Connells bring to the market this recently renovated two bedroom, mid-terraced property in Gainsborough Close, Salisbury. The property comprises of a lounge, kitchen/diner, two bedrooms, and a bathroom. There are gardens to the front and rear. The property is ideal for first time buyers or investors"
"GROUND FLOOR FLAT WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN - This property offers spacious accommodation throughout comprising two bedrooms, bathroom and a large sitting room / diner which is open plan to the kitchen."
50% RESERVED. Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new one and two bedroom apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon
"A 50% shared in this first floor 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT in an EXCLUSIVE new OVER 55's COMMUNITY. Features include floor to ceiling windows, PRIVATE BALCONY, VILLEROY & BOCH EN-SUITE BATHROOMS, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICEIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and more."
"A delightful two bedroom maisonette situated on the outskirts of Salisbury. The property is light and spacious with lounge/diner, kitchen, bathroom and two double bedrooms. There is an allocated parking to the side of the property, The property also beneifts from access to the rear garden, w..."
"A two bedroom terraced house with front and rear gardens. In need of modernisation the property consists of porch, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, conservatory and utility room. Upstairs provides two bedrooms (one with shower cubicle) and a bathroom. Enclosed rear garden"
"A spacious purpose built two double bedroom apartment located within walking distance of the city centre. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, two double bedrooms, modern kitchen, refitted bathroom and spacious lounge diner. The property benefits from stunning views across the city...."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom first floor flat (with passenger lift), set in a desirable development moments from Salisbury city centre."
"Light and spacious two bedroom first floor apartment for those over 60, ideally situated moments from the centre of Salisbury. Located within a well maintained retirement development set amongst attractive grounds, with house manager, 24 hour careline system and parking."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely two bedroom first floor apartment . The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good decorative order. The dual aspect Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furn...
A particularly light filled first floor apartment offered in good order throughout **TWO BEDROOMS ** COMMUNAL GARDENS ** CITY CENTRE LOCATION **
**Incredible investment or FTB opportunity** A beautifully appointed 1 bedroom apartment currently used as an established busy ‘Airbnb’. The apartment benefits from a private entrance and is perfectly situated just off the Market Square. 
Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 new apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon
"Ewemove - (VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE) - Modern apartment with a balcony next to the open plan living/ dining area. Separate kitchen and 2 Double bedrooms, with en-suite to the main bedroom and a family bathroom. There is allocated parking, visitor parking & the property is well served by buses into ..."
"A first and second floor maisonette with well proportioned accommodation offering potential for enhancement. 13b Longland forms part of this two property conversion, the maisonette is well laid out with an entrance hall/landing, 4.6m open plan living room /kitchen, two double bedrooms and bathroo..."
50% ALREADY RESERVED. A stylish one double bedroom 2nd floor apartment in a new development of 62 apartments.
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A great investment opportunity for those looking to start or expand a buy-to-let portfolio. This property is a first-floor flat comprising a sitting room, kitchen, and two bedrooms which are served by the family bathroom. Externally, the plot offers two garden spaces..."
"We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £165,000 - £175,000*"
A stylish ONE bedroom apartment in a characterful converted building within a popular location. ** COMMUNAL GARDENS ** PARKING
A generous one double bedroom first floor apartment situated within a convenient edge of city cul-de-sac and benefiting from mature communal gardens. Viewing is recommended. EPC: C
"One Bedrooms from £160,000! Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon."
"A well presented ground floor flat with well proportioned accommodation and private rear garden, 13a Longland forms part of this converted period property and is only appreciated by a viewing. The flat benefits from double glazing and gas heating with modern kitchen and bathroom fittings, the dec..."
"** NO FORWARD CHAIN ** Fox & Sons are delighted to offer this top floor maisonette located in the popular area of Harnham, which is conveniently situated for Salisbury City Centre. The accommodation includes a spacious 17'6"" Lounge/dining room, kitchen, bathroom, bedroom & further box room / study."
An opportunity for a first time buyer or investment buyer to purchase a one bedroom flat located in the sought after area of Bishopdown.
A very well-presented ground floor split level maisonette accessed via its own private front door. The property offers specious accommodation which includes an entrance hall with stairs rising to the first floor accommodation and doors to the modern kitchen and large living room which benefits fr...
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** A contemporary one-bedroom apartment situated on the top floor of the recently constructed Fountain Way retirement village with a lovely balcony boasting fantastic panoramic views. Suitable for over 55's, this property comprises a welcoming sitting/kitchen/diner with..."
"Experience a new way of living in this spacious GROUND FLOOR 1 BEDROOM apartment in an exclusive new over 55s community. Features include FLOOR TO CEILING WINDOWS, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT APPLIANCES and more."
50% RESERVED Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 brand new one and two bedroom apartments situated in the heart of Salisbury and backing onto the River Avon
A well presented GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT for the OVER 55's situated a SHORT WALK from the city centre. ** TWO GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS ** COMMUNAL FACILITIES **
"This is a comfortably proportioned two bedroom retirement flat for the over 60's built by McCarthy and Stone in the 1990's. An ever popular development Archers Court has very good communal facilities including a full time resident manager and comfortable residents lounge, separate laundry facilit..."
OPEN DAY - SATURDAY 25TH FEBRUARY - CALL NOW TO BOOK VIEWING 50% SOLD - One & Two Bedroom Apartments. Riverside Court is an exciting collection of 62 new apartments..
"A REFURBISHED, one bedroom, GROUND FLOOR retirement flat with DIRECT ACCESS on to COMMUNAL GARDENS."
A very well-presented ground floor retirement apartment situated in a highly sought after development within the City Centre. The property occupies an enviable position on the ground floor with direct access from the enclosed garden on Castle Street. Offering spacious accommodation which comprise...
"This modern two-bedroom apartment is ideal for investment buyers or as a first time purchase.  The accommodation, set on the first floor of the block, consists of an entrance hallway, lounge / dining room measuring 15'11"" max x 9'10""max, a modern kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom. Other benefi..."
" ***WATCH THE VIDEO TOUR*** Ideally positioned within comfortable walking distance of the Salisbury city centre. This newly redecorated retirement apartment offers two good sized bedrooms, a kitchen, sitting room and a shower room. Additionally, any prospective buyer will benefit from being abl..."
"A ground floor apartment with one double bedroom and private entry located within close proximity of Salisbury City Centre and train station. The accommodation comprises of kitchen, lounge diner, bedroom and shower room. Other benefits include private garden, gas central heating, off road parking..."
**Ideal Buy To Let Investment * Spacious One Double Bedroom Top Floor Apartment * Modern Fitted Kitchen * Communal Gardens** A spacious one double bedroom second floor flat with far-reaching views communal garden and ample storage.
* For Sale by Modern Auction * A spacious one double bedroom second floor flat with far-reaching views communal garden and ample storage.
GOOD SIZED ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT. Level access to the city centre.
"OVER 55'S EXCLUIVELY- BOOK TO VIEW TODAY! Very well presented second floor retirement apartment offering spacious accommodation and convenient City Centre location. Property also benefits from modern kitchen, communal lounge and garden and onsite manager. A MUST SEE!!!"
"Large well proportioned one double bedroom apartment which is in good condition with new carpets throughout. The complex was built by McCarthy & Stone and is set in the city centre on the bank of the River Avon. The apartment is in great order with spacious hallway, hallway storage, fully fit..."
"A 25% share in a pre-loved TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED house on a quiet CUL DE SAC with a PRIVATE GARDEN in an EXCLUSIVE OVER 55s COMMUNITY. Features a DOWNSTAIRS TOILET, TWO ENSUITES, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES & a host of ON-SITE FACILITIES."
"A 50% share in a pre-loved 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT on the third floor in an EXCLUSIVE NEW OVER 55s COMMUNITY. Features include TWO PRIVATE BALCONIES, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and more."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ** TWO BALCONIES ** VIEWS OF SALISBURY & CATHEDRAL ** TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH LIFT IN BLOCK ** NO FORWARD CHAIN ** 50% SHARED OWNERSHIP PROPERTY ** OVER 55'S RETIREMENT DEVELOPMENT WITH COMMUNAL LOUNGE, GARDENS & ON SITE BISTRO**"
"A self contained third floor apartment, with lift access and far reaching views across the city, is available at a 50% shared ownership. Constable Court was the first phase of the Chapters development, built in 2019, as part of this new city based retirement village for the over 55's. The superbl..."
"A 51% share in a pre-loved 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT on the first floor in an EXCLUSIVE NEW OVER 55s COMMUNITY. Features include a PRIVATE BALCONY with CATHEDRAL VIEWS, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and more."
"This flat formed within the Victoria Court Complex off Stratford Road, a development within three blocks where number 78 is accessed from Park Lane. Victoria Court is an attractive retirement scheme for the over 55's and has the benefit of a part time resident manager supported by Retirement Leas..."
"A 50% shared in a pre-loved 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT on the second floor in an EXCLUSIVE NEW OVER 55s COMMUNITY. Features include FLOOR TO CEILING WINDOWS, VILLEROY & BOCH BATHROOM, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & LIVING AREA, FULLY FITTED KITCHEN with ENERGY-EFFICIENT NEFF APPLIANCES and more."
** ONE YEARS SERVICE CHARGE PAID**A 50% SHARE of a ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR FLAT in a popular RETIREMENT complex. ** NO ONWARD CHAIN **
"A spacious ground floor 2 bedroom flat within easy reach of Salisbury City Centre, specifically for the over 55s."
Victoria Court is a attractive retirement scheme for the over 55's and consists of a development of twenty two flats with the benefit of a part time Resident Manager. Victoria Court provides a secure and supportive environment which is ideal for the active retired. This flat is located o...
"A well presented over 55s two bedroom ground floor retirement apartment situated in this desirable location within walking distance of Salisbury city centre. The property benefits from a modern fitted kitchen and shower room, communal parking and gardens for residents. Offered to the market with ..."
A second floor retirement flat for the over 55's located in this popular development on the northern edge of the city of Salisbury. The flats are now managed by Retirement Lease Housing Association and have the benefit of a scheme manager on call. The flat has both stairs and lift access. The acc...
Ground floor flat for the over 55's in arguably the best location in the block. ** DOUBLE BEDROOM ** COMMUNAL GROUNDS ** COMMUNAL PARKING **
"Located in a cul-de-sac in Salisbury City Centre, close to the Cathedral. Two bedroom ground floor over 55's retirement apartment offered for sale with no forward chain. The block has well kept communal grounds and residents have use of a communal lounge and laundry. BOOK TO VIEW!!"
"* For Sale by Modern Auction * A self contained first floor flat, with garden, large store and with potential for cosmetic updating and some refurbishment. The accommodation has double glazing, gas central heating and includes an entrance lobby, a bedroom, sitting room, kitchenette and shower roo..."
"**Guide Price £60,000-£70,000 * Ideal Buy To Let Investment * First Floor Self Contained One Bedroom Flat * Separate Garden & Large Store** A self contained first floor flat, with garden, large store and with potential for cosmetic updating and some refurbishment. The accommodation has double glazin"
"**LAUNCH DAY SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - CALL NOW TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING** This well thought out initiative offers you the opportunity to buy the shell of your home, fit it out internally to your own specification and move in knowing that you have equity in your property from day one! "
An extremely rare opportunity to purchase a stately Victorian residence which exudes quality and is situated within one of Sheffield’s most sought-after areas. This magnificent nine bedroomed detached home stands in a commanding position within a plot of approximately 1.7 acres and provides subst...
"NEW PRICE £2,250,000 - fantastic property upgraded to a high specification and situated in one of the most sought after locations in Sheffield. One of the finest properties I have been privileged to market for sale in nearly 40 years as an Estate Agent. Set in professionally landscaped ..."
"* Rare Residential Development Opportunity In Sandygate* Full Planning Permission for 8 Dwellings* Site Area -Approx 0.32 acres* Desirable Residential Location * Freehold For Sale - Offers in the Region of £2,200,000"
"Sandygate House is an imposing stone built detached Victorian residence that offers over 5000 Sq. Ft of stunning family accommodation which is skilfully arranged over three floors which includes a ground floor extension with stunning 20 Metre long pool. The property has five double bedrooms, four..."
"A substantial, stone built detached Victorian villa situated in this sought after area a short stroll away from the fashionable shops, bars and restaurants in Sharrowvale and Nether Edge. This gorgeous property has a wealth of accommodation over three floors complemented by mature south facing gr..."
The Boatman is a substantial detached residence with a total of nine bedrooms and stands within extensive gardens and grounds. This outstanding home provides luxury accommodation and also has the benefit of an attached self-contained two bedroomed cottage that is ideal for dependant persons.
"****GRADE 2 LISTED FIVE BEDROOM PROPERTY**** ****STUNNING GROUNDS WITH LISTED GARDENS**** ****CONVERTED BARN**** This fabulous opportunity has arisen with this stunning five bedroom Grade 2 listed property, with converted barn, triple garage, courtyard and the most breath taking grounds. Onc..."
"**A TRULY REMARKABLE PROPERTY IN ONE OF SHEFFIELDS MOST DESIRABLE LOCATION'S! ** Hunters are privileged to introduce to the market this exclusive 5 bedroom 5 Bathroom with pool complex, snooker room and own bar in the garden. Set in its own private grounds with patio to the rear for ente..."
"Woodlands is a substantial and incredibly impressive five bedroom detached family home that has been finished to the highest standard, located down a private driveway off Dore Road, one of Sheffield's most sought-after areas."
An impressive and imposing Freehold detached Victorian residence and Coach House standing in approximately 1/2 acre of grounds in one of Sheffield's most sought after locations. This substantial family house is thought to date back to 1850 and retains immense charm and character although wou...
"Asking Price £1,450,000 Nestled at the end of a private road, within an exclusive gated development is a fabulous, recently refurbished, 6 bedroom detached family home in Worrall, S35. The property is stylishly presented and provides substantial, versatile accommodation, enhanced by a wr..."
"A truly outstanding detached family home, finished to an incredibly high specification occupying an enviable position on this exclusive gated development, located in the heart of Ranmoor."
"Filled with an abundance of character and charm is Moorview House, a five bedroomed stone-built detached residence that originally dates back to the mid-1800s. This wonderful home offers a versatile layout for family living and has the benefit of a beautiful south-westerly facing garden."
"**SUPERB FULLY RENOVATED FIVE BEDROOM EXECUTIVE HOME** This great property has undergone a full renovation and boasts many outstanding features. Modern in design and laying within the exclusive S17 postcode, a short walk to Dore village and its many amenities. Excellent road and train links, with..."
"Positioned within a plot of approximately 2.5 acres of gardens, grounds and woodland, The Yews is a magnificent six bedroomed detached residence with extensive family accommodation over three floors."
Ideally situated nestled back from the main road and occupying a truly breath-taking position overlooking Rivelin Woods and the river is this delightful four bedroomed detached residence called Birch Lea. The property has been maintained over the years and has been built around offerin...
"GUIDE PRICE £1,200,000-£1,300,0000
An exceptionally rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this magnificent, seven bedroomed, double fronted, detached family residence. Having been tastefully extended to the rear and finished internally to an exceptionally high standard incorporating a..."
"An executive, four bedroom, detached luxury home set within the exclusive, and highly sought-after, gated Hallam Towers development."
"*** More Hall *** 16th century country house *** Extensive grounds and internal accommodation *** Ideal for renovation  *** Grade II listing *** 3D Matterport Virtual Tour *** LW0379 *** A property rich in heritage and history. More Hall, built in 1573 by Mr Thomas ..."
"Standing on a substantial plot within a private, gated development is this executive six bedroomed detached residence. This outstanding home provides high-quality, extensive accommodation over two floors and is centered within large wrap-around gardens."
"A fabulous home in a private elevated position with stunning uninterrupted views, in the heart of the sought-after village of Dore. This property benefits from the spacious, flexible, open plan design for family main living areas and incorporates huge bi fold doors from the dining area, to a cov..."
"A once in a lifetime opportunity has arisen to purchase this bespoke, double fronted, five bedroomed detached family residence. Having been architecturally designed, built and finished to the very highest level with absolutely no expense spared by the current vendors to create this breathtaking f..."
"Located on this highly sought after road, standing in an elevated position, close to Fulwood Village and the open countryside is this substantial five bedroomed detached family home which is offered for sale with no chain and early vacant possession. Number 27 has over 3800 Sq. Ft of family acco..."
"7-13 Wood End gives a country manor lifestyle, whilst only being six miles from the centre of Sheffield. This exceptional property was built in the 1650s and was the original farmhouse on the Whitley Hall estate. The property, south facing in an idyllic setting, has been sympathetically refurbish..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £140,000 - £145,000 ** CHAIN FREE! Call our sales team today to arrange your viewing for this two double bedroomed terrace house, with the added benefit of a large store room to the first floor. Ready to move into and having a long garden boasting masses of potential! On the doorst..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £330,000-£335,000*** ****NO CHAIN**** Only by viewing can you truly appreciate the size and space of this superb three/four bedroom detached property benefitting from substantial off road parking, three reception rooms, and downstairs WC."
"Guide Price £1,100,000 - £1,200,000 Occupying a large plot, located on a sought-after road In Ecclesall is this stunning 5 double bedroom elevated, detached family home, arranged over 3 floors with a generous, private, enclosed rear garden. The property features 5 double bedrooms, ..."
"A substantially extended Georgian style five bedroom, three bathroom executive detached family home situated on this exclusive development, and in an excellent catchment area for schools. Large reception hall, cloakroom, through drawing room with opening French bay window, large family ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £1,000,000 TO £1,250,000 A very individual substantial four double bedroom detached property centrally positioned within its own grounds. The spacious accommodation extends over two floors and makes a fantastic family home, with generous surrounding level g..."
This four bedroom four bathroom detached family home/dormer bungalow has all the space a growing family could need and offers superb quality accommodation over two levels with an impressive specification. This delightful property is situated in a gated development of just three properties and is ...
Offered for sale is this truly stunning equestrian property occupying an idyllic setting on a gently sloping plot of approximately 10 acres. Syke Cottage is a beautifully presented three bedroom Grade II listed detached property.
"Occupying in our opinion the finest position on this well sought after residential road and enjoying the benefit of a triple plot is this substantial, detached family home. With a fully self contained apartment annexe to one side that will offer a dependant relative suite or potential to be let o..."
A stunning 5 bedroom detached family home with beautifully presented accommodation laid out over 3 floors and boasting over 2700 square feet of living space. The property enjoys an enviable position on this highly sought after tree lined road within the ever popular village of Dore which...
"GUIDE PRICE £950,000-£1,000,000 ** FREEHOLD ** Offered for sale on the open market for the first time in over 40 years is this truly impressive detached period property having expansive accommodation of over 2700 sq ft with further outbuildings expanding individually to 3500 sq ft. The property h..."
"The Simford is an exemplary five-bedroom detached home, forming part of Totley Hall Farm, a new development situated perfectly on the edge of the countryside in the highly sought-after village of Totley."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this outstanding period detached family home which oozes character and charm. The property boasts generous room proportions throughout and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. A very sizeable plot of over 0.25 of an ac...
Offered for sale if this beautiful five double bedroomed stone built detached family home which is situated on this exclusive development on the doorstep of the open countryside .No 2 offers over 2500 Sq Ft of accommodation which is skillfully arranged over two floors and an internal inspection i...
"*** FABULOUS FAMILY HOME *** This superb property has exceptional versatile accommodation. The Sitting Room has a staircase up to the study room/bedroom five. With the shower room being adjacent would make an ideal granny/teenager annex/semi self contained area.
**** VIEWING ADVISED *** The acc..."
"NO VENDOR CHAIN - LAND - PADDOCK - DETACHED BUNGALOW! This superb, detached dwelling boasts huge potential and is nestled in pleasant substantial surroundings with four outbuildings, approximately 3/4-acre paddock, solar panelled electricity and heating, septic tank, and its very own ..."
"Situated on a lovely fantastic large plot, in excess of a quarter of an acre, an attractive four bedroom, two bathroom detached family residence on this very sought after road in this prestigious suburb. The property, which has lapsed planning permission for a superb two storey extensi..."
"A delightful location, in a Conservation area and in lovely grounds of 0.63 of an acre, with fantastic open views over open fields to Blacka Moor and the Peak District. A substantially extended and tastefully upgraded five bedroom, three bathroom family residence with ground floor master bedroom..."
A tremendous opportunity to acquire a large and versatile detached bungalow which occupies a substantial plot amounting to approximately 2 acres with a range of outbuildings offering excellent commercial potential. FULL PLANNING PERMISSION WAS GRANTED 08/03/2023 FOR CHANGE OF USE OF THE...
"GUIDE PRICE £825,000 - £850,000. An exceptional family home that offers a luxurious finish over two floors with a superb range of generously proportioned and extended accommodation that boasts modern fittings in all the right places. This gorgeous property has an extended, open plan dining kitche..."
A stunning four bedroom detached Victorian lodge house.
"GUIDE PRICE £825,000 TO £850,000 A generously proportioned four bedroom freehold stone built detached house situated in Ranmoor, one of Sheffields most sought after locations. This individually built house enjoys a delightful front aspect occupying a slig..."
"Offered for sale with no chain and early vacant possession is this stunning four double bedroomed detached bungalow. No 31 stands in a lovely, established south facing plot and offers approaching 2600 Sq Ft of versatile accommodation which is sure to suit those looking to retire or with disabilit..."
"GUIDE PRICE £825,000-£850,000 Without doubt the best position in this exclusive gated development set back from the road with great privacy and private large double garage. Stunning spacious high specification accommodation of over 2,000 sq.ft, including three double bedrooms, all with e..."
An incredibly exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this stunning three bedroom penthouse apartment which forms part of this landmark building within the highly sought after area of Ranmoor. Beautifully presented throughout and finished to an extremely high specification the property benefi...
"Price Guide £800,000 - £820,000 Situated on one of Sheffield's most desirable roads in the very heart of Whirlow on a generous plot, well back from the road, which offers huge potential for further development (subject to the necessary consents). This really is a super opportunity for one luc..."
This stunning semi-detached property divided into seven apartments and two bedsits offers huge potential and is located in the heart of Broomhall in Sheffield.
"CHAIN FREE!! Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this ready to move into and situated on a generous sized plot three bedroom semi-detached property. Offering kitchen/diner, off road parking and low maintenance rear garden. The property is positioned close to great local amenities and road li..."
"A truly STUNNING, five bedroom detached property with an additional ONE BEDROOM, THREE STOREY ANNEXE, which is situated in the highly sought after residential area of DORE. Occupying an enviable CUL-DE-SAC position and conveniently located for local amenities in Dore Village, excellent local scho..."
This fabulous three bedroomed detached family home is situated on a private cul-de-sac in a most sought-after location. The property accommodates three large bedrooms and offers superb living spaces throughout with scope to extend above the garage (subject to planning consents).
"Standing in an elevated position facing in a southerly direction with fine, leafy views is this simply stunning five double bedroomed stone built Edwardian family residence. Retaining many original features No 182 has extremely well proportioned accommodation arranged over three floors and is loc..."
"A stunning 17th century farmhouse and adjoining barn, sympathetically converted and restored, resulting in a stunning home, with retained period features; occupying landscaped grounds approaching 1/3 of an acre whilst commanding breathtaking views over adjoining countryside.
"
"An outstanding four bedroom detached family home, set in beautifully landscaped gardens and located in the sought-after suburb of Totley Rise."
"Located on this popular tree lined road within the highly regarded suburb of Fulwood is this stunning three double bedroom detached family home which is beautifully presented throughout. Having been thoughtfully extended and renovated to a high standard by the current owner, the property enjoys a..."
"Incredible four-bedroom, two-bathroom family home with off-street parking, a garage and nearly 2,700ft2 of floor space! Tapton Crescent Road is an extremely popular location as it’s within the catchment area for popular schools and within walking distance to Crosspool, Crookes, Broomhill, Sheffie..."
"Standing in this commanding position, that enjoys some fabulous views over The Mayfield valley is this stunning four/five bedroomed, two bathroomed, detached family home. Having been tastefully extended to the side, loft and rear to create this unique layout that gives an impressive 2,331 sq feet..."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY to purchase this converted public house which now consists of 9 flats/studios.
"GUIDE PRICE £750,000 - £775,000. Extended to the side and rear and offering generously proportioned and well designed accommodation, ideal for families, over three floors including a superb, open plan kitchen and a large, principal suite. The immaculate interior is complemented by the gorgeous, ..."
"Guide Price: £725,000 - £750,000 A superbly presented and significantly extended four bedroom detached family home, situated in the highly sought-after suburb of Dore."
"A particularly spacious Victorian villa offering a wealth of generously proportioned accommodation, ideal for the family market, over three floors. This gorgeous, six bedroom, property is available with no chain and has excellent gardens to both the front and rear alongside basement rooms that co..."
A simply stunning 4 bedroom stone built Victorian semi detached property which must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The beautifully presented accommodation is laid out over 3 floors plus basement rooms and offers fantastic family accommodation. Rarely does a property of this standard ...
"One of the finest around ... Guide Price £720,000- £750,000 ... this fantastic detached house is perfect inside and out. Boasting a lovely mix of traditional features coupled with a modern feel it offers a fantastic lifestyle along with lots of space and one of the most popular locations around"
A spacious four bedroom detached property that is located on this most desirable of roads in the highly regarded village of Dore. Although requiring a general scheme of modernisation this is a fabulous opportunity to acquire a detached home in one of the best locations Dore has to offer. The prop...
"GUIDE PRICE £700,000-£725,000 Situated towards the top of Millhouses Lane, in a very sought after residential location, is this lovingly well maintained larger style three double bedroom, two bathroom detached house with a very large lower ground floor currently with integral double gara..."
"An absolutely fabulous, four double bedroomed, detached family home. Standing in this commanding position ensuring a huge degree of privacy together with some stunning views to front. Enjoying a large rear south facing garden number 13 has an incredibly light and spacious feel throughout the two ..."
"An outstanding five bedroom detached executive home situated in the sought-after village of Eckington. On the market for a guide price of £700,000 - £725,000"
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this very generously proportioned 5 bedroom detached family home. The well-presented accommodation is laid out over 3 floors and boasts generous room proportions throughout. A great deal of character and original features are also e...
"Extremely spacious, four bedroom detached property in one of the most desirable areas in Sheffield. Great school catchments areas, within walking distance of both Dore and Totley, you are also perfectly placed for public transport and access to the Peak District National Park. "
"Guide Price at £695,000 - £710,000. A fabulous, extended semi-detached house with spectacular views of the Mayfield Valley. Spacious accommodation with a ground floor rear extension and a stunning loft conversion. Features include 4 bedrooms including a second floor master bedroom ..."
"A simply stunning 5 bedroom stone built Freehold semi detached with sizeable and flexible accommodation arranged over 3 floors with separate coach house, situated on a generous plot backing on to Abbeydale Sports Club. Only on a detailed internal inspection can the true size and standard..."
"A beautifully presented and significantly extended/reconfigured four bedroom detached family home, situated in the heart of Dore village."
"A fabulous four bedroom detached family home, occupying a generous plot on a quiet cul-de-sac, in the sought-after suburb of Fulwood."
Call to receive a FREE info pack on these Sheffield investment flats in S1 Sheffield city centre. Free furniture pack offered for a limited time only. A518
"Asking Price - £699,999 - Purple Bricks are delighted to market this superb, five bedroom detached family home located in the fantastic area of Dore, S17. Comprising of an entrance porch leading to a spacious entrance hallway with storage cupboard and access to the modern open kitchen area, spac..."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this outstanding 3 bedroom Freehold detached bungalow which enjoys an enviable position on this quiet cul de sac within this most sought after area. The deceptively spacious accommodation is presented to a high standard throughout a...
"An absolutely beautiful five bedroom semi detached family home occupying an excellent size plot on this highly regarded road in the catchment area for excellent schools. Having been extended to both the side and rear and lovingly maintained over the years, this stunning family home is well worthy..."
"A stunning Victorian house originally built in 1900, sympathetically converted to include this exceptional three bedroom home, offering generous accommodation laid out over two floors, retaining original period features and occupying a delightful position in the heart of Ranmoor."
"Guide Price £650,000 - £675,000 A generously proportioned 4 double bedroom detached family home in Ecclesall. The property is located on a cul de sac, has a double garage, sun room, en-suite shower room, balcony, built-in kitchen appliances, uPVC double glazing, gas central heating..."
"Hunters Woodseats are delighted to market this four bedroom, three bathroom stone barn conversion situated within generous grounds. The beautifully presented and spacious accommodation, boasting over 2000 sq.ft. has been sympathetically restored retaining original beams and hard wood double glaze..."
"Guide Price at £650,000 - £675,000. A lovely 4 bedroom and 2 bathroom detached house commanding an enviable position with views to the front and a south-west facing garden to the rear. Deceptively spacious and beautifully presented having been refurbished by the present owner in re..."
"GUIDE PRICE - £650,000 - £675,000 - A STUNNING TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED ON A TREE LINED ROAD IN THE MOST SOUGHT AFTER OF AREAS!!! IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR FABULOUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION YOU MUST CALL US ON TODAY TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING!!!"
"An outstanding three bedroom detached family home, situated in the highly sought-after suburb of Fulwood."
"The attractive architecture of the grade 2 listed, King Edwards site is complemented by the luxurious finish throughout this deceptively spacious home. This versatile property has retained much of its original charm and character, including typically high ceilings from the Victorian era, and thes..."
"Situated in an enviable position, well back from this prestigious road, close to the train station that provides speedy links into town and The Hope Valley, Abbeydale Golf Club, scenic woodland walks and a thriving social scene found at The Summerhouse Bar and Restaurant. This deceptively spaciou..."
"The Houses at Moorcrest Mews are three beautifully designed three-bedroom houses, each with large level south facing private garden to the rear. Each also has a front garden and driveway with electric car charging point."
"Situated on this very sought after tree lined road in a highly desirable residential suburb in an excellent catchment area for junior and secondary schools, is this strikingly attractive and substantial six bedroomed late Victorian semi-detached family residence with superb accommodation on four ..."
"Guide Price £650,000-£665,000. Enjoying an enviable corner plot position within Dore village is this substantial extended 4 bedroom detached family home which must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property boasts generous room proportions throughout and offers fantastic scope for e..."
"Only upon a detailed internal viewing will the true beauty and size of this exceptional, four bedroomed, two bathroomed detached family home. The property has been tastefully refurbished to an incredibly high standard with absolutely no expense spared to create a breath-taking finish that epitomi..."
"A beautifully presented four bedroom, two bathroom semi detached family home situated over four floors, offering an abundance of space and situated in this highly regarded area in the catchment area for excellent schools. Having been lovingly maintained and upgraded over the years, this..."
"Inspired by the glorious countryside that dominates Mayfield Valley, this characterful and homely detached cottage is a superbly located retreat that's only moments away from Fulwood Village and Bents Green’s many amenities. Spectacular views and spacious rooms meet exceptional craftsmanship and ..."
A spacious and modern semi detached property offering a fabulous range of versatile accommodation over three floors (including a remodelled ground floor that includes a self contained one bedroom apartment that would be ideal for dependent relatives). The property has an impressive 1718 square fe...
"PRICE - £650,000 - This well-presented six bedroom dormer bungalow equipped with disability assistance technology throughout, would make the perfect home for a family with a wheelchair user or someone looking for a property with open plan/spacious living accommodation. Call now to view!"
"An incredibly rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this substantial nine bedroomed, three bathroomed, Georgian semi detached rental property. With full HMO license in place and being fully let for the forthcoming academic year 2023-2024 this sale represents an opportunity to acquire a property..."
"Introducing Moorcrest Mews - a contemporary new development on the cusp of the Peak District. Situated in a prime location just off Redmires Road with views over Hallamshire Golf Course, this beautifully designed development showcases the epitome of modern architecture."
"GUIDE PRICE £625,000 – £650,000 A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this truly outstanding, traditional four-bedroom detached family home that has internally been presented to the highest of standards. Oozing charm & character whilst providing spacious & practical accommodation."
"Fully let for the forth coming academic year 2022/2023 and 2023/2024 is this spacious 10 bedroomed student let property. Returning an annual income of £46,280 per annum. Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield´s most sought after residential student suburbs, close to campus, Endclif..."
"An absolutely fabulous, immaculately presented and very deceptive, four bedroomed, two bathroomed, bay windowed, Victorian terraced property. Quietly tucked away on this incredibly popular residential road in the very heart of ultra popular Ecclesall, number 16 enjoys a simply fabulous and bespok..."
"LAND OPPORTUNITY, This is a great opportunity to purchase this potential development. Proposal of 11 four bedroom properties, in the heart of Sheffield, located within close proximity to the city centre, transport links, shops and schools. Please enquire for full information pack. "
"Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000 Effectively extended, 5-bedroom family home, having an enviable corner location, on a popular road in Millhouses. Spacious accommodation, retaining period features, benefiting from 3 reception rooms, modern kitchen and bathrooms, off street parking a..."
"Situated on a superb, south westerly facing plot close to the 'outstanding' local schooling and the run of local shops and transport links that are found on Ringinglow Road. This 1920's, freehold, detached property boasts a large rear garden and offers huge potential for extensions to further the..."
" A stunning, extended, and refurbished 1920’s brick semi-detached house, finished to an extremely high standard, commanding an enviable position in Fulwood. A charming looking property with a cottage feel, yet offering spacious, light and airy, accommodation over two floors with a ground f..."
"An individually designed 4/5 bedroomed detached property which was constructed and self built by the current owners in 2014. CHAIN FREE and standing in a fully enclosed plot of around 1/5 acre. With high insulation levels, this offers an excellent EPC of 'B' Rated (84) incorporating gas fired UF..."
"Guide Price £595,000 - £625,000 A superb 4 bedroom detached home adjoining open fields with fabulous countryside views in Howbrook. The property was built in 2018, has oak internal doors, gas central heating with column radiators, double glazing, an extremely generous first floor o..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a plot of land with full planning permission- More details below. This land is being sold via modern method of auction, further details, terms and conditions can be viewed below."
"A stunningly presented 4-Bed detached house in the sought after area of Stannington. Linnet Way has everything from curb appeal, a driveway for 5 cars, solar panels, an A energy rating, to impressive countryside views. With the inside being as beautiful as the outside, it´s hard not to fall..."
"GUIDE PRICE £580,000-£600,000 ** FREEHOLD ** Situated in this cul-de-sac position on this admirable plot is this spacious, four bedroom, two bathroom detached property which enjoys a fantastic, landscaped rear garden and benefits from a double-width driveway, a double garage, uPVC double glazing ..."
"Guide price £575,000 - £590,000 EQUESTRIAN PROPERTY WITH APPROXIMATELY 2.5 ACRES OF GRAZING LAND A unique property being ideal for those with equestrian interests is this 3-4 bedroomed cottage which benefits from having approx. 2.5 acres of grazing land and attached barn with th..."
"** FREEHOLD ** Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this fully renovated and immaculately presented, charming four double bedroom Victorian Villa located in the desirable central suburb of Broomhill in Sheffield 10. The property has been carefully refurbished to a high standard throughout, re..."
"Only by viewing can you truly appreciate this superb stone built four bedroom, three bathroom, detached property benefiting from stunning open plan living/dining/kitchen space, separate formal lounge, substantial off road parking, downstairs cloakroom and garage."
A superbly presented and substantially extended four bedroom semi-detached house located in the highly sought-after suburb of Fulwood.
Occupying one of the largest plots on the estate is this spacious and well-presented four double bedroomed detached property with double garage. The family space is over three floors with a large entertaining area to the lower floor that could also be changed to provide living space fo...
"PURCHASE OFF-PLAN - Exceptional duplex penthouse. LARGE, LIGHT FILLED living area with recessed BESPOKE KITCHEN with feature BREAKFAST BAR. Double doors onto PRIVATE BALCONY with VIEWS. Master bedroom & Guest room both include EN-SUITES. Ample storage and DEDICATED PARKING FOR TWO CARS."
"An exceptional three bedroomed detached home, located in a most sought-after area. This fabulous home has been fully refurbished to a high standard throughout by the current owner to offer light and spacious family living."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** This substantial detached home is located in an enviable position at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac, in the sought after village of Aughton. The house stands in a large and extremely private plot that looks out onto open greenery. "
A substantial three/four bedroom detached family home situated in this highly regarded area and in the catchment area for excellent schools. This delightful family home is situated on the corner of Silverdale Gardens where access is provided to a double integral garage. This lovely famil...
"** FREEHOLD ** Tucked away in this quiet position is this immaculately presented, three bedroom, two bathroom detached bungalow in one of Sheffield's most exclusive and sought after suburbs: Ecclesall. The property has been carefully upgraded to a high standard by the current owners and benefits ..."
We are delighted to bring to the market this four double bedroomed detached property.
"Located in the sought-after suburb of Crosspool, this outstanding five bedroom detached family home offers beautifully appointed accommodation across three levels, having undergone a full scheme of refurbishment."
"CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION, DETACHED, FOUR BEDROOMS, NO CAHIN, THREE RECEPTION ROOMS, KITCHEN/DINER, UTILITY ROOM, CLOAKROOM WC, WALK IN WARDROBE & EN SUITE, COURTYARD PARKING & DOUBLE GARAGE: OUTSIDE STUNNING VIEWS, A LARGE GARDEN AND A PADDOCK:"
"An incredibly rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this fabulous three/four bedroomed, semi detached family home. Standing in this unique corner plot that offers a much larger than average garden that enjoys a huge degree of privacy together with a separate driveway and garage accessed from Si..."
The Meadows is an impressive four bedroom detached house which occupies an envious plot in one of Sheffield's most sought-after suburbs of Ridgeway.
"GUIDE PRICE £325,000-£350,000 ** NO CHAIN ** Only upon an internal inspection can this immaculately presented three bedroom detached home be fully appreciated. Ideal for a family, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas fired central heating throughout. Briefly, the accommodation c..."
Land At Junction Of Derbyshire Lane And Norton Lees Road Meersbrook Sheffield S8 9EL - 22/01805/FUL Hunters Woodseats are delighted to offer the market this exciting opportunity to purchase this freehold site with planning permission granted for 11 apartments - 7 two bedroom apartments ...
Offers in the region of £550k. A beautifully renovated property occupying an enviable position in the hugely fashionable neighbourhood of Nether Edge. The property commands an elevated position away from the road and is set in attractively landscaped gardens to both the front and rear. There is a...
Approached by sweeping driveway this extended stone built three bedroom detached bungalow offers peace and tranquillity in one of Sheffield's finest suburbs. There is a large L shaped sitting room incorporating a dining area and an elegant modern kitchen with granite worktops. Sliding doors from ...
"Located within the highly regarded and sought after suburb of Fulwood is this fabulous three double bedroom semi-detached family home which enjoys breath taking views over Sheffield. Well presented throughout, the property has been expertly extended and renovated by the current vendors who have h..."
Bell & Co Estates are delighted to present this lovely FOUR Bedroom DETACHED HOME in the heart of Wales.
"Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000 Dating back to 1937 is an attractive 3 double bedroom detached house set back from the road, offering spacious, versatile living over 2 floors with landscaped gardens. Benefits from combination gas central heating, double glazing, attractive landsca..."
"In the heart of the countryside ... Guide Price £525,000-£550,000 ... nestled in this lovely rural location, this three bedroom cottage has charm and character in abundance. Also benefitting from the M1 being close by , it has the best of both worlds"
"Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000 With vaulted ceilings, private garden and its own front and rear door, this three bedroom first floor duplex apartment PLUS home office really is something special! With light and airy spacious rooms this property would suit professional people needing to ..."
"** VIRTUAL VIEWING NOW AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY ** Detached, executive three bedroom bungalows with such a high quality finish and double garage are extremely rare and only dreamt about!! Don't miss this dream home. With open plan living comprising of lounge, dining space,..."
"A fabulous freehold 5 bedroom family home, with a sunny aspect and low maintenance west facing garden that is bathed in sun from the morning to early evening in the summer months. Private access to the former university Arboretum leads to Broomhill (via Hoole Road or Taptonville road) where wit..."
*PRIVATE FULL LENGTH ROOF TERRACE* Four storey home | Enclosed Garden terrace | Direct access to decked terrace | Triple storey light well | 1327 SQFT | End of terrace townhouse
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£525,000 ** FREEHOLD ** OVER 1700 SQ FT ** Situated in the appealing residential area of Worrall is this stone built, three bedroom, three bathroom barn conversion forming part of this exclusive development. The property benefits from a good size garage with office space abo..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this superb double fronted detached four bedroom extended property, offering plenty of space and scope to create your perfect family home. This deceptively spacious accommodation is offered with NO CHAIN. It has to offer four double bedrooms, with an additional..."
"Guide Price £500,000 - £525,000 A lovely light and airy four bedroom detached family home located within this little known hamlet just off Psalter Lane. Constructed in 1998 the property has evenly proportioned flowing living accommodation over two floors and briefly compris..."
"Guide Price £500,000 - £525,000 An excellent opportunity to acquire a beautifully proportioned four double bedroomed detached house which is particularly well located on the rural fringe of the increasingly sought after suburb of the town with Bradway affording a comprehensive range of l..."
"Relax in style ... Guide Price £500,000-£525,000 ... nestled away in this picturesque spot this stunning home offers you the standard of living you have been looking for, with three bedrooms and open plan living space, it's ready to move in to and relax"
"Guide Price £500,000 - £525,000 Located on a desirable cul de sac in Richmond occupying a larger than average plot is a spacious 5-bedroom detached family home, offering versatile living over 2 floors with an impressive, landscaped rear garden and detached garage. Benefits from gas..."
"Guide Price £500,000-£525,000. A stunning and incredibly spacious 4/5 bedroom detached family home which enjoys an enviable corner plot position at the end of this quiet no through road within this highly sought after area and. Excellent scope for extension is offered given the generous ..."
"Guide Price £500,000 to £525,000 A truly stunning three bedroom detached property located in the popular residnetial area of Crosspool. With views overlooking Rivelin Valley, countryside walks on the door step and an array of amenities closeby, this wonderful house will not..."
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£525,000
Only upon a detailed internal viewing will the true size and style of this fabulous, four double bedroomed, three bathroomed, detached family home be fully revealed. Having been tastefully extended to the side, rear and loft by the current vendors and thoug..."
** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ** FANTASTIC THREE TO FOUR BEDROOM STONE BUILT EXTENDED PROPERTY AND SELF CONTAINED ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT ** The rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this unique 3/4 bedroom split level property with a separate access to the self contained apartment. The second li...
"A deceptively spacious and well presented five bedroom, two bathroom detached home which is located on a quiet cul-de-sac in Crosspool next to open countryside! Perfect for the family with space in mind, this wonderful home enjoys bright and spacious rooms, superb countryside views and offers the..."
"Incredibly rare opportunity to build your dream home in a fantastic location for local shops, cafes, and access to the city centre. Perfect for a family, situated within the catchment area for highly regarded schools. The plot comes with full planning to build a stunning luxurious, five double-be..."
This outstanding three bedroomed ground floor apartment provides over 1100 sq.ft. of luxury living and is situated within an exclusive development in a most sought-after location.
A well presented three bedroom semi detached family home with planning permission for a two storey side extension. The property is situated in this highly regarded area and in the catchment area for excellent schools. This delightful property briefly comprises; Entrance porch leading in...
* NEWLY RELEASED TOWNHOUSE * Four storey home | 480 sqft south east facing private roof terrace | Direct access to landscaped decked terrace | Triple storey light well | 1327 SQFT |
"A larger style, very spacious three double bedroom semi detached family home, on a fabulous large level plot, for sale with immediate vacant possession and no chain and having great potential to extend to the side, rear and fully convert the existing loft area. In need of some updating. "
Set back from the main road and occupying a delightful elevated position is this outstanding four bedroomed two bathroomed detached cottage that offers well-presented family living space that has been maintained by the present owners. Having the added benefit of double parking spaces t...
We are delighted to introduce this superb three bedroom detached dormer bungalow in the village of Whiston
"** FREEHOLD ** Situated in this quiet backwater location in the heart of Stannington Village is this well presented, four bedroom, two bathroom, detached farm house. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas fired central heating throughout. Briefly, the accommodation comprises: Larg..."
"A substantial and very deceptive seven bedroomed, double fronted detached family home. The property enjoys three incredibly spacious floors of accommodation together with vast untapped potential for further development to the existing basement that mirrors the entire footprint of the property. Wi..."
"Only by viewing can you truly appreciate the size and standard of this stunning five/six double bedroom detached property set over three levels providing versatile and flexible living accommodation, benefitting from three bath/shower rooms and a single storey rear extension creating an impressive..."
An exceptionally rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this substantial six bedroomed end of terrace. Currently split in to three apartments but with a little imagination will make a fabulous finished forever family home. Offered to the open market with the benefit of no upward chain and immedi...
"Guide Price: £475,000 A substantial inner terrace with two car parking spaces, comprising four 1 bed and one 2 bedroom flats occupying a prime letting location, a short walk from the University and main teaching hospitals. The property has enjoyed 100% occupancy since purchase in 2009 ..."
"Located in the heart of Nether Edge, a well-proportioned and presented two bedroom detached bungalow which has been adapted throughout for disabled use. This lovely home benefits from having no onward chain, and has been significantly upgraded by the current owner to offer electric opening doors ..."
"A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this lovely 3 bedroom extended semi detached home which enjoys a fabulous position within Dore village and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. The property retains many wonderful characterful features, boasts generous..."
NO OTHER WORD APART FROM WOW! THIS MAGNIFICENT APARTMENT OFFERS FANTASTIC FAMILY ACCOMMODATION. SITUATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION AND HAS THE ADDED BONUS OF BEING OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN!
"Location Location Location... Crucible Homes are DELIGHTED to welcome to the market this truly stunning four / five bedroom detached home in the sought after village of Grenoside, Sheffield. "
A LOVELY FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN THE EVER POPULAR S11 POSTCODE!
"STUNNING PRESENTATION / DETACHED OFFICE / GUEST ROOM - WALKING DISTANCE TO PEAK DISTRICT- Homemove Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer FOR SALE this very well presented semi-detached property, A stunning home offering a multitude of modern features, both inside and out."
"A superb, first floor apartment that offers an excellent range of generously proportioned accommodation and stunning, south facing views from the large and private balcony that is situated off the impressive sitting room. This gorgeous apartment forms part of the prestigious and very desirable Iv..."
"Fantastic views over the Mayfield valley toward Ringinglow await you in this beautiful three bedroomed first floor apartment. Having lift and stair access this impressive apartment is perfect for the downsizer. With communal gardens, private south west facing balconies with far reaching views a..."
"A superbly presented and well-maintained three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the highly sought-after suburb of Fulwood."
"A lovely detached property occupying an enviable position, on a westerly facing plot, close to the end of this quiet cul-de-sac in this most desirable of areas. Occupying an enviable position a short walk away from the first class schooling and Spider Park that are both found close by. This moder..."
"£475,000-£500,000 GUIDE PRICE TWO STOREY SIDE EXTENSION AND LOFT CONVERSION A beautifully presented five bedroom semi detached family home offering superb versatile accommodation situated over four floors. having been effectively extended to the side and into the loft, this delightful pro..."
"Occupying this superb location, a stones throw way from Ecclesall Road and its wide range of amenities and opposite the award winning Botanical Gardens is this immaculately presented four double bedroomed Villa terrace home. No 43 has 1955 Sq Ft of accommodation on offer and a viewing is highly r..."
"Spacious four bedroom semi-detached home with a large South-facing rear garden, off street parking and incredible views! This fantastic family home will be of interest to plenty as it sits within the catchment area for popular schools and is within walking distance to Crookes, Crosspool and Broom..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £500,000 ** This UNIQUE opportunity has arisen to purchase this fabulous detached bungalow, surrounded by stunning gardens and a picturesque babbling brook. "
"Occupying this enviable corner position and enjoying stunning views to the rear is this spacious, extended four bedroomed semi detached family home which is offered for sale with no chain and early vacant possession. No 2 offers versatile family accommodation and is well worthy of an internal ins..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £150,000 TO £175,000** We are pleased to offer for SALE and with NO ONWARD CHAIN this well presented two bedroom first floor flat situated in Greenhill Village and within close proximity to local shops, cafe's and good schools. The property benefits from being just a short ..."
*PRIVATE ROOF TERRACE* | Duplex penthouse | Bespoke kitchen and island | Secure parking available | Double height ceiling | Spiral staircase | Dual aspect | Juliet balcony |1328 SQFT
"** FOUR TO FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** FOUR BATHROOMS ** THREE RECEPTION ROOMS ** DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** MODERN LIVING ** UTILITY ROOM ** AMPLE STORAGE ** RURAL LOCATION *** Guide Price £460,000 - £470,000 Do you work from home?? Have a large family or family that ..."
"A tastefully presented four bedroom detached family home, modernised throughout, enjoys west facing gardens and a sought after position close to both open countryside and the centre of Chapeltown.
"
"*** EXTENSIVE GARAGE/WORKSHOP/OFFICE ***
This unique family home has the rear benefit of the entire ground floor being garaging. *** MUST BE VIEWED ***
The accommodation comprises a garden facing entrance door into the conservatory, a fitted dining kitchen, lounge, two bedrooms and a bathroom, ..."
"A substantial Grade ll listed detached farmhouse just out of the village of Ridgeway, comprising a five bedroom property in need of full modernisation with rural views, together with spacious gardens, orchard and planning permission to extend and create a new driveway, in a spacious plot extendin..."
"Hunters Woodseats are delighted to market this extended three bedroom, two bathroom extended detached house with garage. The property which is neutrally decorated throughout is an ideal family home and briefly comprises; side entrance into the dining kitchen which has a range of fitted wall and b..."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this good size well maintained 3 bedroom Freehold semi detached which boasts an enviable position on this quiet road within this highly sought after area. The property offers good scope for extension if desired (subject to the neces...
"***OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £450,000*** - Superb four bedroom detached house - Close to local amenities - Four bedrooms - Double driveway and garage ***BRAND NEW TO MARKET - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION – CONTACT BLUNDELLS TODAY ON *** Blun..."
"Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000. A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this lovely three bedroom semi-detached family home located on what is without doubt one of the areas most regarded and sought after residential roads within the heart of this leafy suburb. ..."
"A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY!! A delightful three bedroom detached bungalow; spacious throughout and offers fantastic opportunity to further extend (subject to necessary planning). Located on this sought after residential area, this accommodation has plenty to offer. A sizeable low maintenance rear garde..."
Only on a detailed internal inspection can the standard and space on offer in this stylish and imposing five bedroomed detached family home be truly appreciated. Located at the corner of this quiet and popular Cul-De-Sac. Having being finished throughout to a very high standard this property wo...
"This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by iamsold LTD - Starting Bid £405,000 plus Reservation Fee"
"Offered to the market by a motivated seller for a quick sale is this truly unique three bedroomed barn conversion that is Grade II listed and boasts a wealth of character features. Gardeners Cottage is situated within a small hamlet of three other properties, adjacent to the historic Beauchief Ha..."
"Guide Price £450,000-£475,000. UNIQUE PROPERTY! Viewing is a must to appreciate this stunning home! Situated in the sought after location of Ashley Lane, Killamarsh, this quirky 4/5 bedroom detached property offers spacious accommodation, with a beautiful contrast of contemporary and character!"
"An absolutely stunning, four bedroom, two bathroom family home offering beautiful family accommodation and having been effectively extended to the side and rear. This fabulous property , totally refurbished to an exceptional standard, in the catchment area for excellent schools and is well worthy..."
"An exceptional, brand new, three bedroom detached house with a good sized garden and a rural view, on the edge of a sought after hamlet, on the North side of Sheffield within 2 miles of junction 36 of the M1 motorway at Birdwell."
"*LAST 3 PLOTS REMAINING *ZERO ENERGY COSTS UNTIL JAN 2025 *HIGH QUALITY FLOORING INCLUDED Grantley Mews is a luxury development of 4 bed homes, designed to offer a ‘village’ feel with everything you could need within walking distance. The C..."
"Enjoying some truly breathtaking views to both the front and rear is this superbly presented and very deceptive, four bedroomed, two bathroomed, larger than average semi detached family home. Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield´s most sought after and desirable residential suburbs of ..."
"DEAL WORTH £13,000. A stunning family home with 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a DETACHED GARAGE.
The heart of this home is the OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. Downstairs, you will also find a handy STUDY and spacious lounge. Upstairs, there are 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS includin..."
"DEAL WORTH £13,000. A spacious family home with 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a DETACHED GARAGE.
The Radleigh is a superbly presented DETACHED family home. The ground floor offers a stunning OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. Downstairs also benefits from a spacious lounge and sepa..."
"Guide Price at £440,000 to £460,000. A fabulous 2 double bedroom stone built detached lodge which oozes charm and character. Dating back to the nineteenth century, retaining period features complemented by some modern fixtures and fittings, to offer a stylish and homely interior o..."
"Need impressing? This extraordinary 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living, DESIGNER KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE."
"A newly built two bedroomed first floor apartment, situated on a fantastic development in a sought-after area. This exceptional apartment comprises 1011 sq.ft. of luxury accommodation and has a private balcony facing the original stone quarry wall of the site."
"A Well appointed Three bedroom semi- detached property, located at Gleadless, S12"
"If you’re looking for a more spacious family home with lots of development potential – this large five/six-bedroom house is ideal.  At 1848 square feet throughout, this spacious property is full of potential and perfect for growing families or anyone looking for a little ..."
Occupying a generous plot is this lovely four bedroom detached bungalow which would make a fantastic family home. There is great access to all the local amenities and Motorway Links. Early viewings advised!
"Guide Price £430,000 to £450,000. Well appointed and spacious 4 bedroom detached family home in Mosborough. Situated on the sought after Beeches estate this home boasts versatile living accommodation, detached double garage, enviable plot and sizable rear garden. No onward chain"
Experience exceptional living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM and GLASS BALUSTRADE. Three DOUBLE Bedrooms and an Integral garage.
"An exceptional opportunity to acquire this immediately appealing five bedroomed stone fronted Victorian town house which offers well presented and beautifully proportioned accommodation, ideal for a family. Most conveniently located the house stands close to a comprehensive range of loc..."
"A modern and stylish three bedroom semi detached home which enjoys a large garden to the rear and is located on this popular road in Fulwood! Perfect for families, the property has recently undergone a scheme of modernisation including new décor, flooring and a bathroom suite to name a few highli..."
"PRICE GUIDE £425,000-£450,000 ** FREEHOLD ** SOUTH FACING GARDEN ** Situated in this picturesque location in the sought after village of Grenoside is three bedroom, stone built semi-detached, period cottage. Pinfolds Cottage is over 250 years old and is full of charm and character with its fabul..."
"**PERFECT LOCATION!!** This four double bedroom property is new to the market offering a detached garage, study, utility room and a large private rear garden. This house is located on the ever popular Waverley Estate in Rotherham. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"A charming four bedroom detached with the benefit of a garage and off road parking, situated in the sought after area of Waverley. We believe this lovely home is perfect for a family and encourage you to call us to book your viewing"
"WALKING IN A WAVERLEY WONDERLAND! This impressive detached home which sits proudly in this popular modern development. Boasting well presented & spacious accommodation through-out, an en-suite, drive & a garage - THIS HAS EVERYTHING YOU'RE LOOKING FOR - CALL NOW!"
Introducing this Incredibly spacious 5 Bed property with breathtaking garden space: Crabtree Lane. An opulent house brimming with potential to be a remarkable family home. 
"***OFFERS INVITED*** A well presented four bedroom detached family home situated on this highly regarded estate set in a semi rural position with fabulous views over Bradfield. This spacious family home is offered for sale with no onward chain and briefly comprises; Entrance hallway,..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 A 3 double bedroom detached family home standing within generous gardens, offering potential to extend subject to necessary planning conditions. Benefits from double glazing, combination gas central heating, off street parking, garage, and beautiful ..."
"FOR SALE is this simply sublime home which has come to market, in the form of this COMPLETELY RENNOVATED three DOUBLE bedroom property, situated in Totley, S17. "
"A unique chance ... Guide Price £425,000-£450,000 ... backing on to woodland, this extended detached house has a layout that can suit anyone. With a fabulous size lounge, two conservatory's and plenty more space it's ideal for even the largest family"
"Very popular location close to excellent amenities and first-class schools. Substantially extended four bedroom, two bathroom, semi-detached family home for sale with immediate vacant possession. This excellent property briefly comprises; entrance porch, reception hall, lounge with bay w..."
Located on this quiet no-through road within the popular area of Carter Knowle is this wonderful five bedroom semi-detached family home which is offered to the open market for the first time since 1946. Although the property would benefit from some cosmetic updating and gas central heating being ...
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 A beautifully presented FIVE bedroom, three bathroom detached family home occupying a much sought after location on this highly regarded estate. Offering stunning views, light and airy rooms and spacious accommodation throughout, this delightful property i..."
"Full of character and charm ... presented to the highest standard this fantastic extended three bedroom detached cottage with a fabulous garden space, and large detached garage sits in the heart of this lovely village location"
"Location and space ... Guide Price £425,000-£435,000 ... it's time to relax in style inside and out with this lovely extended detached home in a picture perfect location. Looking out over fields it boasts a fantastic amount of living space to enjoy"
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000. A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this quite outstanding four/five bedroom family home which is situated on this lovely tree lined road within this highly desirable area. The property enjoys excellent amenities close by including St James Ret..."
"An outstanding two bedroomed first floor apartment, offering spacious accommodation totalling approximately 968 sq.ft with the advantage of a balcony. Chelsea Heights is an exclusive development, consisting of six apartment buildings, built by PTA Developments, an established developer, with a re..."
"Guide Price £425,000-£450,000 This wonderful three/four bedroom family home, situated on a wider than average plot is ideal for the young family and offers scope to extend again on the side (subject to the necessary consents) This fabulous home briefly comprises; Entrance Hallwa..."
"A newly built two bedroomed ground floor apartment, which has the advantage of a balcony and comprises 1011 sq.ft. of high-quality accommodation. The apartment also faces the original stone quarry wall that has been retained, adding texture and character to the development."
Located at the end of this popular and modern residential estate is this outstanding three bedroomed three bathroomed detached property that has been well maintained by the present owner. Occupying a delightful spot with double tandem driveway for parking and landscaped rear garden wit...
"An absolutely gorgeous, immaculately presented and very well proportioned three bedroomed, bay windowed, extended, semi detached family home. Offering the epitome of contemporary open plan family living to the rear with a stunning and modern kitchen, living diner that is flooded with light provid..."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000-£450,000 ** FREEHOLD ** Situated on this quiet cul-de-sac in the popular residential area of Oughtibridge is this well presented and spacious, stone built, four good size bedroom, two bathroom detached property which enjoys a fully enclosed rear garden and benefits from a dou..."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000-£450,000
Quietly tucked away on this no through cul de sac is this smartly presented and very well proportioned three bedroomed, detached bungalow. The property has a family bathroom, with bath and power shower, and the master bedroom has an en-suite. The property ..."
"A beautifully presented recently constructed three bedroom, two bathroom, residential apartment set in this new retirement community of 65 apartments. Arguably one of the best locations in the development with views from each bedroom window and lounge overlooking the beautifully maintain..."
"Superb throughout is this four bedroom art deco detached property retaining some original features; offering spacious and flexible living space residing in generous gardens and enjoying stunning views to the front. Benefitting from three reception rooms, modern kitchen/diner, utility room, downst..."
"4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living, STUDY, designer kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, and BI-FOLD doors. Separate LIVING ROOM. Downstairs WC and utility cupboard. Main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM."
"Enjoying some truly stunning uninterrupted views over the Mayfield valley to the front is this superb, larger than average three double bedroomed, bay windowed semi detached family home. Standing in this elevated position ensuring privacy to both the front and rear, number 221 also affords a much..."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £23,000. A spacious family home with FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a PRIVATE DRIVEWAY.
On the ground floor, you will find an open-plan dining kitchen and spacious lounge with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. On the first floor, you will find two double bedrooms include the main with..."
"DEAL OVER £23,000. A flexible modern family home, designed over three floors, OVERLOOKING RIVER VIEWS.
Your new home features an open-plan dining kitchen filled with natural light. The spacious lounge benefits from FRENCH DOORS leading to your FULLY TURFED GARDEN. On the first floor, you'll find ..."
"This luxury four bedroom home is part of the unique collection of townhouses at Laycock House in the heart of Sheffield city centre. Perfectly located in a vibrant, regenerated neighbourhood, with an abundance of exciting new food, drink, retail and leisure options on your doorstep."
"Live for WOW with this 4 bedroom detached home with top of the range specification. Fully furnished ex show home which includes furniture, flooring, curtains and blinds and landscaped garden"
"An immaculate detached house located on a quiet cul de sac in Burncross. Comprising of 4 double bedrooms, 2 with en-suites, and a family bathroom. The property is generously sized, offering flexible accommodation over 3 floors, featuring a stylish interior, new carpets, fitted blinds with contemp..."
"Apartment 1107 Hallam Towers is a stunning two-bedroom apartment located within a prestigious new development, previously home to the iconic Hallam Towers Hotel. This exclusive development re-introduces high end living to Sheffield and offers an impressive range of amenities including swimming po..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £410,000 - £420,000 ** WOW ** ENVIOUS CORNER PLOT POSITION! STYLISH & CONTEMPORARY! GENEROUS LANDSCAPED GARDENS! MAGNIFICENT FITTED KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM! DRIVEWAY! GARAGE! Occupying an envious corner plot position, this exsceptional, four bedroom detached residence, boasting generou..."
"Looking for a home full of charm and ready to move in? Take a look at this Beautifully Presented Home situated in the sought after residential area on the outskirts of Sheffield, on Moorthorpe Rise within Owlthorpe. With an enclosed aspect to the rear and private driveway. Situated to an excellen..."
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £10,000! Experience exceptional living with UPGRADED INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. Three DOUBLE Bedrooms and an Integral garage."
"FOUR bedroom, three storey DETACHED home with DESIGNER kitchen, UTILITY room. Stunning TOP FLOOR MAIN bedroom with ensuite and Velux windows."
"DEAL WORTH £12,000. A spacious family home with 2 SETS OF FRENCH DOORS to the garden and a SEPARATE DINING ROOM.
This impressive DETACHED home, in a CORNER LOCATION, features an OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. Also on the ground floor is a relaxing lounge with a ..."
"DEAL AVAILABLE. A modern versatile townhouse, ideal for growing families, with a HOME OFFICE and STUNNING RIVER VIEWS.
The Cannington is designed over three floors creating a home for flexible modern living. A GLAZED BAY leading to the garden allows light to stream into the open-plan kitchen with..."
Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! 4 bedroom home with DESIGNER kitchen and BI FOLD doors. Main bedroom comes with ENSUITE bathroom with FULL HEIGHT tiling. Three DOUBLE bedrooms and Integral garage.
"The Lorimer is a 4-bedroom home that features an en suite to bedrooms 1 and 2, a contemporary family bathroom, an open-plan kitchen dining and family area with utility room, and a separate living room."
"Taunton Grove: A shoppers dream maybe, close to the Meadowhall Shopping Complex as well as other retail parks. Located within Wincobank a popular residential district on the East of Sheffield and ideal for commuters into the city centre as well as ideal for the motorway network."
"This well-presented large family house has lots of period features, natural light, and a generous modern family kitchen, it’s a lovely forever home for a growing family.  At approximately 2120 square feet this period semi-detached house has lots of space and stunning views..."
"Ready Steady MOVE are extremely delighted to market this detached property which offers five double bedrooms and has been refurbished throughout. The property is situated in the sought-after area of Charnock which offers local amenities, public transport and within the catchment area for Charnock..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £410,000 ** Ideal for the family purchaser is this beautiful spacious, well presented five bedroom detached property with driveway and Double garage conversion which stands in maintenance free landscaped gardens with far reaching views. Situated on a cul-de-sac in thi..."
"A beautiful two bedroom detached cottage situated in this highly regarded area and in close proximity to all of the amenities offered on nearby Ecclesall Road. Having been lovingly maintained over the decades by the same family, this quaint little cottage stands proud and back from the road and t..."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£425,000
An incredibly rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this fabulous four double bedroomed, stone built, period, bay windowed, semi detached family home. With three incredibly spacious floors of accommodation that are flooded with natural light and total an ..."
An extended and beautifully presented terraced villa situated on this very desirable road a short walk away from the cosmopolitan neighbourhoods of Broomhill and Sharrowvale where independent bars & bistros rub shoulders with trendy cafes & boutiques to create a thriving social scene. The propert...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 *** This attractive 4 bedroom detached family home is nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in a sought-after area and is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£425,000*** Standing proudly raised and set back from Ashley Lane, enviably positioned on a small cul-de-sac of only three properties is this FOUR bedroom EXTENDED Detached family home, offering a fabulous outlook towards Long Lane providing a semi-r..."
"Guide Price: £400,000 - £425,000 A fabulous four bedroom detached family home, situated in the popular suburb of Beighton."
"PRICE GUIDE offers over £400,000
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***
Located in one of the areas premier roads this detached property offers a fabulous opportunity for the incoming buyer to refurbish and extend this unique home.
*** PRIME LOCATION ***
The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, dual a..."
"The Property **3D VIRTUAL TOUR**OIRO £400,000**MUST BE VIEWED**Fantastic Victorian Family Residence. Four bedroom end Terrace with off street parking.
The property has been lovingly maintained by its current owners and retains many of its original features. Nether Edge is a highly sought after,..."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000 to £425,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND NESTLED AWAY...AN EXECUTIVE HOME FOR YOUR FAMILY TO STAY...! Uflit are more than delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous property offering STYLISH and MODERN LIVING Throughout. "
"A stunning, contemporary styled four bedroom detached family home located in the popular suburb of Chapeltown."
"A generously proportioned three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the heart of Millhouses."
"Guide Price £400,000-£410,000. A beautifully presented and deceptively spacious 3 bedroom detached which enjoys an enviable position at the end of this quiet no through road within this most sought after residential area. The property boasts a beautiful south facing rear garden as well a..."
"Located in a quiet semi-rural area is this fabulous two bedroomed terraced cottage with a south-east facing garden. The Granary has been finished to a superb standard throughout, including under floor heating to the ground floor, and retains a wealth of character features."
"A delightful family home tucked between Stannington and glorious countryside: Chapel Cottages.
Boasting three lovely bedrooms and two large reception rooms, this home affords you the very best of rural and urban living.
"
"Guide Price £400,000-£425,000. An attractively presented and deceptively spacious 4 bedroom detached offering excellent family accommodation within this highly sought after area. The property has been significantly and effectively extended and boasts generous room proportions throughout...."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£415,000
An absolutely sensational, three double bedroomed, two bathroomed, bay windowed semi detached family home. Having been expertly extended to the loft to create an impressive master bedroom that enjoys an en-suite together with some incredible views. Finished..."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£415,000
An incredibly rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this absolutely fabulous, three bedroomed, two bathroomed, detached, new build property. Independently designed and built to the very highest of standards by the current vendors, the property has been cl..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 *** This attractive 4/5 bedroom detached family home sits on a substantial plot in a quiet cul-de-sac and is nestled in a sought-after area in Hillsborough. It is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including GP su..."
Experience exceptional living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. Three DOUBLE Bedrooms and an Integral garage.
"DETACHED home in CORNER LOCATION with STUNNING VIEWS. 
This stunning DETACHED home benefits from STUNNING VIEWS of the River Don. Downstairs, you will find an OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen, FRENCH DOORS to the garden and a handy UTILITY ROOM. A spacious lounge completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs, yo..."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £22,000. A modern versatile townhouse, ideal for growing families, with a HOME OFFICE and PRIVE DRIVEWAY.
Downstairs you will find your handy HOME OFFICE and open-plan kitchen, with a dining and lounge area, with FRENCH DOORS leading out to your garden. On the first floor you'll f..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000** NO CHAIN!! Call our sales team to arrange a viewing on this spacious and beautifully presented throughout three bedroom detached property. Offering modern high gloss kitchen, off road parking and enclosed low maintenance rear garden. Situated in a popular res..."
"Exclusive DESIGNER KITCHEN, BI-FOLDS, and SPACIOUS ROOMS. Boasts OPEN PLAN LIVING and design led living spaces. "
"*LAST 3 PLOTS REMAINING *ZERO ENERGY COSTS UNTIL JAN 2025 *HIGH QUALITY FLOORING INCLUDED Grantley Mews is a luxury development of 4 bed homes, designed to offer a ‘village’ feel with everything you could need within walking distance. The W..."
"This unique individual semi detached house is set in a lovely location, in this highly desirable area. New fibreglass warm roof installation to the main roof flat roof installed under building regulations with guarantee from 18/12/22-to 18/12/42. The three bedroom property has a nice feel with am..."
This attractive 4 bedroom detached home is nestled in a modern development within a sought-after area and is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive and beautifully proportioned ...
"DEAL OVER £22,000. A stunning DETACHED home with FRENCH DOORS to the garden, separate DINING ROOM, DETACHED GARAGE and DRIVEWAY PARKING for 2 cars.
The Alderney is a great home for families. It features a spacious lounge and OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen, both with FRENCH DOORS opening out to the rear..."
"** FOUR TO FIVE BEDROOMS ** EXTENDED FAMILY HOME ** DOWNSTAIRS WETROOM ** LOVELY VIEWS ** Situated within this popular area and offering a generous plot with ample parking and good-sized rear garden which backs on to fields, this extended four to five bed family home offers good flexi..."
**RESERVE YOUR PLOT TODAY** STEP AWAY FROM THE CROWDS With only two of these architecturally designed detached family new builds available you need to move quick to secure your new stylish home. These artisan crafted new properties come with a high specification of finish which o...
"A fabulous three bedroom semi detached family home occupying a good size plot and having off road parking for numerous vehicles and a detached single garage. This lovely home is located in this highly regarded area and in the catchment area for excellent schools and close to local amenities, cit..."
"Only upon a detailed internal inspection will the true beauty of this sensational, immaculately presented and very deceptive four bedroomed Victorian villa terrace be fully revealed. Having recently undergone a full internal transformation by the current vendor to create this jaw dropping finish ..."
"Guide Price £395,000 - £415,000 A well-presented, 3-bedroom brick built detached house located in Dore Village. An attractive property comprising of 3 bedrooms, modern bathroom, ensuite, dual aspect open plan living space and kitchen leading through to a conservatory, with landscap..."
"A beautiful piece of Oughtibridge history. Church Street offers an exciting opportunity for an ambitious new owner. With fantastic layout, great bones and jaw dropping views. This home is unique and packed to the brim with charm. "
"NO CHAIN A superb opportunity to purchase this delightful three bedroom semi-detached property located within this sought after residential area of Beauchief. This spacious family home has three double bedrooms, two reception rooms and a fantastic well maintained sizable garden. The pr..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this stunning four bedroom semi detached family home, situated in this desirable residential location. This well presented modern accommodation has been a loved family home for many years. Deceptively spacious throughout and occ..."
"Bell & Co Estates are pleased to present this lovely FOUR BEDROOM, DETACHED family home in the heart of Swallownest, tucked away at the end of its own private drive."
"Hunters Hillsborough are delighted to present a stunning three / four bedroom semi detached home with two car gated driveway, integrated double garage, and gardens to three sides. The property commands an almost corner plot with pleasant views to the rear. Entry to the property via front door int..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE THIS FANTASTIC FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME!!! GUIDE PRICE £390,000 - £400,000!!! Move straight into this immaculately presented stylish four bedroom semi detached property. Enjoying a fantastic position in this popular residential area of Oughtibridge, wi..."
"GUIDE PRICE £390,000 to £400,000 THIS PROPERTY WILL SELL FAST SO DON'T DELAY...THE BEST OF IT'S KIND ON EYAM WAY...! Uflit are HIGHLY delighted to welcome to the market this STYLISH detached four double bedroom family home offering MODERN and SPACIOUS LIVING throughout. "
"CHAIN FREE!! NOT TO BE MISSED! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this unique 3/4 bedroom detached bungalow. Tucked away on a generous sized plot having masses of potential and surrounded by woodland. Close to great local amenities, road links and choice of school. Plenty of countryside walks. A..."
This fantastic detached property is just what you and your family have been working for. Offering bags of space throughout this really is worth a look and is located on this modern development and well placed for all the local amenities which Aston has to offer. Viewings recommended.
"A superbly presented and deceptively spacious four bedroom detached family home, situated in the popular suburb of Owlthorpe."
"GUIDE PRICE £390,000-£410,000 ** FREEHOLD ** MODERNISED TO A HIGH STANDARD ** Situated in this idyllic and private location enjoying attractive views is this well presented and effectively extended, three bedroom detached property which benefits from well-kept gardens to three sides, a driveway,..."
"Guide Price: £390,000 A substantial 7 bedroom licenced HMO occupying a level corner position in this popular letting area, close to the University, City Centre and Ecclesall Road facilities. The property is let for the current academic year at £30,576pa and £34,215 pa for 2023/24"
"Hunters Woodseats are delighted to market this three/four bedroom three bathroom detached house located in this highly sought after area. The property which is available with no onward chain is tastefully decorated throughout briefly comprises; entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, open p..."
"Occupying an envious elevated position with far reaching views, this three bedroom semi-detached house is situated within the sought-after suburb of Woodhouse."
Prepare to fall in love with this spacious four bedroom detached forever family home located in the sought after area of Swallownest. A viewing is essential to appreciate all the accommodation on offer. The property is well presented throughout and ready to move in. Be just the second owner of th...
"GUIDE PRICE £390,000 - £410,000 ** SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ** FREEHOLD ** Situated on this cul-de-sac position on the popular Wadsley Park Village is this four double bedroom, two bathroom detached property which benefits from a driveway, garage, uPVC double glazing and gas central heating. The..."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £20,000. A spacious family home with a SOUTH-WEST FACING GARDEN and ADAPTABLE WORK FROM HOME SPACE.
The Hadley is a stunning detached home with an open-plan dining kitchen and FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH-WEST FACING GARDEN. Downstairs, you will also find a spacious lounge and handy ..."
"A bright, spacious and well presented three bedroom semi-detached home which is located on this popular road and enjoys a south facing garden to the rear. Perfect for families, the property offers the discerning purchaser the chance to alter to ones own tastes and benefits from an additional occa..."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £22,000. A stylish home offering flexible living across three floors and a dedicated HOME OFFICE.
On the ground floor you will find a spacious living/dining room with FRENCH DOORS to the garden, a stylish kitchen and a separate HOME OFFICE perfect for working from home. There is a..."
An attractively presented and deceptively spacious 3 bedroom detached which enjoys stunning panoramic views and is situated within this highly regarded residential area. The property offers excellent family accommodation and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. Excellent am...
"A well-presented and effectively extended three bedroom, semi-detached family home having a south facing rear garden and offering a wonderful opportunity for first time buyers or a growing family. Having undergone a comprehensive scheme of refurbishment over recent months and benefitting from new..."
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this three bedroom semi-detached family home which is located in a friendly neighbourhood and within the school catchment area for both Dobcroft and Silverdale Schools, voted North England State Secondary School of the decade. Benefitting from a spac..."
"GUIDE PRICE £385,000-£395,000
An absolutely stunning, immaculately presented and very well proportioned three bedroomed, detached family home. With full plans, planning permission and architects´ drawings in place to further extend to the side and rear to create a forever home. En..."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £22,000. An impressive home, perfect for first-time buyers and growing families with adaptable living space.
The ground floor has a comfortable lounge and open-plan dining kitchen that benefits from an adjoining utility room and FRENCH DOORS that open out onto the garden. Upstairs..."
"NO CHAIN!! A unique opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented four bedroom family home. Offering stylish kitchen and bathroom, master bedroom with ensuite and downstairs WC. Also having off road parking, garage and levelled off maintained garden. Situated in a highly sought after villag..."
"Beautifully presented four double bedroom detached property benefitting from modern en-suite shower room, downstairs WC and stunning contemporary spacious high gloss kitchen/diner. Residing on a substantial plot with extensive off road parking including caravan/motorhome and ample space for multi..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £380,000-390,000 ** Viewing is absolutely essential to appreciate this stunning four bedroom stone built detached property having been modernised and refurbished throughout by the current vendors to create an exquisite family home benefiting from en-suite shower room, superb kitch..."
"In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home.  This stunning family home has been modernised over the years, but it still has plenty of period features and ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £380,000-£390,000
Only upon a detailed internal inspection will the true size of this stunning, immaculately presented and very deceptive three bedroomed, bay windowed semi detached family home be fully revealed. Having been superbly extended over the years to create a super..."
"A brilliantly designed four bedroom home, perfect for family life with its internal garage and family bathroom."
"Introducing the Bowyer, a beautiful 4 bedroom detached home comprising an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors to the rear garden, a utility room, dual-aspect living room and en-suite to bedroom 1. Complete by detached single garage. "
"**NO CHAIN ** 2roost are delighted to bring to the market this IMPRESSIVE STUNNING FAMILY HOME. Situated on this ever popular development is this executive style immaculately presented four DOUBLE bedroom, detached family home. Finished in a contemporary style inside."
"Guide Price at £375,000 - £385,000. A stunning, modern, detached house with an ultra-stylish interior, commanding an enviable position on a popular cul-de-sac, with a south facing garden. Improved considerably by the present owners, finished to a high standard, offering accommodati..."
In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this three-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home.  At approximately 900 square feet this semi-detached house has lots of space and a secure garden wi...
An opportunity has arisen to purchase this much loved four bedroom detached family home in the popular S17 postcode. This lovely home has incredible views and is located a stones throw away from the Peak District National Park but remaining convenient for transport links into Sheffield city ce...
"
New to the market, on this desirable residential road, in the heart of Carter Knowle this three bedroom property is extended to the rear to provide an extra room, utility and WC and having its own entrance, could be used as an annexe for the growing family or dependent relative. The kitchen dine..."
"The perfect home in the perfect spot ... Guide Price £375,000-£400,000 ... this spacious four bedroom detached home in the heart of Burncross village has everything you could ask for both inside, and on the doorstep"
"2Roost are pleased to offer for sale this 4 bedroom detached house in Sheffield. The accommodation features living room/diner, kitchen, occasional room, bedroom 1, bedroom 2, bedroom 3, bedroom 4 and bathroom, beautifully presented throughout, detached property , the ideal family home, open plan ..."
"Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000 A fabulous, beautifully presented 3-bedroom family home located in the desirable area of Greystones, S11. Stylish accommodation offering potential to convert the cellar subject to necessary consents. Upgraded by recent owners to provide new kitchen, ..."
Brilliant three-bedroom property that is perfect for families or anyone looking for a spacious home in a great location. The property has been extended to the rear and also has a detached garage. The location is fantastic as you’re a short walk to both Crookes and Crosspool.
"Wonderfully presented 2 bedroom maisonette in Sheffield Comprises of: Impressive open plan split-level ground floor with living, dining and kitchen areas Modern and well-appointed kitchen with integrated appliances Bright and airy dining area Generously sized yet co..."
Enjoying an enviable position within this highly sought after area stands this deceptively spacious and attractively appointed extended 3 bedroom semi detached. The property offers excellent family accommodation and benefits from gas central heating fired via a combination boiler and is ...
A superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached house situated within an envious cul-de-sac position in the sought-after suburb of Totley.
A BEAUTIFUL PROPERTY YOU SIMPLY MUST SEE...ON THE HIGHLY DESIRABLE WAVERLEY...! Uflit are more than delighted to welcome to the market this FABULOUS four-bedroom family home offering SPACIOUS and MODERN LIVING throughout. 
"GUIDE PRICE - £375,000 - £400,000 - WOW! THIS SPLIT LEVEL DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER AREA WITH A STREAM RUNNING THROUGH THE END OF THE GARDEN IS A MUST SEE PROPERTY!"
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£385,000
Recently finished to the very highest of standards by the current vendors with absolutely no expense spared is this incredibly deceptive three/four bedroomed, detached bungalow property. With newly installed full rewire, central heating system and Fensa reg..."
"Are you looking for a four double bedroom detached property with a double garage, car port, two bathrooms and two reception rooms? Then this beautifully presented property offered to the market in Stannington is the property for you. Along side the beautiful décor this property also has a ..."
"A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this large 4 bedroom stone fronted detached dwelling complete with lower ground floor flat and attached post office. This sizeable property will be of interest to a number of different buyers, given the fabulous scope and flexibilit..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £385,000 ** WOW! MAGNIFICENT FAMILY HOME! THREE STOREY! GENEROUS REAR GARDEN, AMPLE DRIVEWAY & GARAGE! NO CHAIN! Occupying an envious corner plot position, commanding delightful views, this magnificent, four bedroomed detached residence, boasting a generous size rear gar..."
"**LAUNCH DAY SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - CALL NOW TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING** Completed to a ""white box"" level, Plot three provides approx. 86sqm of energy-efficient accommodation over three floors, and offers three generous bedrooms over three floors. Plot three is positioned on the c..."
Situated on this quiet tree lined road within this highly sought after area stands this spacious 3 bedroom semi detached property which enjoys a generous plot and must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property benefits from gas central heating and is UPVC double glazed throughout. ...
"Guide Price at £370,000 to £380,000. A freehold 3 bedroom semi-detached house for sale with a conservatory, a south facing garden, and a garage. Accommodation on two floors with modern decorative tones, a modern kitchen and bathroom, and a conservatory. Benefits from gas central he..."
"This beautiful, spacious and characterful 2 bedroom apartment in a vibrant Sheffield cohousing community is located on the first and second floors of Brincliffe House, a Victorian villa in Nether Edge, Sheffield, that was developed in 2018 and converted into flats as part of On the Brink Cohousin..."
"Let us help get you moving with EXPRESS MOVER^ The Cutler is a stunning new home featuring an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with french doors to the rear garden, a range of integrated appliances, a separate living room, plus an en-suite to bedroom 1. Complete by a single integral garage."
"Unique and full of character! Strikingly attractive former detached Lodge sympathetically converted and with some lovely features. Two double bedrooms, superb large dining kitchen with bi-fold doors to terrace courtyard. Attractive bay windowed lounge. Family bathroom. Good basement cell..."
"A viewing is a must to fully appreciate this beautifully presented and spacious four bedroomed detached property situated in the heart of Mosborough Village. With stunning open place living accommodation to the ground floor and a master bedroom with en-suite. Benefitting from off road parking, an..."
"Guide Price £395,000 - £415,000 A superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the highly sought-after suburb of Greystones."
"Andersons are proud to present to the market this fantastic detached family home with well presented, stylish accommodation throughout. Situated in the popular residential area of Bradway, located close to schools, golf and sports clubs and a range of retailers including, coffee shops independent..."
"An exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this superb two double bedroom apartment which is positioned on the seventh floor of this landmark building within the sought after area of Broomhill S10. This prestigious development enjoys the benefits of having an on-site concierge, residents indo..."
"** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** For sale with tenants in situ until June 2024 generating an annual income of £27,360 (inclusive of bills) is this six double bedroom fully licensed HMO. Situated close to the Universities and within easy reach of a wealth of amenities on Barber Road, the property is w..."
"Located just a short stroll from the fantastic amenities found on both Ecclesall Road and Sharrow Vale is this stunning three double bedroom mid terraced house which has been subject to a recent renovation project. Well presented throughout, the property has a modern and contemporary style, benef..."
"Ref: AL0535 We are pleased to offer to the market this three double bedroomed detached house which must viewed to appreciate the individual style. The property briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility room, three double bedrooms, bathroom, sh..."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £280,000 Superb modern, elevated bungalow, on a quiet cul de sac, recently refurbished to a high standard offering 3 double bedrooms, impressive open plan living space with multi fuel stove and attractive landscaped rear garden. Benefits from combination gas ..."
"The one for you.....Guide Price £360,000-£375,000 ... this fabulous three bedroom detached home has so much to offer. With a fantastic garden, lovely conservatory, and far reaching views to enjoy, it ticks every box"
"More space than most ... Guide Price £360,000 - £380,000... set over three floors and boasting lots of living space as well as four bedrooms, this lovely tucked away family home enjoying fantastic views has the room to spread out as much as you need"
A modern two bedroomed first floor apartment offering spacious accommodation with a fabulous specification.
"Situated in this desirable residential location is this well presented, three-bedroom semi-detached property. Having been extended to the rear the property offers spacious living accommodation over two floors and briefly comprises: Entrance hall, lounge, dining room and extended kitchen...."
Situated in the quiet yet popular area of Waverley on the outskirts of Rotherham comes this spacious four bed detached property that would be perfect for growing families.
"GUIDE PRICE £360,000 - £370,000. NO CHAIN!! A unique opportunity to purchase this large four bed detached family home which is situated at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac on a corner plot. Offering downstairs WC, utility room and master bedroom with ensuite. Also having off road parking, double g..."
"Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield´s most sought after and desirable residential suburbs, in the heart of S11, is this well presented and proportioned four bedroomed, extended semi detached family home. Having been cleverly designed and extended by the current vendors to create this ..."
"Space for all of you ... Guide Price £360,000-£375,000 ... tucked away on this quiet cul de sac this spacious four bedroom detached home has the space that you have been looking for"
"Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this three bedroom semi-detached property in the extremely popular area of Nether Edge which is a short walk from Abbeydale Road & London Road which that boats a variety of cafes, restaurants, bars and has great access to public transport. This property ..."
"A spacious family home with French doors to the SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN.
This stunning DETACHED HOME features a contemporary open-plan dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. There is also a spacious lounge, perfect for the family to relax in. Up a flight of stairs, you’ll find t..."
"DEAL OVER £20,000. A stunning family home with 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a SOUTH-WEST FACING GARDEN. This DETACHED home features a modern OPEN-PLAN layout with a dining kitchen, spacious lounge and FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH-WEST FACING GARDEN. The ground floor also benefits from a handy utility room..."
"A spacious home, perfect for young families, with ADAPTABLE WORK FROM HOME SPACE and a SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN.
This DETACHED HOME features a contemporary open-plan dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN. There is also a spacious lounge, perfect for the family t..."
"DEAL WORTH £10,000. A stunning family home with a South facing garden.
This 4 bedroom home includes a spacious open plan kitchen with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. A bright and airy lounge, cloakroom and extra storage space complete the ground floor. Upstairs you'll find an EN SUITE ma..."
"Hunters of Woodseats are pleased to market this three bedroom semi detached home which is available with no onward chain. The property, which is tastefully decorated throughout is situated in the highly popular area of Norton which boasts an abundance of local amenities including, gym, retail par..."
Are you looking to put your own stamp on the perfect family home in S11?
"Situated in the heart of Millhouses, this a fabulous opportunity to purchase a two bedroom semi-detached bungalow, with an expected build completion date of Autumn 2023."
A beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached family home offering quality accommodation with great views and situated in this highly regarded area and in the catchment area for excellent schools. Situated close to shops and local amenities. This lovely family home briefly compri...
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***
This fabulous property offers the incoming purchaser the opportunity to refurbish/extend.
*** VIEWING ADVISED ***
The current accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, W.c., dual aspect lounge, kitchen, utility room, first floor landing, three bedrooms and a bathroom/W...."
"** A MAGNIFICENT BARN CONVERSION ** RECENTLY RENOVATED TO A HIGH SPECIFICATION - UNIQUE, CHARMING AND FULL OF CHARACTER, BELIEVED TO DATE BACK TO 1570, OPEN PLAN LIVING, PICTURE PERFECT GARDENS & OFF STREET PARKING! Believed to date back to 1570, Frogpool Cottage is set within beautiful, Idylic s..."
"Guide Price £350,000-£375,000. Looking for a spacious family home? Situated on a cul-de-sac in the popular location of Killamarsh, this is a well presented and spacious 4 bedroom detached home! The property benefits from a detached DOUBLE garage and ample space for any growing family!"
"Quietly tucked away on this no through cul de sac in the very heart of ultra popular Greystones is this tastefully presented and well proportioned, three bedroomed, bay windowed smi detached family home. Standing in this commanding position ensuring a huge degree of privacy together with some inc..."
"Amazing opportunity to purchase this newly renovated Pristine development. This stunning development will provide an immaculately presented four bedroom, bay windowed end-terraced property. *ANTICIPATED COMPLETION AUGUST.  "
"This three bedroom home is part of the unique collection of townhouses at Laycock House in the heart of Sheffield city centre. Perfectly located in a vibrant, regenerated neighbourhood, with an abundance of exciting new food, drink, retail and leisure options on your doorstep."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000-£360,000 Situated at the end of this quiet cul de sac within the sought after area of Dore stands this most impressive deceptively spacious 3 storey 3 bedroom end townhouse which is attractively presented throughout and must be viewed internally to be fully appreciat..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £110,000 - £120,000 *** Superbly positioned two bedroom first floor maisonette. Enjoying being located within the popular suburb of Sothall. With an abundance of amenities being close by such as shopping complex of 'Crystal peaks' and ease of access to the M1. Take advantage of th..."
"Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000 A beautifully presented three bedroom semidetached property commanding a generous corner plot position. This delightful family home has ample space throughout, an open plan kitchen dining room with direct access to the garden. Well-presented ..."
"Hunters Woodseats are delighted to market this three bedroom extended semi detached family home which benefits from a occasional fourth bedroom, integral garage and level lawned and enclosed rear garden. This tastefully decorated and well presented home provides excellent living space with furthe..."
Residential development land located in a popular residential suburb.
"Hunters Woodseats are pleased to market this four/five bedroom semi detached house situated on a corner plot on a no through road. The property, which is neutrally decorated throughout briefly comprises; entrance hall having a stunning large pattern tiled floor flowing through to the front bay wi..."
"Situated on a cul-de-sac in sought-after Stannington Village located in Bradfield Parish is this well presented three bedroomed detached home offering spacious accommodation over two levels. The property has been upgraded by the current owners to a high specification, is freehold, and has the ..."
"A beautifully presented recently constructed two bedroom, two bathroom, residential apartment set in this new retirement community of 65 apartments. This extremely well presented top floor apartment with balcony offers excellent living accommodation comprising; Entrance lobby, open plan..."
"CHAIN FREE!! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this unique and spacious four double bedroom bedroom detached dorma bungalow which is tucked away on a private road consisting of five houses/bungalows in the popular residential village of Killamarsh. Offering conservatory, two bathrooms and downs..."
Located on this stunning tree lined road in the heart of The Broomhill Conservation Area is this beautifully and appointed and most spacious three bedroomed Penthouse Apartment. One of only five apartments in this purpose built stone building which was constructed in a most sympathetic manner wit...
"Guide price £350,000 - £375,000 A great opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious three bedroom detached property. Located within this popular residential area and situated on this enviable corner plot. Benefitting from three double bedrooms, sizable conservatory, t..."
A superb property in a prime location
"£375,000 - £400,000 (Guide Price) A fabulous two-bedroom mews cottage, situated within this stunning stable block conversion in the heart of Millhouses."
Offering bags of potential for extension and development subject to the necessary planning permissions is this three bedroomed semi detached family home which is offered for sale with no chain and early vacant possession. No 56 occupies this good sized corner plot which will add to its desirabili...
An internal viewing is highly recommended to appreciate this beautifully appointed three bedroom semi-detached home situated in this popular residential street in the heart of Crookes. The property enjoys pleasant views to the front over the Rivelin Valley and benefits from uPVC double glazing an...
"An extended period villa with an excellent range of well presented accommodation situated over three floors. This larger than average property (rumoured to be the largest on the road) has a lovely finish throughout, with modern fixtures and fittings in all the right places including integrated ap..."
"** FREEHOLD ** SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ** Situated near the end of this quiet cul-de-sac position in the popular residential area of Oughtibridge is this effectively extended, two bedroom detached bungalow which enjoys a good size rear garden and benefits from a driveway providing off-road parki..."
"**VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY** Stunning four bedroom semi detached home now available. With accommodation over three floors this ready to move in home is not going to be on the market long. The home benefits from large living room with solid fuel burner, a sp..."
"A fantastic opportunity to live in this outstanding and elegant four double bedroom mid-terrace property, that oozes charm and character, whilst providing spacious and practical accommodation set over three levels. This home enjoys an enviable position on this much sought-after road."
"Guide Price £345,000 - £365,000 A fantastic opportunity to purchase this superb four bedroom semidetached property situated within the sought after location. This well presented, extended property has ample amounts of space; neutrally decorated throughout and has the added ..."
"A great opportunity to purchase an attractive, larger style four bedroom Victorian mid terrace which retains lovely charm and character and offers accommodation over four floors including a basement cellar. Very well placed for the amenities of Crookes and Broomhill and close to the un..."
"Situated on the doorstep of both Bingham & Endcliffe Parks is this most deceptive, three bedroomed mid terrace property that has tastefully appointed accommodation arranged over four floors. The property has excellent nearby amenities at Hangingwater & Nethergreen and has sought after school catc..."
Situated overlooking Hillsborough park and offering generously sized family space over four floors is this delightful four bedroomed spacious end terraced property. Having been maintained to a high standard by the present owners and benefitting from gas central heating and double glazi...
"WHAT A FIND!!.. We couldn't be happier to present to the market this fantastic three-bedroom detached property, located within a terrific residential area of Sheffield. Boasting a superb corner plot, this family home presents an impressive internal layout, with an abundance of space to modernise ..."
"2roost are thrilled to present to you this stunning four-bedroom detached family home, located in the highly desirable modern estate of Aston. This property boasts an enviable location, with easy access to Sheffield, Rotherham, and the M1 motorway network, as well as being in close proximity to a..."
PURCHASE OFF-PLAN - Open plan two bedroom converted apartment. Master bedroom comes with LUXURY EN-SUITE. Second double bedroom. Bespoke fitted kitchen with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and feature BREAKFAST BAR. Double doors onto PRIVATE BALCONY. DEDICATED PARKING for TWO CARS. 
"GUIDE PRICE £340,000-£350,000
An absolutely gorgeous, immaculately presented and very well proportioned four double bedroomed, two bathroomed, period, Victorian, bay windowed, terraced property. Enjoying a double rear off shot that maximises the feeling of space throughout the the thre..."
"A TRULY UNIQUE FIND! This charming Grade II listed cottage is a rare find, with many original period features maintained whilst offering a wealth of accommodation. Tucked away within the popular village of Mosborough, do not miss your chance to view this simply stunning chocolate box cottage."
"***GUIDE PRICE £340,000-£350,000*** Located in this much sought after and well regarded area is this four bedroom detached dorma bungalow. The property has been modernised to a great finish and provides great access to Crystal Peaks and Supertam network."
"Guide Price £340,000 to £350,000. Stunning four bedroom detached family home with three reception rooms, breakfast kitchen and utility room. ideal for local amenities and transport links this home needs to be viewed to appreciate the standard of accommodation on offer"
"Providing spacious and generously sized family accommodation throughout is this immaculately maintained and presented four bedroom detached property benefitting from modern high gloss kitchen, utility room, downstairs WC, en-suite shower room and conservatory."
"The Property**3D VIRTUAL TOUR**OIRO £340,000** A superb opportunity to acquire a nicely proportioned, three bedroomed semi-detached house enviably located within this highly desirable residential suburb, well served by local amenities, including renowned local schooling, ease of access to the cit..."
A superbly presented & modern built three bedroom detached dormer bungalow set back from the road in the sought-after town of Killamarsh.
Occupying a generous corner plot is this four bedroom detached property which would be ideal for a growing family. Beautifully presented throughout the property offers bags of space. There is great access to all the local amenities Handsworth has to offer.
"This generously sized two bedroom townhouse is part of the Laycock House collection of characterful townhouses in the heart of Sheffield city centre. Perfectly located in a vibrant, regenerated neighbourhood, with an abundance of exciting new food, drink, retail and leisure options on your doorstep."
"A great opportunity has arisen to purchase this spacious four bedroom family home, ideally located for shops, schools and transport links. The spacious property benefits from modern décor throughout and a landscaped rear garden! Call us today to arrange your viewing!"
"GUIDE PRICE £335,000-£345,000
With direct access to the woodland and golf course to the rear is this well presented and proportioned, three bedroomed, bay windowed, detached family home. Stood in this larger than expected plot with fabulous rear private garden the property also enjoys s..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious throughout four/five bedroom detached property situated in a popular residential area. Offering master bedroom with ensuite, downstairs WC and utility room. Also having off road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden.Close to great local ameniti..."
"Guide Price £335,000 – £365,000 Located on a quiet road in Norton is this 2/3 bedroom semi-detached house, faithful to its period, offering good living space. The property is in need of modernisation but offers huge potential including a large outbuilding. Benefits from predo..."
"2Roost are pleased to offer for sale this 4 bedroom detached house in Beighton. The accommodation features hallway, dining room, kitchen, lounge, downstairs cloakroom, bedroom, bathroom, bedroom, bedroom, bathroom, bedroom, outside and garage, beautifully presented throughout , four bedroom detac..."
"CHARACTER, STYLE AND LOCATION! PEACEFUL HAMLET SETTING, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, LOVELY COURTYARD GARDEN, BEAUTIFUL THROUGHOUT! "
"MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION - GUIDE PRICE - £330,000 - Everything you need for a family home is here! With a cul-de-sac location and superb amenities on the door step this has family home written all over it."
"FOR SALE is this well presented FOUR bedroom detached property located in this popular residential estate in Handsworth, Sheffield."
"***GUIDE PRICE £330,000-£340,000*** ** EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ** FOUR WELL PROPORTIONED DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** EXTENDED TO REAR **DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS ** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** MODERN FITTED DINING KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES ** LOWER GROUND FLOO..."
"An attractive, bay windowed three bedroom semi detached family home for sale with a completed chain and situated on this quiet cul de sac in a very sought after area, in an excellent catchment area for schools and within walking distance of the beautiful open countryside of Derbyshire and the Pea..."
"Hunters Hillsborough present an opportunity to own a substantial three bedroom detached home with a garage and two conservatories, situated at the bottom of a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after Wadsley Park Village development. Entry via front door into the porch, the perfect space for coats an..."
"NEW TO MARKET! A superb opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi detached property, located within this sought after residential area. There is plenty of opportunity to further extend (subject to planning) and this accommodation is offered with NO CHAIN. Benefitting from two reception room..."
"A stylish 3 bedroom detached house situated on a popular road in Loxley, commanding stunning views across the valley. Modern interior with light and airy space over three floors"
"A unique opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented and spacious throughout four bedroom detached property. Offering separate dining room and downstairs WC. Also having private enclosed rear garden, off road parking and large garage. Tucked away on a quiet cul-de-sac and well positioned..."
"SEMI-DETACHED home with STUNNING VIEWS and EN SUITE main bedroom. 
This stunning semi-detached home is situated with VIEWS ACROSS THE RIVER and features an open-plan dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS to the garden. Downstairs is complete by a spacious lounge and plenty of STORAGE. 
Upstairs, you w..."
"Spacious SEMI-DETACHED home with STUNNING VIEWS and EN SUITE main bedroom. 
The Archford is an impressive three-bedroom home, ideal for first-time buyers, growing families and downsizers. The ground floor offers an OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. A separate livin..."
"Ideal for growing families, the Denby features a modern OPEN-PLAN LAYOUT with a dining kitchen, spacious lounge and FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN. The ground floor also benefits from a handy utility room and storage throughout. Upstairs, you will find 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS providing pl..."
"A most attractive three bedroomed detached house located in this pleasant cul-de-sac position in the south-westerly outskirts of Sheffield, within what is undoubtedly one of the city's most highly regarded and desirable suburbs. Gas central heating, double glazing, two reception rooms, modern fit..."
"A beautifully presented and recently upgraded, spacious three bedroom end terrace family home situated in the highly regarded area of Dore and in the catchment area for excellent schools. This fabulous home offers contemporary accommodation and is offered for sale with no onward chain. ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £325,000-£350,000*** ** DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** EXTENDED ** CORNER POSITION ** FOUR BEDROOMS ** DINING KITCHEN ** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ** WET ROOM ** DOUBLE FRONT DRIVEWAY ** REAR DRIVE & GARAGE ** GARDENS TO FRONT/SIDE & REAR ** FREEHOLD COUNCIL T..."
"Hunters of Woodseats are pleased to market this extended three/four bedroom bay windowed semi detached family home. The property which is tastefully decorated has accommodation over three levels briefly comprises; entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, bay windowed living room which opens ..."
"Looking for a home full of charm and ready to move in? Take a look at this Well Presented Home situated in the sought after residential area on the outskirts of Sheffield City Centre, on Meadow Head Drive. With an enclosed aspect to the rear. Situated to an excellent range of local amenities, fit..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000 A stunning, effectively extended, 3 bedroom semi-detached property elevated from the road, improved by current owners to create a stylish family home. Benefiting from a rear extension, fabulous newly installed kitchen, oak internal and composite exte..."
"** OPPORTUNITY TO INVEST ** For sale with tenants in situ until June 2024 and generating an annual income of £22,800 (inclusive of bills) is this substantial, five double bedroom (with occasional basement room), fully licensed HMO in the heart of popular Crookesmoor. The property benefits from uP..."
Staves are proud to present to the market this truly magnificent four-bedroom semi-detached family home. Having been significantly extended by the current vendor the property offers over 1500 square feet of living accommodation over three floors and is beautifully presented throughout. T...
"Offers in the region of £325,000. An exciting opportunity has arisen to purchase this spacious four bedroom family home, ideally located for shops, schools and transport links. Available with no onward chain this will make a great purchase for any growing family"
"Guide price £325,000 - £350,000 NEW TO MARKET! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this delightful four bedroom semi-detached property. Located within this sought after area of Bradway, this sizeable accommodation would make an ideal family home. This property is offered wi..."
"Offers In the Region of £325,000 Built in 2018, is an immaculately presented 4 bedroom, family home located in Halfway. Beautiful, light & airy accommodation presented over 3 floors, benefiting from solid oaks doors, new carpets, stylish interior, double glazing, combination gas central ..."
"In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home.  At 1353 square feet throughout, this spacious property is full of potential and perfect for growing fami..."
"*SUPERB BUY-TO-LET OPPORTUNITY!* Mr Investa are pleased to bring to the market this substantial 6-DOUBLE bedroom HMO property which has been consistently let every year. Confirmed income for the 2023/24 academic year is £34,320 which provides an investor with a yield of 10.5%."
A spacious mid terrace property that incorporates the space over the passage at the rear and so benefits from much better proportions than some of the neighbouring homes. This larger style arrangement allows for three double bedrooms and even an ensuite shower room on the second floor and with th...
"Invest from £45,950 in luxury Sheffield apartments located in a residential development in the prime S1 postcode. Call to view floor plans today. A523"
"The Property**3D VIRTUAL TOUR**OIRO £325,000**Offered for sale is this well appointed extended four bedroom detached family home with solar panels situated in the sought after area of Sothall. Ideally placed for a host of local amenities and schools. The property is beautifully presented througho..."
"*** Immaculately Presented Three Bedroom Detached Family Home *** Oughtibridge Village *** Quiet Cul-de-sac Location *** Potential To Extend *** 3D Matterport Tour *** LW0379 *** Situated in the highly sought after village of Oughtibridge, in an elevated position overlooking the v..."
"In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this exceptionally presented, generously proportioned four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking to be close to Sheffield City Centre. At 1153 square feet throughout, this spacious pro..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £340,000 A stylish, well-proportioned 4 bedroom family home, improved by recent owners. The beautifully presented property benefits from modern kitchen and bathrooms, 2 reception rooms, driveway leading to detached garage and south facing enclosed rear garden..."
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME SET OVER THREE FLOORS** This fantastic family home has many outstanding features and is ready to walk into with no work required. Located on this popular residential road in the heart of Oughtibridge, with just a short walk to the primary school..."
A stunning semi detached property situated in the Foxhill area and featuring a wealth of accommodation steadily altered through the years to create a supreme family home
"***NO CHAIN*** Only by viewing can you truly appreciate this beautifully presented and maintained four bedroom detached property residing on a cul-de-sac location within Owlthorpe benefitting from modern breakfast kitchen, lounge, dining room, conservatory and double detached garage with electr..."
"This deceptively well proportioned three double bedroomed detached dormer bungalow is enviably located on this highly sought after road away from the main thoroughfare yet within easy reach of a comprehensive range of local amenities. Set well back from the road on a very good size plot,..."
"A well maintained, neutrally decorated four bedroom town house ideally located a short distance from the city centre."
"GUIDE PRICE £325,000-£350,000
Quietly tucked away on this no through road in the very heart of ultra popular Carter Knowle is this beautifully finished, immaculately presented, three bedroomed, bay windowed semi detached family home. Having recently undergone a scheme of modernisation b..."
Are you looking for a family home in S10? Great sized accommodation and garden space to match
"NO CHAIN!! Call our sales team to arrange your viewing on this ready to move into four double bedroom detached property situated at the top of a popular estate. Offering Master bedroom with ensuite, downstairs WC and formal dining. Also having off road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden. Lo..."
"A superbly presented four bedroom semi-detached house, situated on an exclusive development in the popular suburb of Woodseats."
"Hunters Woodseats are please to present to market this late 1940's three bedroom detached house with double detached garage. The property, which has granted planning for a fantastic side extension briefly comprises; entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, a front bay windowed living room, r..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000 A suburb opportunity to purchase this delightful, beautifully presented three bedroom-gated semi-detached home. This generous plot has plenty of space outside to the front and rear with ample parking and a garage/workshop offering further opp..."
"VIEWING NOW VIA AGENT of this High End New Build Dormer Bungalow, packed with a host of features including - Air Source Heat Pump, Integrated Kitchen Appliances, EV Charging Point, Ramped Access and Lanscaped Garden in a great location, look no further. Anticipated Completion end February 2023."
"We are pleased to market this great two bedroomed mews cottage located in heart of the desirable suburb of Ranmoor, S10. The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating and an ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. The accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises, large lounge area and a ..."
"Located close to the heart of Killamarsh Village, This superb four bedroom detached family home, Close to all local amenities, Great transport links and a stones through away from the Rother Valley Country Park, An outstanding property an early viewing will be essential, Excellent inside and out."
"DEAL WORTH OVER £18,000. A bright and spacious home with a private driveway and adaptable living space.
Your OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS to the garden is ideal for enjoying time with friends and family. A cosy lounge completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs, you'll find your EN SUITE ..."
"DEAL OVER £18,000. A spacious home, ideal for first-time buyers and growing families, SURROUNDED BY WOODLAND.
The ground floor offers an open-plan dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden. A spacious living room and a handy downstairs cloakroom complete the ground floor. On the firs..."
"Modern, 3 storey OPEN-PLAN 4 bed home including DESIGNER kitchen, contemporary tiling and much more.."
"1 JACOBS GATE A beautifully presented new two bedroom, two bathroom residential retirement apartment set in this new retirement community of 65 apartments. Apartment 1 is a spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment, with an en-suite to the master bedroom. Designed to help you make ..."
"Hunters of Hunters Bar are excited to bring to market this fabulous recently refurbished three double bedroom Victorian terrace family home. This beautifully presented property enjoys three incredibly spacious floors of accommodation that total 1,367 sq ft and with the advantage of a double he..."
"GUIDE PRICE £320,000-£335,000
A stunning three bedroomed bay windowed extended semi detached family home. Located in one of the city´s most sought after residential suburbs within catchment for top performing schools together with being in easy access of both Chelsea and Millhouses..."
"GUIDE PRICE £320,000 - £330,000 A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this magnificent four bedroomed detached family home, boasting a generous rear garden, driveway and GARAGE."
This property is really something special - a family home in a very desirable area with an opportunity to make your own and no chain to delay you! This stunning three bedroom stone fronted detached home is located within the heart of the popular village of Grenoside. It is situated onl...
"An attractive two double bedroom extended detached bungalow with delightful sunny rear garden area and integral garage, situated on this popular cul de sac in this extremely sought after residential suburb. Offered for sale with no chain. The property briefly comprises: entrance..."
Extended Semi Detached 4/5 Bedroom Family Home In Handsworth With No Vendor Chain. This superb family home has been extended to both the side and rear creating spacious accommodation over two floors. The property was fully renovated in 2017. The ground floor comprises of. en...
An internal inspection is highly recommended to truly appreciate this spacious four/five double bedroom detached family home which is a credit to the current owners and is finished to a high standard throughout. Situated in this popular village close to all amenities and within easy access of the...
"Hunters of Hunters Bar are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom, bay windowed semi detached house located in the popular and sought after area of Nether Edge. The property which has a unique feel throughout briefly comprises; entrance lobby with stairs to the first floor which has a J..."
"This stunning three bedroom detached house is situated on a corner plot on a quiet road within the popular suburb of Norton Lees. Beautifully presented throughout, the property has been greatly improved by the current owners who have transformed the house into a fabulous, contemporary modern home..."
** NO CHAIN ** Only by viewing can you truly appreciate the size and standard of accommodation on offer for this superb individually designed and built three double bedroom detached dormer bungalow recently constructed and benefiting from stunning open plan living/dining/kitchen space with vaul...
"*** FULLY BESPOKE YOUR NEW HOME AT VALLEY VIEW *** Plot 2 Valley View is a striking 4-bedroom semi-detached home, arranged over three floors with a family-friendly layout, spacious Principal bedroom and single garage. Occupying an enviable position with far reaching views across Rother Valley."
"Spacious three bedroom mid-terrace home in the heart of Greystones with private rear garden. Located on Tullibardine Road the new owners will be close to Endcliffe Park, Ecclesall Road, Sharrow Vale and also within walking distance of the city centre."
"Superb opportunity, this beautifully presented two bedroom detached barn conversion having been converted in 2005 and fully renovated in 2019. Occupying an enviable courtyard setting with some original features. Located in a popular residential area of Treeton, Rotherham. EPC TBC"
"Guide Price £315,000 to £325,000 Offering spacious family accommodation over four floors with further potential to change to allow more bedrooms is this attractive three double bedroomed mid terraced property. Located within a popular residential area and within ..."
"An effectively extended, Four bedroom detached family home, situated in a quiet cul-de-sac position, the current vendors have extended to the downstairs to make another bedroom, which opens out into the garden, complete with an en-suite shower room"
"** GUIDE PRICE £315,000 - £330,000 ** A magnificent five bedroomed detached residence, commanding spectacular views over local countryside, extensive rear garden, driveway and garage. No chain."
"Guide price £315,000 - £325,000 An attractive, imposing, larger style four double bedroom Villa terrace with views towards Ecclesall Road and Fulwood. This well maintained property has been continuously let by the current owners since 2012 and generates approximately £21,300 per year. ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £315,000 - £325,000 ** Only by viewing can you appreciate the size and space of this substantially extended four bedroom detached property offering flexible and spacious accommodation and benefitting from two bathrooms, downstairs WC, three reception rooms, study, utility and downs..."
"A contemporary styled four bedroom, three storey town house ideally positioned a short distance from the city centre."
Occupying an envious elevated position within the quiet residential area of Hackenthorpe is this superbly presented four bedroom detached house.
"GUIDE PRICE 3315,000-£330,000
Quietly tucked away on this little known back water in the very heart of Bannerdale is this tastefully presented and very deceptive three bedroomed semi detached family home. Having a rear ground floor extension, larger than average, southerly facing, garden, of..."
"** FREEHOLD ** NO CHAIN ** BUILD COMPLETION JANUARY 2023 ** A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire a BRAND NEW three bedroom semi-detached home in the very heart of Stannington Village, within walking distance of a wealth of amenities, Stannington Park and café, as well as open countryside in t..."
"** EARLY VIEWING ADVISED! ** Situated on this sought after residential development at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac is this well presented, three bedroom, link-detached home ideal for a family benefitting from well regarded local schools and vast open countryside on the doorstep. The property en..."
"Tucked away in leafy Wadsley, a 4-bed home brimming with potential: Wadsley Lane.
Featuring generous living space and a bright attic room, this property is not to be missed.
"
"Fully let for the forth coming academic year 2022/2023 is this spacious three bedroomed student let property. With an additional one bedroomed ground floor recently refurbished apartment. Returning an annual income of £16,960 per Annam. Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield's most soug..."
"Situated on this quiet cul de sac within this most sought after area stands this delightful 2 bedroom detached bungalow which is available with no upward chain and is worthy of a detailed internal inspection. Features include gas central heating fired via a combination boiler, UPVC doubl..."
Three-storey living as it should be. FLEXIBLE living spaces with BI-FOLD doors and a DESIGNER kitchen. MAIN BEDROOM features an ENSUITE shower room.
Occupying a generous plot is this beautifully presented three bedroom detached property located on this sought after estate of Halfway. This property would make the ideal home for you and you family and is in move in condition. Viewings recommended!
"Space and style ... this fabulous four bed home is ready to move in to and enjoy the fantastic standard of living on offer inside and out. Boasting a large utility room and conservatory, and in this quiet cul de sac , it has all you could ask for"
"FIRST PLOTS RELEASED AT VALLEY VIEW! A home you'll love in the perfect location. Four bedroom, two bathroom semi detached home with off road parking. A development of twenty two quality new build homes, located in the Hackenthorpe suburb of Sheffield built by Walshaw ..."
"NEW PLOTS RELEASED AT VALLEY VIEW! A home you'll love in the perfect location. Four bedroom, two bathroom semi detached home with off road parking. A development of twenty two quality new build homes, located in the Hackenthorpe suburb of Sheffield built by Walshaw Ho..."
The development consists of 10 luxury 4-bed houses with high spec from as little as £310K to £312K. The development is located in a suburban residential area on the edge of city centre and only 7.2 miles to Sheffield city centre (typically between 18-28 minutes drive). Whilst there’s tra...
" Purple Bricks are delighted to market this fantastic three bedroom detached house located in the sought after area of Chapeltown and offered to the market with no onwards chain. Comprising of a brief entrance hall leading to an open plan through lounge diner, a fully equipped modern kitchen, a ..."
"*** FULLY BESPOKE YOUR NEW HOME AT VALLEY VIEW *** Plot 3 Valley View is a striking 4-bedroom semi-detached home, arranged over three floors with a family-friendly layout and spacious Principal bedroom. The properties occupy an enviable position having far reaching views across Rother Valley."
This well presented four bedroom detached house is generously sized internally and externally and offers a fantastic opportunity to own a spacious family home. 
"We are pleased to present this four-bedroom, detached property located in Aughton. The property consists of – Lounge, Kitchen, Diner, Four bedrooms (one en suite) and a Bathroom. This property offers well-presented and modern family accommodation. Close to local amenities includ..."
An early viewing is essential to take advantage of this extended three bedroomed semi-detached home located on a cul-de-sac in the heart of sought after Oughtibridge Village
Occupying a generous plot is this beautifully presented and effectively extended four bedroom detached property which would make the perfect home for a growing family. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout and has a beautiful gardens and great access to Motorway Links.
"A spacious five bedroomed student let property. Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield´s most sought after residential student suburbs, close to campus, Endcliffe park, nightlife and the city centre, the property is available as a going concern and has all relevant HMO paperwork in place..."
"Nexus Point, Owlthorpe 4 bedroom terraced houses for sale in the Nexus Point development on a shared ownership basis. Shares available from 10% - 75%. Reserve your new home today."
"Guide Price £300,000 - £310,000 A delightful three bedroom terraced family home offering an excellent opportunity for young first time buyers and situated in this highly regarded area close to all local amenities. Sold with no chain is this lovely property offering well presented accommo..."
"Offers in the Region of £300,000 A well-proportioned, 2-bedroom, stone built bungalow backing onto Beauchief Golf Course. The property benefits from period features, double glazing, combination gas central heating, beautiful established rear garden, and off-street parking, leading to a g..."
"Enjoying a superb position in S17, close to Dore Train Station for commuters to access both Sheffield and Manchester and also only a short walk away from excellent sports facilities at Abbeydale Sports Club and the golf clubs found up the road. Forming part of this desirable, modern development a..."
"Lot no 217Sell via Auction MethodBidding Starting Price: £280,000For Legal Pack and other information, you would need to register on our website just-sold dot co dot UKOffers accepted prior to AuctionPlease note that the legal pack is in Process. Location: 117 Penrhyn Road, Sheffield, Sout..."
"More space than most ... Guide Price £300,000-£325,000 ... this lovely extended detached home in the village location of Grenoside is the perfect family home. Boasting lots of living space, and three good size bedrooms, the potential is endless"
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £320,000** A unique opportunity to purchase this large modern throughout four bedroom detached family home! Offering master bedroom with ensuite, downstairs WC and large L shaped kitchen/diner. Also having ample off road parking, garage and good sized lawn. Close to grea..."
"Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 A beautifully presented 4 double bedroom, detached family home located at the end of a quiet cul de sac in Waterthorpe, S20. Benefits from fabulous modern kitchen and bathrooms, solid wooden flooring, stylish interior, enclosed landscaped rear garden..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase the deceptively spacious family home. Immaculately presented and well maintained accommodation is situated over three floors and is spacious throughout. Four bedrooms, three ensuite shower rooms alongside a neutral family bathroom. This property lends itself to..."
"** ATTENTION INVESTORS ** An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this fully licensed five bedroom HMO in the heart of bustling Broomhill with an annual rental income of £21,600 (bills included) with tenants in situ until June 2024. The property is generally well kept with the benefit of ..."
"Perfect for your family ... Guide Price £300,000-£325,000 ... if your looking for a detached family home with lots of space, then this one is for you. With four bedrooms and spacious living area's, it could be the forever home for you"
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£315,000
A much larger than average four double bedroomed, Victorian bay windowed terraced property. With the huge added bonus of a rear off road parking space accessed from Jarrow Road, this property is currently used as a successful buy to let investment but could..."
"*Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000* In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home. At 1160 square feet throughout, this spacious property is ful..."
"Fully let for the forth coming academic year 2022/2023 is this spacious four bedroomed student let property. Returning an annual income of £18,096 per Annam. Located in unquestionably one of Sheffield's most sought after residential student suburbs, close to campus, Endcliffe park, nightlife..."
A beautifully presented 3 bed house in the sought after location of Oughtibridge. Haggstones Road benefits from the flawless balance of Rural and City Living. The perfect home for a family and commuters. 
"NEW TO MARKET!! A rare opportunity to purchase this fantastic three bedroom semi detached property, offering a sizable enclosed rear garden benefitting from solar panels. This spacious plot offers plenty of opportunity for further extension works (subject to correct planning permission) Located w..."
Call to receive a FREE info pack on these Sheffield investment flats in S1 Sheffield city centre. Free furniture pack offered for a limited time only. A262
"*** CUL DE SAC LOCATION ***
This spacious family home has bright spacious accommodation throughout. It benefits from a quiet yet convenient location and a delightful rear garden. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, W.c., lounge, dining room, kitchen and utility room. There is a firs..."
"This superb property has access to Meersbrook park at the end of the road and is well placed for all local amenities including easy access into Sheffield City centre, the Sheffield Parkway, retail park on Chesterfield Road and nearby Woodseats centre. This beautifully presented four bed..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000
Returning an annual income of £22,500 per Annam excluding utility bills and equating to a healthy 7% per Annam yield is this superb five bedroomed end of terraced investment property. With a full HMO license in place combined with being fully let for ..."
"The Property**3D VIRTUAL TOUR**OIRO £300,000**NO FORWARD CHAIN** A fabulous well proportioned stone fronted three bedroom semi detached family house in need of updating, located within this extremely popular residential area. Situated directly opposite to picturesque Graves Park having a nine hol..."
"Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 Having an enviable corner location with beautiful views of Waverley Lakes & Park is a 3 bedroom, detached family house. This light and airy accommodation benefits from a 10 year New Build guarantee with 3 years remaining, solar panels, gas central he..."
Three bedroom property in a sought after location. This property is one not to miss if you are wanting to put your own touch on things and looking for future investment. This property has had full planning permission through to convert to three double bedrooms with ensuits and also plannin...
"Ref: AL0535 ***IDEAL FAMILY HOME, CORNER PLOT, STUNNING VIEWS, POTENTIAL FOR EXTENDING. ***  *** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £320,000 *** We are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroomed detached house which briefly comprises: lounge..."
"Guide Price at £300,000 to £325,000. An extended 2 bedroom (previously 3 bedroom) detached dormer house commanding an enviable position with a south-west facing garden, on a highly sought-after cul-de-sac. Generous sized accommodation on two floors with a ground floor rear extensio..."
"***Guide Price: £300,000 - £325,000*** Virtual Tour SK Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market for sale this extended 3 bedroomed semi-detached family home, located in the highly desirable neighbourhood of Norton. Just a short distance from Graves Park, St James retail par..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 Located on this much sought after development is this four bedroom detached property which would make the perfect family home. With bags of space throughout the property provides great access to local amenities and public transport links. Call to day to avoid disappointment."
"** THREE BED DETACHED BUNGALOW ** NO CHAIN ** PRIVATE ROAD ** SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION *** £300,000 - £325,000 Blundells are delighted to bring to market this unique three bedroom detached bungalow with off street parking and garage tucked away off Thompson Hill."
"GUIDE PRICE; £300,000 - £325,000. A charming 3 Bed detached Bungalow, with impressive rear garden space. Cliffefield Road is an ideal spot for a little bit of peace away from the hustle and bustle of the city. "
"£300,000 - £325,000 (Guide Price) A superbly presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom mid terrace house, situated in the sought-after suburb of Sharrow Vale."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£315,000
A substantial and very deceptive, four double bedroomed, two bath/shower roomed, Victorian villa terrace. With the huge benefit of a garage to the lower ground floor that is a real rarity in these areas, number 41 also has a double rear off shot and accommo..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000
An absolutely stunning, immaculately presented and very well proportioned three double bedroomed, stone fronted, period terraced property. Enjoying a double rear off shot that maximises the feeling space across all three floors together with two bathrooms, ..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain is this fantastic, extended to the ground floor three bedroom semi detached property. Refurbished throughout to a high standard and extended to the rear ground floor providing a large, airy feel, open plan multi function rooms with a newly fitted kitchen, hav..."
CHAIN FREE!! An internal inspection is highly recommended of this spacious two double bedroomed detached bungalow situated on a generous plot with great potential to extend (subject to necessary permissions). Ample off road parking and a detached garage. Elevated views over Rother Valley to the r...
"GUIDE PRICE £285,000-£295,000
An incredibly deceptive, six double bedroomed, two bathroomed, split level, duplex apartment. Having previously been used as a successful student buy to let property that but could also be used as an air B and B to create a more lucrative return. When fully..."
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this three bedroomed Victorian terraced property which has the benefit of the passageway to the first and second floor. Located on this highly sought after road within a short walk of both Endcliffe and Bingham Parks. No 90 requires a full scheme of modern...
NO ONWARD CHAIN! EPC RATING B! STAMP DUTY INCENTIVES AVAILABLE. Beautiful new build semi-detached home with off-street parking and private rear garden on a quiet cul-de-sac in Greenhill Village. Internally the property has been finished to a high standard and is eco-friendly as it has an air sour...
"An outstanding, fully refurbished & extended three/four bedroom detached house, situated in the sought-after suburb of Aughton."
"**NO CHAIN - GREAT POTENTIAL** Perfectly situated in the sought after location of Chapeltown, minutes away from the M1, within walking distance of the local train station, with great public transport links into both Sheffield and Rotherham. The property is located next to excellent amenities, a n..."
"GUIDE PRICE £295,000-£310,000
Located in the very heart of this ultra popular residential suburb of Ecclesall is this beautifully presented and very deceptive three double bedroomed, period Victorian terraced property. Perfect for the professional couple, young family and first time buy..."
"This stunning and deceptively spacious, four double bedroom mid terraced family home has been expertly renovated to an extremely high standard. Located in the popular area of Woodseats which benefits from a superb array of local amenities, the property benefits from a new roof, new electrics, new..."
"** NO CHAIN ** OFF ROAD PARKING ** Fully renovated to a high standard is this much larger than average, three bedroom, two bathroom end of terrace in the heart of Crookes with the benefit of off road parking for three vehicles. The property is tastefully decorated with quality fittings throughout..."
"NEW TO MARKET! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three-bedroom semi-detached property. Offered with NO CHAIN is this well-proportioned accommodation. Benefitting of three bedrooms, an open plan living/dining room, driveway, garage and enclosed well-maintained rear garden. This property wi..."
"Situated within this popular area of Stannington and within walking distance to good reputable schools, parks and local shops is this recently refurbished and upgraded three bedroomed detached property. Having undergone a complete overhaul to include an attractive open plan style livin..."
"Guide Price: £295,000 The property comprises a 6 bedroom inner terrace HMO let as student accommodation for the academic year 2022-2023. The accommodation includes a lounge/diner, a separate kitchen/breakfast room and two shower rooms. The property will interest residential investors."
"** EARLY VIEWING ADVISED ** FREEHOLD ** PANORAMIC CITY VIEWS ** A rare and most exciting opportunity has arisen to acquire this much larger than average four bedroom end of terrace with music room and further living space to the basement level, located in the heart of Walkley and boasting over 14..."
"GUIDE PRICE - £295,000 - £310,000. AN INDIVIDUAL TRADITIONAL DETACHED FAMILY WHICH NEEDS TO BE VIEWED TO BE FULLY APPRECIATED!"
"Sky-House is an innovative urban development of next-generation townhouses, featuring open-plan living, beautiful roof gardens and expansive glazing."
"* VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED * A superb example of a beautiful three-bedroom detached family home Offering spacious accommodation with three spacious bedrooms, garage and garden to the rear The current decor creates a chic, homely feel upon entering the property and throughout...."
"GUIDE PRICE £290,000 TO £300,000 ***2 BALCONIES WITH VIEWS TOWARDS BINGHAM PARK*** ***GARAGE*** ***FANTASTIC LOCATION*** ***CLOSE TO AMENITIES*** ***DUPLEX APARTMENT OVER 2 FLOORS*** ***POTENTIAL TO BE TURNED BACK INTO A 3 BEDROOM*** ***BRIGHT ..."
"£290,000 to £300,000 (Guide Price) A superbly presented and well-proportioned four bedroom detached family home, occupying an enviable position on a quiet cul-de-sac, overlooking the park and situated in the popular suburb of Halfway."
"** GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000 ** 2roost is delighted to present to you this spacious, extended and beautifully presented 3-bedroom semi-detached property located in the highly sought-after residential area of Gleadless. Boasting a guide price of £290,000 - £300,000, this stunning property..."
"** SOUTH FACING GARDEN ** NO CHAIN ** FREEHOLD ** Located in the sought after village of Worrall and situated near the end of this quiet cul-de-sac position on a good size plot is this four bedroom, three bathroom detached dormer bungalow which benefits from off-road parking and a garage. This ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £290,000-£300,000
Quietly tucked away on this no through road is this tastefully presented and very deceptive three bedroomed, bay windowed, semi detached family home. Having been tastefully extended to the and further potential to convert the loft (subject to planning). Wit..."
"An IMPRESSIVE newly renovated FOUR bedroom detached home, situated in the sough after village of High Green, Sheffield. "
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000-£300,000*** Superb throughout is this extended three bedroom detached property residing on a cul-de-sac location benefitting from beautiful lounge, extended kitchen/diner, downstairs WC, utility room, landscaped rear garden, and garage. "
"ASKING PRICE £290,000. STEP INSIDE THIS STYLISH 3 BED DETACHED PROPERTY, HAVING BEEN FULLY UPGRADED THROUGHOUT YOU CAN SIT BACK , RELAX AND MAKE YOURSELF AT HOME! This beautifully presented property is located in the popular commuter town of Chapeltown, walking distance to the local train station..."
"This three-bedroom end-terraced house balances plenty of living space with a lovely secure garden. Close to great daycare, nurseries, and primary and secondary schools, there are excellent bus links direct to the centre of town – the location is perfect for families with young chi..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this ready to move into three double bedroom detached bungalow situated in a great location in a popular residential area. Offering master bedroom with ensuite and oak doors throughout. Also having private rear garden, garage and off road parking. Within walkin..."
"*Guide Price - £290,000-£300,000* In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home. This well-presented family home has plenty of space and bags of po..."
Offered with No Chain & Immediate Possession!! Unique opportunity to acquire this deceptively spacious extended TWO/THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW which stands in a substantial plot with South Facing rear landscaped gardens. Situated within the conservation area of Eckington with easy a...
"Don't lift a finger ... Guide Price £290,000-£300,000 ... recently renovated this lovely home on one of the most popular roads around is ready and waiting for you to move in to and enjoy"
"Phase II Oughtibridge Mill - The next-generation 3-bedroom townhouse (House Type 01) offers a high specification as standard, including contemporary kitchen, open plan living space and a private rooftop garden. Bespoke local housebuilder Sky-House Co have just released the next phase of homes at ..."
"£285,000 - £300,000 (Guide Price) An immaculately presented and well-maintained three bedroom semi-detached house, situated on the sought-after Waverley development."
"Spacious two double bedroom first-floor apartment in the highly regarded Storth Park development, Fulwood. Great for a first-time buyer or someone looking to downsize the property has a spacious living/dining room with a balcony and there are beautiful countryside views from the kitchen."
"Offered to the open market with no onward chain is this stunning two bedroom, two bathroom first floor apartment which forms part of an impressive building that dates back to 1879 and was formerly used as a school. Beautifully presented throughout the property enjoys extremely high ceilings, gene..."
"GUIDE PRICE £285,000-£295,000
Quietly tucked away on this prestigious residential road and located opposite Ranmoor church, in the very heart of this ultra-popular suburb, is this tastefully presented and very well proportioned three bedroomed, bay windowed, Victorian terraced property...."
This well presented two bedroom bungalow with a stunning rear garden is now on the market in Swallownest.
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this one double bedroom bungalow in the heart of Gleadless has been adapted for accessible living. Originally a three bedroomed property it has been refurbished throughout and upgraded to include a ceiling mounted hoist and an en-suite wet room. The large ...
*SUPERB 4 BEDROOM ACCOMODATION * ALL BEDROOMS ARE ENSUITE * SHARED LIVING & KITCHEN SPACE * COMMUNAL GARDENS & OUTDOOR SPACE * TWO LARGE BALCONIES * * INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY * COUNCIL TAX BAND B* EPC B 
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 to £325,000. A superb and beautifully presented property offering generously proportioned accommodation over three floors. Part of the appeal of this lovely property is the fact that it benefits from the space at the rear of the property, that is located over the side passage..."
"This exceptional 3 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE with FULL-HEIGHT tiling. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE - £280,000 - £290,000 *** Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to offer this stunning four/five bedroom semi-detached house. This property has been significantly extended and upgraded and offers over 1237 sq.ft of accommodation across three levels. It is located in the sought ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £290,000** GENEROUS PLOT!! Situated at the head of a private drive in a quiet cul-de-sac is this detached property. Ample off road parking and garage. Low maintenance rear garden. Lounge with log burner! Within walking distance of the Trans Pennine Trail and Rother Valle..."
"Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000 Walk to the Shops & Cafe's Perfect for couples & families. A lovely home in Hunters Bar, located close to Hunter's Bar Primary School, Endcliffe Park, and the array of shops, cafe's and restaurants on bustling Ecclesal Road"
"Stunning four bedroom semi-detached family home. Fully refurbished, ready to move into and a must-see. Off-street parking, double length garage, carport, landscaped garden and an outside family entertaining room. Modern contemporary living at its best, with bespoke fixtures and fittings. A must-see."
In this family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home.  This spacious property is full of potential and perfect for growing families or anyone looking for a little m...
"A unique opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom detached property. Positioned on a quiet road and having stylish kitchen and bathroom, ample off road parking and larger than average garage. The property is close to good road links to the City Ce..."
"** VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY ** If you are looking for a lovely, spacious family home in a very popular location then here it is! With spacious lounge, kitchen/diner, utility room, WC and ground floor bedroom plus three further bedrooms upstairs and a stylish shower roo..."
"A fabulous two bedroom, second-floor apartment situated in the highly sought-after suburb of Eccelsall."
"£290,000 - STUNNING!!! Words simply do not describe the standard of the property on offer. Boasting an en-suite, four good sized bedrooms, a driveway & a delightful rear garden. - CALL NOW!"
"An absolutely gorgeous, two double bedroomed, bay windowed, semi detached home. Located in the very heart of ultra popular Frecheville this smartly finished property will appeal hugely to the professional couple, first time buyer or young family alike. With vast potential to further extend to the..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this stylish, well proportioned first floor apartment in this fine Victorian residence. The property on offer is located in the heart of The Broomhill Conservation Area on the edge of the city centre and close to excellent amenities. The property ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £280,000-290,000 **Beautifully presented throughout is this spacious three double bedroom detached property residing on this sought after development and benefiting from modern breakfast kitchen, two reception rooms, downstairs WC, en-suite shower room, family bathroom and converte..."
"Guide Price £280,000 to £295,000 Set on the edge of the Peak District National Park, this stunning apartment occupies the upper floor of a former historic gated hunting lodge. Wide open views and magnificent local walks make this one of the most desirable locations. Superbly posit..."
"Purple Bricks are delighted to market this three bedroom semi detached property, ideally nestled in the sought after Lodge Moor, S10, and offered to the market with no onwards chain.
The ground floor comprises of an entrance porch and hallway with storage leading to a kitchen/diner, and a spaciou..."
Offered for sale is this three bedroom Semi detached in Stannington. Perfect for those looking to get a foot on the property ladder this home has been well cared for and offers spacious accommodation with a secure rear garden
"*** GUIDE PRICE - £280,000 - £290,000 *** Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this three bedroom semi-detached house which has been recently renovated including UPVC double glazed windows and is located in the sought after of Charnock which has great transport links and local ameni..."
"This stunning three bedroom detached property with its own garage and well appointed accommodation set across two floors is now on the market in Sothall, Sheffield."
"A totally stunning terrace home within walking distance to local supermarkets, shops and parks. Great school catchment and larger than average living accommodation. This property also has the added bonus of RARE off street parking!"
"Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000 A very well presented two bedroom first floor apartment with a double garage and situated in this extremely popular development close to all local amenities. This fabulous apartment offers light and spacious accommodation and has been upgraded by the current ve..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this well presented and spacious four bedroomed end town house situated in a popular residential area and offering accommodation over three levels. Having master bedroom with ensuite, downstairs WC and open plan kitchen/diner. Also having enclosed rear garden, ..."
This outstanding contemporary styled three bedroom detached house is situated within a quiet cul-de-sac location in the sought-after suburb of Waterthorpe.
"Ideally located for the M1 transport links, Chapeltown train station, good school catchments and local amenities this property is not to be missed. With four bedrooms, a driveway providing off street parking, a utility room and a conservatory, a viewing is highly advised to appreciate the accommo..."
"Superb throughout is this four bedroom detached property having been much improved by the current vendors benefiting from en-suite shower room, downstairs WC, utility room, stunning kitchen/diner with integrated appliances. The garage has been successfully converted to create the fourth bedroom."
"** NO CHAIN ** Beautifully maintained and presented throughout is this extended three bedroom detached property benefiting from two bath/shower rooms, spacious kitchen/diner, conservatory and garage. "
"***GUIDE PRICE £275,000-£285,000*** **DETACHED FAMILY HOME **FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS **SPACIOUS LOUNGE **FITTED DINING KITCHEN **GARDENS TO FRONT & REAR **BLOCK PAVED DRIVEWAY **GARDENS TO FRONT & REAR ** GOOD SIZED PLOT **CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION** A superb Four bedro..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 - £300,000 The property comprises a 6 bedroom inner terrace HMO let as student accommodation for the academic year 2022-2023. The accommodation includes a lounge/diner, a separate kitchen/breakfast room and two shower rooms. The property will interest residential ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £275,000-£285,000*** **DETACHED HOME **THREE BEDROOMS **ATTRACTIVELY PRESENTED ** CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN **MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM **ENCLOSED GARDEN TO REAR **GARAGE & DRIVEWAY **FAMILY HOME **POPULAR LOCATION** FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C Env..."
"* VIEWING RECOMMENDED * A superb example of a beautiful four bedroom Town house  Offering spacious accommodation with four spacious bedrooms and garden to rear. The current decor creates a chic, homely feel upon entering the property and throughout. Arran..."
"Message to get your slot on the viewing day Saturday 5TH November, 12:30 PM - 1: 30 PM  Situated in a popular area on the outskirts of Sheffield comes this spacious four-bed detached property that would be perfect for growing families. The property comprises an entrance hallw..."
"** SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ** FREEHOLD ** Offered for sale is this much larger than average, four bedroom, semi detached Villa, featuring fabulous original features and an open-plan kitchen diner. The property enjoys fully enclosed gardens to the rear and benefits from sash windows and gas cent..."
"Guide Price £275,000-£300,000. This is a rare and exciting opportunity to make this characteristic property your home! Situated on a courtyard in the popular location of Beighton, the beautiful semi-detached house benefits from spacious accommodation and garage. Viewing is a must, call us today!"
FOR SALE is this fantastic THREE to FOUR bed End of Terrace property located on Brookfield Road in the ever so popular S7 area of Sheffield which is right in the heart of the antiques quarter.
"GUIDE PRICE £275,000-£285,000 An immaculately presented, two bedroom detached bungalow located in this quiet tree lined avenue in the sought after area of Stannington. The property has been loved by the current owners and is upgraded throughout to a high standard, benefitting from a detached gara..."
An outstanding three-bedroom semi-detached house situated within a quiet cul-de-sac position in the highly sought-after suburb of Grenoside.
"Guide Price £145,000 - £160,000 Ideally located close to the universities and hospitals is a 2 bedroom, second floor apartment, recently refurbished. The property benefits from combination gas central heating, double glazing and off street parking, ,with fabulous far reaching views..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 A traditional 3 bedroom semi detached house in this sought after location close to High Storrs school. The property requires considerable refurbishment, including complete new timbers to the ground floor but benefits from a large conservatory to the rear and Upvc ..."
"FIRST TIME BUYERS YOU'LL NEVER LOOK BACK...WITH THIS LITTLE BEAUTY ON A QUIET CUL-DE-SAC...! Uflit are highly delighted to welcome to the market this FABULOUS three bed semi detached property, beautifully appointed throughout,."
"*** KELHAM ISLAND ***
Offered for sale with no onward chain, this stunning two bedroom, two bathroom Duplex apartment has a fabulous roof terrace overlooking the river. Both bedrooms are en-suite and there is a gorgeous open plan living room/kitchen also with views over the river.
***MUST BE VIE..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £275,000-£285,000*** **TOWN HOUSE **THREE STOREY **THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS **EN SUITE TO PRINCIPLE BEDROOM **FINISHED TO A HIGH SPECIFICATION **RECENTLY REPLACED MODERN FITTED KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES AND UNDER FLOOR HEATING **CONTEMPORARY FAMILY BATHROOM *..."
This attractive 3 bedroom terraced home is nestled in a highly sought-after area and is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive and beautifully proportioned home o...
"Invest from £45,950 in luxury Sheffield apartments located in a residential development in the prime S1 postcode. Call to view floor plans today. A261"
"**NO CHAIN** New to the market is this deceptively spacious three bedroom detached family home. Benefiting from an exceptionally large integral garage, occupying the full footprint at ground level. Whilst in need of some modernisation this sound property has large rooms throughout and scope to cr..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 A substantial five bedroom HMO producing £2,304 pcm ( £27,648pa including services) The property is located in this prime letting area close to the centre of Hunters Bar and within walking distance of a comprehensive range of shops, cafes and restaurants."
"Hunters are delighted to offer with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this three bedroom luxury apartment situated in the heart of West Street having access to an abundance of great amenities in the City Centre including shops, bars, eateries and public transport links including the Supertram network. The apartme..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 - £300,000 A well presented 5 bedroom student house occupying a level position in the heart of this popular letting area. The property is currently let at £23,465pa and then re let for the 2023/24 academic year at £23,848pa. FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION 4th April ..."
"It's all done for you ... this lovely two bedroom detached bungalow is in the perfect spot, recently renovated throughout, you can move in and not have to lift a finger"
This well-presented three-bedroom detached bungalow is positioned within a quiet residential area in the sought-after suburb of Hackenthorpe.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious three double bedroom property, located within this sought after area of Meersbrook. This sizeable accommodation occupies a corner plot position and benefits from NO CHAIN. Ideal for modern day living with an open plan kitchen/dining ro..."
"NO CHAIN!! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this this spacious throughout three bedroom detached bungalow boasting masses of potenital and situated in a superb location, at the end of a quiet cul-de-sac. Having off road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden. Close to fantastic road links to..."
"Guide Price: £275,000 An attractive stone built semi detached located in the heart of Nether Edge. The property has been used as an HMO but is now vacant and offers potential for ongoing letting or as a family home. FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION 31st January 2023. Interested parties mus..."
"View floor plans today!Sheffield buy to let flats from £45,950. Studios, 1 and 2-beds available. A522"
"The Farnstone, need impressing? This extraordinary home features, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, DINING and LIVING AREA with BI-FOLD doors. "
A generous three bedroom home with open plan living for those who love to entertain.
A traditional double fronted home which is perfectly designed to ensure there is plenty of ground floor space for growing families.
"THE BAYCLIFFE - OPEN PLAN KITCHEN WITH DINING AREA, SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM and EN SUITE to bedroom 1. EXCEPTIONAL SPECIFICATION"
"This stunning three bedroom semi detached home in Wisewood has the wow factor in abundance. It has been extended to create an amazing dining kitchen which is perfect for entertaining with all all the mod cons, including a lantern roof, bi folding doors, underfloor heating and built i..."
"Guide Price £270,000 - £290,000 *EXCELLENT LOCATION* *CLOSE TO ENDCLIFFE PARK* *WONDERFUL SCHOOLS* *THREE GOOD SIZE BEDROOMS* *DELIGHTFUL COURTYARD GARDEN* *CELLAR* *NO ONWARD CHAIN* A lovely three bedroom bay windowed terrace house..."
"Superb three double bedroom penthouse apartment in what is unquestionably one of Sheffield's premier locations. Located on the lower section of Dore Road, Netherby Manor was once a substantial dwelling house but has been sympathetically converted and extended to accommodate several spacious apart..."
"CHAIN FREE!! A unique opportunity to purchase this modern and ready to move into three bedroom townhouse which is situated over three floors. Benefitting from master bedroom with ensuite, downstairs WC and open plan kitchen/diner. Also having landscaped low maintenance rear garden with bar and of..."
"This family home offers versatile living space, and perfect if you are looking for a property that you can make your own. Located on a quiet road in Hillsborough"
"Perfect for first time buyers and growing families alike is this deceptively spacious two double bedroomed, semi-detached family home. Sold with plans for a double storey side and single storey rear extension, with no onward chain. Ideally located within private grounds with easy access to not o..."
A WEST FACING SUNNY DOUBLE ASPECT TWO BEDROOM CORNER APARTMENT with JULIET BALCONY and GARDEN VIEWS on the 3rd floor of this age exclusive MCCARTHY STONE RETIREMENT LIVING PLUS DEVELOPMENT for the OVER 75'S. Windsor House is well located for easy transport access to Sheffield and Tesco supermarket.
"*** Guide Price £270,000 - £290,000 *** VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE SK Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market for sale this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property in the sought after area of Norton Lees, just a short distance from excellent local shops, good transport l..."
"Stunning throughout is this spacious three bedroom detached property much improved by the current vendors, constructed approximately five years ago and benefitting from superb kitchen/diner, utility room, downstairs WC, en-suite, garage, and good sized rear garden."
"In this sought-after family-friendly area — with lots of green space and great schools close by — this four-bedroom end terrace house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious home.  This stunning family home has been modernised by the current owner, but it stil..."
"Space inside and out ... Guide Price £270,000- £280,000 ... this lovely three bedroom family home is ready and waiting for you to make it your own. With a fantastic rear garden backing on to local fields and enjoying fantastic far reaching views, it could be the one for you"
"FOR SALE is this beautifully presented THREE bedroom Semi-Detached house located in the ever popular area of Mosborough in Sheffield. The property is well placed for access to all local amenities such as schools, shops, public houses and restaurants. Great transport links to the M1 and M18 motorw..."
*** STANDING ON THIS GOOD SIZED PLOT WITH DRIVEWAY TO THE SIDE *** *** POPULAR LOCATION *** *** OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN *** *** CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES *** *** CONVENIENT FOR THE M1/M18 MOTORWAY NETWORK *** *** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS *** *** KITCHEN (WHICH REQUIRES FULL MODERNISATION) ...
"Here we have a fantastic opportunity for both, potential investors or if you’re looking for a family home. This property is not to be overlooked as it offers a generous amount of space inside."
"This three bedroom mid-terrace house arranged over three floors is not set to disappoint, with its spacious and bright rooms, making it perfect for a family home"
"Exceptional, four bed, mid-terrace family home, with garden, in the heart of Crookes. Cosmetic update/modernisation required. Perfect for first time buyers, couples and young professionals. Close proximity to local shops and amenities. Easy access to the city centre, Universities and Hospitals"
"A traditional bay-fronted, semi-detached family home with a large ground floor extension. Entrance Hall, two reception rooms, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, modern Family Bathroom and three good size bedrooms. Ample off-street parking and a great landscaped garden. Boasts G/CH heating & fully double glazed"
"Appealing to first time buyers, young families, and couples, this lovely two bedroom semi-detached property with well appointed accommodation set across two floors, is now on the market in Greenhill, Sheffield."
"More than meets the eye..Guide Price £270,000-£280,000... This lovely cottage in the heart of High Green village has the space for even the largest of families. With off road parking and a good sized garden, you may have the perfect family life"
"FOR SALE £270,000 Contemporary 2 bedroom PENTHOUSE apartment with panoramic views, private balcony, bespoke kitchen, high ceilings, concierge service & much more. Short walk to railway station, shops & restaurants. Call NOW for a viewing. We are open 7 days a week from 8am to 8pm."
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000-£280,000 ** WEST FACING REAR GARDEN ** Situated in the village of Grenoside is this well presented, three bedroom semi detached property which enjoys a fully enclosed rear garden and benefits from a driveway, garage, internal oak doors, uPVC double glazing and gas central he..."
"A rare and promising find for any house hunter, this characterful detached property has been modernised throughout, meaning it is ready for its new owner to simply move in. With superb workmanship clearly apparent throughout, the property features three well-proportioned bedrooms, one three-piec..."
"GUIDE PRICE £265,000-£285,000
Having recently undergone a full internal transformation to create this incredible and super stylish finish, is this this truly incredible, three double bedroomed, Victorian terraced. With an eye for detail and finished with no expense spared by the current..."
"GUIDE PRICE £265,000-£275,000 ** FREEHOLD ** NO CHAIN ** Situated in the heart of Crookes is this effectively extended, stone fronted mid-terrace enjoying accommodation over the passage with three double bedrooms. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing (with the exception of the kitchen w..."
"Guide Price £265,000 to £285,000 Stunning Stunning Stunning! If you are looking for something really special and 'move in ready', then this is the property for you! The house has undergone a full renovation making it feel sparkly and new. With three good size bed..."
"Tucked away at the top of Butts Hill, forming part of the attractive 'Shrewsbury Terrace' and situated in the very heart of Old Totley this gorgeous one/two bedroom cottage has a lovely, modernised finish throughout. The location is highly sought after, a moments' walk away from the award winning..."
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* A fantastic new buy-to-let investment opportunity in the heart of Sheffield City Centre. Luxury studios, 1 and 2 bed apartments now available.S1 Postcode"
"*** ASKING PRICE £265,000 *** Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this spacious throughout five bedroom extended semi-detached property. Benefitting from newly fitted kitchen, downstairs WC and three reception rooms. Also having off road parking and enclosed rear garden. Located in a popular..."
A fantastic and rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this beautiful and charming one bedroom stone built detached cottage which boasts an enviable position adjacent to stunning open countryside whilst being only a 5 minute drive from a host of amenities in Sheffield. The property is c...
"** GUIDE PRICE £265,000 - £275,000 ** WOW! EFFECTIVELY EXTENDED! OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM! TASTEFULLY PRESENTED! CONTEMPORARY! STYLISH BATHROOM! GENEROUS GARDENS! AMPLE DRIVEWAY! A magnificent, effectively extended, three bedroom detached residence, boasting landscaped gardens and ample ..."
"A beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached which enjoys an enviable position on this desirable tree lined road within this highly regarded area.. Benefiting from a sizeable rear extension, the property offers spacious accommodation throughout and has been extensively refurbished ove..."
"Guide Price £265,000 to £285,000 Stunning Stunning Stunning! If you are looking for something really special and move in ready, then this is the property for you! The house has undergone a full renovation making it feel sparkly and new. With three good size bedro..."
Enjoying an enviable elevated position within this highly sought after area stands this attractively presented 3 bedroom semi detached. The property makes for an ideal family home with scope for extension if desired (subject to the necessary consents) Excellent amenities can be found clo...
Hunters of Hunters Bar are delighted to bring to the open market with no onward chain this four bedroom mid terraced house which is located within the highly sought after area of Sharrow Vale. The property is currently let to four tenants by way of Assured shorthold tenancy generating an annual i...
"Situated in a quiet yet popular area of Chapeltown, on the outskirts of Sheffield is this beautifully presented, three-bedroom home with a private drive. This property would be perfect for growing families."
"The perfect home ... Guide Price £265,000-£280,000 ... this lovely bungalow in the heart of Grenoside is a rare opportunity. Boasting more than meets the eye, it has two double bedrooms, plus an occasional room and generous sun room"
** FOUR BEDROOMS ** CHARACTER PROPERTY ** SPACIOUS LIVING ** OFF STREET PARKING & GARAGE *** A opportunity has arisen to purchase this four bed character property in the sought after area of High Green. The home is accessed via a welcoming porch and leads through to a co...
"0.14ha (0.36 acre) Of Freehold land with Outline planning consent for residential development of 8 houses convenient location with easy access to M1, Northern General and Meadowhall"
A stunning 2 double bedroom first floor apartment which forms part of this exclusive development within this most sought after area. The apartment boasts generous room proportions throughout and is beautifully presented. Also benefits from gas central heating fired via a combination boil...
"This exceptional 3 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE with DESIGNER tiling. "
"Ideal for first time buyers, the Gosford is a spacious three bedroom home"
" Located in the heart of Oughtibridge village, is a beautifully presented 3 bedroom, semi-detached house with integral garage recently refurbished by the owners. Arranged over 3 floors is thoughtfully conceived accommodation, including an integral garage with utility room, stylish living space o..."
"The Property**3D VIRTUAL TOUR** **GUID PRICE £260,000-£270,000**WOW what an opportunity to own this stunning 4 bedroom home in a very popular area of Sheffield. The moment you walk through the front door you will realise that this house is just what you've been looking for.
An outstanding example..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000-£270,000 ** DRIVEWAY & GARAGE ** FREEHOLD ** Brand new to the market is this extremely well-built, three bedroom, two bathroom semi-detached property with approximately 1,500 of square foot of accommodation. The property enjoys attractive views, a rear garden and benefits fr..."
"A generously proportioned three bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the popular suburb of Beighton and available with no onward chain."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000 to £270,000 FIRST TIME BUYERS, YOU HAVE SEARCHED & NOW IT'S TIME...TO INVEST IN THIS STUNNING PROPERTY, PEAK DALE DRIVE, NUMBER TWENTY NINE...! Uflit are delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully presented THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME."
"This lovely two bedroom bungalow is now available. In a great location. Benefitting from open living room/diner, two bedrooms and a new bathroom this property is one you can move straight into. The property also has a large drive and garage with power . COUNCIL TAX BAND..."
"A two double bedroom penthouse apartment with parking, offered for sale with no onward chain and offering immaculate contemporary accommodation in this highly desirable location on Ecclesall Road in walking distance of all the cafes, restaurants and wine bars and also Sheffield Town Centre. <..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000-£270,000 Recently modernised throughout to a high standard is this three double bedroom, two bathroom semi detached property which enjoys a fully enclosed, landscaped rear garden and benefits from uPVC double glazing. Set over three levels, the spacious and well presented li..."
"Its calling you ... £260,000-£270,000 ... this tucked away home is waiting for you to move in to and enjoy the peace and quiet. With three bedrooms and private garden it offers the lifestyle you want"
"*** SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY HOME ***
There is bright spacious accommodation arranged over three floors. The four bedrooms are good sizes as are both the lounge and the kitchen/diner which leads directly to the rear garden.
*** VIEWING ADVISED ***
The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall with do..."
"Well-proportioned, four bed, detached family home, with two reception rooms, an ensuite shower room and sublime, stunning, views. Perfect for first time buyers, couples, families and retirees. Close proximity to local shops and amenities. Easy access to the city centre, Universities and Hospitals"
FOR SALE is the this newly refurbished well presented THREE bedroom mid-terrace property located in the popular S7 area of Sheffield on South View Road.
"A superb opportunity to purchase this delightful three bedroom detached property, located within this sought after residential area. The accommodation is well presented and well maintained, neutrally decorated throughout with two reception rooms, sizable rear garden and a garage. This property is..."
"**LAUNCH DAY SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - CALL NOW TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING** Two bedrooms starting from £260,000, we have two, three and four bedroom properties available. Please take a look at this fabulous, groundbreaking new scheme. This well thought out initiative offers you the o..."
*** Very well presented two bedroom semi-detached home *** Highly popular location of Oughtibridge Village *** Outlook to the rear of open countryside *** Perfect for first time buyers or young families *** 3D Matterport tour *** LW0379 *** Nestled in the charming a...
Situated in a popular residential area this stunning semi-detached property is a must-view for any family looking to be on this ever-popular development. With spacious bedrooms and living rooms internally and 2 parking spaces and a private rear garden outside there is room for all the family.
"Located on this quiet leafy street in the popular residential suburb is this well presented, three bedroom mid terrace property oozing character and charm. The property briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, bay windowed living room, dining room with off shot kitchen. First floor; master doubl..."
Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this well presented two double bedroom detached bungalow with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Offering spacious and well proportioned rooms. The property is situated in the popular residential area of Gleadless and is well positioned for easy access to excellent ameniti...
"GUIDE PRICE £255,000-£265,000 This three bedroom detached house is perfect for a family to move straight into. Including a lounge, modern breakfast kitchen, sun room (potential to be a playroom or dining room), three bedrooms, bathroom , garage and parking for two cars. "
"High quality two bedroom, penthouse apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on this beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, this penthouse apartment is going to be very popular. Expected completion date October 2022. Don&rsquo..."
"Hunters Crookes are pleased to offer to the market this well presented four bedroom semi detached home, which offers accommodation over four floors. Situated in the much sought after area of Crookes, having access to a range of local amenities including shops, eateries, pubs and public transport ..."
"A fantastic, three bedroom detached house with the benefit of off road parking, situated in the sought after area of Catcliffe we believe this lovely home will have a huge fan club"
"£259,995 - PREPARE TO BE CHARMED - This three bedroom detached property is offered to market bosting well presented and spacious accommodation throughout. Close to local amenities and transport links and benefiting from a rear garden and off road parking...CALL NOW!!!"
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000-£260,000 This detached house is perfect for a growing family. Including, three bedrooms - one with en suite, bathroom, kitchen, WC, living room, conservatory, garden, garage and drive for multiple cars. Situated on the popular residential Thorncliffe estate..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £270,000 ** Located in an extremely popular residential area is this beautifully presented THREE bedroomed detached bungalow set within walking distance of all local amenities of Swallownest and within easy access of the Sheffield City centre and the M1 motorway and o..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 ** WOW ** MAGNIFICENT FAMILY HOME! THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS! IMPRESSIVE FITTED KITCHEN! TWO RECEPTION ROOMS! CELLAR! OUTDOOR ENTERTAINMENT ROOM/BAR! EXQUISITE FAMILY BATHROOM! GENEROUS GARDEN! AMPLE DRIVEWAY! This magnificent three double bedroom semi detached resi..."
"A modern and well presented detached family home which is ideally located for links into Sheffield and Chesterfield, Having been renovated by the current vendors this lovely home is ready to move straight into.. Property Ref RB0377.
"
"Guide Price: £250,000 Freehold site of approximately 0.23 acres located opposite the Northern General Hospital with planning permission for 19 flats in a 2/3 storey block."
"Looking for a home that's full of charm and ready to move in? Check out this Traditional Home with a modern twist situated in the popular residential area of Sheffield City Centre, on Kirkby View. With an enclosed aspect to the rear and recently refurbished throughout. Situated close to an ex..."
"A quirky home brimming with character: Coward Drive. With extensive rear garden, and fabulous bedroom balcony. You will fall in love with this home the moment you see it! "
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000** CHAIN FREE!! Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this spacious throughout two double bedroom detached bungalow situated in a popular residential area. Offering conservatory and separate dining, lounge and kitchen area. Also having garage, off road parking ..."
Only will an internal inspection reveal the size of this lovely four bedroom semi detached property which would make a lovely family home. The property is well placed for local schools and amenities.
"This beautifully extended three bedroom semi-detached property, located in the heart of the desirable Sothall S20 area, presents a rare opportunity to experience modern contemporary living at its finest. Boasting bespoke high white gloss fitted kitchen with integral appliances, this first-class f..."
Hunters Hillsborough are delighted to present an immaculately presented one bedroom bungalow with outstanding picturesque views situated in the sought after district of Worrall. The property has been completely re-developed with an envious landscaped garden and modern interior. A substantial dri...
"This beautiful 1900's terraced style villa has plenty of character. With four bedrooms, entrance hallway, two reception rooms, fitted kitchen and bathroom, rear garden and plenty of storage, this home is a real gem. Located close to local amenities and great transport links. Call the office to bo..."
"Boasting accommodation over Three floors is this well-appointed Four bedroom townhouse, located in S2, overlooking the park and within walking distance to St Theresa's Catholic Primary School"
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000** Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented and spacious throughout three bedroom detached property situated on a corner plot on a quiet road. Offering ample off road parking and carport, large rear garden and conservatory. The property..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***
This fabulous ground floor apartment offers exceptional, bright spacious rooms throughout. 'Stand Out' features include the lovely living room with balcony, a modern fitted kitchen and garage.
*** VIEWING ADVISED *** The accommodation comprises an entrance hall with a ge..."
"Occupying an envious corner plot in the sought-after suburb of Gleadless is this superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached house. On the market for a Guide Price £250,000 - £275,000."
"Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this beautifully presented and extended four bedroom, semi-detached property situated in highly popular area of Gleadless. Situated within a short distance from the tram link, bus routes and links to Sheffield City Centre as well as close to local ameniti..."
Hunters Crookes are delighted to market a three bedroom end terrace house located in the increasingly popular area of S10. Accommodation over four floors with a fully tanked cellar with radiator and window which would be an ideal office area. Entry to the property via front door into the lounge....
** NO CHAIN ** Offering huge potential is this spacious three bedroom stone fronted detached property requiring a scheme of modernisation and refurbishment set over three floors built C1882 with a range of original features and benefiting from ample off road parking and good sized rear garden. 
"Guide Price: £250,000 - £275,000 A superbly presented and well-maintained three bedroom town house, situated in the popular suburb of Mosborough."
"Guide Price: £250,000 A substantial inner terrace comprising a long established conversion into 4 flats, all let at £1,706pa (£20,472pa) located in the heart of Nether Edge. FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION 4th April 2023. Interested parties must register via the Mark Jenkinson website"
"** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 ** 2Roost are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom family home. This beautifully appointed home boasts spacious living throughout and being ideally suited to the growing family. The downstairs accommodation comprises of a spacious hallway, mode..."
"**NO CHAIN** DETACHED FAMILY HOME ** THREE BEDROOMS ** MODERN LIVING **FRESHLY RENOVATED** OFF STREET PARKING ** WORKING FROM HOME ** WORKSHOP/OFFICE SPACE ** Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 Blundells are delighted to bring to market this fantastic three bedroom ..."
"Only by viewing can you appreciate the size of this spacious five bedroom semi-detached property with planning (lapsed) to further extend into the attic. The property resides on a sought after road within Woodhouse Mill and has a resin driveway to the front providing substantial off road parking,..."
"*** NO CHAIN *** Tucked away within a popular village location is this EXTENDED, SPACIOUS FOUR-BEDROOM semi-detached family home. "
"Only by viewing can you truly appreciate the size and standard of this this superb extended four bedroom semi-detached property set over three floors benefitting from en-suite shower room, additional family bathroom, downstairs WC, driveway, uPVC double glazing and gas central heating."
"In this sought-after family-friendly area — with lots of green space, far-reaching rural views, and reputable schools close by — this very well-presented three-bedroom house is perfect for a family looking for a more spacious forever home.  At approximately XXXX squa..."
"Guide Price £250,000-£260,000. Situated on a cul-de-sac in the popular location of Woodhouse, this modern three bedroom detached home is ready to move into! The home benefits from extended ground floor living and available with no onward chain!"
COMING SOON - REGISTER YOUR INTEREST. Beautifully converted apartments set within the Grade II listed Tapton Court in the Ranmoor district of Sheffield. 
"** VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY ** Here's a great three bedroom semi detached dormer property in a very popular area. Boasting good sized living space through out with large lounge/diner, kitchen, bathroom and three bedrooms plus gardens and a detached garage its ideal as a fam..."
"ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A WELL PRESENTED, two bedroom DUAL ASPECT apartment, benefiting from NEW CARPETS and a JULIET BALCONY on the first floor of this McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development for the over 75's (60 plus if registered disabled)..."
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 WOW! SPECTACULAR FAMILY HOME! HIGH SPECIFICATION! PARKING! GARAGE! IMPRESSIVE KITCHEN! HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION! STYLISH FAMILY BATHROOM! DOWNSTAIRS WC! ENSUITE! Blundells are proud to present this stunning three bedroom town h..."
A superbly presented & modern built three-bedroom house situated within a sought-after development in the suburb of Mosborough.
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £270,000. SEEING IS BELIEVING AND THE POTENTIAL IS HUGE WITH THIS WELL PRESENTED 3 BED SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY located on a popular cul de sac, in the great commuter location of Chapeltown, minutes way from the M1, surrounded by reputable schools, hosting an array of ameniti..."
"****TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED**** ****HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER AREA**** ****LARGE GARDEN**** At a guide price of £250,000-£260,000
This spacious two double bedroom semi-detached is situated in the ever-popular village of Stannington, close to local amenities including shops, pubs, cafes. Catchme..."
"This well presented three double bedroom semi detached property on the ever so popular estate in Wadlsey is not to be missed. Accommodation comprises: Lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathroom, family sized rear garden, detached garage and off road parking..."
"** NO CHAIN ** THREE BED SEMI **GRENOSIDE ** SPACIOUS THROUGHOUT ** GARAGE ** DRIVE ** Situated in the much sought after Grenoside village on a nice cul de sac we have a lovely three bed semi-detached home, ideal for first time buyers or a young family. The home offers spac..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi-detached property within this popular residential area of Norton Lees. In need of a degree of modernisation, this property offers plenty of opportunity for anyone looking for a family home or investment. Kitchen/dining room leading onto ..."
"Hunters Crookes are delighted to market with NO ONWARD CHAIN this two double bedroom, two bathroom individually built dwelling, which is nestled away from the main road. The property, which has spacious accommodation all on one level, briefly comprises; a walkway leading to a gated front courtyar..."
"Offered to the open market with no onward chain is this outstanding three bedroom mid terraced house which has been subject to an extensive professional refurbishment. Beautifully presented throughout in a contemporary style the property benefits from new UPVC double glazed windows, new electrics..."
"NO CHAIN!! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this ready to move into three bedroom detached family home situated in a popular residential area. Offering open plan lounge/diner, off road parking and low maintenance rear garden. Close to great local amenities, woodland walks and open countryside...."
"Situated in the sought after residential area of Stannington, with easy access to central Sheffield and in turn the Peak District, is this three bedroom semi-detached home which would be well suited to a family"
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £260,000 A beautifully presented and spacious three double bedroom end terraced property with off road parking. Benefitting from a quiet cul-de-sac location, on an elevated position, located within the popular area of Meersbrook. Close to parks, cafes and main bus ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000-£270,000 Situated in this popular residential area and enjoying attractive views is this bay fronted, three bedroom semi detached property which enjoys a fully enclosed rear garden and benefits from uPVC double glazing, under-house storage and gas central heating. Effectivel..."
"Located within a few minutes’ walk to Hillsborough centre that offers a wide range of shops, restaurants, bars and supermarkets is this attractive three bedroomed semi-detached property with driveway and garage. The property offers no chain and benefits from gas central heating a..."
"FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION; STARTING BID PRICE £250,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE A spacious end of terrace property with accommodation laid out over three floors, benefitting from gas central heating and modern fitments to the kitchen and bathroom, however, does require a p..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this three bedroom end terrace with garage, located in the popular location of Loxley. Perfect for those looking for a family home, a viewing is certainly advised"
"Guide Price £250,000-£260,000. Beautiful property!! This is an immaculately presented three bedroom detached home, situated in the sought after location of Eckington! The property benefits from modern décor throughout along with a landscaped garden, call us today to arrange your viewing!"
"Nexus Point, Owlthorpe 3 bedroom terraced houses for sale in the Nexus Point development on a shared ownership basis. Shares available from 10% - 75%. Reserve your new home today."
"A superbly presented and well maintained two bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the popular suburb of Hackenthorpe."
"Purple Bricks are delighted to market this absolutely stunning three bedroom detached property, nestled down a delightful cul-de-sac in one of the most sought after parts of S9. Offered to the market with no onwards chain and with vacant possession, this property has been enhanced, renovated and ..."
"View floor plans today!Sheffield buy to let flats from £45,950. Studios, 1 and 2-beds available. A260"
"** DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY ** this exciting home in Crookes is available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS. Call to enquire!Bettermove are proud to welcome to the market this charming four bedroom end terrace house in Crookes, available with no forward chain.The property is vacant ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260-265,000. A stunning location with spectacular views over Blacka Moor and the Peak District, a first floor apartment with balcony. Great position, on the front of this popular and exclusive retirement development, with easy access of the lift and the main entrance. <..."
Occupying one of the finest positions in this sought after development is this lovely two bedroomed ground floor apartment that enjoys a stunning leafy outlook. Apt 2 is offered for sale with no chain and early vacant possession and has had new carpets fitted and also been professionally redecora...
"Guide Price £150,000 - £160,000 A 2-bedroom, first floor duplex apartment overlooking the River Don in Kelham Island, S3. The property benefits from its own private entrance, balcony overlooking the river, underfloor heating and majority double glazing. Superb location in the sough..."
"GUIDE PRICE £245,000-£255,000 ** NOT TO BE MISSED! ** FREEHOLD ** A truly spectacular, immaculately presented, three bedroom end of terrace in the popular residential area of Walkley enjoying far reaching panoramic views to the rear. Only upon an internal inspection can one fully appreciate this ..."
"£245,000 - £255,000 (Guide Price) A superbly presented two bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the sought-after suburb of Halfway."
"GUIDE PRICE £245,000-£255,000 This three bedroom detached house is perfect for a family. Including, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms, bathroom, front and rear gardens with driveway for two cars. Situated in the popular residential area of High green, this beautiful ..."
"A nicely appointed three bedroom family Freehold detached house which has gas central heating,double glazing, conservatory extension and a garage to the rear. The accommodation comprises an Entrance Porch,Entrance Hall with coats cupboard,Lounge with feature fireplace set with an electric fire, s..."
"Exceptional opportunity to purchase a stunning 2 bedroom 2 bathroom apartment 'off plan' in the thriving and sought after Philadelphia neighbourhood of Sheffield, located just 1500 metres to Sheffield city centre and ready to move in to in Q2 2024. This exclusive development of just 6 (cont.)"
PENTHOUSE APARTMENT!! TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT IN THE WEST ONE DEVELOPMENT!! This property is offered for sale furnished with a current tenant occupying the property. The current rental income achieved is £1375pcm and the tenant is in a fixed term tenant until October 2023.
"Prices from £45,950in this unbelievable below market value investment opportunity in Sheffield. 65% already sold to call today to receive a FREE info pack. A521"
This attractive extended 3 bedroom semi-detached home is nestled in the highly sought-after area of Richmond and is well placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive and bea...
"An outstanding family home in a very popular residential location anyone ? Thought so.An early viewing will be necessary here for this lovely three bedroom semi detached house, Take a look at the kitchen and the Conservatory the real focal points of this stunning property, Everything you could want"
"** GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000** Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this well presented three bedroom detached property situated on a quiet cul-de-sac. Offering conservatory with solid roof and modern kitchen and bathroom. Also having off road parking, garage and good sized rear garden. ..."
"Guide Price: £240,000 - £250,000 A superbly presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom mid terrace house situated in the popular suburb of Walkley."
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this immaculately presented and deceptively spacious three bedroomed detached family home. Located in the heart of this popular and much sought after estate this property benefits from not only having excellent public transport links but also a wealth of l...
"START THE DREAM HERE - Situated in the ever popular development of Waverley, this modern mid terraced house boats beautifully presented accommodation throughout, an ensuite, off road parking & delightful rear garden- CALL US NOW!"
"£240,000 - £250,000 (Guide Price) A beautifully presented and significantly extended three double bedroom, semi-detached house, situated in the popular suburb of Beighton."
"****NO CHAIN**** The first time this property has ever been advertised is this very well presented and maintained three bedroom semi-detached property benefitting from a single storey rear extension benefitting from spacious lounge/dining room, breakfast kitchen, garage, driveway, garden, uPVC do..."
"Stunning three-bedroom extended semi-detached family home. The property is immaculately presented, with ample off-street parking and a large family garden: modern and contemporary fixtures and fittings throughout yet retaining its character and charm."
"This stunning three-bedroom semi-detached property, with an impressive single-storey rear extension, offers a luxurious family living experience. Boasting a spacious and beautifully presented open-plan family living/kitchen space, as well as a separate formal lounge and dining room, this property..."
"This is a great opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached home, situated on a cul-de-sac in the popular location of Eckington. The charming property benefits from spacious accommodation and is well presented throughout. Call us today to arrange your viewing!"
"A superbly presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom detached home situated within the sought-after village of Eckington. On the market for a Guide Price: £240,000 - £250,000"
"***OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £240,000*** - Spacious three bedroom semi-detached house - Close to local amenities - Two double bedrooms and one single - Driveway ***BRAND NEW TO MARKET – CONTACT BLUNDELLS TODAY*** Blundells are delighted to market th..."
"Hunters Hillsborough present a fantastic opportunity to purchase a larger than most three bedroom, two bathroom family home with accommodation over four levels. Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in Malin Bridge on the outskirts of Hillsborough and offered for sale with no onward chain, viewing is es..."
"GUIDE PRICE £240,000-£250,000
Quietly tucked away on this little known cul de sac and set in this peaceful setting backing on to the woods is this beautifully presented and very well proportioned, three bedroomed, semi detached family home. Offering an incredibly rare opportunity to mar..."
"ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A TWO BEDROOM apartment with SOUTH FACING JULIET BALCONY located on LEVEL FOUR of this McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development with an ON-SITE RESTAURANT, ESTATE MANAGER, CARE STAFF on-site 24 hours a day and BESPOKE CA..."
"LAY YOUR HAT, YOU'LL WANT TO STAY...IN THIS BEAUTIFUL HOUSE ON CALVER WAY...! Uflit are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous THREE BEDROOM family home set over two floors. Nestled in the highly desirable modern development of the Waverley."
"GUIDE PRICE - £240,000 - £250,000 - A DECEPTIVELY LARGE FAMILY HOME OFFERING NO LESS THAN 5 DOUBLE BEDROOMS!!! INTERNAL VIEWING IS ESSENTIAL TO FULLY APPRECIATE THE ACCOMMODATION ON OFFER!"
"Ready to move in to ... Guide Price £240,000- £250,000.. sitting on a fantastic corner plot with detached garage, this extended three bedroom semi detached home in the heart of Burncross village could be just what you have been looking for"
"A spacious 2 double bedroom first floor apartment which must be viewed to be fully appreciated. Enjoying a fantastic position within this sought after area with a host of excellent amenities on the door step. This impressive apartment benefits from a private entrance door, private garden..."
"**INVESTMENT PROPERTY FOR SALE** **£240,000 GUIDE PRICE** **FULLY FURNISHED** 5-bedroom house located on Abbeydale road. Excellently located with access to brilliant local amenities and excellent transport links."
"OCCUPYING A QUIET, LITTLE-KNOWN POSITION IN THIS HIGHLY REGARDED AREA OF SHEFFIELD, WE OFFER TO THE MARKET THIS THREE BEDROOMED TERRACED PROPERTY, WITH ACCOMMODATION OVER TWO STOREYS, GARDENS TO FRONT ANF REAR, AND POTENTIAL FOR OFF-STREET PARKING GIVEN NECESSARY PLANNING AND CONSENTS. Offered to..."
Located in the popular village of Eckington is this three bedroom detached property which would ideally suit a family. The property provides great access to local and local amenities.
"The land at Dungworth extends in total to approximately 65.50 acres (26.53 ha) of grassland, available in five lots, in a rural yet commutable area."
"A beautiful three-bedroom home in Walkley with an open plan kitchen/dining room and South-West facing rear garden with no rights of way from neighbours. Fantastic location with superb local shops, cafes and pubs just a short stroll away. The city centre, Sheffield University and central hospitals..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000** Well presented and spacious three bedroom detached property benefitting from a double fronted extension, large conservatory, driveway, rear garden, uPVC double glazing and gas central heating. "
Live for WOW in this 3 bedroom home with a DESIGNER kitchen and OPEN plan living area. Main bedroom with ENSUITE. Bathroom with DESIGNER tiling.
£500 towards legal fees paid. Carpets and vinyl package included. .
"Bell & Co Estates are delighted to present this NEWLY RENOVATED, THREE Bedroom SEMI-DETACHED in this popular village of WALES, selling with NO VENDOR CHAIN."
"Award winning local housebuilder Sky-House Co have just released the next phase of homes in Waverley. The next-generation 3-bedroom townhouse (House Type 01) offers a high specification as standard, including contemporary kitchen, open plan living space and a private rooftop garden."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £235,000-£250,000 *** **TOWN HOUSE** 3 STOREY ** 3 BEDROOMS ** ATTRACTIVELY PRESENTED ** PRINCIPLE DRESSROOM SUITE WITH DRESSING AREA AND EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM ** QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION ** DRIVEWAY PROVIDNG OFFROAD PARKING ** ENCLOSED GARDEN TO THE REAR* LEASEHO..."
"Guide Price: £235,000 - £255,000 An attractive 5 bedroom HMO in this popular part of Crookes, let for both the current academic year at £22,360 and 2023/24 at £22884pa"
ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A WELL PRESENTED one bedroom apartment with a HOBBY/STUDY room and DUAL ASPECT LIVING ROOM situated on the FOURTH FLOOR of a desirable McCARTHY AND STONE Retirement Living Plus development for the over 75's.
"Ref AL0535    ** IDEAL FAMILY HOME ** ** FREEHOLD PROPERTY ** We are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroomed semi detached house which briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, conservatory, three good sized bedrooms, bathroom, gardens to fr..."
"ONLINE AUCTION. Stylish, modern 5-BEDROOM APARTMENT finished to a high standard FOR SALE in Kelham Island. Potential rental income £23,760 pa - Ideal for Buy-to-Let investor. Close to City Centre. Call us for a viewing. We are open 7 days a week from 8am to 8pm."
"If you're looking for a beautiful modern home, look no further!! Situated in the popular location of Woodhouse, this three bedroom semi-detached home will make a great purchase. The spacious home benefits from modern décor throughout and a landscaped garden. Call us today to book your viewing!"
"A STUNNING PROPERTY PRICED TO SELL...OVERLOOKING COMMUNAL GREENS ON TIDESWELL...! Uflit are delighted to welcome to the market this stunning THREE BEDROOM family home, nestled in the highly desirable modern development of the Waverley."
"***Detached House***Three Bedrooms***Lounge***Fitted Kitchen/Dining Room***
***Master Bedroom with En-suite***Fitted Bathroom*** Double Glazing***Attached Garage***Front and Rear Gardens***Off Road Parking For Two Cars***"
"** FREEHOLD ** NO CHAIN ** Situated on this sought after tree lined street in the heart of Crookes is this three double bedroom, two bathroom stone fronted mid-terrace. The property has recently been re-decorated throughout and benefits from new carpets, uPVC double glazing and gas fired central ..."
"** VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY ** This starter home is in a great location for the Supertram, Hillsborough Park and all the shops and facilities in Hillsborough centre. On the ground floor there's a generously sized front lounge, a dining room and lovely kitchen. On ..."
"Guide Price: £235,000 - £245,000 A superbly presented three bedroom mid terrace house, situated in the sought-after suburb of Walkley."
"Hunters are delighted to offer to the market with no onward chain, this well presented and stone fronted three bedroom terraced home. The property is situated in the ever popular residential area of Crookes, having access to excellent local amenities, shops, bars, eateries and regular transport l..."
FOR SALE is this FOUR bedroom FOUR shower room property located on the popular Myrtle Road in Sheffield just outside the City Centre.
"Positioned on the top floor of this popular development which is located in the heart of Sheffield City Centre is this fabulous two double bedroom penthouse apartment which has a private balcony and terrace which enjoy stunning panoramic views. Beautifully presented throughout, the property benef..."
"****NO CHAIN**** Offering huge potential is this extended three bedroom semi-detached property requiring a scheme of modernisation and refurbishment residing on a sought after area within Handsworth; backing onto open fields and benefitting from garage, uPVC double glazing and gas central heat..."
"This lovely three/four bedroom semi detached property would make a great family home and is located in the sough after area of Richmond providing great access to all the local amenities and schools. No chain involved, viewings recommended!"
"UNPACK AND UNWIND, A PROPERTY YOU THRIVE..! WE'VE FOUND YOUR DREAM HOME ON WHARFEDALE DRIVE...! Uflit are highly delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully appointed three bedroom semi detached property, offering modern and spacious living throughout."
"Time to plant your roots ... Guide Price £230,000-£240,000 ... on one of the most popular and peaceful roads round, this lovely three bedroom semi detached home with lots of living space could be the on to call yours"
Positioned on a quiet cul-de-sac is this well maintained three bedroom semi-detached house.
FOR SALE is this beautifully presented THREE bedroom detached house located on this new estate in the popular area of Sheffield 2.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious and stunning throughout three bedroom semi-detached property situated on a large plot with gardens to three sides. Offering brand new kitchen, utility room and stylish bathroom. Also having off road parking and garage for storage. The ..."
"***OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £230,000*** - Perfect for a first time buyer, couple or family - Close to local amenities - Three bedrooms - Driveway & garage ***BRAND NEW TO MARKET – CONTACT BLUNDELLS TODAY*** Blundells are delighted to bring to marke..."
"Nestled in idyllic Oughtibridge: Greeton Drive has so much to offer, located in a cul-de-sac, close to local facilities, excllent schools, rural countryside and ideal for the commuter. Standing in a good sized garden, the home is ripe for the discerning purchaser to alter to their own tastes and..."
"Hunters Hillsborough present a rare opportunity to purchase a two bedroom bungalow situated in the extremely popular residential district of Loxley enjoying a vast panorama of open countryside. Occupying a corner plot, this property has widened doors and easy access for anyone using a wheelchair...."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 -SOLD WITH NO CHAIN! A fantastic opportunity to buy this two-bedroom mid-terrace property, which has been presented to the highest of standards by the current owners and would make a fantastic investment."
"A large three-bedroom mid-terrace home on a quiet cul-de-sac in Crookes that will be of interest to first-time buyers, families and investor landlords. Internally there is an open-plan kitchen/dining room, three good bedrooms and a modern bathroom. The property is in a great location, within walk..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000** A unique opportunity to purchase this stunning and immaculately presented three/four bedroom semi-detached property which situated in a popular residential area on a quiet road. The property offers downstairs WC, conservatory and snug/dining space/bed four. Al..."
"A stunning, two double bedroom, first floor apartment with allocated parking, set in beautiful communal grounds. The apartment is ideally located in the leafy and exclusive neighbourhood of Ranmoor within easy commuting distance of the central hospitals, university and the City Centre. With its h..."
"It can be tricky for first-time buyers or young couples to find a good amount of space in a trendy location — but with schools, amenities, and transport links, this stunning terraced certainly fits the bill.  At approximately 700 square feet this terraced house has lots of space and..."
This beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached property would make the perfect home for families or first time buyers. Located in the favourable area of Intake the property is well placed for local amenities and public transport links.
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 ** ** NO CHAIN ** Residing on a substantial corner plot in in extensive gardens is this extended three bedroom detached bungalow benefitting from open plan lounge and dining room, wetroom, garage, and ample off road parking."
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000** NO CHAIN!! A unique opportunity to purchase this three bedroom detached property which is set on a large plot with drive to the front, side and rear. The property boasts masses of potential and also has a large mechanics garage. Close to great local amenities ..."
"Guide Price £230,000 - £240,000 Located in the heart of Walkley is a 2-bedroom semi-detached house, with off street parking. The property benefits from allocated parking, south west facing rear garden, modern kitchen and bathroom, combination gas central heating and double glazing...."
**ATTENDANCE ALLOWANCE AVAILABLE TO RESIDENTS TO ASSIST WITH THE COST OF MAINTENANCE TYPICALLY IN THE REGION OF £61.88 PER WEEK OR £268 PER MONTH FOLLOW THE LINK FOR MORE INFORMATION An excellent two double bedroomed pent house apartm...
"Hunters Hillsborough present a fantastic opportunity to purchase this 3 bedroom semi detached home located on a quiet cul-de-sac in the heart of Oughtibridge Village. Appealing to first time buyers looking for a project and growing families, we are sure the highly regarded location and school cat..."
"Prices from £45,950in this unbelievable below market value investment opportunity in Sheffield. 65% already sold to call today to receive a FREE info pack. A259"
"This is a traditional bay fronted three-bedroom semi-detached home. occupying a large plot with gardens to the front and rear; as well as a driveway, providing ample off-road parking"
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000-£240,000
Forming part of this superb residential development in the popular suburb of Ecclesall is this well presented two double bedroomed, ground floor apartment. Quietly tucked away on this cul de sac position and set back from the hustle and bustle yet within wa..."
"A beautifully presented Three bedroom semi-detached home, located at the heart of Charnock, S12"
"**GUIDE PRICE £230,00 TO £240,000 ** **THREE BEDROOMS** SEMI DETACHED ** DRIVEWAY ** GARAGE ** MODERN FAMILY KITCHEN ** NO ONWARD CHAIN INVOLVED** FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND: B Blundells are delighted to market this excellent three bedroom semi-detached..."
EARLY INTERNAL INSPECTION IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
"Hunters of Woodseats are pleased to market this three bedroom, bay windowed semi detached house located in this popular residential area. The property which is neutrally decorated and well presented briefly comprises; entrance lobby with stairs to the first floor, living room with a front bay win..."
"Looking for a home recently refurbished and ready to move in? Take a look at this Beautifully Presented Home situated in the sought after residential area on the outskirts of Sheffield City Centre, on Birklands Avenue. With an enclosed aspect to the rear and offering a driveway. Situated to an ex..."
"A stunning, modern styled three bedroom mid terraced home which enjoys spacious bedrooms and a gorgeous dining kitchen! Perfect for first time buyers or families, the property has been modernised to a high standard throughout and is worthy of an internal inspection to appreciate the accommodation..."
A simply stunning extended 3 bedroom stone fronted semi detached which must be viewed internally to be fully appreciated. The deceptively spacious accommodation is presented to an exceptionally high standard throughout and offers superb family accommodation. The property also boasts a ge...
"Looking for a home ready to move in? Check out this Semi-Detached Home situated in the popular residential area on the outskirts of Sheffield, on Main Road within Wharncliffe. With an enclosed aspect to the rear. Situated close to an excellent ran..."
ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A southerly facing dual aspect TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT overlooking the front and side gardens in a MCCARTHY STONE RETIREMENT LIVING PLUS development for the OVER 75'S in the popular MILLHOUSES area . Good local amenities and transp...
"** NO CHAIN ** Beautifully presented throughout is this four bedroom semi-detached property benefitting from ample off road parking, detached garage, spacious lounge/diner, conservatory, uPVC double glazing and gas central heating. "
"READY TO WALK STRAIGHT IN is this IMMACULATE THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED NEW BUILD, finished to a VERY HIGH SPECIFICATION with TWO BATHROOMS, 2/3 RECEPTION ROOMS, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN and PRIVATE REAR GARDEN. Available with NO CHAIN and 6 YEARS GUARANTEE! Positioned on a PRIV..."
Plot 80: The Rivelin 
"***SAVE £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Tailor is a 3-bedroom home with an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a front-facing living room, a modern family bathroom, and an en-suite shower room to bedroom 1."
"***NO CHAIN*** Fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property set in very generous gardens and benefitting from spacious lounge, large kitchen/diner and garage."
"** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £235,000 ** WOW! GENEROUS REAR GARDEN! CONTEMPORARY & STYLISH! DRIVEWAY & GARAGE! A magnificent, three bedroom detached residence, boasting a generous rear garden, driveway and garage. NO CHAIN!"
"This beautifully presented and deceptively spacious three double mid terraced house is located within the popular area of Hillsborough S6. The property benefits from a double off shot to the rear, a south west facing garden, and period features which are seamlessly blended together with modern co..."
"A well-presented three bedroom property located within the heart of Woodseats. This delightful property has been well maintained, is light and airy with truly fantastic views from the rear of the house. The property has good proportions throughout and has an internal garage and utility room to th..."
"A well proportioned, two double bedroom, two bathroom apartment in this popular exclusive retirement development for the over 60s with staff onsite 24/7. Situated on the first floor, with rear facing balcony with attractive aspect. Within easy access of the excellent amenities of Dore V..."
Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this 2 bedroomed bungalow on an exciting over 50's development. A fantastic opportunity to purchase this ready to move in home in the complex of Bramley Park which offers beautiful countryside views as well as access to the local amenities of Eckington.
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £240,000 - FEELS LIKE HOME! Situated in this sought after location, well placed for both Rotherham & Sheffield, local amenities & transport links. Boasting a homely feel the moment you step through the door. Driveway & garage - this makes an excellent family purchase."
Development Opportunity. City of Sheffield. Planning Application 21/04441/FUL
"A beautifully presented, recently refurbished well- proportioned three bedroom property, located in the heart of Woodseats one of Sheffield's most sought after residential suburbs. This delightful terraced property has been modernised to the highest standard, boasting a newly fitted kitchen, and ..."
"Guide Price £225,000 - £235,000 Situated in a popular residential area within walking distance of local amenities this well-presented semi-detached property is a must-view for any first-time buyer or growing family. The property also has ample off-street parking, a garage and a private rear garden."
"LOCATION LOCATION ALERT A two-bedroom detached bungalow in a highly sought-after area close to Crystal Peaks. The bungalow is in need of updating but offers a great opportunity for the new owner to put their stamp on it. There is a generous lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom. NO CHAIN"
"PLOT 1 HANDSWORTH HILL MEWS Make your move and reserve your next new home. These eagerly awaited 4 bedroom townhouses will form part of this delightful development in this popular area of South East Sheffield. Finished to a high standard throughout by this respected local builder, the..."
"NEW PLOT RELEASED AT VALLEY VIEW! A home you'll love in the perfect location. Three bedroom, two bathroom semi detached home with off road parking. A development of twenty two quality new build homes, located in the Hackenthorpe suburb of Sheffield built by Walshaw Ho..."
This superb development of 'assisted care' apartments have been built around gorgeous communal grounds with lovely views extending over the valley towards Blacka Moor. They are designed for the over 60's market and offer Independent living with the benefit of a bespoke care package that can be ta...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £230,000*** Hunters Hillsborough are delighted to offer a well presented three bedroom semi detached property with bespoke fitted blinds, driveway and a garage. Having recently undergone a scheme of modernisation, we are sure this will be a favourite, therefor..."
Quietly tucked away on this no through road in the heart of this well sought after residential suburb is this beautiful three bedroomed linked detached family home. With ample off road parking and garage to the front together with a private rear and flat garden this property will be super popular...
"A deceptively spacious two bedroom detached house, available with no onward chain and situated in the sought-after suburb of Crookes."
£500 towards legal fees. Carpets and vinyl package throughout.  .
Enjoying an enviable position at the end of this quiet cul de sac within this popular residential area stands this most impressive 3 bedroom semi detached. The property is very well presented throughout and benefits from gas central heating fired via a combination boiler and is UPVC doub...
"****Guide Price £220,000 - £230,000****** Hunters Hillsborough are delighted to market a three bedroom terraced home with high ceilings and contemporary décor. Situated on a popular road within close proximity to Marlcliffe Primary school, the Sheffield Supertram links and easy access to loca..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000** NO CHAIN!! Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this ready to move into and well presented throughout three bedroom semi-detached property. Offering extended kitchen/diner, ample off road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden. Situated in a sought after ..."
** NO CHAIN ** THREE BED DETACHED ** OFF STREET PARKING ** GARAGE ** An opportunity has a risen for a family or first time buyers to put their stamp on this spacious detached home in a much sought after area. The home is set on a fabulous plot and is unique in its own right...
"** GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000 ** ** NO CHAIN ** Modernised and refurbished throughout is this three/four bedroom semi-detached property benefitting from open plan grey high gloss kitchen/diner/living space; contemporary bathroom and substantial off road parking to the front."
"Hunters Hillsborough are delighted to present a superb family home in the heart of Malin Bridge offering accommodation over four levels enjoying outstanding views. This three bedroom mid townhouse has the added benefit of an occasional attic room with access via a pull down ladder, ideal for an o..."
ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A WELL PRESENTED one bedroom apartment with JULIET BALCONY OVERLOOKING THE COMMUNAL GARDENS located on the FIFTH FLOOR of a McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development approx. 300 m from a Tesco SUPERSTORE.
"** SOUTH-WEST FACING REAR GARDEN ** Benefiting from a double-width driveway and recently refurbished is this two bedroom townhouse situated in the popular residential area of Oughtibridge. Refurbishments include new doors, windows, boiler and a kitchen. There is scope to convert the first floor..."
** NO CHAIN ** THREE BED FAMILY HOME ** PARK VIEWS ** A great opportunity to purchase this three bed family home with access straight on to the popular Grenoside park and walking distance to the school and Village. The home requires a scheme of modernisation throughout but...
"Offered to the market with NO CHAIN is this spacious three double bedroom end terraced property. Requiring a few improvements, the property offers fantastic potential and will make an ideal purchase for the first-time buyer, growing family or buy to let investor alike. Situated in the ev..."
"**Guide Price £220,000 - £240,000** SK Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market, this deceptively spacious, four bedroomed end-terrace property located close-by to a host of local shops and cafe's, Meersbrook Park, good local schools and excellent transport links to Sheffield Cit..."
"Guide Price £220,000 -£240,000, Windsor House is the most recent development for the over 70s by McCarthy and Stone in the south west sector of the city, situated in a private position away from Abbeydale Road on the fringe of Millhouses in tree studded grounds. The development comprises a range ..."
Located within a popular spot with views to the rear over the park is this formally three bedroomed townhouse that is now a two bedroomed home. The property was changed by the previous owner to increase the bedroom space but with a few small changes can be altered back to its original ...
"Beautifully presented throughout is this superb three bedroom semi-detached property much improved by the current vendors to create an impressive family home benefitting from a large conservatory with tiled roof, spacious kitchen/diner and good sized lounge. Also having driveway for two cars and ..."
"Sitting pretty ... Guide Price £220,000-£230,000 ... this lovely three bedroom bungalow sits on a fantastic plot with gardens to three sides and a detached garage, it could be the perfect spot for you"
Located on the popular residential development in the highly sought after suburb of Dore is this stunning two bedroom top floor apartment.
"Bell & Co Estates present to the market this STUNNING, SPACIOUS and WELL-PRESENTED property set within the very heart of Swallownest selling with NO VENDOR CHAIN."
FREE luxury furniture pack with these buy to let Sheffield apartments. Close to amenities and built to a high specification. Enquire today.A566
"Guide Price £220,000 to £240,000. An elegant 2-bed apartment in an exclusive development for over 75s: Windsor House.
Occupying an enviable position on Abbeydale Road, Windsor House enjoys an exceptional standard of on-site facilities, including a communal lounge, table-service dining, ..."
"Superb, larger than average, three double bedroom family home, with private garden, in the heart of Crookes. Westways/King Edward VII school catchment. Beautifully presented throughout. Close proximity to local shops and amenities. Easy access to the city centre, Universities and Teaching Hospitals"
"***NO CHAIN*** Substantially extended to the rear is the spacious and well presented three bedroom detached bungalow benefitting from extended lounge/diner, kitchen, utility room, wetroom and separate WC. Also having tandem double garage, uPVC double glazing and central heating (by way of a bac..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a property on this highly sought after road within Aston where properties rarely come up for sale, benefitting from superb modern spacious kitchen/diner, upgraded bathroom, small conservatory to the rear, driveway and good sized garden to the rear."
"*** GUIDE PRICE - £220,000 - £230,000 *** Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this stunning three bedroom semi detached property situated within Woodhouse Village. The property is well positioned with a good range of local amenities and transport links including shops, schools, the..."
Only on a detailed internal inspection can the lucky buyer truly appreciate the standard of accommodation on offer in this stylish three double bedroomed extended semi-detached family home. Located in the heart of this popular suburb with easy access to a wealth of local amenities as well as unri...
Impressive is the only way to describe this extended semi detached property which occupies a generous plot. With a family in mind there is great access to all the local amenities and Motorway Links.
"PRICE - £220,000 - This outstanding home is effectively extended, with a fantastically sized, bright and open plan living area, with high spec appliances and is finished to an immaculate standard. Spacious and stylish throughout, this property definitely won't be around for long! Call now to view!"
"This beautifully presented and stylishly decorated, three bedroom mid terraced house is located on a cul-de-sac within the popular area of Grenoside. Ideal for a first time buyer or downsizer, the property has been greatly improved by the current owners including a full electrical re-wire, new ro..."
"This spacious three bedroom semi-detached property spans over three floors and boasts ample space throughout, making it the perfect family home. With its modern kitchen and bathroom, along with uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, this property is sure to impress. "
"STOP AND STARE!! At this well presented three bedroom mid terraced property located in the heart of Hillsborough. Accommodation comprises of a front aspect lounge, dining kitchen, utility room, two bedroom and family bathroom on the first floor and a double attic bedroom with storage located on t..."
"ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A WELL PRESENTED, two bedroom, DUAL ASPECT apartment with a JULIET BALCONY located on level 3 of a McCARTHY STONE age exclusive 75 plus development (60 plus if registered disabled) with an on-site RESTAURANT, MANAGER and a CQC re..."
"A delightful, family home situated in a Parson Cross. The property offers substantial living accommodation so a viewing must be arranged straight away to appreciate everything on offer"
"** GUIDE PRICE £215,000 - £225,000 ** WOW! A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this magnificent three bedroom detached family home, boasting an extensive rear garden, driveway and garage."
"Offered to the open market with no onward chain is this fabulous, two double bedroom top floor apartment which is beautifully presented throughout. Positioned towards the end of a quiet cul-de-sac with allocated parking and lift access to all floors the property would be ideal for a downsizer or ..."
FOR SALE is this FIVE bedroom terrace property located in the popular Norfolk Park area of Sheffield. The property is ideally situated for access to Sheffield City Centre as it is less than half a mile away. Great access to public transport links such as the Super tram and bus routes. Close to al...
"A delightful family home set slightly back from the Hillsborough high street: Marion Road. With generous sized rooms, modern decor and and a sizeable back garden, you will soon fall in love with this home. "
"Guide Price £215,000 - £220,000 A beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor apartment, located in this sought after location and benefitting from allocated parking. This accommodation has two good size bedrooms, a modern kitchen and a family bathroom, as well as the pr..."
"Hunters Woodseats are pleased to market this five bedroom three bathroom town house. The property, which is available with no onward chain briefly comprises; entrance hall, cloakroom/w.c., living room, dining kitchen with fitted wall and base units along with French doors to the garden. To the fi..."
"A superbly presented and contemporary styled three bedroom semi-detached house in the sought-after area of Woodhouse. On the market for a guide price of Guide Price £215,000 - £225,000"
IDEAL PROPERTY FOR INVESTMENT! A well-presented three-bedroom terrace. The property is located in the S8 area of Sheffield which is a great area for working professionals & families. Please call for more information or to arrange a viewing. 
"A rare opportunity to purchase a detached one bedroom bungalow in this very popular and sought after suburb, close to excellent local amenities and offered for sale with immediate vacant possession and no chain. Within walking distance of nearby shops, public transport and excellent am..."
"***Semi Detached House***Four Bedrooms*** Fitted Kitchen/Dining Room***Lounge***Fitted Bathroom***Utility Area***Double Glazing***Cloakroom***Front and Rear Gardens***Close to Local Amenties***Long leasehold
***MUST BE SEEN BOOK A VIEWING TODAY***"
"** NO CHAIN ** FREEHOLD ** Situated in the sought after area of Walkley is this effectively extended, stone fronted three bedroom mid-terrace which is perfect for a first time buyer, young family or investor alike. The property has uPVC double glazing (newly installed 2015) and gas fired central ..."
Ready Steady MOVE are delighted to market this spacious three bedroom end of terrace property situated in the popular area of Meersbrook. The property is well placed with access to a range of shops and amenities including Meersbrook Park. Having excellent links to public transport giving access t...
"A two bedroom, two bathroom apartment in this popular exclusive retirement development for the over 60's with staff onsite 24/7. Situated on the upper ground floor, as you come into the development with it's own balcony with attractive aspect. Within easy access of the excellent ameniti..."
"A BRIGHT, SUNNY and AIRY one bedroom apartment with SOUTH FACING JULIET BALCONY located on the THIRD FLOOR of a McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development for the OVER 75'S; benefiting from an ON-SITE RESTAURANT, ESTATE MANAGER and CARE TEAM with BUS STOP's directly outside the development."
"Guide Price £215,000 – £235,000 Located within Stannington village is a 2 bedroom semi-detached house offering fabulous potential to extend to the side and rear, subject to any necessary consents. In need of modernisation. Light and airy accommodation offering 2 double bedroo..."
"ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A BRIGHT and AIRY, SOUTH FACING, two bedroom / two bathroom apartment located on the THIRD FLOOR of a DESIRABLE McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development with an ON-SITE RESTAURANT, ESTATE MANAGER, CARE STAFF on-site 24 h..."
"This fantastic two bed, mid-terrace family home in Totley is an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity. In close proximity to local amenities, outstanding schools, woodland walks, the Peak District National Park and excellent transport links"
"Ideally placed on this popular estate in Handsworth is this three bedroom semi detached home that requires some updating and would certainly suit those looking for a family home to put their own stamp on.  Offering a good size plot with patio garden to front and rear, a car port as well a..."
"***NO CHAIN*** Residing on a good sized plot on a cul-de-sac location is this two bedroom detached bungalow benefitting from 'L' shaped lounge/diner, kitchen and conservatory. Also having detached garage, uPVC double glazing and gas central heating."
"With great local schools and the park, only a few minutes walk away, this home is ideal for a family looking for more space.  At approximately 1300 square feet this detached house has lots of space and a private enclosed garden – perfect for a young family with kids. The h..."
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000-£220,000 ** NO CHAIN ** Situated in this sought after cul-de-sac in the heart of popular Walkley is this three double bedroom mid-terrace with spacious accommodation over four floors. The property benefits from hardwood timber double glazing and gas fired central heating thro..."
"Guide Price £210,000-£220,000. If you're looking for a modern and charming family home, look no further. Situated in the popular location of Halfway, this is a well sized 3 bedroom end town house which benefits from an en-suite and easily maintained rear garden, perfect for any first time buyer!"
"** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000** Call our sales team to arrange your viewing on this beautifully presented and spacious throughout three bedroom semi-detached property situated in a popular residential area. Offering open plan lounge/diner, off road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden. T..."
"This stone-fronted three-bedroom terraced house balances plenty of living space with a lovely enclosed garden. Close to Ofsted Good and Excellent rated daycare, nursery, and primary and secondary schools, and with an excellent bus service into the Sheffield City Centre – the locat..."
"In need of some cosmetic attention is this extended Three bedroom semi-detached home, situated on a corner plot with Three reception rooms, this property boasts fabulous potential"
"Guide Price £210,000 - £220,000 Situated on this very popular road in a sought after suburb, an attractive well appointed stone fronted, mid terrace property sold with vacant possession and completed chain. Attractive accommodation having been well maintained and with some features i..."
"BRAND NEW is this attractive three bedroom detached home, which is situated in the popular residential area of High Green, Sheffield."
"Superb throughout is this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property having a modern interior throughout benefitting from contemporary high gloss kitchen, downstairs WC, modern bathroom, large driveway providing substantial off road parking, and generously sized rear garden."
Occupying a cul de sac position is this modern style three bedroom semi detached property which is ideally located for Crystal Peaks and Super Tram network and may be of particular interest to first time buyers. The property sits on a generous plot and is worthy of an inspection.
"Guide Price £110,000 - £120,000 A brick built semi-detached house in S2, located over 2 floors comprising of 3 bedrooms, bathroom, separate WC, spacious lounge and kitchen, featuring lean to porch. In need of cosmetic upgrade. Benefits from a generous rear garden, detached garage w..."
"** NO CHAIN ** A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this superb two bedroom detached bungalow with rear garden, spacious driveway, and garage. This property offers good sized living accommodation which must be internally inspected to fully appreciate. Briefly comprising; entrance ha..."
"Larger than average three bedroom, end terrace property, situated on a fantastic residential cul de sac in a great location. This property benefits from a rear garden and is sold with vacant possession and no onward chain. Perfect for first time buyers or as an investment pr..."
"Quietly tucked away on this no through road is this well presented and deceptively spacious, three bedroomed, bay windowed, Victorian terraced property. Offered to the open market with the benefit of no upward chain and immediate vacant possession this property will be absolutely perfect for the ..."
*TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM PENTHOUSE* LARGE WRAP AROUND BALCONY*CURRENTLY TENANTED BUT VACANT POSSESSION CAN BE OFFERED SUBJECT TO RELEVANT NOTICES* COUNCIL TAX- BAND C * NOT YET EWS1 COMPLIANT (CASH BUYERS SOUGHT) 
"*** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000 *** Beautifully presented throughout is this extended spacious three bedroom semi-detached property with converted attic, utility room, superb extended kitchen/diner and parking for three cars. Also having uPVC double glazing and gas central heating."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented and spacious throughout three bedroom with additional attic room semi-detached property. Having off road parking, low maintenance garden and garage. Situated in a popular residential area close to bus route, good road links to M1 moto..."
A contemporary styled three bedroom semi-detached house located in this popular suburb.
"** NO CHAIN ** Ideal for a first time buyer is this effectively extended, two bedroom mid-terrace in this quiet position within Crookes offering potential to add off road parking (subject to the relevant consents). The property benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas fired central heating throu..."
Capital Growth Potential - Earn high capital growth on these apartments as 28.2% house price growth is projected by 2025. Invest now to make maximum return on your investment. A258
"Hunters Crookes are delighted to offer this extended three bedroom semi detached home for sale, situated in this very popular residential area having excellent shopping facilities, good public transport, schools and links to motorway. The property is extended to the rear giving a good sized dinin..."
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,00 Located in this sought after area is this three bedroom semi detached property which is available to the market with no chain. The property provides great access to Motorway Links and all the local amanities and schools which Aston has to offer."
Perfect for first time buyers and investors alike is this quaint and well proportioned two double bedroomed cottage. Located on this quiet no through road in the heart of one of Sheffields most popular residential suburbs this property benefits from not only excellent transport links but also has...
Great investment opportunity or residential. This larger than average two-bedroom stunning apartment is situated on the 26th floor within the landmark City Lofts development in the heart of Sheffield city centre. Finished to a high standard & contemporary style.
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000 to £220,000 **THREE BEDROOM PROPERTY**CONSERVATORY** THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS **IMMACULATELY PRESENTED ** DRIVEWAY **LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN **VIEWING ESSENTIAL** A deceptively spacious and attractively presented THREE bedroom property, THREE DO..."
"Sure to be of interest to the young couple / first time buyer is this lovely two bedroomed Victorian mid terrace home which is located a stones throw from Crookes and its wide range of independent bars, restaurants and coffee shops. No 18 has gas fired combination central heating, UPVC double gla..."
"Guide Price £210,000 - £220,000 Blundells are delighted to bring to market this well presented three bed detached home tucked away on a quiet cul-de-sac. The home has contemporary decor feel throughout and offers good sized living accommodation comprising of a we..."
This two bedroom semi detached bungalow is available to the market with no chain and is located in this favourable area. The property benefits from a recently fitted kitchen and bathroom and is worthy of an inspection.
"Are you a first time buyer looking to get your feet on the property ladder? Looking for a property in the heart of Hillsborough close to local amenities and great transport links? Then this property is perfect for you. With a front facing lounge, rear facing dining room with a fitted off shot kit..."
"**Attention Investors!!Perfect for Buy to Serviced Accommodation With up to 15% yield. Unique opportunity in this current market, Get in touch to Learn more**"
"Perfect for first time buyers and investors alike is this spacious and well presented three bedroomed mid-terraced property. Offered for sale with no onward chain and ideally positioned in the heart of Sheffield's most popular suburbs. Also benefits from having a wide range of shops, cafes and b..."
"A charming two bedroom terraced house with the benefit of off road parking, situated on the sought after Waverley Estate. We believe this lovely property will be very popular"
"***ASKING PRICE £205,000*** - Perfect for any first time buyer or family - Close to local amenities - Two double bedrooms and one single - Driveway ***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this modern three bedroom townhouse, locat..."
"FOR SALE is this well presented THREE bedroom semi-detached property located on the popular Myrtle Close in Sheffield, just outside the City Centre."
"A charming two bedroom terraced house with the benefit of off road parking, situated on the sought after Waverley Estate, we believe this lovely home will have a huge fan club"
" Guide Price £125,000 to £130,000 - This three bedroom terrace is well maintained and neutrally decorated throughout and is located within close proximity of both Rotherham and Sheffield, has bus routes on the doorstep, and is within walking distance of primary schools and shops maki..."
"£209,995 - SOMETHING DIFFERENT - Offered to market is this beautifully presented two bedroom property on the popular Waverley estate. Modern throughout and move in ready with roof terrace...GIVE US A CALL TO VIEW!!!"
"Nexus Point, Owlthorpe 2 bedroom terraced houses for sale in the Nexus Point development on a shared ownership basis. Shares available from 10% - 75%. Reserve your new home today."
"Beautifully presented two bedroom town house which spans over four floor, benefits from double glazing and a gas central heating system, open plan living, kitchen diner, modern bathroom and en-suite, allocated parking and roof terrace."
"GUIDE PRICE £203,500 to £213,500 AN AFFORDABLE HOME WHERE YOU ONLY PAY 80% OF THE VALUE ON THE WAVERLEY...! Uflit are more than delighted to welcome to the market this FABULOUS MODERN three-bedroom end terraced property offering an affordable way to step onto the property l..."
"Guide Price £200,000-£210,000. If you're looking for a spacious family home, look no further! This is a beautifully presented, three bedroom semi-detached home, situated in the popular location of Handsworth. The home benefits from a generous plot and landscaped garden!"
"NO CHAIN * THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS * LAND SURROUNDING THE HOUSE * This three-bedroom semi-detached house has traditional features, two reception rooms and a kitchen/ diner."
"Hunters at Woodseats are pleased to market this well proportioned three bedroom mid terrace house with off shot kitchen and private enclosed garden. The property which is available with no onward chain briefly comprises; side entrance lobby with stairs to the first floor, a front facing living ro..."
"Stop The Press! PRICE REDUCED This property offers much to the Savvy Buyer, whether First Time Buyer, Investor or Right Sizer. With tons of Space for a Growing Family, Off-Street Parking, Extensive Enclosed Garden, Great Location. What's not to Love about this Property? NO ONWARD CHAIN. VIEW NOW!"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 *** *** PERFECT FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER OR FAMILY *** *** OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN *** *** SITUATED IN THIS POPULAR AREA CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES *** *** CONVENIENT FOR THE M1/M18 MOTORWAY NETWORK *** *** READY TO MOVE INTO *** *** ENTRANCE HALL ***
..."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 FANTASTIC LOCATION! SPACIOUS TERRACED PROPERTY BOASTING TWO RECEPTION ROOMS! VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!"
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 A superb penthouse apartment in this very popular McCarthy and Stone retirement development. Larger style and more spacious accommodation than average, with two double bedrooms and a larger living room with adjacent dining area. Having the benefit of on ..."
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE TOP FLOOR Munro Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises of 22 one and two bedroom properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within ...
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £220,000 Hunters of Woodseats are pleased to market this two double bedroom, bay windowed, semi detached house located in this popular and sought after area. The property which is available with no onward chain is neutrally decorated and briefly comprises; side entrance..."
"**PRICE GUIDE £200,000-210,000** 2roost are delighted to bring to the market this end terrace three bedroom property situated on a quiet sought after residential development in Handsworth. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hallway, downstairs WC, spacious lounge, fitted dining kitchen..."
"Offered for sale with NO CHAIN is this spacious three-bedroom semi-detached property. Offering ample living space over two floors, the property will be of particular interest to first time buyers, growing families or investors alike. Situated in this desirable residential location the pr..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND A We are delighted to offer to the market this fantastic 3-bedroom terraced house on The Wheel, Ecclesfield offering no upward chain. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array of..."
"This is a rare opportunity to purchase a move-in-ready property that has been recently built and modernised from top to bottom. Located close to the bustling city of Sheffield, this gorgeous terraced home boasts a plethora of superb features, from its four large bedrooms to its well-proportioned..."
Occupying a corner plot is this three bedroom semi detached property which would make the ideal property for first time buyers. Well placed for Supertram Links this property is definitely worth a look
"***GUIDE PRICE £200,000.00 - £210,000.00***
Chadwicks are delighted to bring to the market a newly refurbished, mid terrace property in the desirable residential area of Woodseats, with all the local amenities Woodseats has to offer within walking distance. Newly fitted, modern kitchen ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this delightful two bedroom semi-detached property. This spacious accommodation is situated within the heart of Woodseats. It is a superb location for anyone who is looking to be within walking distance to local amenities, including shops, cafes, bars and beaut..."
"Exceptional opportunity to purchase a stunning 1 bedroom 1 bathroom apartment 'off plan' in the thriving and sought after Philadelphia neighbourhood of Sheffield, located just 1500 metres to Sheffield city centre and ready to move in to in Q2 2024. This exclusive development of just 6 (cont.)"
"This lovely semi-detached home has much to offer. Located in Sheffield, it boasts three bedrooms, a bay-fronted lounge and a modern kitchen/diner. It also offers ample off-road parking. This is the perfect opportunity for any home hunter. Viewing advised, we don't anticipate the property being o..."
"Beautifully presented throughout is this good sized three bedroom semi-detached property benefitting from a lovely lounge/diner, modern high gloss kitchen and low maintenance enclosed rear garden. Also having driveway with space for two cars and double side gates."
"Bell & Co Estates are delighted to present this modern THREE Bedroom, SEMI-DETACHED home in the Heart of Aston, selling with NO VENDOR CHAIN."
** THREE BED FAMILY HOME ** OFF STREET PARKING ** Located on a quiet cul-de-sac in a much sought after location is this light and spacious family home with great potential. The home is entered through a welcoming porch into a good sized kitchen having ample built in wall an...
FOR SALE is this beautifully presented TWO bedroom Terrace property located on the ever so popular Woodseats Road in Sheffield S8 area.
"ENJOY LUNCH ON US WHEN YOU TAKE A TOUR OF WINDSOR HOUSE - BOOK NOW! A BRIGHT, SUNNY and AIRY one bedroom apartment with SOUTH FACING JULIET BALCONY located on the FOURTH FLOOR of a McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Plus development for the OVER 70'S; benefiting from an ON-SITE RESTAURANT, ESTATE M..."
A well maintained three bedroom mid terraced house.
The Property The property located on an estate of new build properties is within close proximity to local amenities and local schools and also has great transport links with being close to the Price of Wales road offering easy access to Sheffield city centre or towards the M1. The property brief...
"A 3-bed terrace set high above the city in Crookes: Heavygate Road.
With two generous reception rooms and breath-taking views, this home has a lot of potential.
"
**DEATCHED BUNGALOW **TWO BEDROOMS **TWO RECEPTION ROOMS **POPULAR LOCATION **NO ONWARD CHAIN INVOLVED **DRIVEWAY PROVIDING OFF ROAD PARKING **ENCLOSED GARDEN TO REAR ** WELL PRESENTED **LEASEHOLD **COUNCIL TAX BAND: C This Two bedroom detached bungalow IS NOT TO BE MISSED! A...
"Hunters at Woodseats is pleased to market this larger than average, three bedroom mid terrace house with private garden. This property which benefits from additional accommodation over the passageway briefly comprises; front living room with feature fire place, inner lobby with stairs to the firs..."
"Hunters are delighted to offer this stone fronted three bedroom mid terrace home with no onward chain. Situated in this very popular residential area of Crookes on the quiet back water off Lydgate Lane, having access to excellent local amenities including shops, Supermarkets, eateries and public ..."
**CASH BUYER ONY**Two Bedroom Apartment Situated within the landmark City Lofts development in the heart of Sheffield city centre
"Elliot Lane, Whitley, SheffieldFOR SALE BY INFORMAL TENDERAn exceptional opportunity to acquire 10.26 hectares (25.34 acres) of grazing land divided into four parcels on the outskirts of EcclesfieldGUIDE PRICE: £200,000 - £250,000TENDER CLOSING DATE : TH..."
"A well presented, tastefully decorated Two Bedroom spacious apartment located on the corner of the building, set in a popular vibrant area, shops, cafes, bars, universities and hospitals all within walking distance and has fantastic transport links in and around the city including t..."
Good sized Commercial shop with rear storerooms and multiple additional rooms to the first floor above. This mid terrace property is set over two floors and totals approximately 1075 sq ft. In need of updating and refurbishment yet offering fantastic potential and may be of interest for further d...
"***GUIDE PRICE £200,000 – 215,000*** - Perfect for a first time buyer, couple or family - Close to local amenities - Four bedrooms - Driveway & garage ***BRAND NEW TO MARKET – CONTACT BLUNDELLS TODAY*** Blundells are delighted to bring t..."
"** FREEHOLD ** Offered to the market with NO ONWARDS CHAIN and in need of a full scheme of modernization throughout is this charming and characterful three double bedroom, two bathroom terraced house in Walkley, Sheffield 6. The property is ideally located to take advantage of all that South Road..."
A fabulously presented three bedroom semi-detached house located within a quiet residential area in the suburb of Handsworth.
"Guide Price £200,000 to £210,000 A stunning two bedroom penthouse apartment that is situated within this character rich conversion. Open plan living space with large mezzanine level with views over the River Don. The apartment has been maintained by the present o..."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 This lovely presented three bedroom semi detached property occupies a cul de sac position and is worthy of an inspection. The property is well placed for all the amenities Woodhouse has to offer and great access to Motorway Links. Viewings advised!"
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000-£210,000
Located in the very heart of ultra popular Crosspool is this beautiful, period, two double bedroomed, extended, end terraced cottage. With the Peak District literally on the doorstep and numerous independent eateries, cafes and shops at the end of the road,..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000** NO CHAIN!! A fantastic opportunity to purchase this ready to move into and deceptively spacious three double bedroom semi-detached property, situated in the ever popular Mosborough Village. Offering extended kitchen/diner, off road parking, garage and private ..."
Offered for sale with NO CHAIN this three-bedroom Semi Detached house requires a little work to complete the project. EPC Rating: D
"***OFFERS IN REGION OF £200,000*** - Perfect for a first time buyer, couple or family - Close to local amenities - Three double bedrooms - Driveway ***BRAND NEW TO MARKET – CONTACT BLUNDELLS TODAY*** Blundells are delighted to bring to market this ..."
"**** NO CHAIN **** Crucible homes are DELIGHTED to welcome to the market this one of kind three bedroom semi detached home in the sought after village of High Green, Sheffield. "
"Three bedroom stone fronted semi-detached home in Rivelin with easy access to Stannington, Hillsborough and the city centre. Located on Rivelin Park Road the new owners are on the doorstep of picturesque countryside including Rivelin Valley Nature Trail."
"For sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this immaculately presented, one/two bedroom, two bathroom ground floor apartment in the stunning Grade II listed York House in the heart of Sheffield's bustling city centre. The property benefits from beautiful single glazed period windows with secondary glazing ..."
Only by viewing can you truly appreciate the size and scope of this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property occupying a large corner plot with ample space to further extend and develop (subject to planning consents). There are gardens to three sides.
"** GUIDE PRICE £195,000 - £200,000** CHAIN FREE!! Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this spacious and well presented three bedroom semi-detached property situated in a popular residential area. Having downstairs WC, large kitchen, enclosed rear garden and off road parking. The property is w..."
"Situated in the sought after area of Treeton, on the outskirts of Rotherham is this spacious two bedroomed cottage. This property would be ideal for first-time buyers. The ground floor briefly comprises;  entrance hallway, which gives access to a large lounge, from there you go ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £195,000 TO £205,000**One of the largest 2 Bedroom Apartments in Sheffield City Centre."
"*LAST REMAINING 2 BED!*Artemis is an exclusive new development composed of two contemporary buildings, Bankside Apartments and Sheafside Apartments, each built to exacting specifications. Bankside is comprised of 21 stunning 1 and 2-bed apartments, whilst Sheafside has a total of 12 apartments. ..."
"Guide Price £195,000 - £205,000 Hunters are delighted to offer to market this refurbished 3 bedroom mid terrace property which is situated within this popular residential area. There is modern décor throughout with a new kitchen and bathroom thsi si an ideal fro a couple or young family ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £195,000-£200,000
Quietly tucked away on this well regarded road in the very heart of ultra popular Norfolk Park is this tastefully presented and very deceptive, three double bedroomed, detached home. Offering one of the largest plots on this development and with off road pa..."
This modern style three bedroom mid town house would make the ideal starter home and provides great access to all the amenities which Aston has to offer. This lovely property is definitely worth a look.
"GUIDE PRICE ** £195,000 -£205,000** Call our sales team to arrange your viewing on this modern, spacious three bedroom semi-detached property situated in a sought after area. Having stylish kitchen and bathroom, conservatory, off road parking and enclosed rear garden. The property is well positio..."
* MID TERRACED HOME IN CONVENIENT LOCATION * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * LARGE KITCHEN * 4 BEDROOMS * ENCLOSED REAR WITH UTILITY OUTDOOR SPACE * STREET PARKING * EPC D
"High quality, ground floor, two bedroom apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on these beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, these apartments are going to be very popular. Expected completion date December 2022. Don’..."
"GUIDE PRICE £195,00 - £200,000 NO CHAIN Situated at the end of this popular cul de sac, in a superb private location, in a small popular exclusive development, a tastefully refurbished two bedroom ground floor apartment, new carpets throughout, with the unusual advantage ..."
"** ASKING PRICE £195,000 ** CHAIN FREE!! Call our sales team to arrange your viewing on this deceptively spacious two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated on a corner plot which is tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac. Offering ample off road parking and enclosed rear garden. Positioned cl..."
"High quality two bedroom, ground floor apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on these beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, these apartments are going to be very popular. Expected completion date December 2022. Don’t..."
"An attractive three bedroom semi detached property which occupies a private position on this well regarded residential area. The interior of the property is very well maintained with the kitchen and shower room areas having recently been refitted. The accommodation includes an entrance hall, fitt..."
"High quality, first floor, two bedroom apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on these beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, these apartments are going to be very popular. Expected completion date December 2022. Don’t..."
"High quality two bedroom, first floor apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on these beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, these apartments are going to be very popular. Expected completion date October 2022. Don’t m..."
"High quality two bedroom, first floor apartments in such a popular location are rare so don’t miss out on these beauties. Finished to a very high standard and with parking on site, or nearby, these apartments are going to be very popular. Expected completion date December 2022. Don’t ..."
"GUIDE PRICE - £190,000 - £200,000 - JUST WOW! DESCRIBES THIS QUANT GRADE ll LISTED COTTAGE SITUATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION."
"Forming part of a beautiful Grade II listed former chapel within the sought after area of Walkley is this stunning, one/two bedroom first floor apartment which is beautifully presented throughout. The property was part of a fabulous renovation project which was completed in 2020 and enjoys a perf..."
"Guide Price at £195,000 to £205,000. A lovely 3 bedroom brick detached house with a conservatory and a larger size garage. Beautifully presented over two floors with a modern kitchen and bathroom, a spacious conservatory, pleasant outlook, and a south-east facing garden. Benefits f..."
"Don't miss your opportunity to purchase this deceptively spacious and ready to move into three bedroom semi-detached property which is tucked away on a quiet road. Offering ample off road parking, larger than average garden and ample built in storage. Well positioned for great local amenities an..."
"A very spacious 4 bedroom town house in this established and historic part of the city. The homes is a large plot, arranged over 3 levels and offers 2 bathrooms. Our clients have created a large timber summer house in the rear garden which could easily be a home office."
"The property comprises a combination of industrial buildings, including workshop, office space, external yard space and separate car park/yard. There is yard space to the front of the property some of which is fenced and there is an adjacent car park of 0.37 acres. The property is the subject..."
** IDEAL INVESTMENT ** This is a rare opportunity to acquire 4 APARTMENT BLOCKS comprising 24 APARTMENTS made up of 18 x 2 BEDROOM APARTMENTS and 6 x 3 BEDROOM APARTMENTS as well as a block of 12 GARAGES.
*EXCITING INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* *4 x purpose built blocks of tenanted flats (24 flats total) *CURRENT YIELD ~£215K PA* *Excellent potential for uplift*
"This character detached residence was originally built in the style of a Sussex farmhouse and is centrally positioned on a plot of two thirds of an acre. Offered for sale with no forward chain, this impressive property is found in Southampton's premier residential area and boasts spacious an..."
"One of Chilworth's grandest houses that stands in a private, level plot that approaches one acre in size. This imposing and substantial detached house exudes immense character and stature and will appeal to discerning purchasers seeking a traditional family home of enviable proportions with a hos..."
"One of the most unique apartments to come to the market in Southampton in some time. A 5 bedroom, 5 bathroom, duplex apartment with 2957 sqft internal living space & 2453 sqft outside."
"The property, now vacant was formerly a social club which has been demolished. In July 2020 Southampton City Council granted planning permission for 34 x 1 bed, 6 x 2 bed and 5 x 3 bed flats on the site under planning application no. 21/00994/REM. We believe that the Community Infrastructure L..."
"Celeste at Every Step of The Way Property Group is delighted to bring to the market with no forward chain this detached residence, which is still in the throes of undergoing an intensive programme of extension, renovation, and improvement. The property still requires some further works to be comp..."
"Occupying a superb position on a level plot in this cul-de-sac location in the heart of Chilworth, this thoughtfully appointed detached family home has been subject to a comprehensive program of improvement and renovation. ref: cihw"
Welcome To Nunton Cottage! This is an exceptional four-bedroom detached house that stands proudly on the land once occupied by a charming 1930's cottage. This magnificent home was built in 2011 and is situated in the coveted West End neighbourhood of Southampt...
"“Our beautiful home is set down a long driveway and tucked away on its own private plot allowing us a quiet and peaceful oasis. Our little road feels wonderfully rural and picturesque, but at the same time it’s not isolated and everything we need is easily accessible. We’re actu..."
This spacious detached house is positioned in Southampton's premier residential area on a corner plot approaching half an acre in size. This impressive residence is located well away from main roads and will appeal to purchasers seeking a home that is ideal for a growing family that al...
 This substantial and imposing Edwardian detached property displays great character and stature and exceeds 4000 square feet in size. The extensive accommodation is ideally suited to the growing family and boasts high ceilings that enhance the feeling of space which this fi...
"Beautifully tucked away, hidden from the road and nestled amongst its grounds, a stunning residence extending to 2,129 sqft, offering versatile accommodation set in grounds of 1.75 acres with driveway parking and a substantial outbuilding/garage measuring some 41’ x 16’, situated in a..."
"Fox and Sons have pleasure in offering for sale this stunning, charming and unique property located in the desirable location of upper Bassett Avenue This historic house has been restored offering all modern amenities while still maintaining its original character and charm."
"A rare and genuinely exciting opportunity to purchase this executive detached, five bedroom family home. The property has been tastefully and comprehensively improved to an exacting specification and astonishing attention to detail that includes air conditioning to all principal rooms. Tucked awa..."
An individual house of enviable proportions found in a quiet back street on the highly favoured west side of Bassett Avenue and found close to Chilworth. The property is superbly presented throughout with an independent annexe found on the lower ground floor that covers all family circumstances a...
"A stunning, substantial family home of over 4000 sq ft, set in a fantastic secluded position backing on to open fields. Located along a private drive and boasting many fantastic features including an enviable games room and a 360-degree rotating wood burner set centrally within the generous sitti..."
 This impressive detached house is positioned on a mature plot exceeding a quarter of an acre with a delightful leafy outlook and distant views at the rear and boasting a southerly facing aspect. The property will appeal to discerning purchasers seeking a quality individual home of enviable ...
"** No Onward Chain ** Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this beautiful, four bedroom detached house, situated in the highly sought after residential area of Bassett. The secluded family home is available to the market with no onward chain, on the popular and rarely ..."
"Austin & Wyatt is pleased to announce Bassett Avenue to the market. Conventiently located on Bassett Avenue in the prime residential area of Bassett, lies this attractive 1920's four bedroom detached residence standing in a mature and established plot. Offering a wealth of spacious accommodat..."
"This house is part of a PORTFOLIO OF THREE PROPERTIES all located in popular areas of Southampton.  Being sold with tenants in situ it has a combined rental income of £48,840 p.a. with potential to increase to  c£53,100 p.a.  Contact Belvoir for more detai..."
"Situated in a semi-rural location, is this beautiful, four-bedroom, detached, family home which has been beautifully maintained by the current owners. The property starts with a well-presented hallway, which takes you through to the open plan kitchen/dining area with an extensive range of wall an..."
"We are pleased to offer to market this stunning detached family home set in a semi rural location in West End. The beautifully presented accommodation consists of; reception hallway, study, sitting room, lounge measuring 18'6"" max x 12'10"" max, a stylish kitchen / dining room measuring 18'6"" max ..."
1 Bedroom New Build Apartment - reserve off plan today & choose your BESPOKE FITTED KITCHEN with Centre Island* BALCONY or PRIVATE GARDEN and allocated PARKING.
"A large detached imposing home located on Upper New Road within West End village. This wonderful home has an abundance of space and character retaining many original features, generously proportioned rooms and a larger than average plot approaching a quarter of an acre with the added benefit of a..."
This impressive detached house is located in one of Bassett's most highly aspired to residential areas and is positioned on a mature plot of just over a fifth of an acre that enjoys a high degree of privacy. The accommodation comprises a central hallway with a cloakroom and spacious sitting room ...
"Situated on a prominent position and well-regarded location on The Avenue which enjoys the benefits of conservation status, this elegantly appointed substantial family home built circa 1850 has been meticulously renovated and improved by the current owners and seamlessly blends sympathetic modern..."
Avonleas is an impressive detached house in a sought after and desirable cul-de-sac of Dumbleton Close. Situated on an enviable private landscaped plot that is around a fifth of an acre in size. The tastefully decorated accommodation includes a stunning reception hall that has a high-level aspect...
"A superb detached five-bedroom home, presented in excellent order throughout, with three reception rooms, spacious driveway, and double garage. This fantastic family home is tucked away on a driveway with only two other homes, in a sought-after cul-de-sac, ideally situated within a sylvan setting..."
"Enviably offering one of the most outstanding positions in Ocean Village is this top floor, penthouse apartment, boasting an unrivalled circa 8.4m x 8.2m living space. This exceptional property showcases total accommodation of circa 1480sq ft, and must be viewed to appreciate its size, aspect and..."
"This contemporary five-bedroom detached residence occupies a delightful position affording much privacy, with a plot measuring 0.24 acres and boasting its own outdoor swimming pool. The property has undergone substantial redevelopment to create a wonderfully social and naturally bright home. The ..."
"Enjoying an extremely pleasant position within this well favoured cul-de-sac in one of the city's most well requested locations, this detached four bedroom home has the advantage of a superb position overlooking a communal green area which is enclosed by established and mature plantings provides ..."
"Stanford Estate Agents welcome you to Byways, an extensively refurbished and extended, detached chalet bungalow offering an array of well presented rooms and open plan living. The property sits on an enviable plot with a fabulous landscaped garden and benefits from ample off road parking. "
"Nestled within one of the most desirable locations in Southampton, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this stunning four/five bedroom property situated in the highly sought after location of Bassett. The accommodatio offers fantastic scope for making this property the perfect family home."
Approached via a gated entrance this substantial family offers exceptional accommodation with the added advantage of a driveway and double garage. The property was originally built by Foreman Homes and has been thoughtfully designed in addition to being ideally situated close to Swanwick and Hamb...
The Home Agency are delighted to offer for sale this block of four flats. All of the flats are currently rented on AST agreements totaling £3445.00pcm. The block is set in a secluded cul-de-sac in Bassett and offers an ideal investment opportunity. An early viewing is highly recommended.
"This is a meticulously refurbished 5 bedroom house, beautifully finished with particularly good entertaining space with garage and plenty of parking.  The house has a wonderful 9.5m wide well appointed kitchen/dining room with six full height bi-folding glass doors out to a full width patio and o..."
"W&W are pleased to offer for sale this five bedroom detached family home sat on an enviable plot. The property boasts five double bedrooms, lounge, dining room, study, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, downstairs cloakroom, conservatory, modern family bathroom & modern en-suite bathroom. The ..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout, five bedroom, detached house in the highly desirable location of Barbe Baker Avenue, West End. This spacious property boasts five double bedrooms, en suite to 18ft master bedroom, 17ft sitting room, separate din..."
"A fantastic individual detached family home situated within a generous plot within the highly sought-after location of West End. Boasting in the region of 2400sqft and consisting of five bedrooms, two with en-suites, ample reception rooms, kitchen / breakfast room, separate utility room ground fl..."
This character detached house is situated on the highly favoured west side of Bassett Avenue and is set 76' back from the road with mature trees and shrubs creating natural privacy. The spacious accommodation comprises a large hallway that provides a warm welcome and there are two well-proportion...
A spacious beautifully extended 4 bedroom detached chalet bungalow with garage set in generous mature gardens. This delightful family home has been the subject of a substantial program of refurbishment by the current owners to provide an large open plan Kitchen/dining/family room (30’7&rdqu...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to welcome you to Cadland Court, a very rare to market, three bedroom, semi detached house which backs onto the River Itchen, offering stunning panoramic views and is located in the highly desirable location of Ocean Village. This spacious property has the ad ..."
"Welcome To West End Road!  This is a stunning 5-bedroom detached house with a gated entrance and driveway for ample cars and the benefit of an insulated log cabin with kitchen and shower room. Situated in a location that is super convenient, a short distance to Bi..."
The asset currently comprises a former motorcycle dealership (Park Road Powerbikes) fronting Shirley Road with adjoined workshop to the rear which can be accessed either internally or via a separate entrance on Lisbon Road. The ground floor is mainly open-plan and offers a large retail trading sp...
"172 m sq (1851 sq feet) An executive luxury home with 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 3 ENSUITES, a large family kitchen living area and study is offered in this cul de sac location of the popular village of West End. The size and layout compliments modern family living."
"Offers in Excess of £695,000. Rare opportunity to acquire this delightful five bedroom detached dwelling, quietly situated in a highly sought after cul de sac on a sizable corner plot of just under a 1/4 of an acre. There is a double garage, off road parking for numerous vehicles & h..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this bright and sunny detached bungalow, a perfect property for those looking for a home to individualise as some cosmetic upgrading works would be beneficial throughout. The accommodation comprises a welcoming entrance hallway which offers loft access, a..."
TAKE A LOOK AT OUR 360 TOUR! Chambers are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom detached family home set in a PRIVATE ROAD amongst just three other properties. All four properties are unique in their design and were built approximately 1995. The accommodation on the ground floor compris...
"** SHORT & COMPLETE CHAIN AHEAD ** JUST UNDER A QUARTER ACRE PLOT ** An attractive detached character cottage, set in this popular non-estate position, within walking distance of the banks of the River Hamble. Presented in good order, a great deal of thought has been used to ensure the high l..."
"***BEAUTIFUL WATER VIEWS*** Constructed in 2015, this exquisite two double bedroom, duplex maritime apartment reveals 102 square metre accommodation, 43 metre south facing roof terrace with elevated views, utility room, walk-in dressing room with bespoke Sharps cupboards, two allocated..."
"In one of Southampton's most prestigious developments, Moorhead Court offers uninterrupted views over the marina. This stunning penthouse apartment offers true exclusivity with access via a lift to a private floor entrance. The generous, well planned accommodation includes a magnificent living/di..."
"A superbly presented, modern end of terrace house positioned in a delightful, tucked away location at the end of a private lane shared with just eight other properties. nestling in grounds just under one acre in size. This fine home is situated in a highly sought-after residential area equidistan..."
"Nestled within one of the most desirable locations in Southampton, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this stunning four bedroom detached property situated in the highly sought after location of Lingwood Close, Bassett."
"Guide Price £650,000 Freehold. Manns and Manns are pleased to bring to market this beautifully presented four bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after location of Bursledon. The property comprises of a sizeable garden and off road parking."
REF: WA0517 Land for sale with outline planning permission for a ** FANTASTIC DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY **. To redevelop the site with a new building containing 6 SPACIOUS 2 BEDROOM Flats following the demolishing of the existing building. Being situated in a m...
"Presenting this incredibly spacious four double bedroom detached family home located within the private mews of Roselands, West End. Consisting of two reception rooms, study, kitchen breakfast room, utility room, conservatory and downstairs W/C. Upstairs hosts four bedrooms all with fitted storag..."
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this spacious detached house is found in a quiet back street with a delightful aspect opposite the mature trees of Bassett Wood. The interesting accommodation is arranged over four storeys with the ground floor offering a feature lounge that boasts a vaulte..."
The welcoming entrance hallway guides you into the home and leads you to the open plan style lounge and dining room. The lounge offers a lovely retreat with log burner and bay window typical of the period and the dining area having views over the garden. The large kitchen/breakfast room offers wo...
"Leaders are delighted to present this three-bedroom detached house located in a peaceful residential area of Bassett. Internally, the property benefits from a 21' lounge/diner offering ample space for furniture with patio doors leading out to the large, enclosed rear garden. A separate kitc..."
"This magnificent detached home is located in Bassett, Southampton. It offers plenty of living space for a family with four/five bedrooms, two bathrooms, utility room, two living rooms, and a kitchen. The outside of the home is just as impressive with a beautifully landscaped garden and a driveway..."
"Situated in the popular location of Bassett on the west side of Bassett Avenue, this substantial detached family home has been individually designed and built and now offers prospective purchasers the opportunity to carry out some re-modelling work from the original design construction to create ..."
"Save £15,000* on this 3 storey Garrton home with a sociable kitchen diner and 5 bedrooms."
"Set on 0.3 of an acre, this four bedroom detached house comprises a generously sized entrance hall, a downstairs WC, 17ft lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen with separate utility room and a study/bedroom five to the ground floor. Whilst the first floor benefits from a good sized landing with two..."
"This stunning fifth floor apartment comes with just under 1,300sq ft of accommodation and panoramic views across Southampton's Ocean Village marina and the River Itchen. Accommodation briefly comprises an inviting entrance hall, stunning 25ft open plan sitting room/dining area and beautiful kitch..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN! A superbly presented, extended, detached bungalow in the much sought after location of Rownhams Close. The property briefly comprises, on the ground floor; entrance area, lounge with bay window, bathroom, 2 x double bedrooms (one with fitted wardrobes), kitchen, family room with..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - ADDITIONAL BUILDING PLOT INCLUDED* Detached family home with accommodation arranged over 3 floors. Refitted Kitchen, Sitting Room, Dining Room, Annexe/Home office/Study. 4 bedrooms with en suite shower room to the master and 4 piece family bathroom on the first floor. Pl..."
Broadleaf Park is one of the most desirable locations within the Rownhams area and we're delighted to offer this 5 bedroom detached property to the market. The development itself is situated in one of the most sought after locations and offers amazing transport links to the M27 and M3 motorways..
"Nearly ready to move into with integrated kitchen, upgraded electrics and plumbing included but choice of flooring still available to add that personal touch to this unique L-shape 4 bedroom Langdale home"
"This stunning two-bedroom, two-bathroom, split level penthouse apartment is perfect for those seeking a luxurious and stylish city-centre home. The property is situated in a much sought-after location, close to shops and restaurants and with convenient public transport links in Ocean Village. The..."
"This impressive four storey townhouse enjoys stunning views across the marina and benefits from a 10m deep water mooring that will appeal immensely to the boating enthusiast. Beautifully presented, the accommodation offers tremendous flexibility and on the ground floor the study/bedroom four has ..."
"A beautifully presented home in this most sought-after and desirable location, with a well-arranged interior complemented by immaculate landscaped gardens.  The property has been tastefully improved by our clients and will be of interest to downsizers and families alike as it offers a versatile i..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this rare to market, spacious, four bedroom detached family home in the highly desirable location of Southern Road, West End. Boasting a 20ft sitting room, separate dining room, 20ft kitchen/breakfast room, cloakroom, 15ft master bedroom, four piece..."
A substantial home of character and distinction that occupies a prominent position within Portswood. Previously used as a care home the property provides ample living accommodation that includes five bedrooms and four bathroom facilities. The property enjoys a wealth of period features and contem...
A DETACHED ANNEXE WITHIN THE PLOT POSSIBLE RENTAL 700pcm! This property is a deceptively spacious and very versatile FIVE BEDROOM detached chalet. The current owners have fully refurrbished this property throughout. A particular feature is the addition of a DETACHED ONE BEDROOM ANNEXE with its o...
"Fox & Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this delightful four bedroom detached house in the desirable and sought after location of Bassett.Roof felted and re-tiled and chimneys rebuilt 5 years ago, new bathroom and power shower installed four years ago."
"FAMILY HOME WITH AN ANNEXE - This well appointed home gives family members independence and privacy, as well as the choice to mix with everyone as much as they like. WATCH THE 360' TOUR HERE"
"*COMES WITH DETACHED ANNEXE* Having been both thoughtfully extended and tastefully updated by the current owners, along with the additional benefit of a detached annexe, this rather deceptive 5-bedroom property in a very popular location is certainly expected to generate a healthy lot of interes..."
"Enjoying a sought after position in affluent Bassett, this individually designed and Scandinavian styled detached residence, offers a wealth of magnificently presented accommodation, coupled with an annex and wonderfully sized landscaped grounds. Having been hugely improved by the cu..."
"*** STUNNING WATER VIEWS *** Located in the city’s sought after Ocean Village Marina and offering a brand-new category of luxury. This impressive 9th floor, three-double bedroom waterside apartment reveals two secure under croft parking spaces, direct South facing Marina views, e..."
"Save up to £15,000 on this large 4 bedroom traditional double fronted family home with generous size bedrooms for those seeking the perfect home"
"Save up to £15,000*on this wonderful 4 bedroom Langdale home with a versatile layout ideal for growing families"
"Edison Green are delighted to present this substantial 4/5 bedroom detached family home on Willis Road, Southampton. Tucked away positioned towards the end of a no-through road, this property boasts two driveways offering off-road parking for multiple vehicles, a front garden, a detached double g..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this very well presented five bedroom, detached house situated in the highly desirable location of Barbe Baker Avenue. This fabulous, spacious home features a light and airy sitting room, stylish kitchen/breakfast room, dining room, two cloakrooms, ..."
"This spacious and beautifully presented four bedroom detached house includes a double gargae, study, two en-suites, downstairs cloakroom, private rear garden and off road parking."
"**Investment Opportunity not to be missed** 1 three bedroom apartment | 2 two bedroom apartment | 1 one bedroom apartment. Richmonds are pleased to offer for sale this investment opportunity situated in the ever popular residential area of Portswood and consisting of one, three bedroom apartme..."
"Welcome to Moorhead Court!  This is a versatile three-bedroom house over three floors with two bathrooms, off road parking, a private 12 meter mooring and unrestricted views over Southampton’s waters.  Moorhead Court occupies arguably one of the most prestig..."
"SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED RESIDENCE WITH A LEAFY GREEN OUTLOOK IN LINGWOOD CLOSE, Benefitting from, Four Reception Rooms, Double Glazing, Gas Central Heating, Utility Room, Four Bedrooms And A Double Garage"
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this rarely available stunning three bedroom, 2 bathroom penthouse situated in the popular residential location of Bassett"
"This is a three bedroom, detached family home of character and distinction that occupies a prominent position within Highfield. The rear garden is a true highlight that has been beautifully landscaped with mature shrubs, flowerbeds and a patio perfect for al-fresco dining. At the rear of the gard..."
"Occupying an excellent and unique position, set back in a hidden cul-de-sac and set within the prime location of Kanes Hill, this four-bedroom detached family home with double garage is presented in excellent condition and falls within the highly sought-after Wildern School catchment. The home of..."
BUILT IN 1964 THIS UNIQUE EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE LOCATED IN A SOUGHT AFTER CLOSE IN BASSETT COMES WITH LOVELY COTTAGE STYLE WALLED GARDENS PLUS A VERSATILE CONVERTED COACH HOUSE STYLE OFFICE / ANNEXE.
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this bright and spacious detached house is found in one of Southampton’s most sought-after areas. It is perfectly positioned towards the end of a cul-de-sac, a short walk away from Southampton’s sports centre. The accommodation is fitted with b..."
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this detached family home is presented in first class decorative order throughout and is located within a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Bassett area. The property has been updated by the current owners and benefits from spacious, well planned accommodatio..."
"Enjoying a wonderful position within the exclusive Orchards Way, this magnificent double fronted home built by the famous Herbert Collins is available for viewing at your earliest convenience. The Uplands Estate, Highfield conservation area, is one of the areas exclusive to Herbert Col..."
"Tyron Ash Real Estate is excited to present a stunning detached lodge house in the sought-after location of Chilworth, Southampton. Please get in touch to find out details of our upcoming open house"
Fox and Sons Southampton Have pleasure in offering for sale this lovely three bedroom Linked Detached property and is situated in the highly sought after location of Lordswood.This property a must see as well as the quiet location backing onto the woodland.
"Fox & Sons warmly welcome this four bedroom detached house has an ideal location in a peaceful cull-de-sac area of West End. The property benefits from a driveway, lounge, separate dining room and kitchen, conservatory, utility area, downstairs toilet, ensuite, family bathroom and four bedrooms."
"A semi-detached family home located in the popular Upper Shirley district adjacent to the King Edward VI Independent School playing field and close to Southampton Common. The property benefits from well proportioned accommodation that comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, ground floor cloakroo..."
"Positioned wonderfully in the heart of Upper Shirley, we are pleased to offer for sale this fine example of a 1930’s detached family home that benefits from extended living accommodation. Entry to the home is via a porch that leads to a welcoming hallway. Stairs ascend to the fi..."
A detached house found on the highly favoured west side of Bassett Avenue in a small cul-de-sac within close proximity of the Sports Centre and the Common. The property is ideally placed for access to the University campus and the General Hospital while popular schools are found nearby. Offered w...
"A rare opportunity to purchase this spacious detached family home on the sought-after Melrose Road. Located within prime Upper Shirley, this property perfectly suits buyers from all walks of life with an array of local amenities nearby. The property itself comprises entrance hall, a light and air..."
"Located on Kanes Hill this deceptively spacious detached period family home has been extended and improved by the current owners and now offers a remarkable amount of well-appointed accommodation, which briefly comprises: The entrance hallway, a generous sitting room with bay window and feature f..."
"This three bedroom, semi-detached Georgian home dates back to circa 1830 and originally formed part of one large home. Having been split into two properties in the late 1960's, this characterful home boasts features including high ceilings, picture rails, an open fireplace and a two-way wood burn..."
Enjoying a tranquil position on the edge of Ocean Village Marina and the River Itchen. This fabulous home in Moorhead Court offers a wealth of accommodation over three floors with direct water views from each floor. The opportunity arises to purchase this stunning three bedroom mid te...
"Rare to the market do we have the pleasure of offering a superb detached family home, which retains many original features, and is beautifully presented.  This home has been maintained to a meticulous standard by the current owners and offers a great wealth of accommodation set over two floors. T..."
"Located on the fifth and top floor within the original Victorian wing of the truly stunning and historical South Western House, once Southampton’s most luxurious hotel, with elevated views over Queens Park and towards the docks. This extremely spacious apartment in excess of 1500sqft has be..."
"An immaculate 1920s character property on the prestigious conservation area, of Church Lane in Old Bursledon. Approaching the home from the driveway fit for multiple cars, and entering through the original front door will lead you to the entrance hall. The first thing that you will notice is the ..."
"An ideal family home with an impressive 30' wide newly fitted kitchen/family room. There is a large block paved, secure driveway for numerous vehicles, leading to a large garage/workshop and four good sized bedrooms. "
"This wonderfully proportioned four bedroom detached home, resides on one of Upper Shirley’s most popular roads, adjacent to the common and lies within catchment for the desirable Shirley School. It comes to the market for the first time in over five decades, is offered with no onward chain..."
A delightfully spacious extended detached Victorian family home located in the sought after Kanes Hill location. The location offers a wide array of amenities and excellent commuting links to junction 7 of the M27 motorway . The layout consists of a reception room to the front boasting a charming...
** CASH BUYER'S ONLY ** This simply stunning 11th floor apartment situated within this luxurious development in Ocean Village. This three bedroom wonderful apartment with spacious open plan living accommodation and stunning floor to ceiling windows with 180 degree views over the ocean village mar...
"Offered with no forward chain, this generous size, detached family home has been extended to provide well-proportioned accommodation throughout including four double bedrooms. The accommodation briefly comprises a lounge, study area, utility, cloakroom and a spacious dining room which is open pla..."
"A semi detached family home located in one of Upper Shirley's most popular residential locations within close proximity to Southampton Common.  The property offers well planned accommodation with spacious rooms and a private rear garden.  The accommodation comprises: entrance porch, entrance hall..."
£5000 CASHBACK/DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION. Brand New Four Bedroom Detached Family Home With Two En suite Shower Rooms.
" ONLY 2 PLOTS REMAINING - READY FOR IMMEDIATE OCCUPATION - INCENTIVES AVAILABLE FOR RESERVATIONS BEFORE THE END OF MARCH 2023 £5,000 Cashback/deposit paid or stamp duty contribution* *Terms & conditions apply **AN ATTRACTIVE NEW DEVELOPMENT THAT YOU WILL LOVE TO CALL HOME - VIEWINGS O..."
This unique and original home offers a superb amount of potential for either a family home or development opportunity subject to the relevant planning consents. The current footprint consists of two reception rooms and a large open plan kitchen/ diner. Moving upstairs you have three double bedroo...
"A double fronted, detached family home conveniently located within reach of the city centre. The property is set within a large plot, with a private south facing rear garden. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, sitting room, dining room, open-plan kitchen/breakfast room, three double bedro..."
This cleverly extended and immaculately presented detached home is set within a highly desirable road within the much requested and always popular Upper Shirley suburb of Southampton. The current owners have refurbished the home to the highest standard throughout with high end technical finishes...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful, three bedroom, extended detached family home, perfectly located in this highly sought after road in Upper Shirley. The accommodation briefly comprises of three good sized bedrooms, a13ft sitting room, a 23ft family room..."
"Offered to the market for the first time in almost forty years this spacious and handsome 1930s semi-detached family home is within easy reach of schooling for all ages including King Edward VI school, St Anne’s and Richard Taunton sixth form college, local shops, the town centre, central r..."
"Save £15,000 on this traditional 4 bedroom family-friendly home with an integral garage, with our Key Worker* scheme"
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this spacious detached house is positioned on a quiet back street in a highly sought after residential area ideally placed for access to the University campus in Highfield and the General Hospital with Bassett Wood found close by. The accommodation comprise..."
Fox & Sons Estate Agents welcome to the market this immaculate four bedroom detached chalet bungalow. In our opinion the property is in superb condition through-out and is a credit to the current owners. An internal inspection is essential to appreciate the versatility of the home.
"Edison Green are delighted to present for sale this character detached family home in Bassett, beautifully positioned with access directly into 365 acres of Southampton Common parkland. Offering versatile accommodation with 3/4 bedrooms and the flexibility to have a self-contained annex/apartment..."
Deposit Unlock Scheme available on this Normandy home with separate study/4th bedroom which has been thoughtfully designed for family living
"***WATERFRONT PENTHOUSE*** This impressive three-bedroom duplex penthouse apartment, built in 2020, located over the 7th and 8th floors, is the epitome of luxury apartment living and has been beautifully looked after by the current owners. Elm Quay is superbly located on the banks of t..."
"This attractive and spacious family home is located within the popular area of Upper Shirley. Popular due to its proximity to Southampton General Hospital, the University, Southampton central railway station and its excellent local schooling."
"An opportunity has arisen, to purchase this beautifully designed, well presented property. The property benefits from four Bedrooms, one En suite, open plan Kitchen/Diner with bi-folding doors opening onto the patio, separate Lounge and an Out Building to rear of the Garden."
A rare opportunity to purchase a substantial 4 bedroom family home with a very large rear garden. The master bedroom's ensuite has a free-standing rolled top bath with shower attachment. It could easily be made into a dressing room with ensuite or another bedroom! This could be your forever home.
"Pure Estate Agents are proud to present ""High Trees"" an incredibly spacious four bedroom detached family home located within the heart of West End Village. Relishing in extensive panoramic views for around 10 miles towards Winchester from the front of the property and offering double garage which..."
"MUST SEE FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM DETATCHED CHALET BUNGALOW! Perfect for any growing family this four double bedroom family really is a must see! Comprising an entrance hallway, 27ft Lounge, 27ft Kitchen/Diner, 13ft Master Bedroom with built in wardrobes, two further double Bedrooms on the..."
"Situated in the sought-after and popular residential area of Nursling and pleasantly located along a quiet road, this three-bedroom, detached chalet-style bungalow is beautifully presented having undergone extensive renovation throughout Offering excellent versatile living options, the ..."
"Positioned in one of Upper Shirley's most sought after residential locations, this detached family home is offered for sale with no forward chain.  The well proportioned accommodation is laid out over two floors and comprises; entrance porch, reception hallway, dual aspect sitting room, lean to s..."
"Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this spectacular four bedroom detached house located in the highly desirable location of Nursling. Immaculately presented throughout, the property benefits from four generously sized double bedrooms, two of which have an en-suite w..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 ** Sizeable 4/5 bedroom detached townhouse with annexe potential offered with no forward chain. The property is tucked away at the end of cul-de-sac and benefits from a 30 foot lounge/diner with modern fireplace, study, double integral garage & generous driveway"
"** No Onward Chain ** Self Contained Annexe ** Purplebricks are pleased to present to the market, this immaculately presented FOUR/FIVE bedroom spacious semi detached house, located in the sought after residential area of Bassett. The property has been significantly EXTENDED and configurated, b..."
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac within this popular development, this improved family home offers spacious and well planned accommodation. Having been altered and extended to provide a fifth bedroom or study, ideal for homeworking, internal viewing is advised to appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"Occupying a prominent position within Orchards Way, the property enjoys an idyllic leafy setting in one of the most sought after roads in Southampton. There is a substantial garden to the front of the property with mature shrubs, flowerbeds and a pathway leading to the entrance. The elevated posi..."
"A truly beautiful family home with four bedrooms, a good-sized, west facing tiered garden, garage and driveway set within a thoughtfully designed development. The property has been finished to an exceptionally high standard including a fully integrated kitchen/diner, living room and cloakroom. On..."
"This five bedroom detached home has been refurbished to provide a contemporary feel. Situated in one of the most desirable roads in Regents Park, this extended five bedroom detached property is located on King Georges Avenue. This property, which would make the ideal family home, compris..."
"We are pleased to welcome to the market this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE including a modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, private rear garden and off road parking."
"Positioned wonderfully in the heart of Upper Shirley, we are pleased to offer for sale this fine example of a 1930’s detached family home that benefits from extended living accommodation. Entry to the home is via a porch that leads to a welcoming hallway. At the front of the hous..."
"Located in one of Southampton's most prestigious developments, Moorhead Court offers uninterrupted views over the marina. This modern apartment offers well planned accommodation, including a spacious sitting/dining area enjoying direct marina views with double doors leading out onto the private b..."
BRAND NEW DETACHED HOME - Currently under construction and aiming to be ready for occupation in early 2023. The property boasts well proportioned accommodation over two floors and driveway parking
A beautifully designed four-bedroom detached family home located in the highly sought-after village of Nursling with local amenities and fantastic schooling within close proximity. A bright entrance hall leads to the generous living accommodation with a superb sitting room benefitting from a char...
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this beautifully presented three bedroom house. The property is very modern throughout and benefits from- a open plan Kitchen Lounge and Diner, En-suit off of bedroom one, Bathroom, Astro turf balcony, Makeup studio, Bar and Gym to the rear of the garden."
"This is a three-bedroom detached house that has been finished to an exceptionally high standard throughout. The property briefly comprises of open plan lounge/dining and modern kitchen, large private roof terrace, downstairs W/C, two bathrooms (one of which is en-suite), three double bedrooms. wi..."
"This luxury residence occupies the 2nd & 3rd floor of this impressive building and boasts two covered balconies and delightful marina views. The apartment has been enhanced by the current vendors which includes a vast amount of Porcelanosa tiled flooring in many areas of the apartment, a supe..."
"Three/Four bedroom House in the popular Village of Rownhams. The property features two bathrooms, large enclosed rear garden, large driveway for ample parking, a garage, two reception rooms and a mezzanine floor. The property could benefit from some modernistation and is offered without chain."
This larger than average semi-detached house with four reception rooms and four bedrooms has been cleverly extended and altered in recent years to create a spacious and versatile home with enough size and flexibility in its layout to suit most families. If space is at the top of your list of crit...
Stunning two bedroom Duplex apartment set within a highly sought after Marina development in the heart of the City's waterfront with two balconies with beautiful far reaching views of the marina and the water
"Being sold using the Committed Buyer process.
Committed Buyer is a new, innovative and pioneering process for buying and selling property. It significantly reduces the risk of gazumping or double-selling by offering security to both parties by gaining a commitment from both parties to buy and sell."
"We are pleased to welcome to the market well presented FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE located on the popular Fen Meadow development. Accomadation inlcudes downstairs cloakroom, utility, en-suite shower room, a private rear garden, garage and off road parking."
"47, Northcliffe House offers a unique opportunity to own a two-bedroom apartment, close to the communal facilities in a vibrant retirement community. "
"** No Onward Chain ** Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented, five bedroom detached property, situated in Bitterne. The house would make an ideal purchase for families due to its close proximity to a number of good schools. The city centre is ..."
"This four bedroom property has views over woodland to the front aspect. The ground floor of the property has an open plan kitchen / dining room, separate living room, cloakroom and internal door leading to the garage. Upstairs are the four bedrooms, family bathroom and the En-Suite shower rooms..."
"***PURCHASE INCENTIVE OFFERED*** Introducing this immaculately presented three-bedroom apartment on the 14th Floor, offered chain free and located in a prime position in the ever-popular Ocean Village Marina. With stunning panoramic views over the marina and Solent, we believe this spa..."
"For sale on 30 March 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00."
Set in a secluded position at the end of a cul-de-sac is this beautifully presented and well-proportioned detached bungalow which boasts a detached double garage and a superb separate games room/home office. The property has undergone extensive modernisation over recent years by the current homeo...
"*OFFERED WITH VACANT POSSESION* FURNITURE CAN BE INCLUDED* This stunning three bedroom, three bathroom, 14th floor apartment is being offered for sale in the sought-after Admirals Quay development in Ocean Village, Southampton. The property boasts in the region of 1050 sq. ft of light and airy ac..."
We are pleased to welcome to the market this four bedroom detached property located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Rownhams. NO FORWARD CHAIN.
"Almost as good as new! An attractive four bedroom detached property with generous garden, garage, carport parking and south facing gardens, to name just a few of the best bits... "
We are pleased to be showcasing this spacious 3/4-bedroom semi-detached Victorian cottage. The property is literally a stone's throw away from the river Hamble and Swanwick Marina.
"A recently extended semi detached family home located in the heart of popular Upper Shirley and benefiting from well planned, adaptable accommodation.  Having recently undergone a program of extension and renovation, the property is offered for sale in first class order throughout and the accommo..."
Fully let period HMO (6 rooms) with extensive garden and forecourt parking and generous provision of shared rooms and facilities
"Enjoying a wonderful position within the exclusive Orchards Way, this magnificent home built by the famous Herbert Collins is available for viewing at your earliest convenience. The Uplands Estate, Highfield conservation area, is one of the areas exclusive to Herbert Collins dwellings ..."
Located within walking distance to Southampton Common and easy reach to Southampton City Centre is this substantial and characterful three double bedroom detached family home which has been tastefully decorated throughout. The delightful entrance hall leads to a beautiful sitting room with featur...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to welcome you to Estwood, a beautifully presented throughout, three bedroom, detached house in the highly sought after location of Bitterne Park. This spacious and stunning home boasts an 18ft sitting room, 17ft kitchen/breakfast room, 15ft family room, 12ft ..."
"Guide Price £475,000 - £500,000  'The Oak House' Situated within this beautiful, character building, full of original charm and history is this individual 1928 Arts & Crafts three bedroom detached house. This traditional home was built in 1928 and was designed to be spacious and comfortable, with..."
This characterful three bedroom detached family home enjoys a prominent position within a quiet cul-de-sac in the cul-de-sac location of Stoneham Close. There is parking to the front of the property for multiple vehicles which leads to a detached garage. There is a west facing garden to the rear ...
"FOUR bedroom family home situated in the popular area of Rownhams. This property offers SPACIOUS living and LARGE REAR GARDEN. There are fantastic transport links and local schools. Perfectly situated within a short drive of ROMSEY TOWN and SOUTHAMPTON. Vendor suited. GUIDE PRICE £475,000"
"An ideally positioned family residence enjoying efficient solar panels and situated on this popular residential development. This spacious and well-presented home benefits from an integral garage, ideal for storage or to offer the potential for conversion into further additional ground floor acc..."
"Rare opportunity to acquire this spacious two/three bedroom detached chalet bungalow situated on a corner plot in the sought after location of Bursledon. The dwelling has off road parking for several vehicles, a good sized garden & side access to the garage. £475,000 Freehold...."
"This extended and well presented Six bedroom semi detached character family home comes to the market on the sought after Regents park road in Regents park, which is just a stone's throw from Shirley high street with all of its shops, cafes, bars and local amenities, making this a very convenient ..."
"If you have ever dreamt of being within walking distance to a stylish marina with contemporary bars and restaurants, then look no further. This beautiful spacious town house is located not only close to Ocean Village Marina but also West Quay Shopping centre and the popular Oxford Street. It trul..."
This stunning 1930’s 3-bedroom Semi-Detached home with a mock Tudor-style frontage is in immaculate condition. The house has been recently refurbished and finished to a high standard. The property provides spacious and well-appointed family living accommodation that is well prese...
"***SPACIOUS FIVE BEDROOM PROPERTY WITH RIVER VIEWS*** ***360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer this well-presented property with views over the River Itchen and across Southampton, situated equidistant between Bitterne and Woolston. This five-bedroomed townhouse was buil..."
"A character detached property situated a short distance from the city centre, offering a fantastic investment and development opportunity with the spacious accommodation laid out over three floors. There is also potential to generate a future income in the region of £1700pcm. Five generous bedroo..."
FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY  -  FULLY LICENSED 8 BED HMO  -  C4 PLANNING IN PLACE  -  TENANTED ON A ROOM-BY-ROOM BASIS  -  WALKING DISTANCE TO SOUTHAMPTON GENERAL HOSPITAL  -  CONTACT BELVOIR FOR MORE INFORMATION
"Leaders are delighted to introduce this beautiful three-bedroom semi-detached home in the popular residential location of Bassett Green, Southampton. The current owners have completely refurbished the property to a very high standard, and we believe this home really must be viewed to appreciate e..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and ideally situated, detached bungalow in a sought after cul-de-sac in Bassett. Offering off road parking, a detached garage and spacious accommodation throughout, this bungalow makes for a great place to call home. "
"This is a stunning 4 bedroom semi-detached house on a private road. This beautifully presented property is finished to a high standard throughout. The property comprises of a bright and airy living room with double doors leading out to the rear garden, downstairs W/C, a spacious kitchen/diner, a ..."
"This delightful, charming, spacious detached family home is located within the highly sought-after suburb of Upper Shirley, with quick and easy access to the town centre, main railway station, Shirley high street, the open spaces of the common and schooling for all ages and is offered for sale wi..."
"Enjoying a sought after position in a desirable part of Shirley, this imposing semi detached four bedroom house benefits from a wealth od spacious and well-presented and full of character, coupled with a large driveway and a southerly aspect garden. The ground floor is arranged with a ..."
"This seven bedroom HMO (2018/02315/MANRST), is situated in the popular location of The Polygon, Southampton and is ideally situated for easy access to Southampton city centre with its comprehensive range of amenities with numerous bars, restaurants and shopping facilities, including the West Quay..."
"Welcome to Boldrewood Road! Set in the sought after area of Basset in a quiet cul-de-sac is this 2 bedroom detached chalet bungalow, perfect for anyone looking for a property to sink their teeth into. The property does require refurbishment, however offers exceptional ..."
"Introducing this well-presented detached home, offering a sociable living space for all the family. A bright entrance hall welcomes you in and to the front is the spacious lounge with a feature fireplace. The rest of the fantastic accommodation is open-plan including a cosy dining room, conservat..."
"Enjoying a quiet cul-de-sac position in the heart of Lordswood, this magnificent detached house offers a wealth of extended and practical accommodation ideal for family living. Upon entering you are greeted by an entrance porch with a door leading to a large and airy living room. This spacious ..."
"Offered with no forward chain, this three bedroom, detached bungalow is tucked away at the end of a small cul-de-sac and benefits from a detached double garage, off road parking and a rear garden. The accommodation comprises a spacious lounge/diner, modern fitted kitchen, three bedrooms a shower ..."
"On the market for the first time since it was constructed in 1964, a particularly spacious and bright bungalow with a good sized plot set in a peaceful cul-de-sac in the village of West End.  Located within easy access of the village centre, motorway network, schools and other amenities.   Prese..."
"Guide Price of £440,000 to £450,000 Subject to Contract A spacious three bedroom apartment enjoying fantastic views out across The River Itchen. This inviting three bedroom property caters for all with its garage, off road parking with two separate visitors permits and 14 metre mooring, Loca..."
"This 4 bedroom detached house is tucked away at the end of a no-through road in the West End area and has a south-west facing garden and integral garage with power. The extensive accommodation includes 2 open plan reception rooms, substantial kitchen, downstairs cloakroom & ample storage throughout"
"A home of character and distinction that occupies a substantial plot that could be used for development, subject to planning approval. The double fronted property benefits from three well-proportioned reception rooms and attractive bay windows. There is a lengthy rear garden with a large garage a..."
"NOW AVAILABLE TO RESERVE! This exclusive development of four brand-new, traditional style homes, is located in the ever desirable area of West End Road, West End. Built by local renowned developers, KJ Parker, each home has been designed with great thought and a meticulous f..."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this lovely four bedroom Semi-detached house, located in the popular and established community of Rownhams.Mossleigh Avenue is an enviable location with ease of access to the M27, Romsey and Southampton."
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this spacious semi-detached family home is located in the popular Upper Shirley district close to Southampton common and the General Hospital. The accommodation is laid out over three floors and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, sitting room, dining ..."
"Introducing this unique opportunity for investors to purchase three properties located in the residential area of St Mary’s in Southampton. The investment offers a total gross yield of 5.5%pa with an ERV of 5.7%pa, as well as the freehold of the apartments, and as such we believ..."
"This modern detached house backs directly onto The Common and offers well-appointed accommodation that will appeal to a wide range of buyers, including parents for their child studying at the nearby University. The ground floor layout comprises a hallway with a cloakroom and a stylish kitchen/bre..."
**NO FORWARD CHAIN** **VIRTUAL TOUR** Welcome to Copperfield Road! We are delighted to present this three bedroom semi located within the quiet and leafy area of Bassett.Complex. The transport links are excellent with the M3 accessed via The Avenue and the M27 via Thomas Lewis Way. Southampton Un...
We are pleased to welcome to the market this Extended Three Bedroom Detached House located closely to Southampton General Hospital in a popular location. Garage and Off Road Parking
***SPECTACULAR VIEWS*** ***360 DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to present this modern three-story end-of-terrace townhouse with superb views over the River Itchen. The property is currently laid over three levels and the accommodation consists of: On the ground floor an entran...
"A 1930’s three bedroom detached residence located along a well-regarded road within Sholing. Offering extended ground floor accommodation which includes a lounge with bay window, 24ft lounge/dining room opening to the kitchen, 18ft family room and a ground floor WC. Whilst to the first floor, are..."
"Edison Green are pleased to offer for sale this fully licensed HMO currently achieving a monthly rental income of £2840 per month / £34,080 per annum. This property was professionally refurbished circa 3 years ago, inclusive of a new kitchen and appliances, new boiler, 3 brand new ens..."
"This beautifully presented and extended Three/Four bedroom, two bathroom semi detached family home comes to the market in the sought after area of Maybush which is close to local amenities and just a short distance from Shirley high street. The property has been fully refurbished throughout to a ..."
Wonderfully presented 5-6 bed detached house located in Sholing Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units Spacious and cosy living room with feature fireplace Spacious dining room Utility Room Master...
"Occupying a fantastic central position on the historical and vibrant Oxford Street close to many bars and restaurants as well as Ocean Village, this substantial four-storey town house enviably positioned is also being offered with no forward chain. The property provides flexible and versatile acc..."
"Located within the heart of West End is this three bedroom-detached house on Chapel Road with garage and off-road parking. Situated within easy reach to West End High Street, Itchen Valley Country park and schooling catchment to St. James primary and Wildern secondary schools. The property would ..."
"The attractive, modern detached home is set back from the road in a very quiet mews of only three likeminded homes in the popular Shirley area of the City. It offers a wealth of accommodation ideal for family living, coupled with an enclosed easterly aspect garden, parking and a garage. "
"We are pleased to welcome to the market this well presented three bedroom semi detached property with off road parking and garage in the popular location of Deacon Crescent, Bitterne. This property has been finished to an exceptional standard by the current owners and the ground floor co..."
STUNNING THREE BEDROOM VICTORIAN SEMI DETATCHED COTTAGE WITH AN 80FT SOUTHERLY FACING REAR GARDEN! This incredible home formally The Cowmans Cottage within the old grounds of Townhill Estate now known in more recent times as the Gregg School boasts original features throughout including an open f...
"Set on one of the most desirable roads in Maybush, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom detached property set on a wonderful corner plot on Glencoyne Gardens. A viewing is certainly recommended to truly appreciate the size and space this property has to offer."
"This modern three storey home enjoys a quiet position nestled in the corner of a small cluster of homes on Hill Lane, directly opposite Southampton Common. The accommodation is of a favourable configuration, with three spacious bedrooms, two bathrooms, an open plan living room, a well-appointed ..."
We are pleased to welcome to the market this Three Bedroom Detached House located in a extremely desirable area of Totton with schools and other amenities nearby. Integral garage and private rear garden. NO FORWARD CHAIN.
"Located in the heart of the popular polygon area of the City, this substantial Victorian semi-detached house has been a well-run and fully licenced HMO for many years, with six rentable bedrooms and comprehensive communal facilities. The six double bedrooms are arranged over the two ..."
This spacious semi-detached house is offered for sale with no forward chain and is located in a highly-sought after cul-de-sac in Southampton's premier residential area. The accommodation comprises a hallway with a cloakroom and a generous size lounge that has a front view and doors opening to th...
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this detached chalet style property is conveniently located on Winchester Road within close proximity to all local amenities and Southampton Common.  The property has accommodation laid out over two floors which comprises entrance hall, spacous sitting/dini..."
Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this stunning three bedroom penthouse finished to a very high standard throughout and an early internal inspection is highly recommended to appreciate the accommodation on offer. Close to proximity to cruise terminals and City Centre.
"This charming semi-detached Herbert Collins designed house enjoys a sizeable plot and has been completely refurbished throughout over recent months. The characterful yet modern accommodation comprises a reception hall that leads to two spacious reception rooms, one of which has a large opening in..."
"Enjoyed by the owners for many decades is this beautifully preserved three bedroom detached family home. The property is located on Winchester Road which benefits from being within close proximity to The Southampton Common, local shops, Southampton General Hospital and both infant and secondary s..."
"Enjoying a wonderful position on arguably one of Shirley's finest roads, this extended, four bedroom semi detached home is impressive in every way. Upon entering you are greeted by an enclosed porch leading into a welcoming hallway. Stairs ascend to the first floor with doors leadi..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this exciting opportunity to remodel and re-arrange this quirky semi-detached property that lies within a highly desirable Bassett location close to The General Hospital, the sports centre, schooling for all ages, the town centre, M3 motorway network and t..."
"WOW! Welcome to Radstock Road! A truly sensational three bedroom detached house in Woolston which has so much on offer... from a large garden, outbuilding, off road parking to two reception rooms and one and half bathrooms. This traditional, Victorian home was built circa 1884 and was designed to..."
"This spacious and versatile five-bedroom detached home is offered for sale in good order and conveniently located for access to many facilities, including local shops and supermarket, schools for all ages and access to both Netley and Hamble. The property offers flexible accommodation over two fl..."
"Set in this very popular area of Bitterne, this home has been in family ownership for over 40 years! There are many character features including high ceilings, a galleried landing, and large entrance reception. The property does require modernizing to put potential buyers' own stamp on it!"
"Offered for sale with NO Forward Chain this period semi-detached family home is conveniently located in the popular Upper Shirley district.  The property has the benefit of period and original features including high ceilings, picture rails and period coving.  The accommodation comprises: spaciou..."
"An immaculately presented 4 bedroom semi-detached house in the popular residential area of Shirley. Austin and Wyatt are proud to present this beautiful, extended home with the additional bonus of an Annex which makes this home the perfect family home or investment. This home requires no work an..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this extended spacious three bedroom detached house in the residential area of Bitterne Park in Southampton. Bitterne Park is a very popular location and well known for its infant, juinor and senior schools. Also there are local ameni..."
"A rare opportunity arises to purchase this immaculate four bedroom 1950's semi-detached home. The property has under gone a refurbishment and is a credit to the current owner. The property is located a short 5 minute drive from Bitterne village, with local amenities surrounding. Do not miss out!"
"Offered as a fantastic investment opportunity is this six double bedroom HMO terraced house located situated on Shakespeare Avenue. When fully let the property has achieved £2,520 per month which equates to a 7.1% yield. The current owner has been using the property as a prosperous investment for..."
"Austin and Wyatt are pleased to bring to the market Archery Gardens. Archery Gardens is a 1930s three-bedroom detached home. The property has been extended making it spacious and bright throughout with ample living space both down stairs and upstairs,the property is also double glazed and has cen..."
"Idyllically situated on the edge of River Itchen, is this outstanding townhouse offering an abundance of accommodation. The property is arranged over three floors and should appeal to a range of buyers. The heart of this home is its beautiful 23ft lounge which enjoys a triple aspect water view an..."
"Fox & Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this stunning two bedroom, two bathrooms luxury apartment situated on the 2nd floor offering fantastic views stretching across Ocean Village marina making it a perfect place to call home."
Apartment 6. This particular two bedroom apartment is one of the largest on the development and positioned on the ground floor enjoying a corner position with a sunny dual aspect ensuring excellent natural light. The wrap-around corner terrace provides ample space to relax on sunny days and over...
"Situated in a popular residential development, on the outskirts of Southampton, this beautiful detached family home benefits from over 6 years remaining NHBC warranty and incredible views out over the Le Marechal ponds. In a corner position, this home is one of only a few designed to this excell..."
"Austin & Wyatt Shirley are pleased to welcome to the market this extended three-bedroom family home situated within a quiet closed road in the popular area of Rownhams. The property enjoys a most favoured location within the centre of this established residential area, well served ..."
"Built to a very high specification this BRAND NEW 3 bedroom home, architecturally designed for modern family living offers open plan dining and cooking and an en-suite to the Master bedroom. The rooms are very well proportioned. An EV Charging Point fitted which compliments modern family living."
"Morris Dibben Romsey are pleased to welcome to the market this extended three-bedroom family home situated within a quiet closed road in the popular area of Rownhams. The property enjoys a most favoured location within the centre of this established residential area, well served by loc..."
Less than half a mile to Bursledon Junior and Infant schools and the same to the River Hamble and Bursledon train station - an ideal location for a family home
"Hamwic are pleased to offer for sale this refurbished and extended 3 bedroom detached house located in Central Totton. Benefits include an open plan kitchen - family room at the rear with bi-fold doors, ground floor WC, gas central heating, generous rear garden and within walking distance to local s"
"Tucked away within the desirable Hillyfields area of Nursling on a large plot, this extended and greatly improved four bedroom semi detached house offers a wealth of spacious and well-presented accommodation ideal for a family, with large gardens and driveway offering plenty of parking."
"Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the excellent proportions, versatile accommodation, and immaculate presentation of this lovely, detached home in the popular area of Bitterne Park in Southampton, within the catchment area of Bitterne Park Secondary & Primary School. The property be..."
"This Grade II listed freehold terraced property is located in a prominent position within the thriving Bedford Place area of Southampton. The property is currently used as a commercial property with A1 usage. There are two commercial tenants using the premises, one occupies the lower ground floor..."
"This three bedroom character semi-detached family home is located on Eastbourne Avenue in the highly sought after area of Upper Shirley.The property is a great size throughout and offers a Lounge, 17ft kitchen/Diner and conservatory all on the ground floor and three good sized bedrooms, Bathroom ..."
"NEW BUILD HOME - reserve off plan today & choose your BESPOKE FITTED KITCHEN with fitted appliances. Open plan living, 3 bedroom with Superb MASTER SUITE and dressing area, ALLOCATED PARKING, 10 Year Warranty."
"This sought after style of property is found in the popular area of Midanbury and is well presented throughout having been well looked after by the current owners. Internal benefits include three bedrooms, a kitchen/breakfast room and triple aspect conservatory overlooking the private rear garde..."
"Jackson Bailey are delighted to market for sale this spectacular, three-double bedroom top floor, penthouse apartment, located within the highly requested area of Woolston, Southampton. The property comprises: communal entrance with secure entry system & lift to all floors, entrance to apartme..."
"This two bedroom apartment is set within one of the premium apartments of Admirals Quay. Being situated in the heart of Ocean Village, with the likes of West Quay and Oxford Street just a short distance away, the property is well positioned to make the most of what Southampton has to offer. <..."
"This exceptional home lies in a sought after part of Shirley, within easy reach of Shirley’s outstanding schools and St James Park. Having undergone extension and improvement by the current vendors, this attractive semi is truly the perfect family home, with an array of family focused acco..."
Welcome to Garfield Road! This home has been beautifully restored and offers sociable family accommodation across both floors. You are welcomed by an impressive entrance hall which leads you to the primary rooms. The dining room is situated to the front of the property and features a large window...
"An extended semi-detached home located within the popular area of Upper Shirley. The property comprises of an entrance porch, hallway, family living room, dining room, fitted kitchen and reception room / fourth bedroom. Upstairs you will find three good sized bedrooms, family bathroom and W/C."
"Description A superb development of just 3, three bedroom townhouses and 9 luxuriously appointed apartments superbly located close Shirley High Street and St James Park. Excellent specification to include bespoke hand made kitchens, fitted wardrobes in bedrooms double glazing, ensuite facilities ..."
"Built in 2012 by reputable South Coast builders Linden Homes, Brantons Independent Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this surprisingly spacious end of terrace house located within Totton. The ground floor is comprised of a spacious lounge with sliding patio door, a sizable modern ki..."
Welcome To Rippon Way!   OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN!   This is a modern three bedroom Detached House with a driveway for two / three. Located in the recently constructed Taylor Wimpy development moments away from Tesco Superstor...
"Mann Countrywide present for sale a stunning, extended and modernised three bedroom semi detached house (with recent large lounge extension) within walking distance of the centre of Totton. There is a superb open plan refitted kitchen leading into the dining area at the front (with bay..."
"A modern three bedroom, link detached home set within a sought-after location in Rownhams.  This lovely home is presented in excellent order throughout, with garage, driveway, and popular kitchen/diner configuration.  The addition of a study/utility room and spacious conservatory has added handy ..."
"Fox & Sons are delighted to offer this three bedroom Semi-detached house located within the highly sought after area of Totton. Situated close to amenities, Doctors and schools. Off street parking for multiple vehicles and can offered chain FREE! Don't miss out! CALL NOW to arrange a viewing."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this immaculately presented throughout, three bedroom, detached bungalow in a sought after location in Bitterne. This property is not only finished to a high standard throughout but also boasts a fabulous 23ft sitting/dining room, three double bedrooms.."
"Enjoying a favourable Upper Shirley location within easy reach of St James Park and popular schooling, this semi-detached house offers a wealth of spacious accommodation that is ideal for a family. With driveway double glazed and Offered for sale with no onward chain."
"SUBSTANTIALLY EXTENDED FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME!! The very exciting opportunity presents itself to purchase this versatile family home, offering an abundance of scope for those seeking a property that they can comfortably live in, whilst updating. The ground floor accomm..."
"Located only moments away from Southampton University Highfield Campus and Southampton Common, this attractive three-bedroom semi-detached home enjoys a request position in a quiet part of Highfield and offers a wealth of extended living accommodation that is ideal for family living. T..."
"Located within Chapel Road, West End, A detached chalet bungalow with accommodation over two floors, The ground floor has two bedrooms at the front alongside the family shower room, the lounge overlooks the rear conservatory with the extended kitchen overlooking the rear, The first floor has a be..."
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac, whilst being close to nearby schools, St James' Park, Shirley High Street and within easy reach of Southampton General Hospital, it’s easy to understand why Upper Shirley is in high demand. Enviably positioned, the property enjoys a quiet aspect and is offere..."
"Situated in the highly sought after location of Old Redbridge, this REFURBISHED FIVE BEDROOM END-TERRACED property is extremely rare as it offers a separate annexe perfect for self-contained living or separate office space."
A beautifully presented family home in a great location close to the Primary School in within walking distance of the village centre shops and public transport links.  Detached 3 bedroom home constructed in 2018 to a high specification including beautiful oak and glass staircase and oak doors thr...
"Edison Green are delighted to offer for sale this stunning 6th floor marina apartment boasting a circa 26 square ft, south facing roof terrace with both marina and city views, plus a second city view balcony accessible from the main bedroom. Other fantastic features include a dressing area and en..."
| *** CHAIN FREE *** | *** VIRTUAL TOUR LINK ATTACHED *** | *** NHBC WARRANTY VALID UNTIL FEB 2028 *** | *** NEWLY LAID PRIVATE GARDEN *** | *** PRIVATE PARKING ON THE DRIVEWAY *** | EPC BAND: B *** | 
A fantastic opportunity to purchase this extended and refurbished three double bedroom House with attached Barber shop which is situated on the highly sought after Pound Street in Bitterne village which is just a stone through from Bitterne precinct.The property is a fantastic size throughout and...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout three double bedroom detached house in the desirable location of Bitterne Manor. Boasting a 22ft sitting/dining room, 12ft modern kitchen, beautifully presented four piece bathroom, good sized garden and driveway ..."
With no forward chain and situated on a large plot this three bedroom detached family home is ready for a new owner to create their forever family home
"Your Move are extremely pleased to present to the market this brand new apartment. Located on the ground floor this apartment features a spacious lounge/dining room. The kitchen and shower room are superbly appointed and two generous double bedrooms, one of which has built in wardrobes. "
"Built in 2004, Aspire are delighted to offer for sale this 6 bedroom town house, just a few minutes walk from the Solent University. Spread across 3 floors of accommodation, the property comprises of two double bedrooms with a 'Jack & Jill' bathroom and a further shower room on the ground fl (cont.)"
The Property is located in the heart of Bitterne Park area surrounding by local amenities and also a short walk way from Riverside Park. This is also a good school catchments for multiple surrounding the area. Public transport is available heading to the City Centre or Bitterne.
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow in the residential area of West End in Southampton. The property is presented toa very high standard amd the location is very popular for amenities, bus routes and access to the M27. Th..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout and spacious, three bedroom, detached modern family home in the desirable location of West End. Boasting a 17ft sitting/dining room, 15ft kitchen/breakfast room, downstairs cloakroom, en suite to master bedroom, ..."
MUST BE VIEWED VERY POPULAR LOCATION PRESENTED TO A VERY GOOD STANDARD Austin & Wyatt are proud to present for sale this three bedroom detached house in the residential area of Bitterne in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good standard and ...
With vendors already suited to an end of chain purchase this fabulous family home could pose a lovely straightforward purchase 
"Brantons Independent Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this spacious and versatile semi detached family home situated in a convenient location within central Totton. The ground floor begins with an entrance hall which leads to; a lounge or third bedroom, a family room with fe..."
"This superbly presented Victorian Semi detached property has been lovingly restored by the present owners. The accommodation comprises of a cosy lounge, dining room/snug, refitted kitchen, refitted bathroom and three very spacious double bedrooms. Outside the extensive rear garden is approximate..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this fantastic three bedroom semi detached family home situated in the very sought after location of Douglas Crescent. The property comprises; entrance hall leading to the beautifully presented lounge to the front, well appointed kitchen and di..."
* 2 bed semi-detached bungalow *4.86m Living room *Enclosed rear garden *Gas central heating *Attached garaged *Off road parking *Fitted bedroom furniture *Offering no chain *Set back from Winchester road *Close to bus routes *Close to Southampton Common *Viewing recommended 
"This 1930s 4 bedroom character property has been beautifully extended and improved by its current owner and is now a fantastic size throughout and offers flexible accommodation. It is situated on a quiet road in the sought after area of Maybush so is close to Southampton General Hospital, local a..."
"Connells are delighted to offer this THREE BEDROOM LINK DETACHED property in the highly sought after location of Lordswood. The property comprises of a very SPACIOUS living area, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and a three piece bathroom suite, GARAGE, GARDEN AND OFF ROAD PARKING."
"""PLEASE NOTE THIS IS A VERY MUCH AN UN-FINISHED PROJECT"" Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale a magnificent four bedroom Edwardian home enjoys a popular and convenient position."
"NO CHAIN! Mann Countrywide present for sale a three bedroom detached house with much character which is set on a generous size plot in Totton. Accommodation comprises the porch, hall, cloakroom, lounge-diner (with bay window and feature fireplace), conservatory, superb extended kitche..."
"***COMMERCIAL UNIT******Kings Estates are pleased to offer for sale this commercial retail unit located in the heart of Bitterne Triangle. The unit comprises of a commercial shop on the ground floor, on the first floor is a one bedroom self contained apartment with an attic room, the lower ground..."
"Looking for a spacious detached home in Bitterne, Southampton? This stunning detached home offers bright and airy living accommodation comprising of four bedrooms, two bathrooms, two living rooms, conservatory, garage and driveway parking. The property is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac..."
"Apartment 12 Positioned on the ground floor this apartment features a spacious lounge/dining room that offers excellent living space and over-looks the communal gardens, a separate kitchen with fitted appliances and two double bedrooms. One of the bedrooms benefs from a walk in wardrobe and..."
"Offered with no onward chain, this beautifully presented link detached home is located within a quiet cul-de-sac, in the popular residential area of Rownhams. The home comprises useful porch, sitting room, kitchen/dining room, study, three bedrooms and family bathroom. Externally the home benefit..."
"Edison Green is pleased to present this four/five-bedroom HMO located in the central and sought-after location of Inner Avenue and currently achieving a monthly rent of £2,325 (£27,900 PA). A unique accommodation comprises open plan communal living, flowing in to a well-proportioned a..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this large three bedroom detached family home which sits on the original plot of two houses. The property offers the potential to extended and expand the already spacious home. The ground floor boasts a separate lounge, open plan kitchen/dining room which spans t..."
"AUSTIN & WYATT are pleased to announce to the market, this stunning 1930’s 3-bedroom Semi-Detached home with a mock Tudor-style frontage is in immaculate condition. The property provides spacious and well-appointed family living accommodation that is well presented and is tas..."
Austin and Wyatt are pleased to bring to the market Swift Road. Swift road is a four-bedroom semi-detached home with a wow factor open plan living space. The property has been extended and refurbished making it spacious and bright throughout with ample living space both down stairs and upstairs. ...
"Beautifully presented terraced property which was previously arranged with four bedrooms, but more recently converted to a generous well proportioned three-bedroom family home. The property is conveniently located within equal distance of Southampton centre and Chandlers Ford and benefits from co..."
"* NO FORWARD CHAIN * Sat in the popular location of Wilton Crescent in Upper Shirley, this three-bedroom semi-detached home is available to purchase. This home will give the purchaser a unique opportunity to complete an array of works to the property, allowing them to add their own finish and cre..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this four bedroom family house situated in the popular residential area of Shirley. The property comprises; entrance hall leading to the dining room to the front, generous lounge with doors into the conservatory and kitchen breakfast room. "
"GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY | CONVERTED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE | TWO FLATS - TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR & THREE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR | SPACIOUS RECEPTION ROOMS | DRIVEWAY PARKING | REAR GARDEN | CURRENTLY TENANTS IN SITU WITH CURRENT RENT OF £20,880 P.A.| NO CHAIN "
"Brantons Independent Estate Agents are delighted to present for sale this charming detached bungalow situated in a convenient location within central Totton. The accommodation consists of two double bedrooms, lounge with bay window and feature fireplace, modern kitchen, bathroom, and a large ..."
"Fox & Sons are pleased to offer an opportunity to acquire this stunning 11th floor two double bedroom apartment offering elevated views of the marina, water and city views. Further features include a residents gymnasium, concierge service and secure allocated parking is provided."
"This three bedroom detached bungalow is situated in the popular location of Bitterne Park and offers excellent accommodation throughout. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, one single bedroom, a modern en-suite shower, a modern family shower room, 20ft fitted kitchen/diner and 15ft lo..."
"Hamwic are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 2 bedroom detached bungalow located in Central Totton. Benefits include off road parking, 2 reception rooms, original character features throughout, modern kitchen and conservatory. Offered with no forward chain we highly recommend an early "
"Hamwic are delighted to offer for sale this refurbished 3 bedroom detached bungalow located in Redbridge, Southampton. Benefits include a modern open plan kitchen/living room, en-suite shower room, off road parking, generous rear garden and no forward chain."
"***SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME WITH IMPRESSIVE GARDEN*** ***360 DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer this spacious semi-detached home set on a good size plot. The accommodation comprises 3 reception rooms, kitchen, conservatory, utility, and w.c. On the first floor are 3 bedrooms..."
"A Detached Bungalow with potential for enlargement located on a corner position. Hall, Lounge, Kitchen, Three Beds, Bathroom, Loft Room, Garage, Parking. No Forward Chain."
"This extended three bedroom semi-detached chalet style bungalow has been finished to a high standard throughout. Accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises a 23ft kitchen/diner, lounge, separate dining room, bathroom and a utility room. Whilst on the first floor, are three bedrooms with ..."
"A BEAUTIFUL THREE BEDROOM house situated in the popular residential area of Nursling. Offering plenty of space and modern décor, this home benefits from a great sized living space, a spacious fitted kitchen diner, with space for all appliances, a utility area and double doors l..."
"** No Onward Chain ** ** Open House Event 18/03 12:30 - 13:30 by Appointment Only ** Purplebricks are pleased to present to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the highly popular residential area of Nursling. Available to the market for the very first time si..."
"Edison Green are delighted to offer for sale this 3 bedroom penthouse style property situated very close to Ocean Village marina. This particular property is a duplex so is split over two floors (the 5th & 6th) with convenient separate lift access to both, there are dual entrances into the ap..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this FIVE bedroom HMO situated in the ever popular area of Portswood, which is currently let at £1950 pcm. (HMO number: 2018/06079/MANNSU) Situated in close proximity to shops, transport links and of course with easy access to both Univer..."
Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this first floor one bedroom over 55s apartment in the sought after location of Regent Park.
Located within one of the most requested districts in Southampton this charming and characterful semi-detached family home which is offered to the market with the added benefit of there being no forward chain. The entrance hallway leads you to the 15-foot lounge with open fireplace and large bay ...
" Located in a desirable location close to Southampton City Centre and the M27/M3 is this three bedroom, semi-detached, family home boasting a circa 100ft rear garden and a detached garage. Other feature benefits include off-road driveway parking, two generous reception rooms, a modern fitted kit..."
"Mann Countrywide present for sale a three bedroom semi-detached house in Totton which is set on a super-size plot with extra-large sunny rear garden and double garage. Accommodation comprises the porch, hall (with feature winding staircase), lounge, dining room, stunning kitchen, and c..."
"A beautifully presented and substantial older style property is set along a popular road in Woolston. Offering a driveway and a rear garden of excellent size, this lovely home provides two large reception rooms with high ceilings, a kitchen/breakfast room, a utility room and a four piece ground f..."
"Looking for a spacious and bright chalet bungalow in a sought-after cul-de-sac location? This beautiful, well-maintained detached bungalow is situated on a corner plot and offers versatile accommodation with two living rooms, two bedrooms and two bathrooms, as well as off-road parking, a driveway..."
"A well-presented three story, four bedroom town house offering a good level of flexible living accommodation in the popular location of Rownhams, with southerly aspect rear garden, garage, and driveway."
"Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000 Welcome to Archery Grove! A truly stunning 1930's three bedroom detached house in Woolston which has so much on offer, from a spectacular open plan kitchen breakfast room, glamorous lounge diner to two bathrooms and an impressive landscaped garden. The property is ..."
"A Tudor Style semi-detached house offered with 3 good size bedrooms, off-road parking, lovely rear sunny garden, well decorated throughout, large living space, fitted kitchen and original features. The property has been restored and maintained by the present owners to a fantastic standard."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 FAMILY HOME WHICH HAS BEEN EXTENDED TO THE REAR - Offering versatile accommodation over two floors and offered to the market having no forward chain."
"3 Bedroom semi-detached house, in need of modernsation with lots of potential, large open plan kitchen/dining room, driveway parking for up to 5 cars, plus garage, close to local amenities, excellent transport links."
"This beautiful Victorian, semi-detached home is located in St Denys, Southampton. The home features a semi-detached design, with three bedrooms and four piece bathroom. The property is located close to all amenities, including schools, shops and restaurants. The home has been tastefully decorated..."
"Located in the private cul-de-sac location of Horne Close is this stunning four bedroom semi-detached townhouse. With direct views over Chartwell Green recreational ground the property consists of entrance hallway, modern kitchen to the front aspect with integral appliances and new flooring being..."
"This extended three bedroom semi-detached home offers excellent accommodation and space throughout. The ground floor briefly comprises an entrance hall, a downstairs cloakroom, lounge with box bay window, modern fitted kitchen, 21ft dining room and a 15ft conservatory. Whilst on the first floor, ..."
"For sale by Public Auction, Wednesday 12th April 2023 at the Ageas Bowl, Botley Road, West End, Southampton SO30 3XH starting at 11.00 a.m.   A well-arranged detached house offering generous accommodation, ideal for a family and enjoying an established position at the entrance to a pleasant cul-d..."
"If space is what you are looking for, look no further! This impressive residence, built in 1906, offers an abundance of space, featuring a sociable and spacious kitchen dining space to the rear opening on to the extensive rear garden. The entrance hall greets you and leads you to all the essentia..."
"Built just four years ago, this deceptively spacious and stylishly presented family home offers an amazing amount of light and airy accommodation, which in brief comprises: The generous entrance hallway, a modern fully fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, a ground floor cloakroom and a larg..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this extremely well-presented and generously sized detached family home, conveniently located within close proximity to schooling for all ages, the M27 motorway network, local shops, Shirley High Street, the city centre and central railway station. This is..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom detached house situated in the popular residential location of Shirley close to the General hospital. Occupying a fantastic position in Anglesea Road, the property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, conservatory, utility room, cloakroom, fo..."
This mid terraced house is found in a highly sought-after residential area being ideally placed for access to the University campus in Highfield and the General Hospital. The accommodation comprises a spacious hallway with a cloakroom and understairs storage cupboard. The lounge/dining room is a ...
"This attractive three-storey townhouse is located within walking distance of the town centre, the central railway station, Shirley High Street and schooling for all ages, as well as being the shortest of distances to the M27/M271 motorway network, making it the ideal setting for a growing family...."
"Your Move are extremely pleased to present to the market this fantastic 140 square metres three-bedroom Ocean Village apartment located on the 6th and 7th floors with far-reaching views. Being one of the largest in the block at 140 square metres, this property must not be overlooked. ..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this extended, four double bedroom, detached house in the popular location of Woolston. Boasting an 11ft sitting room, dining room, family room, and good size rear garden. This property is offered with no forward chain so please call now to avoid ..."
Situated on Foundry Lane which is walking distance to Shirley High Street is this spacious three bedroom detached family home. The current owners have enjoyed the property for around 20 years & maintained the property splendidly over that time whilst introducing a few quirky features for the next...
Offered to the market with no forward chain this three bedroom semi-detached house would make the perfect home for someone looking to put their own stamp on a property. The ground floor compromises of a spacious living room which leads to a dining room through double doors. The kitchen is located...
"A SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD comes with this maisonette as well as a GARAGE, PARKING FOR 2 CARS & a PRIVATE GARDEN with a southwesterly aspect. The property benefits from low energy light bulbs, fitted in all rooms."
IN NEED OF UPDATING THROUGHOUT - A family home with attractive character features situated in Lordswood. Vacant and no forward chain
Rarely does an opportunity arise to acquire such an exquisite and spacious home. This truly impressive residence is situated in an enviable location in Bitterne and offers an immaculate three bedroom accommodation which benefits from an excellent condition throughout. The property is set over thr...
"Offered for sale with no forward chain, this semi-detached family home is conveniently located in popular Upper Shirley. The property itself is in need of updating and benefits from well proportioned accommodation over two floors with a courtyard style rear garden as well as parking and garaging ..."
"Built in 2004, Aspire are delighted to offer for sale this 3/4 bedroom town house, just a few minutes walk from the city centre. Spread across 3 floors of accommodation, the property comprises of a double bedroom, cloakroom and garage on the ground floor, a spacious lounge with a separate ki (cont.)"
This very well presented 3 bedroom semi detached home enjoys ample parking and garage. The rear garden enjoys a high degree of privacy and river and forest walks are located nearby.
"Located in the prestigious Newitt Place in a sought after and leafy part of Bassett, this magnificent first floor apartment offers a wealth of well-presented and spacious and well-presented accommodation. it enjoys a quiet, elevated rear position in the building giving beautiful outlooks and two ..."
"Located in the magnificent development of Newitt Place in a sought after and leafy part of Bassett, this spacious and well-formed top floor apartment offers a wealth of well-presented accommodation, whilst enjoying a quiet, elevated rear position in the building, giving a beautiful tree top outlo..."
"Introducing this spacious three-bedroom end of terrace house located in the popular area of Woolston. In our opinion, this property offers ample space throughout and is the ideal residential or investment purchase. Internally, the property offers a separate lounge found on y..."
**No Chain** **Large Garden** **Corner Plot** **Large Driveway** ***Please click the brochure button near the bottom of the Rightmove advert or visit the Purplebricks website to book a viewing 24 hours a day*** This is a lovely three bedroom home set on a large corner plot with driveway parking...
"Looking for a family home in the Southampton area? This detached home in Townhill Park might be just what you're looking for. With three bedrooms and a family bathroom suite, this home has plenty of room for your family to grow. The community is close-knit and friendly, and there are plenty of am..."
"Located in the highly request Inner Avenue district of the City, we are pleased to offer this modern, detached townhouse to the market with no onward chain. This spacious townhouse offers an array of flexible accommodation arranged over three floors, it sits in a prominent position on ..."
"***IMMACULATE MODERN THREE DOUBLE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME*** *** 360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** ***GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this modern three double-bedroom immaculate detached home situated in the popular residential area of Sholing. The proper..."
"OPEN HOUSE - Saturday 8th April 11:00 - 13:00, contact us for details. This fabulous family home is locted to the rear of a quiet cul de sac in ROWNHAMS Southampton. This property offers a modern living space with open plan kitchen diner, spacious rear garden, off road parking and garage. ..."
"This detached family home is very well presented throughout with the majority having neutral décor, a modern kitchen with separate utility room, and plenty of living space over two floors. Outside benefits include driveway parking, a garage and an enclosed rear garden."
"Wilroy Gardens is within a sought after, modern complex in the heart of Maybush, that is in easy reach of amenities, Schooling, transport links and Southampton General Hospital. Built in 2014, this magnificent four bedroom townhouse benefits from the remaining NHBC guarantee, and off..."
Austin & Wyatt Shirley are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three-bedroom 1930’s semi-detached house situated in the popular residential location of Regents Park. The location of this property in Regents Park is convenient for access to the motorway with...
"This beautifully presented, four bedroomed, period home is located in an excellent school catchment area and would make an ideal family home. Benefitting from double glazing, gas central heating, bay windows and high ceilings, the property briefly comprises; two living rooms, both of a good size ..."
"| *** GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** | *** HMO LICENCE FOR 5 BEDROOM HOUSE *** | *** CURRENT RENT: £1,950PCM *** | *** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO UNIVERSITY OF SOUTHAMPTON *** |"
"We warmly welcome this two bed detached Bungalow to the market! The property benefits from a driveway suitable for two cars, conservatory to rear and an Ensuite off of bedroom one. It is situated in a peaceful area of Bitterne Park, only a short walk away from the local shops."
A very well presented and spacious 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM semi detached with ample off road parking and garage. Potential for a GARDEN OFFICE. Our clients have extensively improved and extended the home to compliment modern family living
"This three-bedroom detached home in Southampton is the perfect family home. The property is in a great location, with good schools and easy access to the City Centre. The house itself is spacious and well-appointed, with a large open-plan kitchen/dining room and a good-sized garden. There is also..."
"FOUR BEDROOM TERRACED HMO - Located in White Star Place within walking distance of the city centre. We are advised that the property generates an annual income of circa £21,000, excluding bills"
"Fox & Sons are delighted to welcome this three bed detached property to the market. The property benefits from Downstairs toilet, Dining room, Lounge, Kitchen and Family bathroom. Parking is also available for two cars on the driveway, and there is also a garage."
"Fox & Sons are proud to market this three bedroom detached property. The location of the property is situated in an area of Bitterne. The property itself benefits from three bedrooms, kitchen, downstairs toilet, lounge, dining room, family bathroom and large rear garden with parking. NO CHAIN!"
"**CHAIN FREE** Great opportunity to purchase this Six/Seven bedroom HMO property with a high rental value. Situated within a short walk to Southampton City Centre. The property comprises of Seven bedrooms, two bathrooms and separate W.C. Communal lounge. Fitted kitchen with white goods as well as..."
Enviably positioned along the entrance of the marina and River Itchen offering the best of both worlds who wishes an oceanfront setting. This delightful and rarely available two double bedroom ground floor apartment showcases an impressive 1036sqft of accommodation. This property boasts its own s...
"Fantastic investment opportunity to purchase this Five-bedroom HMO property this will make an ideal investment opportunity. The property comprises of a welcoming entrance hallway with stairs to first floor and under stairs storage, downstairs two double bedroom's, communal lounge with..."
"A modernised and beautifully presented three-bedroom link-detached house, offered to the market with no forward chain. This 'ready to move into' home benefits from a 15ft lounge and a bright and airy kitchen/dining room which is the perfect space for the family to sit and enjoy dinner together, ..."
"Nestled within the heart of West End is beautiful two double bedroom semi-detached cottage. Fully refurbished in 2018 and consisting of extended 18ft long kitchen diner, separate living room with log burner. Utility room and downstairs bathroom; upstairs hosts two identically sized bedrooms both ..."
A great opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi detached house being offered with no forward chain. The house is in a very convenient location for Southampton University and would make an excellent family home or investment purchase. On the ground floor there are two generous reception ro...
"Deluxe apartment living in Ocean Village, Southampton - that's what you can expect when you call Modern, Apartment home. Our luxurious and spacious apartment homes are just what you've been searching for. With top-of-the-line amenities and a prime location near everything that you need, there's n..."
"A beautifully appointed semi detached property conveniently located within reach of the city centre and Southampton Common.  The accommodation comprises; entrance hall, spacious sitting room, open plan kitchen/dining room, ground floor shower room, four bedrooms and a family bathroom.  Further be..."
Fox and Sons Southampton offer for sale this beautiful extended three bedroom semi-detached house in the highly sought after area of Shirley.
ATTRACTIVE OUTLOOK TO THE REAR - A spacious and well positioned home on an elevated position with three bedrooms and two reception rooms. Also enjoys a huge cellar with scope to develop STPP. WATCH THE 360' TOUR HERE
"This extended three bedroom detached house offers excellent accommodation throughout. On the ground floor the property briefly comprises an entrance hall, a 26ft lounge/diner, downstairs shower room, 16ft kitchen/diner and a conservatory. Whilst on the first floor are three bedrooms and a family ..."
***SPACIOUS THREE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WHICH HAS BEEN TASTEFULLY UPDATED*** *** 360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks Southampton is delighted to present to the market this wonderful three-bed semi-detached property situated in ever sought area of Midanbury. The property comprises open plan l...
"If you are looking for something ready to move into then this is the home for you. Offering plenty of space throughout along with modern decor and a generously sized garden. As you enter you have a modern fitted kitchen with space for all appliances, a downstairs toilet and a large open plan loun..."
"This two-bedroom semi-detached home is situated in Bitterne Park, Southampton - within easy reach of the M27 motorway and close to the river. This property would be ideal for a family looking for their first home. The downstairs comprises of a bright and airy living room, dining room, ..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three/four bedroom town house in the residential area of Weston in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, fitted kitchen/diner, family bathroom, en suite showe..."
"Abshot Estates are delighted to introduce this charming extended two double bedroom period cottage located just a stone's throw away from the idyllic Swanwick Marina, in the highly sought-after area of Lower Swanwick. Enjoying glimpses of the water, this delightful property boasts a wealth o (cont.)"
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout, three bedroom, detached house in the popular location of Sholing. This spacious home boasts a 20ft sitting/dining room, 17ft kitchen/breakfast Room, downstairs cloakroom, study, driveway parking for two - three ..."
"This detached family home is in the heart of Bitterne Manor and has been thoughtfully extended and improved by the current owners. The property comprises of an entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen/breakfast room, dining room, living room, landing, master bedroom with built in wardrobes and two furth..."
"Enjoying a favourable position to the east of Southampton University Highfield Campus, this exceptionally well presented three bedroom Victorian terrace, offers a wealth of extended and remodelled accommodation, coupled with a good sized garden and a garage. Once inside, you are greete..."
"This four bedroom mid-terraced town house has been finished to a very high standard and offers excellent accommodation throughout. On the ground floor the property briefly comprises a generously sized entrance hall, a kitchen/diner and downstairs WC. Whilst to the first floor, are the lounge, two..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached character house situated in the popular residential location of Bitterne Park close to Riverside Park, local schools and amenities. Occupying a fantastic position within the vicinity which affords a view of the river and pa..."
"The property itself is a multipurpose outbuilding and the rear garden has low maintenance. The accommodation is set over 3 floors benefiting from a lounge, kitchen/diner, four bedrooms, and three separate bathrooms. The property also has side access and eaves available for storage space."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale in the sought after location of Ocean Village, this lovely two bedrooms, and two bathrooms apartment in Sapphire Court."
"This three-bedroom detached home in Shirley, Southampton is the perfect family home. With a spacious living room, a large kitchen/diner, and a private garden, this property has everything you need. The property comprises of two living rooms, a spacious utility room, a kitchen, three bedrooms, and..."
"Eric Medus Close is a delightful cul-de-sac ideally positioned a stones’ throw from Swaythling railway station and running adjacent to the Thomas Lewis Way, which offers easy access to the city centre and a direct route to Junction 5 of the M27. This four-bedroom family homes' accommodation..."
"Situated within a highly requested road in Sholing, sits this beautifully presented three bedroom link detached family home. The property is conveniently located within walking distance of local convenience stores and Sholing train station, which allows access to London and Southampton city centr..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom town house in the residential area of Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, fitted kitchen/diner, downstairs cloakroom, four bedrooms, shower roo..."
"Situated on the banks of the River Itchen and boasting a superb position within the Chapel Riverside Quay development, this modern 4th floor apartment benefits from direct water views and spacious living. Riverside Quay is a recently built luxury complex neighbouring Ocean Village, the apartment ..."
"Enfield are delighted to offer for sale this well presented, two-bedroom, detached bungalow situated in the popular residential location of Firtree Way. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms and three-piece bathroom suite. The property also bene..."
"Every Step of The Way Property Group is delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached home, offering approximately 1,048 square feet of accommodation. The accommodation comprises a lovely sitting room, kitchen/diner, conservatory, cloakroom, three bedro..."
"Riverside Quay forms part of the newly built development located on the banks of the River Itchen, offering beautiful direct water views. The current homeowners have tastefully presented this superb apartment which offers modern stylish living with an abundance of natural light throughout. The a..."
Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this four bedroom detached house built in 2013 in the sort after location of Maybush offered a great investment opportunity or family home.
"Enfield’s are pleased to present this beautiful, three bedroom, detached house, located in the popular location of Bitterne Park. Benefiting from being within the Bitterne Park school catchment, the property consists of good sized rooms and a long private garden. Dow..."
We are pleased to welcome to the market this Three Bedroom Semi-Detached property located within walking distance to Southampton General Hospital.
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Introducing this beautifully presented top floor two-bedroom apartment complete with a large wrap around roof terrace and water views located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village Marina. In our opinion, the property offers some generous size living accommodat..."
"Set in the heart of Bitterne Park, this extended three bedroom semi-detached home offers excellent accommodation throughout and briefly comprises an entrance hall, a lounge/dining room, kitchen, and downstairs bathroom on the ground floor. Whilst on the first floor, there are three double bedroom..."
"Introducing this well presented three-bedroom semidetached house situated in the popular residential area of Woolston. The property comprises of lounge with large bay window allowing plenty of light throughout the day, following into a spacious dining area and kitchen. The kitchen offe..."
"New 3 bedroom property is now ready for viewings. The property is very modern throughout and benefits from Lounge, Kitchen, Downstairs toilet, Three bedroom's, Bathroom and a Garage to rear with also parking suitable for 5 cars. Perfect for first time buyer or a first family home!"
"Austin and Wyatt are delighted to present this stunning 3 bedroom semi detached house in the popular residential area of Shirley. This property benefits from 2 reception rooms, a good sized kitchen along with a lean too which features a downstairs w/c. Upstairs, there are 3 good sized bedrooms in..."
"Are you looking for a fantastic size apartment in the heart of the city centre? Then look no further this stylish penthouse in Telephone House could be just for you. This versatile home has so much to offer, with high ceilings stylish features and an open plan kitchen/living area being the ideal ..."
"Situated in the heart of Bitterne Park, this three bedroom semi-detached home has been finished to a high standard throughout, having been recently refurbished. On the ground floor, accommodation comprises an entrance hall, a lounge, dining room and a modern fitted kitchen. Whilst on the first fl..."
"A detached CHARACTER PROPERTY located in a QUIET CORNER POSITION on an AVENUE on the outskirts of Southampton. The property has been sympathetically EXTENDED by the current owners in recent years and benefits two reception rooms, separate DINING ROOM and LOUNGE that overlooks the ENCLOSED REA..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this extended and immaculately presented throughout, two bedroom, semi detached bungalow in the requested location of Wingate Drive. The property is only a short walk from local amenities and boasts a 26ft sitting/dining room. 17ft kitchen. low mainte..."
" A well presented and extended 3 bedroom family home located in the highly requested area of Barbe Baker Avenue in West End. Enjoying a good size plot the property comprises; entrance hall, WC, open plan lounge/diner and fitted kitchen off with newly fitted oven there is access from the dinin..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are pleased to offer this well presented, single storey extended, three bedroom, end of terrace house located within close proximity to Southampton General Hospital. Offering off road parking, a garage and spacious accommodation throughout this house would makes a great ..."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale conveniently located in the heart of the City Centre in the highly desirable Saxon Gate, this first floor one bedroom apartment fronting the internal courtyard and being less than five years old is magnificently presented throughout."
"Located along the quiet and sought-after Hatley Road in Bitterne, is this charming three-bedroom semi-detached house. This delightful property has been a well-maintained and modernised throughout as well as having a new roof within the last 18 months. Upon entering the property, the entrance hall..."
This beautifully presented Three bedroom semi detached family home comes to the market in a quiet road within the sought after area of Regents park which is close to local amenities and just a short distance from Shirley high street. The property has been lovingly refurbished throughout to a very...
WELL PRESENTED HOME WITH VIEWS TOWARDS THE RIVER ITCHEN - Offered to the market with additional benefit of having no forward chain. WATCH THE 360' TOUR
"A detached chalet style home offering well-proportioned accommodation throughout. Conveniently located in Sholing the property comprises an 18ft lounge, kitchen/dining room, utility room, bedroom three/study and a ground floor bathroom. To the first floor, are two double bedrooms and a separate W..."
"This two bedroom detached house is set in the popular location of Bitterne Village and offers excellent accommodation throughout. On the ground floor the property comprises of entrance porch opening to the 23ft lounge diner, conservatory, kitchen, utility room and downstairs WC. Upstairs there ar..."
"Two bed Detached bungalow is now available! The bungalow is located in Sholing, in a quiet cul-de-sac, surrounded by woodland. The property itself benefits from two double sized bedrooms, conservatory, lounge, kitchen and a separate detached garage. The driveway is suitable for atleast two cars."
"Offered with no forward chain, this two double bedroom, semi-detached home benefits from a south facing garden and off road parking for two cars. The accommodation on the ground floor comprises a modern fitted kitchen, a cloakroom and a spacious lounge/diner with French doors opening out to the r..."
A charming two-bedroom terraced home located in the highly sought after location of Nursling and within walking distance to local schooling and an abundance of amenities. A welcoming entrance hall leads to the generous living accommodation with a cosy sitting room boasting ample space for comfort...
"Offered with no forward chain is this three bedroom semi-detached character Collins built home in the popular area of Thornhill Park. Close to many amenities, public transport and motorway access. This deceptively spacious family home offers a generous plot which provides off road parking for num..."
"Situated in the desirable location of Maybush, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached property on Romsey Road. The property comprises of a lounge, spacious kitchen/dining area, conservatory, three good sized bedrooms and a three piece shower suite."
"A three bedroom, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, two bathrooms, SEMI-DETACHED EXTENDED PROPERTY with OFF ROAD PARKING to the front. The property also benefits from WHEELCHAIR ACCESS THROUGHOUT!"
This wonderful 3 storey period property offers superb living standards over three floors having not only three floors and three bedrooms but three bathrooms. The property has been superbly renovated over the last few years and has many original features as well as a modern twist. 
"***WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH 11M GARAGE AND WORKSHOP*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer this well-presented three-bedroom semi-detached home. The property comprises on the ground floor a lounge, great size kitchen/diner, and a bathroom. On the first floor are three bedroo..."
"**5 BED HMO FOR SALE IN PORTSWOOD** This great student house is currently let till September 2023 at £1900pcm. (HMO Licence number: 2018/04153/MANRSU) The property comprises entrance hall, leading to the generous living space which is open plan to the kitchen area. Two of t..."
"**5 BED HMO FOR SALE IN PORTSWOOD** This great student house is currently let till September 2023 at £1800 pcm. (HMO Licence number: 2018/04152/ADDRSU) The property comprises entrance hall, leading to the generous living space which is open plan to the large kitchen area an..."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached family home in a popular area of Archer Grove. The property has been modernised to a very high standard, with three bedrooms, a large open living space and a brand new modern fitted kitchen. Further benefits include a garden office, double driveway."
"WELL PRESENTED HOME LOCATED CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE - Large open plan kitchen/diner, two ground floor reception rooms and three good size bedrooms"
"Offered for sale with the no forward chain, this well-proportioned three-bedroom semi-detached house located within walking distance of The General Hospital and St James Park, whilst also providing quick and easy access to both the M3 and M27 motorway networks, Shirley High Street and the city ce..."
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac, this 3/4 bedroom detached family home is located in a great and accessible area. The property boasts a double-width driveway and garage, and a good-sized terraced garden with a wooden decking area. The property is offered with no forward chain, viewing is recommended."
"This immaculately presented and cleverly extended three-bedroom, semi-detached house is situated on a generous plot. Built in the mid-1990s, the house has been much loved and looked after over the years by the current owners and is the ideal 'turnkey' home for those looking for something with no..."
"A completely refurbished three bedroom semi-detached home in Sholing, available with no forward chain. Offering an open plan kitchen/diner with fitted appliances, a stunning bathroom suite, driveway and landscaped front and rear gardens. Having undergone a significant level of work, the property ..."
"Set within Waterside Park and offering shoreline walks just moments away from your front door, is this outstanding three bedroom home with two parking spaces and a recently completed kitchen/dining extension with bi-folding doors. Presented to an excellent standard throughout, the property in bri..."
"This spacious detached bungalow in Thornhill is presented in immaculate condition by the current owner making this a home you can move straight into with out the need for any redecoration. Boasting a large lounge/diner overlooking the rear garden, a modern kitchen and shower room, and two bedroo..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house situated n the popular loaction of Suffolk Avenue ideal for a residential home or investment (with an HMO licence for five). The property comprises three reception rooms, kitchen, three bedrooms and a two ..."
"There is a rare opportunity to purchase this 4 bedroom detached family home, located in a quiet cul de sac in Shirley. The property comprises of a spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen, breakfast room, and large bedroom with an en suite bathroom downstairs, with a further 3 bedrooms and fam (cont.)"
"Enjoying a wonderful position fronting St James Park, this attractive period home offers a wealth of elegantly presented accommodation that has been sympathetically refurbished blending modern fixtures and fitting with period charm. This highly requested Upper Shirley location falls within popul..."
"Looking for a spacious and well-connected bungalow in a popular and sought-after location? This two-bedroom detached bungalow with a private and low maintenance garden could be just what you're looking for. The bungalow benefits from double glazing and gas central heating throughout, a..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to present this impressive three bedroom, end of terrace house in West End. The property boasts a garage, driveway parking, cloakroom, secluded rear garden and is being offered with no forward chain. An internal viewing is very highly recommended. "
"Fox and Sons Southampton are pleased to offer for sale this lovely three bedroom semi-detached house located in the quiet residential Cul De Sac of Cowley Close in Maybush, within close proximity to Southampton General Hospital."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to present this impressive & extended three bedroom, semi detached house situated on a corner plot in Sholing. The property boasts a 24ft x 16ft lounge/dining room, cloakroom, garage & is being offered with no forward chain. An internal viewing is recommended."
"Located in the heart of glorious Highfield, this extended end of terrace home enjoys a peaceful position, nestled in a small cul-de-sac, only moments from Southampton University Highfield Campus and Southampton Common. The property is in need of some updating and offers an array of acc..."
"An extended and very large five bedroom Victorian terrace house offering a wealth of accommodation that requires refurbishment, located in the popular Newtown district of the city. With accommodation arranged over two floors; the ground floor has a large hallway with under-stair storag..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented, three bedroom, semi detached house in the popular location of Polygon, Southampton. This spacious property currently has an HMO Licence and offers an 11ft sitting room, 11ft dining room, 14ft kitchen/breakfast room, 14ft ..."
"A spacious three double bedroom Victorian terraced house which has recently been extensively refurbished throughout. The property is within easy reach of the town centre, The Common and Solent University and is registered as an HMO with Southampton City Council. Internally the well laid out and ..."
"MUST BE VIEWED MOTIVATED SELLER Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom detached bungalow in the residential area of Sholing in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good condition and the accommodation comprises of lounge, di..."
"** CHAIN FREE ** A character four bedroom semi detached house, located in the heart of the popular polygon area of the City, this Victorian semi-detached house has been a well-run and fully licenced HMO for many years. The property benefits from entrance hall with stairs to first floor, two recep..."
Austin & Wyatt Shirley welcome to the market this 3 bedroom semi-detached family home. An internal viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the space there is to offer. Heysham Road is situated within close proximity to local shops situated on Shirley High Street whi...
"Jackson Bailey are delighted to market for sale this three-bedroom semi-detached family home located in the highly requested area of St Denys. The property comprises: entry way, living room with feature bay window & fireplace, dining room & refitted kitchen. The first floor boasts the propert..."
VIEWS of SOUTHAMPTON WATER and NO CHAIN offered with this spacious 3 bedroom end terrace home. There is a garage with additional parking. The lay out compliments modern family living.
A rare and genuinely exciting opportunity to purchase this three-bedroom Victorian semi-detached property which is situated on the banks of the River Itchen. This character property enjoys the use of a pontoon with southernly facing garden with uninterrupted water views along the river towards So...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout, three bedroom, semi detached house in the desirable location of Midanbury. Boasting a 13ft sitting room, 17ft stunning and stylish kitchen/breakfast room, 12ft conservatory, downstairs cloakroom, well presented ..."
"An immaculate two-bedroom end of terrace home located in the highly sought-after village of Nursling, with local amenities and fantastic schooling within close proximity. A welcoming hallway provides access to the ground floor accommodation with a spacious sitting room creating an instant impress..."
Your Move are extremely pleased to present to the market this brand new apartment. Located on the second floor this apartment features a spacious lounge/dining room. The kitchen and shower room are superbly appointed and the generous double bedroom has a walk in wardrobe. The communal ...
"Situated in the highly sought after location of Maybush, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom end of terrace property in Wilroy Gardens."
"A stunning 2 double bedroom home with a substantial conservatory effectively creating another reception. Our client has undertaken many improvements including the most recent, an oak staircase."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this spacious, four bedroom, end of terrace townhouse in the popular location of Woolston. The property benefits from water views to the rear of the property, a balcony, private courtyard garden, en suite to master bedroom, integral garage, driveway ..."
NO FORWARD CHAIN - A delightful three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the sought after area of Maybush
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this extended three/four bedroom detached house in the residential area of Sholing in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen..."
"Connells are delighted to offer this three bedroom link detached property in the highly sought after location of Lordswood. The property comprises of a very spacious living/dining area, kitchen, conservatory, three upstairs bedrooms and a three piece bathroom suite."
"Introducing this very well presented three bedroom family home located just a short distance from Southampton city centre. In our opinion the current owner has kept the property to a high standard and must be seen to appreciate everything it has to offer. Internally, the property has a moder..."
This beautifully kept four bedroom HMO comes to the market for the first time in decades. It enjoys a sought after position in the heart of The Polygon and is available for investment purchase with tenant secured for the 2022/2023 academic year. The accommodation is arranged over tw...
"This extended, three bedroom mid-terraced house with loft room offers excellent accommodation and has been finished to a high standard throughout. On the ground floor the property comprises an entrance porch, downstairs WC, kitchen/diner and lounge. On the first floor there are three bedrooms, wi..."
"A delightful 4 bedroom semi-detached property ideally situated for good local school catchments and boasts off road parking for 2 cars as well as a double garage. The property itself is presented in good order and offers a light and airy living space, and a low maintenance garden."
"Edison Green are delighted to present this stunning, approx 1120sq ft, first floor, two double bedroom apartment located within Southampton City Centre. The apartment has a large 20'6 x 18'4 lounge/diner with historic city and partial water views. There is a 16'4 x 11'7 master bedroom with ensuit..."
A lovely 3 bedroom semi-detached house in the popular area of Lordswood. This property offers great potential with off road parking and garage. This ideal family home has an open planned kitchen dining room and a separate living space. An internal viewing is highly recommended as this property wo...
***360 VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to offer to the market this spacious four-bedroom semi-detached House. The property like many in this area is subject to a Pepper Corn Lease. Over 900 years remain and the ground rent charge is only £5 per year. Located in the popu...
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this modern three bedroom mid terraced house in the residential area of Weston in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a good standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, fitted kitchen, family bathroom, en suite shower..."
"This end terrace family home provides ample living space, with good sized gardens to both the front and the rear of the property. Benefits include three bedrooms, a spacious lounge/diner, downstairs cloakroom and garage with parking. "
"***SPACIOUS APARTMENT WITH MARINA VIEWS FROM A LARGE BALCONY*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer this two-double bedroom waterside apartment located in the ever-popular Ocean Village with a private balcony boasting marina views, secure allocated parking, friendly concierge service. This ligh..."
"Hamwic Independent Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale for the first time in over 50 years this extended end terraced character property located in central Totton. The property benefits from many original character features including handmade fireplaces, two reception rooms, ground floor bat"
"THREE BEDROOM VICTORIAN SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH AN INCREDIBLE 120FT GARDEN! This modern family home boasts a 12ft Lounge with bay window to front, separate Dining Room with under stairs storage. Modern Kitchen with built in gas hob and electric oven, rear access to the garden and the gener..."
"This extended three bedroom semi-detached house offers excellent accommodation throughout. Accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises an entrance hall, lounge with bay window, 18ft kitchen/diner, conservatory, utility room and downstairs WC. Whilst on the first floor there are three bedr..."
This beautifully kept three bedroom HMO comes to the market for the first time in decades. It enjoys a sought after position in the heart of The outer avenue and is available for investment purchase or as a personal property. The accommodation is arranged over two floors with a comm...
Charters are delighted to offer to market this beautifully presented modern and chic two-bedroom mid terrace property in a quiet and tucked away yet conveniently positioned setting in the always popular Regents Park. The bright and spacious accommodation is split over four floors with steps to ea...
"This heavily extended Collins house now offers over 1,100sqft of accommodation & side access to a landscaped rear garden.
In addition to three spacious bedrooms there is a 22´4 x 11´9 kitchen/diner, a 20´3 x 11´ living room with feature bay window & a separate bathroom..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom detached house in the residential area of Bitterne in Southampton. The property in our opinion would benefit from some updating and the accommodation comprises of lounge/diner, sitting room, fitted kitchen and bathroom, three b..."
"Set within a quiet cul-de-sac and located in a very popular road in Sholing, is this two bedroom detached bungalow being offered for sale with no forward chain. The property comprises two double bedrooms, a spacious living room, modern re-fitted kitchen leading to a large conservatory and a moder..."
"This exceptionally well presented Victorian home is situated in a quiet location close to St James's Park on a no through road. Offering three bedrooms, first floor bathroom, lounge/dining room, kitchen, delightful rear garden approximately 80 ft in length. No onward chain, viewing essential."
PRESENTED TO A VERY HIGH STANDARD VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house in the residential area of Townhill Park in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very high standard and the ...
"A truly charming, two bedroom cottage that has been tastefully decorated throughout the property. The property is nestled in a convenient location, enjoying a prominent position situated on Southampton's Old Town walls. The entrance hall leads into an open plan sitting/dining room which draws in ..."
"Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented, 2 bedroom penthouse apartment located in the heart of Southampton City centre. The duplex apartment boasts stunning city views which can be appreciated from two balconies. The flat also benefits from a lar..."
"Royal Crescent Apartments were constructed in 2018 and are located in a prominent position on the outskirts of Ocean Village, close to Oxford Street and Southampton City Centre. This stylish two-bedroom apartment is located on the second floor and offers approximately 766 square foot of internal ..."
"This extremely spacious, ground floor, two-bedroom apartment, offered with no forward chain, is located within the highly sought-after and exclusive gated development of Providence Park, on the favoured west side of Bassett Avenue. The property benefits from easy access to the M3 motorway network..."
"Situated on Peterborough Road within Inner Avenue is this beautifully presented mid terraced property which benefits from an extended open plan kitchen dining room to the rear. Inner Avenue is a popular location due to being in close proximity to Southampton City Centre, The Southampton Common an..."
SIMPLY STUNNING and CONVENIENTLY SITUATED between Bitterne and Woolston. This character property has been considerably enhanced and beautifully maintained by the current owners. There is a lounge to the front aspect with a feature bay window and fireplace. The property has been extended...
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, semi detached house with character features in the popular location of Charlton Road. Occupying a fantastic position within the SO15 postcode, the property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen, cloakroom, three bedrooms an..."
"This three-bedroom, semi-detached family home is located in a quiet cul-de-sac position in the ever popular residential location of Bitterne Park. The property benefits from an elevated position with fantastic views neighbouring the conservation area of Frogs Copse and is also within walking dist..."
"This charming grade two listed end of terrace, thatched cottage is positioned in a delightful conservation area location overlooking the green and within walking distance of Bassett Wood. The property will appeal to a wide variety of potential buyers seeking a historic home as thatched cottages a..."
"Occupying a superb position, within walking distance of the bustling heart of West End, local shops and bus stops; this three bedroom semi-detached home is perfect for a variety of different buyers. To the front of the property is a driveway with space for two cars, with further scope to enlarge ..."
"This is a three-bedroom terraced home in Lordswood, Southampton. The property is within walking distance of Southampton General & Princess Ann Hospital, local schools and amenities, and offers great access to public transport links. The house would be ideal for a family or first-time buyers. ..."
***NO FORWARD CHAIN*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this spacious three-bedroom house with a garage in the sought-after Lower Swanwick area. The location is well served by local amenities such as shops and schools and offers excellent transportation links to all parts of the ar...
"Hamwic Independent Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this 3 bedroom end terraced house located in Lordswood, Southampton. Benefits include separate lounge, separate dining room, garage, off road parking, modern kitchen and bathroom. We highly recommend an early viewing."
Kings Estates present this four bedroom licensed HMO to the market located in the Swaythling district of Southampton. Please contact Kings Estates to arrange a viewing. 
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this immaculately presented throughout, three bedroom, semi detached house in the popular location of West End Park, Benefitting from an open plan living area, wood burning stove, modern kitchen and bathroom, well presented rear garden and driveway ..."
This spacious top floor apartment is set within mature grounds of eight acres and positioned in a courtyard setting that is approached via automated gates and a 170-yard woodland drive. The generous hallway creates a favourable impression and has two useful cupboards and a large hatch with a fold...
***SPACIOUS FAMILY THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME ALSO WITH THREE RECEPTION ROOMS AND NEW KITCHEN*** ***NO FORWARD CHAIN*** ***360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer to the market this spacious three-bedroom semi-detached home. The property comprises a newly fitted ki...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this three bedroom, detached chalet bungalow, in the sought after location of Wellington Avenue. Boasting a 19ft sitting room, three double bedrooms, southerly facing rear garden and driveway parking. This property is offered with no forward chain ..."
"Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached property on Prince of Wales Avenue. This property which would make the ideal family home comprises of a lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms, shower room and outside is a large rear garden & off road parking!"
A substantial property comprising of four bedsits and a one-bedroom flat. The property requires a full refurbishment and has lots of potential for redevelopment (STP). Shirley is a popular residential area with Southampton Common found close by that offers hundreds of acres ...
"Guide Price £300,000 Two bedroom apartment situated on the first floor of this impressive manor house with views towards the communal garden and surrounding woodland. No forward chain."
"BEING SOLD WITH VACANT POSSESSION AND NO ONWARD CHAIN!!! The exciting opportunity presents itself to purchase 'Walnut Cottage', a charming semi-detached cottage nearby to West End high street. The ground floor accommodation of the property briefly consists of a entrance porch and hall..."
"This extended three bedroom semi-detached home, situated in the popular location of Sholing, has been finished to a high standard throughout and boast excellent accommodation. On the ground floor, the property briefly comprises an entrance hall, downstairs WC/utility, a lounge which is open to th..."
"AVAILABLE AT £300,000 - > Three bedroom two reception semi detached house > Requiring complete refurbishment > Popular area close to Southampton University"
"Set on a generous sized corner plot and being offered for sale with no forward chain, is this well-presented two/three bedroom detached bungalow. The well-proportioned property comprises a large lounge/dining room, two double bedrooms, utility room/bedroom three, fitted kitchen and shower room, w..."
"This three bedroom terrace house is conveniently located in a popular area with good schools, close to shops and restaurants. It offers spacious accommodation over two floors, with a bright and airy living room, a modern kitchen and a large family dining room. There is also a private enclosed gar..."
"If you are looking for a home with a ""WOW"" factor, look no further! This character style home has so much on offer and is presented beautifully throughout, retaining the original charm whilst boasting modern twists. The ground floor features a gorgeous lounge with bay window and log burner, two f..."
"Hampton Place, a stunning new development of 49 apartments, exclusively designed for the over 60's. Located on a quiet road in Shirley and less than half a mile from an abundance of local amenities, Hampton Place offers a fantastic environment for peaceful living with the convenience of local sho..."
"With the advantage of OFF ROAD PARKING this three storey townhouse house offers a range of features to include recent redecoration and newly fitted carpets, thoughtfully appointed four piece bathroom suite including a walk in double width shower, modern fitted kitchen with both integral and frees..."
"Located in a quiet, yet convenient and central location nestled in between Shirley High Street and Southampton town centre, this beautifully presented and generously sized accommodation is a perfect home for first-time buyers, those downsizing or buy to let landlords. The entrance hallway with s..."
"**ATTENTION INVESTORS** Fox & Sons are pleased to offer for sale this Semi-Detached property currently being occupied as as a fully licensed HMO. The property is let from 13th July 2022 at the rental income of £1,550pcm (bills excluded)."
"***PRISTINE DUPLEX APARTMENT*** Ideally situated for city living this modern and stylish, duplex, two-bedroom apartment which has been recently improved is a must see! On entering the apartment, the accommodation is set over two floors, offering space and comfortable living. The living..."
"Welcome to Kathleen! A character, two / three bedroom semi-detached cottage which occupies a truly sensational, mature plot, with an impressive rear garden, garage and a generous, hedge bordered driveway. The grounds of this beautiful, character cottage really set this home apart! Bordered by bed..."
"Stylishly appointed eighth floor 2 bedroom apartment complete with a balcony and full-height windows with views over the River Itchen. Ensuite and separate bathroom included, alongside allocated parking and more."
**NO FORWARD CHAIN** Welcome to Dell Road! We are pleased to present this three bedroom semi in the ever popular Bitterne Park area of Southampton. The property is within walking distance from a range of amenities and within catchment of the reputable Bitterne Park schools. Call now to arrange a ...
"An extremely well presented three bedroom family home that has been refurbished to a high standard. There is a large rear garden with vehicular access to a garage, as well as ample off road parking at the front."
"Impressive three bedroom family home located within easy reach of Oakwood Primary School, the sports centre, local shops and Sainsbury's superstore, The General Hospital and within easy access to the M27 motorway network. This property on the ground floor comprises of a bright and airy lounge whi..."
"Set in quiet cul-de-sac within Sholing, this well-presented semi-detached home comes with a driveway for approximately three vehicles and a garage. Offering a kitchen/diner, a separate lounge and a WC on the ground floor, whilst the first floor comprises three well-proportioned bedrooms and a goo..."
"***WELL PRESENTED THREE-BED SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH LARGE GARDEN AND GARAGE*** Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated in the highly popular location of Thornhill, Southampton. The property offers its accommodation in the form of an op..."
"This magnificent Victorian semi detached house, enjoys a quiet position in the desirable Shirley area of the City, within easy reach of an abundance of amenities, transport links and popular Schooling. The house has undergone a programme of extension and complete refurbishment offering a beautif..."
A very well presented 3 bedroom family home is offered with off road parking and garage. Both the kitchen and bathrooms have been substantially updated and the garden has been carefully landscaped to give maximum enjoyment. There is a leafy outlook to the front aspect.
SPACIOUS 3 bedroom home with an extremely large garden is offered with an extended kitchen/diner to compliment modern family living. Within the garden is a concrete base ready to build a home office/garden room with power laid alread on . Adjacent to the terrace are several acres of mature woodland.
"Built by Orchard Homes in 2003 is this well-proportioned top floor two double bedroom apartment offered with no chain. Compass Court is located on Winn Road and benefits from being within close proximity to Southampton City Centre, Portswood High Street, The Southampton Common and bus stops. The ..."
"This Victorian style semi-detached house offers a deceptively large amount of living space and versatile accommodation throughout. This home has 3 upstairs bedrooms, 3 downstairs reception rooms, a modern kitchen and bathroom, and useful built-in storage."
"This attractive Victorian terrace home enjoys a quiet, yet convenient position two roads back from the vibrant Portswood High Street. Throughout the home is a wealth of accommodation that blends character and period charm perfectly. The ground floor is host to welcoming hallway flowin..."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to present this impressive two bedroom detached bungalow in Bitterne. The property boasts a lounge, dining room, garage, car port, double glazing, ample driveway parking & is being offered with no forward chain. An internal viewing is very highly recommended."
"Welcome to Azera! This glamorous two bedroom top floor apartment enjoys a stunning waterside location along the river Itchen. The apartment is refined, elegant and intuitively designed with a luxurious open plan living area that provides an excellent space to dine and entertain. There is an ultra..."
NO FORWARD CHAIN!!!! IMMACULATELY PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE THAT HAS RECENTLY UNDERGONE REFURBISHMENT!! This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached property comes to the market after having been completely redecorated and re-carpeted throughout. The accommodation of thi...
Three Bedroom Semi Detached House * Three Separate Reception Rooms * Modern Fitted Kitchen * Modern First Floor Bathroom With Shower * Double Glazing * Gas Central Heating *
"This character property has been considerably enhanced and meticulously renovated to an excellent standard throughout. There is a spacious open-plan lounge/diner, with a feature window, which leads through to the beautiful newly fitted kitchen, featuring contemporary wall and base units, brick-st..."
"Offered as a fantastic investment opportunity is this four double bedroom HMO terraced house located situated on Livingstone Road. The property is currently achieving £1,500 per month which equates to a 6% yield. The current owner has been using the property as a prosperous investment for around ..."
"For those who enjoy peace and tranquillity, 19 Northcliffe House offers a unique opportunity to own a one-bedroom apartment with its own private entrance. Benefitting from a double patio with access from both lounge and bedroom, it is located close to the extensive communal facilities. The front ..."
" A deceptively spacious 3 bedroom end of terrace house enjoying a cul-de-sac location. The property that is offered in good order throughout, comprises on the ground floor, an entrance porch leading to the spacious open plan L-shaped sitting/dining room which in turn opens into a modern fitted ..."
"Jackson Bailey are delighted to market for sale this two-bedroom detached bungalow, located in the highly requested area of Midanbury. The property comprises: entry way, two bedrooms both with bay windows, bathroom, living room and the extended kitchen/breakfast room. The property is offered w..."
"A 3 bedroom (all doubles) terraced house situated on a popular road within walking distance to the park, Southampton water and local amenities. Deceptively spacious with separate living room, dining room with French doors to the garden and kitchen. No forward chain."
"This traditional terraced refurbished home is located in Shirley. The property has three bedrooms, a kitchen, two reception rooms and family bathroom suite. It would make an ideal first-time buyer home and is being offered with no onward chain. It is located in a sought-after area whic..."
"A standout, semi-detached family home, set in a quiet road within Freemantle, this is a perfect property for up-sizers or downsizers alike. Finished stylishly and whilst also preserving the character, this beautiful and spacious property really will be perfect for a family to make a home. As you ..."
"This well-presented four bedroom home conveniently located in Weston. Offering well-proportioned accommodation throughout, this lovely home comprises a lounge, kitchen/breakfast room and a dining room /study. On the first floor, are four bedrooms and a family bathroom suite. Externally, the pro..."
"**NO FORWARD CHAIN** Welcome to Swift Road! We are pleased to present this 3 double bedroom terraced house situated on a popular road within walking distance to the park, Southampton water and local amenities. Deceptively spacious with separate living room, dining room with French doors to the ..."
"Offered CHAIN FREE! Four bedroom family home with replacement boiler, modern bathroom and double glazing in convenient Bursledon location, call now to arrange your viewing!"
| *** IDEAL FAMILY HOME OR INVESTMENT PROPERTY *** | *** VIRTUAL TOUR LINK ATTACHED *** | *** BLOCK PAVED DRIVEWAY FOR TWO CARS *** | *** CONSERVATORY *** | *** WELL PRESENTED BACK GARDEN *** | 
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this charming three bedroom Semi-Detached house, with double glazing and gas central heating and is located in a convenient part of Shirley, with easy access to transport and a wealth of amenities."
"This end of terrace property is well presented throughout with benefits including a spacious lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, three bedrooms and a downstairs cloakroom. Outside there is a garage and off road parking."
"This well-presented two-bedroom terraced home benefits from parking for two cars and a generous rear garden. The property is located in a cul-de-sac position in West End and benefits from being close to local shops, schools and amenities, including the David Lloyd Leisure Centre and the Ageas Bow..."
"Jackson Bailey are delighted to market for sale this three-bedroom semi-detached family home located in the highly desirable area of Bitterne. The property comprises: entrance hall, living room with feature bay window, kitchen/diner with access to the garden. The first floor boasts the proper..."
"Introducing this very well presented two- bedroom, sixth floor apartment complete with allocated, under croft parking, located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village in Southampton. In our opinion, this property is the ideal first time buy, or family home and we believe must be viewed to appre..."
** Investment Property - HMO Licenced ** Property Overview: Terraced House Four Double Bedrooms Large Lounge Bathroom & Separate Downstairs W/C Low Maintenance Rear Garden On Road Permit Parking Available HMO Registered for Four Individual Sharers Currently Rented to Four Student...
"***INVESTORS ONLY*** Debuting for the first time since 2006, this impressively sized two double bedroom maritime apartment showcases an approximate 99 square metres internal accommodation, towering South facing views across a tranquil marina outlook, allocated under croft parking, wal..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this ""victorian style"" three bedroom semi detached house in the residential area of Woolston in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very good standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted..."
"TO BE SOLD BY PUBLIC AUCTION - This classic older style three bedroom two reception semi detached house offers well proportioned accommodation hich requires a programme of modernisation and upgrading, making it an ideal purchase for investment and speculative buyers."
"Offers in Excess of £280,000A three bedroom semi detached house located in a popular residential position of Bursledon. The property is a few minutes walk from all local amenities and would be ideal for First time buyer or investment purchase."
Three bedroom semi detached home ** Requested location ** Entrance hall ** Lounge & Dining room ** Fitted kitchen ** Conservatory ** Cloakroom ** Utility room ** two double bedrooms ** family bathroom ** Private rear garden ** driveway providing off street parking ** On forward chain!
"This well-presented, spacious family house is the perfect property for those looking for a first home and has the added bonus of being close to local primary and secondary schools, shops and supermarkets and excellent transport links via Southampton central train station and the M27 motorway. Th..."
"Situated in a popular Ocean Village Marina, this 2 bedroom apartment offers a spacious living space and a cleverly designed bedroom 2/lounge solution. Renovated to high standards, bright and light with a fantastic view of the marina and the Itchen bridge."
"Situated just a stone's throw away from Southampton General Hospital, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic two bedroom semi-detached property situated in the highly desirable location of Coxford. The property is being offered for sale with no forward chain."
"This fantastic Period three double bedroom, three reception room, Semi Detached property is situated in the ever popular residential location of The Polygon, Southampton. In Brief the property consists of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, morning room, fitted kitchen, family bathroom, three dou..."
"Connells are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom semi-detached property situated in the highly sought after location of Freemantle, close to Southampton City Centre, local schools, shops and bus routes to Southampton General Hospital."
"This is a three-bedroom, detached family home in Bitterne Manor, Southampton. The house has been well maintained and further improved and is in a great location - only a short walk from local amenities and outstanding schools. There are good transport links nearby, making it an ideal place for co..."
"Enjoying a wonderful position on the fringe of Ocean Village in the highly desirable Royal Crescent Apartments, lies this exceptional two bedroom apartment positioned on the 6th floor and is complimented by a balcony and secure under croft parking. Upon entering the property you are gr..."
"Fox & Sons are please to be offering for sale this semi-detached four bedroom HMO situated in the popular location of Burgess Road, Southampton. There are tenants in situ contracted until September 2023 paying £1100 PCM bills not included. Potential to acheive £1,250pcm in rent."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this clean and tidy throughout, spacious three bedroom, semi detached house in the popular location of Sholing. Boasting a 14ft sitting room, 16ft kitchen/breakfast room, conservatory, good sized rear garden, driveway parking and a garage. This prop..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 97 Wilton Avenue, Southampton, SO15 2HB -We have received an offer of £ 280,000.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. We are pleased to present to the market this..."
"EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN GROVE COPSE! This spacious family home is a must see! Comprising a fitted Kitchen-Diner, extended 21ft Living Room with bi-fold doors to the rear garden, upstairs Bathroom and three generous Bedrooms. In addition to all the space on offer ..."
"Fox & Sons are delighted to welcome this Two bed End of Terrace house to the market. The property is located in a quiet area of Peartree, close to Bitterne and Woolston with local amenities nearby. This is ideal for a first time buyer or a family home!"
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY | SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE CONVERTED INTO TWO INDIVIDUAL FLATS | SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION | GREAT LOCATION WITH GOOD ACCESS INTO AND OUT OF THE CITY | CURRENTLY TENANTED
We are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom detached family home. Benefits to include private drive way and large garden.
"Providence Park is a popular gated development found in the desirable Bassett area of Southampton. This apartment offers modern living, which is instantly noticeable upon entering, comprising of a large reception room with a balcony that offers a tranquil leafy outlook. The kitchen comes ..."
"Kings Estates present this block of two apartments. The ground floor apartment is comprised of two double bedrooms, an open plan kitchen lounge area, bathroom and a garden. The first floor apartment is comprised of two double bedrooms, a kitchen, shower room and a lounge with bay window. Council ..."
"Welcome To Flint Close!  NO FORWARD CHAIN! This is a stunning and meticulously finished modern two-bedroom end of terrace house located in the desirable and tranquil area of Flint Close, Netley Common. The property has been tastefully designed ..."
"NO CHAIN! Mann Countrywide present for sale a well presented three bedroom semi-detached house in Lord's Hill within Southampton. The property comes complete with attached garage and good off road parking for two cars, and is conveniently located for Southampton General Hospital. Accom..."
"Guide Price £280,000 to £290,000 Offering an impressive amount of living accommodation, is this detached two double bedroom bungalow on Heathfield Road. The property offers scope to redecorate to your own taste and comprises of a separate reception room, kitchen / dinning area, two double bed..."
"Connells presents this THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED property within walking distance to Shirley High Street. The property comprises a lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and a bathroom. Further benefits are LARGE REAR GARDEN, OFF ROAD PARKING, double glazing, and NO FORWARD CHAIN!"
"Welcome To Fort Road!   This is a three-bedroom Semi-Detached house with two reception rooms and low maintenance rear garden with summer house. Located conveniently in Woolston, Southampton. Such a location offers an array of loc..."
"This beautiful retirement apartment is situated in the recently built Spitfire Lodge by the highly regarded Churchill Group. Located on the first floor, the apartment comprises a spacious and welcoming entrance hallway leading to a naturally light sitting room benefitting from access to the priva..."
"An opportunity has come up to purchase this wonderful family home set within the heart of St Denys. Set over three floors, the property benefits from a full redecoration and new carpets throughout, three double bedrooms, modern kitchen, large mature garden and gas central heating. No forward chain"
"Apartment 34 Positioned on the first floor this apartment features a spacious lounge/dining room that offers excellent living space, a separate kitchen with fitted appliances and two double bedrooms, one of which benefits from a walk in wardrobe. There is also a private balcony and a modern..."
"A truly fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached property in the highly sought after location of Coxford, close to Southampton General Hospital. The property comprises of a spacious lounge, a beautifully modernised kitchen, three good sized bedrooms and a very modern bathroom."
"Occupying a second floor position within this popular development this two bedroom apartment offers a host of features to include a spacious 15'8 sitting room, a fully integrated kitchen to include fridge/freezer, double oven, built in washing machine and dishwasher. The property also enjoys two ..."
"Situated in the sought-after Admiral's Quay development in Ocean Village, this two-double bedroom, fourth-floor apartment is ideal for those looking to be within walking distance from the city centre. Internally, a generous entrance hall leads through to the spacious reception room which is open-..."
"FOUR BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE located in the popular area of Millbrook. The property comprises lounge, kitchen/diner, four bedrooms and separate additional reception room. The property also benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and an ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN! VIEW TODAY!"
"Are you looking for a family home in a sought-after location that's well connected and has lots of potential? If so, this could be the one for you! This character property is double glazed with driveway parking and is walking distance to parks and shops. It's also in the catchment for ..."
"This three bedroom family home is in fantastic condition throughout and is located in the sought after location of Lordshill which is not only close to local amenities but has great links to the motorway and Southampton City Centre, The property is a great size throughout and benefits from a 25ft..."
"Set within a quiet cul-de-sac, this extended two bedroom semi-detached home briefly comprises on the ground floor of an entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, a lounge, dining room and extended kitchen. On the first floor, there are two double bedrooms and an extended four-piece bathroom. Additiona..."
"This well appointed two-double bedroom waterside apartment is located in the ever-popular Ocean Village and showcases many benefits, including a private duel aspect balcony facing towards the marina, secure allocated parking, friendly concierge service, approximately 728 square foot of accommodat..."
"A beautifully presented 2 bedroom terraced house in the popular location of Aldermoor. This property offers a large living room and large kitchen diner backing on to a good sized garden. Upstairs, there is 2 double bedrooms along with a family bathroom. This home has been decorated to a very high..."
"Located within the ever sought after Bitterne Village is this three bedroom end of terrace house boasting both parking and garage. Presented beautifully and consisting of full width lounge/diner, kitchen breakfast room with space for under counter washing machine and dishwasher. Downstairs W/C an..."
"***WATER AND CITY VIEWS*** Introducing this very well presented two-bedroom, seventh floor, penthouse apartment complete with allocated, under croft parking, located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village in Southampton. In our opinion, this property is the ideal first time buy, or ..."
" Positioned in the heart of Ocean Village is this two bedroom apartment, with West Quay and Oxford Street within walking distance , boasting excellent commuting links are on offer with Southampton Central Station approximately 1.5 miles away. The apartment is located in The Moresby Tower, wit..."
"This three double bedroom family home is in good condition throughout and is located in a quiet cul de sac, which is not only close to local amenities but has great links to the motorway and Southampton City Centre, The property is a great size throughout and benefits from a lounge, Dining room/s..."
"* PART BUY PART RENT ** £275,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £550,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £110,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Home’. You ..."
"4 St Swithuns offers a unique opportunity to own a one-bedroom retirement bungalow with its own private entrance. Benefitting from far-reaching views across the open countryside and gardens, it is located close to the extensive communal facilities housed in the Manor House. "
A highly favoured city centre location provides the setting for this spacious third floor two bedroom apartment that overlooks communal residents' gardens that are a notable feature of this popular development. The impressive high level ceilings are rarely found in modern apartments and enhance ...
9 St Swithun's offers a unique opportunity to own a one-bedroom retirement BUNGALOW with its own private entrance. Benefitting from views of the manor house and gardens.
Welcome to this wonderful three-bedroom terrace house in a sought-after location of Itchen. This is a great family home or perfect for first-time buyers. It's packed with original features and has lots of potential. The double-glazed windows and gas central heating keep the house warm ...
This semi-detached house is beautifully presented and offers spacious accommodation. It is located in a sought after area which is popular with families. It falls within the catchment area for a number of good schools and there are local shops and amenities nearby. The property benefits from doub...
Mann Countrywide present for sale a semi detached house in Totton currently used as a house in multiple occupation. There five rooms to let (main bedroom with en suite shower room) with four of the rooms currently let generating an income of £1800 per calendar month. This will i...
"This stunning two bedroom, end terrace house is located in a desirable location, ideally positioned close to amenities & Southampton General Hospital. Comprising lounge/diner, downstairs WC, modern fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms both with en-suite bathrooms, good size garden & off road parking."
"** CHAIN FREE ** A character three bedroom end terrace house with a generous garden in the requested **ST. DENYS SOUTHAMPTON** area near local amenities and transport links. The property benefits from a driveway providing OFF ROAD PARKING, entrance hall with stairs to first floor, two reception..."
"Available for sale with no forward chain and situated along a quiet road in the heart of Woolston, is this very well-presented two/three bedroom semi-detached house. Offering character and style throughout, the property comprises two good-sized reception rooms with a log burning fire to the loung..."
"Offering an abundance of space and a character facade is this two bedroom terrace house in Mortimer Road, Itchen. On the ground floor, the centre piece of this home is the impressive 25'6ft lounge diner which is complemented with a feature bay window, electric fire place and a dual aspect floodin..."
"Connells are delighted to offer this three bedroom mid-terrace property situated in the highly sought after location of Millbrook, close to the local amenities, bus routes and local schools. A viewing is recommended to truly appreciate the property the accommodation we have to offer."
The opportunity arises to purchase this stunning spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment offered with a private garden. Seymour House was developed in 2017 presenting unique and luxury apartments. The spacious accommodation has been well planned to provide good sized rooms with its open plann...
"WATCH THE 360' DEGREE TOUR HERE - CHARMING VICTORIAN CHARACTER HOUSE - A very well presented home with two bedrooms, two receptions and modern first floor bathroom"
"Welcome to Sunvale Close!  A beautifully presented, three bedroom semi detached house situated within a quiet cul-de-sac and a stone's throw from Shoreburs Greenway woodland's, local shops, schools and bus routes. On the ground floor the property consists of a spacious entrance hall, a generous l..."
"This two/three bedroom family home is located within walking distance of Southampton General Hospital and comprises a lounge, dining room, ground floor bathroom, two/three bedrooms, a large rear garden and potential off road parking. This property also benefits from NO FORWARD CHAIN!!"
"Situated in the fantastic location of Malin Close, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this 3 bedroom mid terrace property which would make a fantastic family home or investment purchase."
"Fox & Sons warmly welcome this well maintained three bedroom semi-detached property. It is situated in a quiet area of Thornhill, surrounded by local amenities and is also a good school catchment. The property itself benefits from three bedrooms, kitchen, lounge, utility area, bathroom and a garage."
"Purplebricks Southampton are pleased to offer to the market this well presented two bedroom terraced house, situated in the highly popular residential area of West End. The property would make an ideal purchase for first time buyers, professional couples of young families and is located in a qu..."
"Situated in one of the most desirable roads in Freemantle, Connells are delighted to offer this two bedroom mid terrace property on Nelson Road. This property would make the ideal investment opportunity or family home."
"Well-proportioned end of terrace family home benefitting from a garage, which is within a generously sized corner plot on a quiet and tucked away road, within easy reach of The General Hospital, schooling for all ages, the M27 motorway network, Shirley High Street, local shops and all other daily..."
"Three bedroom home in a sought after area close to Southampton General hospital, the property benefits from lounge/diner, kitchen leading to private rear garden. Upstairs comprises of three bedrooms and a family bathroom, outside there is off road parking and a garage. CALL NOW TO BOOK VIEWING!"
"Brantons Independent Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this spacious, terraced family home situated in the ever popular residential area of Freemantle. The ground floor layout begins with a porch leading into the hallway with large storage cupboard. From the hall, there is ..."
"We warmly welcome this 3 bed end of terrace property to the market. The property is located in Sholing, surrounded by a range of schools and bus routes to the city centre. It is very modern throughout with a 25 ft kitchen extension. Perfect for a family home!"
TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMED DETACHED BUNGALOW MOSTLY ON THE FLAT WITH A 15FT LOUNGE! This wonderful bungalow in the popular area of Midanbury boasts a 15ft Lounge with a cast iron log burner and access to the Conservatory. There is a separate Kitchen and an 18ft Conservatory with double doors leading to...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to present this impressive two bedroom house in West End. The property is immaculate throughout & boasts a stunning recently refitted kitchen & bathroom, double glazing, gas central heating & a landscaped secluded rear garden. An internal viewing is recommended."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terraced house in the residential area of Woolston in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a very high standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen and bathroom, utilit..."
"This lovely home is well-presented and would be perfect for small families, downsizers, and first-time buyers alike. The home has plenty of storage and natural light. The living room is spacious and great for spending quality time with friends and family or enjoying individual pursuits. The kitch..."
"This substantial four bedroom, three reception room Victorian home is located in the heart of the Newtown area of the city, within easy reach of amenities, schooling and the vibrant city centre. The house benefits from spacious and recently refurbished accommodation, and is for sale ..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the popular location of Bitterne, was built in the late 1800’s and offers excellent potential. Accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises a generously sized hallway, a front living room, downstairs bathroom, dining room and kitchen. Whi..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, semi-detached house with character features in the popular location of Malmesbury Road. Occupying a fantastic position within the SO15 postcode, the property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen. Upstairs consists of three..."
"This contemporary two-double bedroom waterside apartment is located in the ever-popular Ocean Village and showcases many benefits, including a private balcony boasting marina views, secure allocated parking, friendly concierge service, approximately 910 square foot internal accommodation, whilst ..."
"This fantastic fifth floor two bedroom apartment in the popular development of Centenary Quay, Woolston - Southampton's newest and exciting water front development. The apartment is spacious in size with a high level of finish and a private balcony boasting water views. The property has an inviti..."
"Austin and Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this traditional mid terrace property offering versatile accomodation over two floors, situated in the ever popular residentail location of St Marys, Southampton. The property in brief consists of four double bedrooms, three reception rooms, two ba..."
"Enfields Estate Agents are pleased to present for sale this beautiful two bedroom terraced house in the popular location of Townhill Park, Situated along a path with a delightful green area in front offering a quiet and secluded position. The property's accommodation is offered in the form of a g..."
"This three bedroom family home is in good condition throughout and is located in a cul de sac in the sought after location of Lordshill which is not only close to local amenities but has great links to the motorway and Southampton City Centre, The property is a great size throughout and benefits ..."
"This well-proportioned, three bedroom, semi-detached family home is set in the popular area of Bassett close to local schools, shops and amenities. Accommodation briefly comprises a welcoming entrance hall, spacious lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms and a family shower room. Outside there are garde..."
"Fox and Sons have pleasure in offering for sale this lovely first floor apartment in the desirable location off Shirley High Street. The sale as a whole is a very attractive purchase due to the modern internal condition, an extended lease, and parking"
"The Royal Crescent Apartments were constructed in 2018 and are located in a prominent position within the city. This stylish two-bedroom apartment offers approximately 746 sq ft of internal accommodation, completed to a high specification throughout. On entry to the property you are greeted by a ..."
"New to the market is this well presented detached bungalow located within close vicinity to all amenities such as Southampton General Hospital and. Consisting of entrance hallway, separate lounge and kitchen, two spacious double bedrooms, brand-new modern shower room and beautifully landscaped su..."
"Jackson Bailey are delighted to market for sale this two-bedroom terraced home located in the highly desirable area of West End. The property comprises: entrance hallway with storage cupboard, re-fitted kitchen, living area with access out to the garden, two bedrooms and the re-fitted shower r..."
"Leaders are pleased to introduce this cottage style three-bedroom mid terrace home situated in the residential location of Bevois Valley, Southampton. In our opinion, the current owners have kept the property to a very high standard and is the ideal property for anybody wishing for a beautiful fi..."
"Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented, three bedroom mid terrace property situated in the highly sought after area of Lordshill. The house is immaculately presented throughout and finished with modern interior. Downstairs there is a large lou..."
"A mid terrace house in a popular residential location providing the new owners a family home comprising three bedrooms, a lounge, kitchen/diner overlooking the rear garden and a family bathroom. The property has neutral décor throughout with double glazing and gas central heating fitted."
"TWO ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES! Chambers are pleased to be selling this two bedroom terraced property situated in a small cul-de-sac within Bursledon. The accommodation comprises of entrance hallway, fitted kitchen, lounge to rear, two double sized bedrooms and a refitted bathroom. Outside the rea..."
"**CHAIN FREE** Leaders are please to introduce this three bedroom semi detached house in the popular residential location of Woolston. Internally, this property offers an open plan living area with a bay window and log burner. The extended open kitchen diner comprises of a basin sink, f..."
Edison Green are delighted to present this two bedroom apartment found on the fifth floor of the ever so popular Sapphire Court. This property has been kept to the highest standard by the current occupiers and comprises of a spacious living room with views across the marina and a modern fitted ki...
"This good sized three bedroom terraced character home is situated on the fringe of Millbrook and Regents Park areas which is close to Southampton General Hospital, good transport links and Shirley High street with all of its local amenities. The property benefits from a Lounge and Open plan Kitch..."
"INVESTORS ONLY, CURRENTLY RENTED. Situated within the popular Lordswood area of Southampton is this two bedroom, end of terrace property that is offered with no forward chain. To the front of the property is a block paved area providing parking for two vehicles with further space leading down the..."
"Welcome to this spacious three bedroom semi detached family home situated in ever popular Forest Hills Drive location in Townhill Park. Close to nearby schools, Riverside Park and other amenities. The property's split level accommodation is offered in the form of three generous bedrooms the third..."
Austin and Wyatt are pleased to offer to the market Howard Close. Howard Close is a spacious and bright three-bedroom mid terraced home with gas central heating and double glazing. Located in the popular residential area of Mansbridge. The location of the property is within walking dis...
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this Three bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after location of Bassett. This semi-detached house offering a wealth of accommodation with a living room, conservatory, kitchen, ground floor bathroom and three bedrooms."
"Your Move is pleased to offer this spacious two bedroom house situated in the Centenary Quay development in the heart of Woolston, a short walk away from Weston Shore seafront. Situated in an enclosed location and fitted to a high, modern standard, this home is a perfect opportunity for families,..."
"**STUDENT INVESTMENT PROPERTY** A lovely three double bedroom, recently part- refurbished student house is being offered for sale with tenants in situ. The current tenancy is at a rent of £1400pcm and ends on the 23.06.2023 A new tenancy has been arranged - at a rent o..."
"Ideal for first time buyers, families or as an investment, a very spacious and well-presented 4 bedroom family home in a quiet close.  Upgraded and improved throughout by the current owners, including external insulation giving the property a highly efficient EPC Energy rating of C.  Sitting/dini..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 40 Heysham Road, Southampton, Hampshire, SO15 3JP. We have received an offer of £245,000 Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. Your Move are pleased to present to the..."
"Enjoying a third floor position within the impressive and highly sought after Royal Crescent Apartments, this modern and luxurious 2 bedroom flat offers the perfect blend of all the benefits of City Centre living, whilst retaining a quiet and serene feel whilst inside."
"Hunters are extremely pleased to offer this modern two bedroom apartment on the edge of Ocean Village, Southampton. Ideally located for the City Centre and local amenities of Ocean Village. The property has a balcony and secure basement parking. Internally, the property benefits from two doub..."
"Fox & Sons are delighted to offer this three bedroom mid-terraced house located in the popular area of Millbrook. This property comprises a large lounge/diner, kitchen, utility room and downstairs shower room; as well as three good sized bedrooms on the first floor, upstairs bathroom and seperate WC"
This 1930s built semi-detached house is ideally situated within close proximity of the General Hospital and is offered for sale with no forward chain. Potential purchasers should be aware that the property will require modernisation and redecoration but has the benefit of a rear garden that has a...
"Situated in the highly popular location of Millbrook, close to Southampton General Hospital and the local amenities, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom mid-terrace property which would make an ideal first time buyer or investment purchase."
Situated in a popular residential location of Kathleen Road in Sholing is this three bedroom semi-detached house. The property features a large lounge diner with feature bay window accessed off a welcoming entrance hall. A fitted galley style kitchen with matching wall and base units. On the firs...
"Enfield’s are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular residential location of Aldermoor, close to the General Hospital.. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, conservatory. Upstairs consis..."
"This charming cottage is positioned in the sought after Inner Avenue district of the City and offers a wealth of accommodation ideal for home owners or HMO rental investors and is being offered with no onward chain. Upon entering, you are greeted by a welcoming hallway. Stairs ascend ..."
This is a great opportunity to purchase this wonderful three bedroom semi detached located in the sought after Bassett Green area of the City. Situated on the ever popular flower garden estate the property offers the potential purchasers the opportunity to own a fantastic family home...
"Austin and Wyatt are pleased to present this 3-bedroom spacious house in the popular residential area of Shirley. This NO CHAIN home benefits from a large garden. On the ground floor, you have a good sized living space, kitchen, utility area and toilet. Upstairs, you have three good sized bedroom..."
VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED. MODERN LIVING PRESENTED TO A VERY GOOD STANDARD Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this modern three bedroom mid terraced house in the residential area of Sholing in Southampton. The property is very light and bright and the prope...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a modern-styled home that has been kept to the highest standards by the current owners and is located in a well-regarded location in Southampton, close to local schools, transport links, shopping facilities, and amenities. This property is an ideal family home ..."
Fox & Sons are proud to present this three bedroom semi-detached property to the market! The property is located in the Bitterne area a short walk away from Donkey Common and Bitterne village. Public transport is also available heading towards the City Centre.
"AUSTIN & WYATT as pleased to announce this stunning apartment to the market. Situated on the cusp of the beautiful Ocean Village is this exceptional two bedroom apartment, which lies on the third floor within Royal Crescent Apartments. Entry to the development is via a secure inte..."
"Enjoying a wonderful position on the fringe of Ocean Village in the highly desirable Royal Crescent Apartments, lies this exceptional two bedroom apartment positioned on the 3rd floor and is complimented by a balcony and secure under croft parking. Upon entering the property you are gr..."
"Introducing this immaculately presented two-bedroom apartment complete with allocated parking located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village in Southampton. In our opinion, the current owner has kept the property to a high standard and we believe is the ideal first time buy or investment...."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom ground floor apartment. Enjoying a fabulous position on the south/westerly edge of the new Meridian Waterside development, this stunning three bedroom ground floor terrace apartment is only three years old and offers a wealth of spacious..."
***SPACIOUS MODERN TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM MAISONETTE WITH GARAGE & GARDEN*** ***360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer this fully renovated two-bedroom maisonette in the sought-after location of Holly Hill. The property comprises an entrance porch with storage and access to t...
"This generously sized, charming, characterful Victorian home is situated within a quiet tucked away street just a short distance away from the General Hospital, Shirley High Street, and within walking distance to St James Park with its outdoor gym, tennis courts and cafe. You are also within easy..."
"This three bedroom semi detached family home is perfect for those looking for excellent schools nearby as well as plenty of close amenities such as shops and the General hospital. The living room is bright and airy, and the property benefits from having double glazing and gas central h..."
"Offered with no forward chain is this charming two/three bedroom semi-detached house with an abundance of potential! Situated in the popular Ludlow School catchment, this could be the perfect family home! The ground floor offers impressive accommodation with two reception rooms and a spacious kit..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this two/three bedroom semi-detached house in the residential are of Woolston in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a good standard and the accommodation comprises of open plan lounge dining area, two/three bedrooms, spacious family k..."
"Welcome to this semi detached home in Bitterne Manor, Southampton. The home is in a great location, close to all of the amenities that Bitterne Manor has to offer. It comes complete with a lounge/diner, kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathroom suite and a shared driveway leading to two gar..."
"Welcome To Spring Road!  This is a three bedroom mid terrace house located in Spring Road, Sholing. On one end you’ll find Peartree Green which was designated as a Local Nature Reserve in December 2017 and the other is an access route to Junction 8 of the M2..."
Great investment property or first time buy. Does need some modernisation. We welcome viewings to arrange call choosing option 3.
"An opportunity to purchase a three bedroom Semi-detached house is perfect for investors or first time buyers. Located in the popular area of Millbrook the property benefits being within walking distance to local schools, bus stops, shops and amenities. Also close by is access to the M27 and M3. ..."
"This extended character three bedroom family home comes to the market in the sought after area of Freemantle so is close both local amenities and Shirley high street with its array of shops, restaurants, bars and takeaways. The property is a great size throughout with a flexible layout, has views..."
Fox and Sons have pleasure in offering for sale this three bedroom Semi-Detached House in the popular Bassett residential area. As you enter the property you go through to the lounge room for the fitted kitchen with views over the back garden.
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £260,000. Buy it now option available. Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this great two bedroom house is ideal for couples and young families. This great period home offers flexible accommodation with two separate reception rooms to the ground floor and the fitted kitchen, whilst the first floor provides access to the two..."
"Welcome To Azera! NO FORWARD CHAIN! This is modern two-bedroom apartment located on the 5th floor which benefits from stunning views over Southampton’s waters, a balcony, two bathrooms, built in storage and allocated parking. The Centenar..."
"This three bedroom mid-terraced home has been finished to a high standard throughout and offers excellent accommodation. Situated in the popular area of Portswood, accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises an entrance hall, an open plan lounge/diner and kitchen. Whilst on the first floo..."
This three bedroom semi-detached house is stunning and beautifully upgraded. It is highly desirable and in a sought after location that is well connected and conveniently located with easy motorway access. The catchment area for schools is excellent as is the local shops and amenities. The proper...
"This versatile family house is situated in a cul-de-sac location within Bassett Green.
In addition to three spacious bedrooms, there is an open-plan living room, recently refitted kitchen/diner & a conservatory.
The property also boasts fully enclosed gardens to the front & rear."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi-detached property in the highly sought after location of Maybush, close to Southampton General Hospital and bus routes to Southampton City Centre."
"Purplebricks Southampton are pleased to present to the market this well presented, three bedroom terraced house, situated in the popular residential area of Lordshill. The property would make an ideal first time buy for professional couples or young families, as well as a good investment opport..."
"This mid terrace home is well presented throughout and is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location in Sholing. Benefits of the home include a spacious rear aspect lounge overlooking the garden, two bedrooms and a modern bathroom. The property has gas central heating and double glazing, whilst ou..."
"Introducing this well presented two bedroom waterside apartment located on the banks of the River Itchen. Offering a mooring and a balcony with some wonderful water views, we believe this is the ideal first time buy or investment. Internally, the property benefits from a generous size l..."
"Contemporary apartment located on the ninth floor at Meridian Waterside. Boasting 2 generous bedrooms with an en-suite to the Master, a separate bathroom and integrated appliances to the kitchen."
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Introducing this modern, fifth floor, two-bedroom apartment complete with allocated, under croft parking located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village in Southampton. Entering the home, you are welcomed by a generous hallway and ample storage facilities. Furth..."
"Ideal first time home or buy-to-let opportunity, up together and ready to move straight into"
"This three bedroom mid-terraced house has been finished to a good standard throughout and on the ground floor briefly comprises an entrance hall, a 24ft lounge/diner and a kitchen. On the first floor are three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Additional benefits include both front and rear gardens..."
"This spacious three-bedroom, end-of-terrace family home is located within a quiet and tucked away location and could be an ideal property for a first-time buyer, buy to let landlords or those looking to downsize to a smaller, low maintenance home. The property benefits from being within easy reac..."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this well presented two bedroom end terraced house situated in the popular residential location of Lordswood close to the General hospital, local schools and good transport links. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms and a three piece..."
Situated within a cul de sac location is this exquisitely finished two bedroom terraced home which has undergone extensive modernisation within recent years whilst keeping a wealth of original features including open fireplaces and exposed wooden floorboards. Queens Road is conveniently positione...
Offered for sale with no forward chain is this three bedroom terraced property situated in the popular residential location of Inner Avenue. The property would benefit from some cosmetic modernisation with the accommodation consisting of two reception rooms can be found on the ground floor in add...
"***IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY*** Purplebricks are proud to introduce this two-bedroom end-of-terraced house in the popular residential location of Sholing, Southampton. Internally the property comprises a fitted kitchen, lounge, and conservatory. On the first floor are two bedrooms and a family bath..."
"Introducing this modern, stylish, positioned in a quiet private close, terraced house which would make an ideal first home investment. The property offers two generous bedrooms, a lovely open and bright kitchen and a lounge with garden access."
**NO FORWARD CHAIN** Welcome to Peartree Road! We are pleased to present this character three bedroom terraced house located in the popular location of Peartree Green. Offered with No Forward Chain the property requires some refurbishment and updating but has potentail to make a great family home.
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to present this impressive & spacious three bedroom house in Itchen. The property boasts a lounge, dining room, double glazing, gas central heating, enclosed rear garden & is being offered with no forward chain. An internal viewing is very highly recommended."
"Enfield are delighted to offer for sale this well presented, three bedroom, terraced house situated in the popular residential location of Dale Valley Road close to the General hospital. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, three bedrooms and family bathroom suite. "
"A spacious three-bedroom terraced house located in the sought-after area of Bassett Green, within easy reach of the M3 motorway network, Southampton Airport Parkway, University of Southampton and Southampton Common. Schooling for all ages is also nearby, making it a great setting for a first fami..."
10 meter MOORING and direct RIVER VIEWS offered with this exclusive 2 bedroom apartment as well as its own GARDEN. The gated development compliments the exclusivity offered.
** NO VENDOR CHAIN** Two-bedroom luxury apartment located by the entrance of Ocean Village. Access to this building is via a secure entry system at the communal entrance which is then required again at the entrance to the apartment block. This third floor apartment which can be access...
"This delightful detached bungalow is located in the highly sought after area of Midanbury in Southampton. The bungalow benefits from two bedrooms, a spacious lounge/diner, a kitchen and a lean to overlooking the rear garden. It benefits from double glazing, gas central heating, and is..."
Freehold Detached House Vacant Possession
"EWS1 CERTIFIED Situated on the edge of the ever popular Ocean Village, enjoying a fourth floor position within the impressive and highly sought after Royal Crescent Apartments, this ultra modern and luxurious 2 bedroom flat also benefits from a private balcony and allocated under croft parking."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale the superb two bedroom, two bathrooms apartment with wrap around balcony with views toward Ocean Village, and undercroft parking."
"This two double bedroom semi detached character property is located in the highly sought after area of Regents park which is close to Shirley High Street with all of its amenities including shops, supermarkets, cafes, bars and restaurants. Boasting; two receptions rooms, kitchen, utility space an..."
"BITTERNE PARK SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA - A spacious 2 double bedroom, 2 reception room town house set in a cul de sac location is offered with off road parking."
"Fox & Sons are pleased to offer this two bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular location of Newman Street, Southampton. This property provides spacious living accommodation, downstairs cloakroom, two double bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this well presented, two-bedroom, semi detached house situated in the popular residential location of Shirley. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, two-bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom suite. The property also benefits f..."
"Situated on what we would consider the more peaceful end of stunning Ocean Village marina, is this highly desirable two double bedroom modern apartment boasting partial water views and secure undercover allocated parking. Further features include; a generously proportioned open plan living/dining..."
"The property benefits from two Bedrooms, Kitchen, Lounge, Bathroom and Allocated Parking Space. The space within the property is generous throughout with a small dining space within the kitchen. It is located in a quiet Cul-De-Sac in Mansbridge area with amenities near by."
"THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH OFF ROAD PARKING AND SPACIOUS GARDEN, Benefitting From No Forward Chain, Two Reception Rooms, Excellent Commuting Links And A Three Piece Bathroom."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house situated in the popular residential location of Bramley Crescent. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and three piece bathroom suite. The property also benefits from gas cen..."
"Absolutely Delighted to offer this Fantastic, Large, Two Bedroom Apartment, situated in the extremely popular location of Oxford Street, right in the heart of Southampton City Centre. Lift Access."
"Situated in the popular location of Highfield, this two double bedroom ground floor apartment would be suitable for someone who is looking to downsize, for a first time purchase or investment. Offered for sale with no forward chain, the property comprises a lounge/diner which measures 33'0"" in le..."
"Enfields Property Services are delighted to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom terraced house situated in the popular residential location of Shirley. The property comprises open plan lounge/dining room, family kitchen. Upstairs consists of two double bedrooms and four piece bathroom suite...."
"A truly fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom mid-terraced property in the highly sought after location of Coxford, close to Southampton General Hospital. This property is in great condition and would make the perfect family home."
"*CASH BUYERS ONLY* Three Bedroom End of Terrace with Two Reception Rooms, Excellent Potential. Located in a prime student location this property is ideal for investors looking for a property with huge HMO potential."
"** NO VENDOR CHAIN** This is a great opportunity to purchase this wonderful three bedroom semi detached in Bassett Green the property also benefitting from a garage, parking and utility space. Situated on the ever popular flower garden estate the property offers the potential purchas..."
"Introducing this lovely top-floor apartment, with bright and modern accommodations throughout. Located right on the banks of the river Itchen, Quay 2000 offers many ideal features which can only truly be appreciated with an internal viewing. Upon entering the building there is a lift to all floor..."
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this fantastic two bedroom apartment situated in the leafy area of Banister Park. The property is presented to a high standard throughout and comprises; entrance hall leading the very large living room which is laid out in a modern style of open...
"Chambers are delighted to be selling this deceptively spacious two bedroom character cottage in the popular location of Church Road, Woolston. The accommodation consists of entrance hall, lounge with bay window, separate dining room, refitted kitchen, refitted upstairs bathroom and two DOUBLE si..."
"A 3 bedroom terrace home situated in the popular location of Bassett which has fantastic commuter links to Southampton City Center. The owners have found a property they wish to purchase which has no onward chain. Internally the property has a good sized sitting room, modern kitchen/dining room, ..."
"Situated in the highly popular residential location of Bassett Green, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached property within close proximity to Southampton University and also offers fantastic transport links to and from the City."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this spacious, two bedroom, mid terrace house in the popular area of Romsey Road, Shirley. Just a short walk to Shirley High Street and within close proximity to Southampton General Hospital an internal viewing is strongly recommended."
"Occupying a sought after position in a much requested part of Highfield, Morris Dibben are pleased to present to the market, this completely refurbished, ground floor apartment in a desirable Share of freehold building. Entry to the building is via a secure communal entrance. Upon ent..."
This well presented two bedroom mid terrace house located in sought after area of Lordswood is an ideal purchase for first time buyers and investors. The property is situated within the surrounded woodland giving the feel of privacy compared to most. Internally boasts a spacious lounge/dining roo...
"This magnificent terraced house, enjoys a quiet position in the desirable Shirley area of the City, within easy reach of an abundance of amenities, transport links and popular schooling. The house is beautifully presented and benefits with a good size garden. Once inside, you are greeted by a h..."
"Field Palmer offer this two bedroom end of terrace house ideal for first time buyers and investors, which has recently been modernised with new kitchen and bathroom! The property benefits from off road parking, spacious lounge/dining room, fitted kitchen and large rear garden. Upstairs offers two..."
"OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN - Two double bedroom, two reception room terraced home. Ideal starter home or buy to let investment property"
"A well-presented apartment, located on the 3rd floor of the iconic Morseby Tower, in the sought-after development of Ocean Village. This ideal property benefits from two double bedrooms with en-suite facilities to the primary bedroom, and an array of other features that include underfloor heatin..."
"This is a beautifully presented two bedroom terrace house which would make an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity. This property is tucked away, set back from Claremont Crescent in a row of 6 terraced properties and the ground floor comprises of a entrance hall, family kitchen with amp..."
"AUSTIN & WYATT are pleased to announce the opportunity to purchase this character two bedroom apartment which has a 28'7 x 22'2 lounge/diner which is dual aspect, a family bathroom and two bedrooms. The property also has a kitchen/utility room. • First Floor Apartment &bu..."
"Welcome to Swift Road! An older style two double bedroom terraced house with no forward chain. This beautiful, Victorian home is believed to date back to the mid-1880's offering grand proportions and character façades which reflect it's period origins. Inside, the centre piece of this home is the..."
"This three bedroom mid-terrace house has been finished to a high standard throughout and accommodation on the ground floor briefly comprises an entrance hall, a downstairs cloakroom, a lounge, kitchen and dining room. Whilst on the first floor, are three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Additional..."
"An excellent opportunity for first time buyers or investors to purchase a two bedroom end of terrace house situated a short distance from Shirley's amenities. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing with fitted kitchen and first floor bathroom. There is NO CHAIN so call t..."
"A well-presented presented 2 bedroom end of terraced property in the popular residential area of Shirley. This property benefits from a good size kitchen diner, a good size living space and two good size bedrooms along with a 3 piece family bathroom. Externally this property has off road parking ..."
"This good sized three bedroom house is situated in the sought after location of Lordswood which is close to the General hospital, the sports centre and motorway links.The property benefits from a good sized lounge/Diner, three bedrooms and a modern bathroom. Outside you will find a good sized gar..."
"Kings Estates are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £250,000 for 43 Warren Avenue. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Kings Estates at 253 Portswood Road, Southampton, SO17 2NG . Before exchange of contracts.
Kings Estates present this thre..."
** OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Within convenient reach of Southampton Port City in the pretty county of Hampshire. It is located approx 70 miles south west of London and 15 miles west of Portsmouth. The property boasts plenty of space and light and is sat at the end of ter...
"This generously sized, well-presented ground-floor apartment is located within the highly desirable location of Banister Park and only a short distance from the 300 acres of open spaces of the Common, the central railway station, the city centre and access to the M3 motorway. The apartment would ..."
Beside a peaceful waterfront and in a beguiling setting between meandering coastal paths and busy local bistros. Leading into the apartment you are welcomed into a liberally sized entrance hall with a helpful airing cupboard. The generously sized master bedroom benefits from built-in wardrobes. T...
"A SPACIOUS apartment in Woolston, available with NO CHAIN, welcoming CASH buyers only, ideal for INVESTORS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to welcome to the market this charming two bedroom fourth floor apartment in Woolston, available with no forward chain - welcoming cas..."
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Introducing this immaculately presented two-bedroom, modern apartment located in the ever-popular area of Ocean Village. Entering the home, you are welcomed by a generous hallway and ample storage facilities. Further into the modern apartment is the open plan livi..."
"INTRODUCTION Set within the heart of Ocean Village marina is this luxurious two double bedroom apartment which is in the sought after Moresby Tower, which not only offers a concierge service but is also conveniently situated Close to a fantastic selection of restaurants, bars, Southampton City ..."
"**For Sale By Online Auction. Starting Bids £250,000. Terms and Conditions Apply** Set within the heart of Ocean Village marina is this luxurious two double bedroom apartment which is in the sought after Hawkins tower, which not only offers a concierge service but is also conveniently situat..."
"This three bedroom end of terrace house is set in the popular location of Merryoak and offers excellent accommodation. The property on the ground floor comprises an entrance hall, a modern fitted downstairs bathroom, a lounge/diner and fitted kitchen. Whilst on the first floor there are three bed..."
"Located in the desirable Newtown area of the City, close to shops, amenities and schooling, this two/three bedroom Victorian home boasts a wealth of spacious accommodation which has been newly refurbished. This stunning home is the perfect family home and is ready to move straight in..."
"This sizeable, three/four bedroom, double fronted home enjoys a quiet position in the desirable Newtown area of the City. The accommodation is spacious and flexible in its use, perfect for family living and offers huge potential to improve. Once inside you are greeted by a welcoming hallway with ..."
"Situated in the sought after location of Swaythling, this wonderful post war mid terrace residence comes to the market for the first time in nearly half a century, although requiring full renovation to restore it to its former glory, this would make a wonderful first buy for anyone wanting to pu..."
"An excellent opportunity for first time buyers or buy to let investors to purchase this well presented two bedroom mid terrace house which offers spacious living accommodation. Internally the property boasts a large open plan lounge/diner, two double bedrooms, fitted kitchen and spacious bathroom..."
"Set in a cul de sac location and offered with two double bedrooms, this spacious bungalow enjoys off road parking and a garage. A good sized garden is conveyed with this home and there are local shops and bus services as well as a pharmacy."
"A well-presented three bedroom mid-terraced home situated in Thornhill, within a quiet cul-de-sac. The well-proportioned property briefly comprises a good-sized lounge and a fitted kitchen with adjacent dining area. To the first floor, are three good-sized bedrooms and an attractive shower room. ..."
"This two double bedroom top floor apartment is offered in excellent condition throughout, having been built in 2019 the property offers spacious accommodation and benefits from only being one of only four apartments in the block and the only apartment on the top floor. Development offers arrange ..."
"Austin & Wyatt Shirley are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached home situated in Regents Park. This spacious family home is located within walking distance of Shirley high street which offers a wide range of shops, restaurants with take away ..."
"A MODERN and beautifully presented ONE BEDROOM retirement apartment, situated on the FIRST FLOOR of the stunning Hampton Place development in Shirley, Southampton."
" Austin & Wyatt delighted to offer for sale this modern two bedroom apartment in the residential area of Weston in Southampton. This property is presented to a good standard the accommodation comprises of open planned lounge/dining room and fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, family bat..."
We have been advised that the re-cladding work has been approved and will be payed in full . City Centre is this magnificent 3rd floor two bedroom apartment enjoying larger than average and bespoke accommodation finished to an exceptional standard with two balconies and secure undercroft parking.
"In need of modernisation throughout is the two/three-bedroom detached bungalow. The property is offered for sale with no forward chain and has a spacious sitting room, kitchen, bathroom, conservatory and an enclosed rear garden. There is also a garage at the rear. An internal inspection is highly..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Purpose Built in 2019 Apartmen...
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this great family home situated in the popular residential area of Lordswood. The property comprises; generous living room with stairs to the first floor and door into the good sized kitchen diner to the rear with plenty of space for entertaini...
TWO BEDROOM END OF TERRACE HOUSE|  SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION | SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD | LOVELY RESIDENTIAL AREA JUST OFF STONEHAM LANE | EASY ACCESS INTO AND OUT OF THE CITY | PARKING |  
Royal Crescent Apartments was constructed in 2018 located in a prominent position within the city. This stylish two-bedroom apartment offers an approximate 760 square foot internal accommodation completed to a high specification throughout. On entry to the property you are greeted by a spacious h...
Kings Estates welcome this three bedroom detached bungalow located in the Midanbury district of Southampton to the market. Please contact Kings Estates if you would like to arrange a viewing.
"Looking for a modern home with far reaching views over the ""River Itchen"" then look no further! ** Townhouse set over three floors ** In need of modernisation through-out ** Entrance hall ** Kitchen/dining room leading to garden ** Lounge ** Three bedrooms ** Family bathroom ** Separate WC **"
Just imagine sitting on your own balcony soaking up the calm of river views and watching the coming & going of the the yachts & motor boats in the Ocean Village Marina.  This could be you with this fantastic two bedroom apartment in the Azera development in Centenary Quay.  Don't mis...
"A 2 bedroom detached bungalow located in a quiet cul-de-sac with great links to Southampton City Centre and Southampton general hospital. The property benefits from a front garden and drive way, leaving space for 2 cars and side access into rear garden which is mainly laid with lawn and has a pat..."
"Loved for its generously sized living spaces, pioneering building design, floor to ceiling windows and contemporary feel, this exciting three double bedroom, 5th floor, apartment showcases an allocated parking space, impressively sized kitchen/dining area with spectacular turret and a handy ensui..."
"Investors Only. Introducing this two bedroom mid terrace home offered with tenant in situ, set in the popular residential location of Central Southampton. In our opinion, this is the ideal investment and offers some generous size living space throughout. Internally, the property offers ..."
"Situated in a cul de sac location, is this three-bedroom terraced family home that has been refurbished throughout including new flooring and redecoration. The property includes a lounge with a feature fireplace, a modern fitted kitchen/diner, two double bedrooms and a single bedroom with the mas..."
"***CHAIN FREE*** A secure and sizeable two double bedroom apartment which yields a securely gated off road parking space, balcony, secure telephone entry system and no onward chain. Charter House was established in 2002 and is situated 0.5 miles from a vibrant and energetic city centre which..."
"Hamwic Independent Estate Agents offer for sale this 2 double bedroom terraced house located in Sholing, Southampton and offered with no forward chain. Benefits include gas central heating, double glazed windows, integral garage/workshop and off road parking. "
Charters are delighted to offer for sale this second floor apartment which is offered for sale with the added benefit of being chain free. The current owners have used the property very successfully for the busy rental market so it would make the ideal choice of property for any buy to let landlo...
Leaders are delighted to bring to market this terraced two bedroom house. We believe this property to be an ideal first time buy or investment. The property is currently tenanted and being very well looked after. The property can be found in the popular residential and investment area of Por...
"NO CHAIN! Mann Countrywide present for sale a spacious two double bedroom house with garage and driveway in close proximity to Southampton General Hospital. Accommodation includes the hall, kitchen, and generous size living room on the ground floor whilst there are two well-proportione..."
"Introducing this two bedroom mid terrace Freehold home set in the popular residential location of Lordswood in Southampton. In our opinion, this is the ideal first time buy or investment and offers some generous size living space throughout. Internally, the property offers a light and a..."
Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this three bedroom mid-terrace house This Victorian house is located in a popular part of Shirley located between St James Park and Southampton Common.
"A 2 double bedroom terrace home in a quiet cul-de-sac in Sholing. Internally there is a kitchen, spacious lounge, conservatory and a shower room to the first floor. The property needs modernisation and is offered for sale with no forward chain. Accommodation Entrance hallway:	Access to: ..."
"Whether you’re a first-time buyer, or an investor, look no further. This two double bedroom, mid terraced house, could be just what you are looking for. Situated in the popular area of Sholing, this home really could provide everything that you require. Set within a cul-de-sac ..."
** CHAIN FREE ** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM** semi-detached **BUNGALOW** OFF STREET PARKING** and DETACHED GARAGE in the highly sought after Old Redbridge area. ** FREEHOLD ** COUNCIL TAX BAND C**
"Mid-terrace Victorian property offered with no forward chain. The property offers a huge amount of potential and scope for someone to put their own stamp on this home which benefits from 3 bedrooms, 2 open plan downstairs reception rooms, and fitted kitchen. To the outside is a driveway & garden."
"A ground floor two bedroom  retirement apartment located within Lincoln Court Sharon Rd West End, over 55's.  Apello emergency response system and site warden with care line installed, situated within a quiet location the light and airy spacious accommodation comprises a good size lounge/dining r..."
"Enjoying a wonderfully quiet, cul-de-sac position that neighbours Southampton Sports Centre in the popular Bassett area of the City, we are pleased to offer this stunning spacious, two bedroom first floor apartment which has under gone a full refurbishment by the existing owners. The ..."
** PRIVATE TERRACE** NO VENDOR CHAIN**ALLOCATED UNDERCROFT PARKING SPACE ** Boasting a south facing terrace tucked into the corner of The Blake building is this well presented two double bedroom apartment. The spacious hallway gives a light and airy feel which is consistent throughout the propert...
"Offered for sale with a generous rear garden and no forward chain is this three bedroom terraced house in Heathfield Road, Sholing. On the ground floor the property is approached via a generous entrance hall which offers handy storage space for shoes and coats, there is a spacious 13'1' x 12'9' f..."
"Vectis Court is a seriously sought after development tucked away in a quiet and leafy cul-de-sac in the popular Bassett area of the City. This three bedroom second floor apartment offers a wealth of spacious and beautifully presented accommodation, accompanied by a private balcony and garage. "
"This 2/3 bedroom house is found at the rear of a large house on Hill Lane, over two floors, with its own entrance and garden and within walking distance of the train station and city centre. This property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing and is currently tenanted until June 2..."
"Guide Price - £230,000 - £240,000. **CASH BUYERS ONLY** This three-bedroom semi-detached house is in a sought-after location of Highfield, Southampton, conveniently located close to shops and restaurants. The property consists of lounge, dining room, kitchen and lean to conservat..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house in the residential area of Sholing in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a fair standard and the accommodation comprises of lounge, fitted kitchen/diner, three bedrooms and family bathr..."
"**CASH BUYERS ONLY** This luxury 5th floor apartment is presented in great order and offers the current owner a generous living space with ensuite to the master bedroom, a kitchen with integrated appliances and a balcony with panoramic views across the River Itchen. "
"Situated in the highly desirable location of Millbrook, Connells are delighted to welcome to the market this desirable two bedroom end of terrace property in Seacombe Green. This property would make the perfect family home or investment purchase."
Austin & Wyatt Shirley are pleased to welcome to the market this beautifully presented and particularly spacious 2 bedroom end of terrace house with study/small third bedroom situated in the popular residential area of Lordshill. There is a large reception room leading onto dining...
"***10 METRE BERTH*** A first floor apartment situated in the popular Ocean Village with views towards the marina and a 10 metre mooring. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, bedroom, bathroom and benefits from double glazing, gas central heating. Further benefits also includ..."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this two bedroom second floor apartment, enjoying a requested location in the desirable Highfield area of the City on Westwood Road."
"Guide Price £225,000 to £230,000 Subject to Contract. This spacious (1,078.95 Sq.Ft) three-bedroom mid terrace property with a westerly facing garden offers scope to redecorate to your own taste and to fully realise it as the amazing family home. The property is situated in an extre..."
"This Character two bedroom character house is set in the highly sought-after area of Portswood, which is just a stone's throw from the high street with all of its shops, cafes, bars and local amenities, making this a very convenient location.The property is a great size and has a host of characte..."
"** CHAIN FREE ** A character two bedroom semi detached house set in the highly sought-after area of Portswood, In brief the property consists Lounge, Dining room, Kitchen and family bathroom on the ground and two double bedrooms. The property is conveniently located near transport links, shops ..."
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Situated in the highly sought after location of Upper Shirley, Connells are delighted to bring to the market this TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED property on Wilton Road which has fantastic potential to become a wonderful family home."
"Ideally located in the popular Newtown area of the City, this well-presented, two bedroom semi-detached house offers well-proportioned and nicely presented accommodation, with two separate reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom and a separate toilet and two first floor bedrooms ..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this modern two double bedroom end of terrace house that is available with the added benefit of there being no forward chain and is the perfect home for first time buyers, downsizers, or buy to let landlords. Ideally located close to local amenities, schoo..."
"This rarely available two-bedroom ground floor maisonette is situated in Highfield, a sought-after location within walking distance of The Common, the University campus in Highfield and the extensive shopping facilities found in Portswood. The entrance door opens to the hallway which benefits fr..."
"Franklinallan are proud to offer for sale this 2 bedroom character turn of the century semi-detached house. Situated on the edge of Portswood and Inner Avenue close to local amenities such as Portswood High Street, public transportation and access into Southampton City Centre makes this house an ..."
"Martin and co are pleased to present this 3 bedroom property for sale within walking distance of Westquay shopping centre, St Mary's Stadium and a number of restaurants. Solent University is only 0.5 miles away. With multiple bus stops nearby, there is easy access to public transport all over Sou..."
"Situated within close proximity to Southampton General Hospital this two-bedroom terraced house is offered for sale with no forward chain. The downstairs accommodation comprises of a generously sized living room, dining room which leads on to a westerly facing family room, fitted kitchen with fan..."
VERY POPULAR LOCATION VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this ground floor two bedroom maisonette in the popular residential area of Bitterne Park in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a good standard and the accommo...
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY | PART OF A PORTFOLIO | PERIOD MID TERRACE HOUSE | THREE BEDROOMS | TWO RECEPTION ROOMS | COURTYARD STYLE GARDEN | ON THE MARKET WITH TENANTS IN SITU
"Enjoying a quiet cul-de-sac position just off London Road in the heart of the city centre, this magnificent top floor two-bedroom apartment in Synor House is available with no onward chain and is ideal for owner occupiers and rental investors. The building offers secure communal entry with stair..."
This Modern two double bedroom Apartment is situated on one of Southampton's most desirable roads and locations which is just a stone throw from Southampton Common and Southampton city Centre is just a short walk away. The property benefits from two double bedrooms with the master benefitting fro...
"Located in the popular Newtown area of the City, this well-presented and very spacious three bedroom terrace house offers a wealth of accommodation, with three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, kitchen, utility room, ground floor bathroom and a courtyard garden."
Modern spacious two-bedroom apartment with car port located in a prime area within a beautiful and highly desirable marina development and close to so much
"Banister Park is a collection of thoughtfully designed apartment homes in a prime location within Southampton. Residents will enjoy beautiful surroundings and convenient access to the city's best shopping, dining and entertainment. With easy access to public transportation and major highways, Ban..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this stylish and modern first floor apartment within a quiet gated development hidden away from the road yet within easy reach of all daily amenities. The property is located in the ever popular Maybush, close to The General Hospital, Shirley High Street..."
"Martin & Co are pleased to offer this first floor, two bedroom apartment with lift access, Master bedroom with ensuite, lounge diner with juliet balcony. The property includes access to an on site gym and also features a separate storage cupboard on the ground floor. There is 1 allocated park..."
"Charters are delighted to offer for sale this two-bedroom maisonette in the highly desirable Bassett with close proximity to the Avenue, the general hospital, university campus, The Common, sports centre, golf course, and access to the M3 motorway network. It is a perfect property for first-time..."
"This top floor, two bedroom apartment with allocated parking is within a modern development located a short walk from Town Centre in sought after Banister Park. This stunning property offers bright and spacious accommodation with open plan living space leading directly to the South facing pri..."
**KEY FEATURES** * TENANT IN SITU * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * GARAGE * UPPER FLOOR APARTMENT * COMMUNAL GARDENS * FANTASTIC LOCATION IN BASSETT * CLOSE TO M27 & M3 MOTORWAYS Austin & Wyatt are pleased to announce this purpose built developme...
"Introducing this spacious three-bedroom terraced home located in the residential area of Coxford in Southampton. The property has been renovated and we believe this is the ideal first time buy or investment. Internally, the property benefits from a downstairs W.C, generous size lounge..."
"Edison Green are delighted to offer for sale this stunning two bedroom first floor apartment situated in the historic and luxurious South Western House, which combines an abundance of grand traditional features with luxury accommodation with high ceilings and superb views. This Grade II listed bu..."
A modern and spacious two double bedroom first-floor apartment in a highly sought-after location in the heart of Southampton with everything the city dweller needs close by. The property was converted by a respected local developer and would appeal to a purchaser seeking a stylish home boasting a...
"Offered with vacant possession, a well presented two bedroom modern duplex apartment with garage. Located in the sought after area of Rownhams with excellent access to the motorway to Bournemouth, Winchester and Portsmouth, the property is arranged over 2 floors comprises on the first floor a si..."
"Situated in an idyllic green setting, this two bedroom first floor apartment is offered with no forward chain.  Located on Glenwood Avenue in Bassett the property has good communication links in and out of the city centre.  The property enjoys a south facing balcony with a dual aspect sitting roo..."
AUSTIN & WYATT are pleased to announce this NO ONWARD CHAIN fantastic 2 bedroom apartment to the market. This property is in the fantastic location of St Denys and has spectacular views over looking the rive itchen. This stunning two bedroom apartment offers well-proportioned bedr...
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this great family home situated in the popular residential area of Aldermoor. The property is in need of some internal modernisation and would make the ideal first buy or investment purchase. The property comprises; entrance hall leading to th...
"The Archways is an extremely desirable building located in the popular Banister Park area of the City, that is within easy reach of the City Centre, Mainline Train Station and Southampton Common. The apartment enjoys a second floor position with a sunny aspect and a wealth of spacious and well-pr..."
"Conveniently positioned within walking distance to Southampton City Centre & Southampton Common is this two double bedroom first floor flat situated on Hulse Road. Offered for sale with no forward chain, the property comprises a good size lounge/diner, separate kitchen, two bedrooms and three-pie..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this Victorian period cottage in good decorative order, conveniently situated with easy access to local shops and amenities. This property comprises two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, fitted kitchen, downstairs bathroom. Further features include a good s..."
"This ground floor two bedroom maisonette has been finished to a high standard throughout and offers excellent accommodation. The property comprises an entrance hall, a modern fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, a four piece bathroom and a lounge/diner. Additional benefits include direct access t..."
"***EWS1 CERTIFICATE IN PLACE*** Loved for its generously sized internal spaces, pioneering building design, floor to ceiling windows and well-proportioned balcony areas. This exciting two double bedroom, two balcony, third floor apartment showcases an approximate lease length of 104 ye..."
"Welcome To St Annes Gate! NO FORWARD CHAIN! Spacious two bedroom second floor apartment in the popular area of Banister Park just a short walk to Southampton City Centre. Offered with no forward chain. Two double bedrooms, Three piece bathroom ..."
"Enjoying a convenient Banister Park position within easy reach of City Centre and Common, this immaculately presented and very spacious top floor, two double bedroom apartment is situated in The Quadrant on Archers Road and offers bright and airy accommodation, coupled with allocated parking."
"Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this first floor two bedrooms two bathrooms apartment. Located in a sought after location of Glen Eyre Road a popular residential area and close to the University, local amenities and good transport links."
WONDERFUL GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT | TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS | POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION ON WESTWOOD ROAD | SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM & SEPARATE KITCHEN | GARAGE | IDEAL INVESTMENT OR RESIDENTIAL PURCHASE
"**NO FORWARD CHAIN** **IDEAL FIRST TIME PURCHASE** **GOOD BUY TO LET OPPORTUNITY** Lets Rent Southampton are delighted to present for sale this mid terraced two bedroom house, perfectly located on Lyon Street in the popular area of Inner Avenue in Southampton. "
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - An exclusive, share of Freehold corner plot apartment located within the new Bevois Residence development in Bevois Valley. "
A very spacious 2 double bedroom first floor maisonette which comes with its OWN GARDEN & GARAGE. The LONG LEASE and no maintenance charge should make this high on the list of homes to view.
"**CASH BUYERS ONLY** Located in the heart of Southamptons vibrant city, is this modern two double bedroom apartment. Kimber House is set in the area known as the French Quarter and the apartments set within are highly regarded for their spacious room sizes. Offering a l..."
"Edison Green are delighted to present this fantastic 2 double bedroom city centre apartment available with no forward chain. Attractive characteristics include; off road allocated parking, a lift to all floors, a very generously proportioned open plan living space boasting a modern kitchen, and a..."
"Enjoying a convenient position in the highly desirable Banister Park, only a short stroll to the vibrant Bedford Place and Train Station, this exceptional apartment on the second floor of St Annes Gate offers spacious and well-presented accommodation with a balcony and a garage suitable for a car."
"Location Riverside Court is located in a desirable residential area, close to a range of amenities, including shops, restaurants, schools and leisure facilities. It is also conveniently situated for good transport links, with easy access motorway network and a mainline railway station nearby..."
"Guide Price £210,000-£220,000 Leasehold. Manns and Manns are delighted to offer this top floor two bedroom apartment situated in a popular gated development. The property benefits from communal grounds and an allocated parking space. Views over the Solent and Isle of Wight. Viewing..."
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** Situated in the highly sought after location of Upper Shirley, this two bedroom semi-detached property offers fantastic potential to become a perfect family home. A viewing is highly recommended to truly appreciate the location and the accommodation that we have to offer."
"Admiralty House is a substantial Grade II listed building, originally serving as offices for Royal Mail and British Telecom and having been converted into luxurious apartments in 1999, with views towards Southampton Channel, cruise terminal and port. The property comprises a spacious sitting/dini..."
"This Modern and spacious two bedroom Apartment is a fantastic size throughout and is situated in the sought after Surrey Point development which is in the area of Bassett, so is close to local amenities and just a short distance from Bassett's parade of shops as well as numerous parks, Sports Cen..."
"An opportunity has arisen to purchase this two bedroom mid-terraced property. It is located in a quiet area of Peartree, with local amenities nearby and also a good school catchments area. This would be perfect for a first family home."
"Not often does a property come to the market that has no compromise on size or location, this spacious three bedroom family home in Arnheim Road will certainly tick all the boxes. Being in a fantastic location with not only Southampton General Hospital and local amenities in close vicinity, but a..."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terraced house in the residential area of Itchen in Southampton. The property in our opinion is presented to a fair condition and the accommodation comprises of lounge/diner, fitted kitchen and bathroom, three b..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom home situated in the residential area of New Town. The property comprises; entrance hall leading the lounge, dining room and the generous kitchen breakfast room. The enclosed rear garden is accessed via here. ..."
"Two bedroom ground floor apartment with balcony, located in the sought after area of Upper Shirley. Garage and off road parking. No onward chain."
"Castle Place was constructed in 2008 and is situated on a cosmopolitan high street which presents an array of amenities on its doorstep to include brasseries, bars, surgery, pharmacy and a convenience store located below. This beautifully maintained third floor, two double bedroom city centre apa..."
| *** CHAIN FREE *** | *** ESW1 APPROVED *** | *** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO OCEAN VILLAGE MARINA *** | *** ONE ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE FOR ONE CAR *** | *** GAS CENTRAL HEATING *** | 
"A well presented top floor two double bedroom apartment that's been tastefully improved by the current owner. Located within the popular Dell Development. The accommodation includes two double bedrooms, en-suite, bathroom, living room, modern fitted kitchen and allocated undercroft parking."
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this two bedroom, semi detached house, in the popular location of Thornhill. This spacious home has a 14ft sitting room, 11ft kitchen, 14ft master bedroom and a southerly facing rear garden. The property is offered with the convenience of no forward ..."
"Hunters have been favoured with the instruction to sell this superb top floor apartment. The property is conveniently situated with easy access to local shops, train station, and city centre ideal for an investment or first time buyer opportunity. The apartment itself comprises two double bedroom..."
"Excellent opportunity for first time buyers or investors to buy this well priced two-bed house with large 1st floor bathroom. The property has a good sized lounge and kitchen and benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and off-road parking. There is NO CHAIN, so an early viewing is hi..."
"Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented, ground floor, two bedroom apartment situated in Northam. The property would make an ideal purchase for a first time buyer or professional couples trying to get on the property ladder, or Landlords due to..."
"This one bedroom terraced bungalow in Mansbridge is a must see! Comprising of a 12'8ft lounge with character feature fireplace, great sized double bedroom overlooking the rear garden, three piece bathroom suite and fitted kitchen. Externally the South East facing rear garden is enclosed and easy ..."
"***GEORGIAN SPLENDOR*** A former Customs House building which reveals exquisite hallmark features such as a classical entrance hall, Portland stone and yellow brick façade, sweeping stair case, high characterful ceilings and impressive Georgian sash windows with white wooden shu..."
"Situated in the popular location of Bitterne Manor is this two bedroom apartment. Offering neutral decor throughout, the flat briefly consists of: entrance hall with a storage cupboard, airing cupboard, substantial lounge diner extending to 17'1', 13'9', two double bedrooms with ensuite to the ma..."
"Slotting effortlessly into a busy city centre location where convenience is local, amenities are premier, peace is essential and internal style is not compromised on. A relative newcomer to the booming city, this attractively presented two double bedroom first floor apartment offers a slice of se..."
Two bedroom top floor apartment situated in the City Centre of Southampton. OFFERED WITH NO FORWARD CHAIN. The property comprises of two double bedrooms with an en-suite shower room to the master. There is an additional three piece bathroom by the second bedroom. The living space is open plan wit...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented throughout, two bedroom, ground floor maisonette in the popular location of Harefield. This spacious home boasts a 14ft sitting/dining room, 12ft master bedroom, modern kitchen and bathroom and a private and enclosed rear garden. "
"** CHAIN FREE ** An excellent BUY TO LET opportunity with tenant in situ at £1000PCM. Ths GROUND FLOOR purpose built TWO DOUBLE bedroom mordern apartment benefits fro, open plan kitchen diner, bathroom and communal garden. centrally located near amenities. ** SHARE OF FREEHOLD *..."
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom home situated in the residential area of Northam. The property comprises; entrance hall leading the living room which is open plan to the dining room and gives access to the garden via double doors. The fitted kitchen is ...
"** CHAIN FREE ** An excellent BUY TO LET opportunity with tenant in situ **TOP FLOOR** **TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS** apartment situated in the sought after location of Glen Eyre Road, Bassett. In brief the property consist of two bedrooms, bathroom, entrance hall, large lounge/diner, kitchen and alloca..."
"Fox & Sons as sole selling agents are delighted to offer for sale this character three bedroom apartment in this Grade II listed building. Portland Terrace is situated within Southampton City Centre with its vast array of shopping, leisure and dining facilities."
** For sale by online auction **  Welcome To Percy Road! This is a Three bedroom semi-detached house in Percy Road which is conveniently located just a short walk from Shirley High street. The property is being sold by auction which is on ...
74 sq meters (796 sq feet) NO CHAIN offered with this spacious 2 double bedroom first floor apartment set in a cul de sac location. Allocated parking is another benefit and there are delightful river walks opposite the apartment.
"Positioned within a desirable area of the city, in a leafy setting just off The Avenue, this magnificent ground floor apartment is superbly located in equal distance to the amenities of the city centre and the vast Parklands of Southampton Common and is perfect for someone seeking convenience and..."
"A smart and spacious two bedroom top floor apartment in a convenient position for West End village. and Southampton. Ideal for investment, retirement or first time purchase, it has an en-suite, under floor heating, air filtration system and a balcony. NO FORWARD CHAIN. MUST BE VIEWED. "
"This generously sized second floor apartment is located in a quiet area of Midanbury. The property is being offered with NO CHAIN, and the accommodation benefits from two double bedrooms with an en-suite to the master, 17 foot lounge, and outlooks onto Deepdene Woods surrounding the property."
"Austin & Wyatt are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom third floor apartment in the residential area of Harefield in Southampton. The property is presented to a very high standard and the accommodation comprises open planned lounge and fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, en suite sh..."
"This two-bedroom flat located within a stone's throw to Southampton General Hospital and in our opinion is an ideal investment or first time buy. Located on the second floor, this flat is well laid out providing excellent accommodation. There is an open plan living/dining room with large Fre..."
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £200,000
This property will be legally prepared enabling any interested buyer to secure the property immediately once their bid/offer has been accepted. Ultimately a transparent process which provides speed..."
"Offers in Excess of £200,000. Immaculately presented one bedroom cluster house located in a quiet cul-de-sac. The property benefits from a private garden, an allocated parking space and would be ideal for a first time buyer or investor."
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this great two double bedroom apartment situated in close proximity to Southampton University. The property comprises; entrance hall leading to the generous lounge which is a very good size perfect for entertaining. The fitted kitchen is also a...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this beautifully presented throughout, two bedroom, ground floor apartment in the sought after location of Bitterne Manor. This property benefits from a 16ft sitting/dining room, a beautifully presented modern bathroom, stylish en suite to master to ..."
"**CASH BUYERS ONLY** ** Open house 18/03/2023, 13:30-14:30 ** strictly by appointment only!! Purplebricks are pleased to present to the market this well presented, three bedroom end of terrace house which is situated in the highly popular residential area of Millbrook. The three well proportio..."
"A stylish and modern two bed apartment within the newly built Meridian Waterside development. Conveniently situated within walking distance to the River Itchen and a range of amenities located nearby within Southampton city centre, this particular apartment is being offered with no forward chain...."
Offered for sale with no forward chain and long lease is this spacious two double bedroom first floor maisonette in Sholing. Internally this property boasts modern decor throughout. The lounge/diner features two dual aspect windows flooding this home with natural light. The kitchen consists of mo...
"This unique three-bedroom character house is set in the highly sought-after area of Bevois Valley, which is just a short walk from the high street with all its shops, and local amenities, making this a very convenient location. The property has a flexible layout consisting of three bedrooms, two ..."
"Fox & Sons are pleased to be offering for sale this two bedroom ground floor flat with balcony, parking and garage in the popular location of Wilton Road, Southampton. The property is of a good size and decorative order and is light and airy. The property would either suit an investor or FTB"
"*VACANT POSSESSION & NEWLY REFURBISHED* A modern third floor, 2 double bedroom City Centre apartment with parking and balcony. Conveniently situated in the heart of the City within easy walking distance of the thriving Oxford Street, with its excellent selection of restaurants and wine bars...."
**PLEASE READ NOTES BY THE SELLER BELOW BEFORE BOOKING A VIEWING** This is an investment property which will be sold with a tenant in place who is currently renting and wishes to stay long term but is on a rolling contract. He has been in place for over 18 months. The property ...
CASH BUYERS ONLY - TENNANT IN SITU PAYING £1100 PCM. This 3 bedroom detached property is situated in the heart of Bitterne and offers easy access to the city centre and a stunning rear garden. An internal viewing is essential to appreciate the generous room sizes and potential improvements required.
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer with no forward chain, this very well maintained and spacious, two double bedroom retirement property located in this highly regarded warden controlled retirement development. Offering a light and airy sitting/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, mode..."
"Austin & Wyatt is pleased to announce this NO CHAIN and fantastic 2 bedroom Mid Terrace property to the market. This property is in good condition and a very generious size, the property is only a short distance away from the Royal South Hants Hospital, Ocean Village & Southampton Centre...."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a two bedroom semi-detached property in the highly sought after location of Coxford. The property is situated within close proximity of Southampton General hospital and would make the perfect family home or investment opportunity.
"Austin & Wyatt Shirley have the pleasure of welcoming this well presented One Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment to the market. Offered with No Onward Chain, this property benefits from a private rear garden, allocated parking, spacious double bedroom, main bathroom and open plan livin..."
"A delightful, larger than average, one-bedroom apartment situated on the ground floor in the highly regarded South Western House, a beautiful Grade II listed building steeped in history. The outstanding reception foyer creates an air of grandeur and opulence from the moment you walk in, with an i..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION ON 30th March at 12:00 £200,000 plus FREEHOLD VACANT SITE WITH PLANNING PERMISSION FOR 4 x 1 BED FLATS"
Offered with no forward chain is this second floor two double bedroom flat situated within Bassett Court. The property is currently in need of modernisation but offers great potential for either a first time buyer wanting to add their own stamp to a property or as a buy to let investment. The mai...
Situated on Silverdale Road is this well proportioned two bedroom first floor flat within Dorval House which benefits from a garage within the development. The property offers fantastic transport links in close proximity which includes Southampton City Train Station and multiple bus stops for acc...
"Enfield’s delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom mid terrace house situated in the popular residential area of Weston. The property comprises of lounge/diner, kitchen, family bathroom and benefits from double glazing and electric storage heating. The property is being offered for sale..."
"Winchester Road within the sought after location of Bassett lies this first floor modern two bedroom apartment. Being the ideal investment or first home. Being in a prime location this apartment has a real sense of home,"
"** The housing market remains open for in house or virtual viewings and valuations during lockdown ** Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this beautifully refurbished, 2 bedroom ground floor maisonette located in the highly sought after area of Shirley. The property..."
***WELL PRESENTED FLAT WITH GARDEN & GARAGE*** *** 360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are pleased to offer this spacious two-bedroom maisonette located just a short distance from Southampton City Centre. This is an ideal first-time buy or investment and the property offers a generous size...
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and spacious 2nd Floor apartment situated along the sought after location of the High Street, West End. Having two double bedrooms and an en-suite to the master makes this property a great first time buy"
"**One Bedroom Maisonette With Large Private Garden, Garage and Summerhouse** This is a fantastic Victorian one bedroom ground floor flat with private garden centrally located in Bitterne Park. Benefitting from excellent transports links with a local but stop close by, only a 5 minute walk from..."
"This detached chalet bungalow is well presented throughout with the prospect of future modernisation to fitments and décor to your own personal taste. INTERNALLY The entrance door is on the side of the property opening to the hallway, where you have doors to all of the downstairs rooms w..."
Your Move are pleased to present to the market this two double bedroom apartment situated in the sought after location of Ocean Village. Comprising of entrance hall leading to the generous living room which in turn access the kitchen. The good sized balcony is also accessed via the living r...
"This ground floor flat in Woolston is situated on the edge of the River Itchen giving extensive views along the popular water way. This home is well presented throughout with modern décor and benefits including two bedrooms, a spacious open-plan lounge/diner and kitchen, a private enclose..."
"Morris Dibben Estate Agents have the pleasure of welcoming this well presented One Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment. Offered with No Onward Chain, this property benefits from a private rear garden, allocated parking, spacious double bedroom, main bathroom and open plan living with an adj..."
This well presented two bedroom apartment boasts beautiful views over the River Itchen and Riverside Park. Occupying the first-floor position within this lovely development on Priory Avenue we believe to be a great first time buy or investment. The accommodation comprises of a welcoming ent...
A ground floor 2 bedroom apartment presented in good order and offered for sale with no forward chain. The property has a light and spacious feel and the master bedroom benefits from an ensuite shower room. This property would make an ideal purchase for a first time buyer or a buy to let investor...
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom first floor apartment situated in the popular residential location of Coxford Road opposite to the General hospital. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms, en-suite to master and a three piece bathroom suit..."
"Looking for a ground floor flat in Southampton? Check out this purpose-built apartment home in Bitterne Manor. With two bedrooms, one bathroom and en-suite to master bedroom, this apartment is perfect for singles or couples. This property is popular and in a well connected area, The a..."
IDEAL FIRST TIME PURCHASE IN A SOUGHT AFTER SETTING. NO FORWARD CHAIN. A ONE BEDROOM HOUSE (ONE OF 4) BUILT IN THE 1980'S SET IN A VERY PLEASANT RESIDENTIAL LOCATION CLOSE TO ALL AMENITIES AND EXCELLENT TRANSPORT LINKS. 
"Introducing this very well presented two-bedroom first floor apartment located in the popular residential area of Bitterne Manor in Southampton. Boasting an attractive 5.7% rental yeild this property is being sold with tenant is situ. The property is generously sized and comprises, lounge wi..."
"A Ground Floor two double bedroom apartment situated in City centre location within close proximity to Ocean Village, Accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, kitchen/living room, two double bedrooms, bathroom, en-suite and garden."
"Introducing this very well presented two bedroom maisonette located in the popular residential area of Coxford In Southampton. Set over two floors we believe this would be the perfect first time buy or investment. Internally, the first floor offers a generous size lounge/kitchen. U..."
"This spacious and bright two bedroom flat is situated in a purpose built flat location of Banister Park close to local schools and amenities. The accommodation comprises lounge/dining room with its access to the patio, a separate fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms with an en-suite bathroom to ma..."
Fifth floor two bedroom apartment situated in the popular residential location of South Western House that combines an abundance of grand traditional features with luxury accommodation. This Grade II listed building was originally built as the Imperial Hotel in 1865 and later renamed South Wester...
We are pleased to welcome to the market this well presented top floor flat with the benefit of parking and garage. Located in closely to Southampton Sports Centre in the popular area of Lordshill.
"We are pleased to welcome to the market this ONE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT including garage, parking and large private garden. NO FORWARD CHAIN"
Your Move are pleased to offer this two bedroom lower ground floor purpose built flat situated in a popular location of Banister Park close to local schools and amenities. The accommodation comprises two double bedrooms with a lovely en-suite to master bedroom. The family bathroom is also p...
"Guide Price £195,000 - £210,000 (Leasehold). CITY CENTRE APARTMENT - Located within a stunning Grade II listed building, this well presented property is offered to the market having no forward chain"
"With views towards both the Marina and the Port of Southampton, this beautifully presented and thoughtfully designed 6th floor apartment comes with two balconies and the additional benefit of no forward chain. Due to both the accommodation as well as all the property has to offer in terms of its ..."
"This well presented, end terrace house would be an ideal first purchase starter home or investment for letting out. Inside you have a lounge/diner and kitchen on the ground floor, with a double bedroom and bathroom on the first floor. Outside there is a private garden and designated parking."
The opportunity arises to purchase this two bedroom upper ground floor apartment with under croft parking. There is an entrance hall leading to a spacious lounge/fitted kitchen. Two generous sized bedrooms with the main bedroom benefiting from an ensuite. Further features include double glazing t...
"***CASH BUYERS ONLY*** A welcoming two double bedroom maritime apartment which yields a generously sized multiple aspect balcony, 24-hour concierge service, internal gym membership, tastefully decorated en-suite shower, modern tiled bathroom suite and no onward chain. The Blake Buildin..."
"A beautifully presented and recently refurbished 2 bedroom top floor flat in the popular residential area of Southampton. This property benefits from 2 very good sized bedrooms, a good sized kitchen, a large living area and a good size balcony. This property has been refurbished to a very high st..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £195,000** EWS1 OBTAINED AND NO CLADDING ISSUES. Purplebricks Southampton are delighted to present to the market this modern, immaculately presented one bedroom apartment, located in the Ocean Village Marina area. This property is perfect for BTL investors achieving a ..."
We are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom ground floor apartment in the recently converted block of Southbrook Rise. The property comprises of an entrance hall landing to the modern open plan style kitchen living space with lots of windows for a light and airy feel. The two double ...
"***SPACIOUS WELL PRESENTED APARTMENT IN A SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION*** *** 360-DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR*** Purplebricks are delighted to market for sale this well-presented two-bed, two-bath top-floor apartment, located in the highly requested area of Bitterne. The property comprises a secure entry sys..."
"Situated on one of the most desirable roads in Shirley, Connells are delighted to welcome to the market this two bedroom ground floor apartment in the highly desirable location of Shirley, situated close to Shirley High Street and Southampton General Hospital."
Kings Estates present this two bedroom apartment located on Portswood Road in Southampton. Please contact Kings Estates to arrange a viewing. 
"Situated on the first floor is this spacious two double bedroom flat located within walking distance to Southampton City Centre. Converted in 2018 the building benefits from a 125 year lease, modern fitted appliances and an allocated parking space to the front of the building. The welcoming entra..."
This beautiful retirement apartment is situated in the recently built Spitfire Lodge by the highly regarded Churchill developers. Located on the ground floor it comprises an entrance hall leading to a light and airy living room benefitting from the direct access to a patio area outside. The very...
"Edison Green are pleased to offer for sale this 6th floor city apartment close to the City Centre, Oxford Street and Ocean Village. Boasting two double bedrooms, partial water views from the open-plan living/dining space, a modern fitted kitchen with built-in appliances, a city view balcony, a se..."
"Located within the popular development of Clausentum House, is this incredibly spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment. Consisting of entrance hallway with two storage cupboards, living room with access to a private patio area. Separate kitchen diner, master bedroom with en-suite showe..."
"Nestled away from the road, in a quiet leafy position backing onto Southampton Sports Centre, Connells are delighted to offer this two bedroom third floor apartment situated in the highly sought after location of Lordswood. The property would make an ideal first time buyer or investment purchase."
"A delightfully present 2 bedroom second floor flat located conveniently close to the hospital. This property benefits from a large living dining area with access to a good sized balcony. There is a well presented kitchen, family bathroom and two very good sized bedrooms. This property is in excel..."
"Enjoying a wonderful position on Winn Road, one of Southampton’s most requested locations. This bright and airy second floor apartment in Sandringham Court is extremely well presented. Entry to the building is via a communal entrance with stairs ascending to the upper floors. On..."
"Reduced!!! Building Plot/ This is a potential building plot with planning approved for the erection of a 2-storey, 3-bed detached house with associated parking, overlooking Sholing Valley. Offered with no forward chain and an early viewing is highly recommended. The current owner is conside..."
NO FORWARD CHAIN! Welcome To Dorval Manor!  This is a two-bedroom ground floor flat with allocated off road parking for one and a renewed lease with 159 years remaining. Situated on Northlands Road which is withi...
"Tenure: Share of Freehold New to the market this large one bedroom apartment situated in the popular area of Bitterne Park.
The property Is made up of entrance hall leading to the extravagant lounge diner with unique period features including 'parquet' flooring and high celling. This room also h..."
"Brand New Second Floor 1 Bed Apartment with parking space conveniently located near the Avenue, Bedford Place and Southampton Common. Completion Early '23"
* 2 bed first floor apartment *Double glazed windows *Lounge dining room *2 double bedrooms *Electric storage heating *Excellent condition *Fitted kitchen with white goods *Allocated parking *Cul-de-sac location *Walking distance to Shirley High Street *Viewing recommended *Ideal for FTB'ers
"Situated in the highly sought after location of Briarswood, Connells are delighted to welcome to the market this two bedroom ground floor apartment situated just a stones throw away from Southampton General Hospital."
"Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this one bedroom apartment situated in the popular residential location of Grenada House close to the City Centre. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, one bedrooms and a three piece bathroom suite. The property also benefits from unde..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this spilt level apartment situated in one of Southampton's most prestigious landmark buildings of South Western House. This unique apartment has all the space for city living with generous entrance hall, great sized living space, with designat..."
| *** GREAT OPPORTUNITY FOR FTB OR INVESTORS *** | *** VIRTUAL TOUR LINK ATTACHED *** | *** GAS CENTAL HEATING *** | *** ONE ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE *** | *** SEPARATE KITCHEN *** | *** SEPARATE LOUNGE *** |
"Enjoying a wonderful position on Winn Road, one of Southampton’s most requested locations, this bright and airy penthouse apartment in Cheltenham Court is extremely spacious and benefits from a wrap-around balcony and garage. Entry to the building is via a communal entrance with ..."
"A beautifully presented ground floor flat benefitting from a spacious corner plot and allocated parking.  Really well appointed throughout, the accommodation comprises large kitchen/dining/sitting room with doors to the front garden.  The windows have been fitted with stylish plantation shutters,..."
"WATCH THE 360' TOUR HERE - An attractive and modern fourth floor apartment with spacious open plan living accommodation, generous kitchen area, one double bedroom and wrap around balcony"
"Description A superb development of just 3, three bedroom townhouses and 9 luxuriously appointed apartments superbly located close to Shirley High Street and St James Park. Excellent specification to include bespoke hand made kitchens, fitted wardrobes in bedrooms, double glazing, ensuite facilit..."
SHARED FREEHOLD - VIEWINGS AVAILABLE NOW! A collection of apartments situated within close proximity of Southampton Centre with a shared freehold.
" * PART BUY PART RENT ** £182,500 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £365,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £73,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Home’. Y..."
"Description A superb development of just 3, three bedroom townhouses and 9 luxuriously appointed apartments superbly located close Shirley High Street and St James Park. Excellent specification to include bespoke hand made kitchens, fitted wardrobes in bedrooms, double glazing, ensuite facilities..."
CASH BUYERS and NO CHAIN. This property offers 2 Double Bedrooms and a spacious single. Off road parking. Currently achieve 5.7% which could be higher!
"Two-bedroom retirement property, offered to the market with no forward chain. This lovely home benefits from bright and airy accommodation throughout, tucked away in sought-after and peaceful location on a highly-regarded warden-controlled retirement development. The property benefits from a stai..."
** Modern First Floor Apartment**Allocated Parking**Central Totton Location**Communal gardens**Proximity to Train station** Apartment built in 2012 by Linden Homes is presented for sale in excellent order throughout and offers a light and airy interior. The accommodation comprises of s...
"*ATTENTION LANDLORDS* Well presented first floor apartment in popular residential location of Portswood. As you enter the property you are greeted by a spacious hallway with a storage cupboard. At the end of the corridor is the living room, with plenty of space for a dining area..."
** CHAIN FREE ** OCEAN VILLAGE ** This spacious one bedroom apartment located on the third floor this property compromises a fantastic open place living room and kitchen. The bedroom is a generous double and has fitted wardrobes. There is a modern large three piece bathroom suite with a shower ov...
Offered for sale is this very well presented two bedroom apartment in the popular city of Southampton. The property comprises of an entrance hallway with storage cupboard leading to the generously sized lounge with space for dining area and open plan to the modern kitchen. The lounge has Frenc...
"Stanford Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented throughout, two double bedroom, top floor apartment in the popular location of Bitterne. The apartment has a separate door and is set away from the other apartments on the third floor and boasts an 18ft sitting/dining room with a ..."
Welcome to Edwina Close! We are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom ground floor maisonette situated in the popular residential location of Bitterne. Offered with No Forward Chain we feel this would make a great first time purchase or investment opportunity with an anticipated rental in...
"A delightful over 60's development situated in the sought-after area of Highfield, just a short walk from local amenities and offered with no forward chain. This lovely apartment is located on the upper floor and comprises a respectable size lounge, fitted kitchen, two large double bedrooms and ..."
"Enjoying a fabulous position in the heart of Southampton City, This beautiful two bedroom Ground floor apartment is offered with no forward chain. Upon entering the flat you are greeted by a large welcoming hallway providing access to all rooms as well as a storage cupboard. The main living area ..."
"Introducing this wonderfully presented modern two bedroom top floor apartment conveniently located in Southampton city centre. With a tenant in situ this property is only available for Investors. Offering some generous size living space and being only two years old. Internally, the pro..."
"Situated within the city centre of Southampton is an ideal opportunity for purchasers looking for a generous living space. This apartment comprises entrance hall, reception room, separate kitchen, three bedrooms and family bathroom. Furhter benefits include but not limtied to bu..."
"***NO CHAIN*** Loved for its generously sized spaces, stylish internal comfort, feature metal frame windows and marina views. This gracious one double bedroom maritime apartment showcases an approximate lease length of 117 years, gym membership and concierge service. Leading into the a..."
"A unique and spacious one bedroom semidetached house located conveniently close to the hospital. This property provides a good sized living space, a conservatory and good sized kitchen downstairs. Upstairs, there is a double bedroom and three-piece bathroom. The property benefits from a lot of st..."
NEW TO THE MARKET - RESERVE NOW! A collection of apartments situated within close proximity of Southampton Centre with a shared freehold.
We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"**OCEAN VILLAGE** This modern apartment built in 2018 is offered for sale with the remainder of a 121 year lease. Features include, Juliet balcony, one double bedroom, fitted wardrobes, entrance hall with storage area, open plan lounge/kitchen, located in the ever popular area of Ocean Village i..."
"Presenting this first-floor, one-bedroom apartment situated in a cul de sac within the popular Waterside Park development. The property comprises a living room with a Juliet balcony having stunning views over Southampton Water, a separate kitchen with a walk-in storage cupboard, a double bedroom ..."
"The apartment is situated on the first floor and benefits from two double bedrooms, a fitted bathroom, living room with separate kitchen, main bathroom, en-suite shower room. The property is currently tenanted achieving £900pcm, so would make an ideal investment or first time buy."
Kings Estates welcome this two bedroom ground floor maisonette located in the Portswood district of Southampton of Southampton. Please contact Kings Estates to arrange a viewing. 
"Part of an interesting and varied portfolio of SEVEN properties throughout Southampton with a conservative potential break up value of circa £1.1 million. Current annual income of £58,380 with potential projected income of £63,480 Opportunity for short/medium term capital growth. Part portfolio a..."
"FranklinAllan Independent Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this second floor 2 bedroom apartment which is located within the popular and sought after area of Banister Park, offering good access to Southampton City Centre, public transport links including Southampton Central Train Stati..."
| *** CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM FLATS *** | *** VIDEO TOUR LINK ATTACHED *** | *** MINUTES WALK FROM SOUTHAMPTON CENTRAL STATION *** | *** EXCLUSIVE SECURED UNDERGROUND PARKING *** | *** CLOSE PROXIMITY TO CITY CENTRE *** | *** LIFT ACCESS TO ALL FLOORS *** |
One Bed Ground Floor with private courtyard A collection of apartments situated within close proximity of Southampton Centre
"Edison Green are delighted to reveal this stunning, character, ground-floor apartment with it's own private garden, conveniently positioned close to local amenities and Southampton City Centre. Benefits include; off-road allocated parking, high ceilings & original features, open plan living, a fa..."
"Guide Price - £175,000 - £195,000. Commercial unit avaiable with immediate possession. The property consists of three office units, two lavatories and parking, the unit has been used a private hire company in the past and would suit anyone wanting an office based environment. Viewing ..."
"Unique Ground floor apartment within arguably one of the most sought after buildings in Southampton, originally dating back to the 1800’s. This lovely apartment includes a spacious bedroom to the mezzanine level, parking and communal concierge. An internal viewing is highly recommended.&..."
"This split-level two bedroom maisonette has been finished to a good standard throughout and offers excellent accommodation briefly comprising a kitchen/breakfast room and 19ft lounge/diner on the first floor. Whilst to the second floor, there are two double bedrooms and a family bathroom. Additio..."
"Pure Estate Agents are pleased to offer this two bedroom apartment set within the popular Oceana Boulevard development in central Southampton. The apartment set on the fifth floor consists of; entrance hallway, lounge / dining room with access to a balcony, modern fitted kitchen with some built i..."
"Enfields Estate Agents are delighted to offer this one bedroom, ground floor maisonette in the popular location of St Denys. Boasting a 17ft kitchen/breakfast room, 13ft sitting room, 10ft basement which is currently being used as a second bedroom, well presented private garden and of..."
"* NO FORWARD CHAIN * Newly built from 2017, this impressive one-bedroom top floor apartment is offered for sale with no forward chain, and much to offer. Crafted by Kier Construction, the home is a part of a lovely development in the heart of Maybush, Southampton. Entering into the building, the ..."
"Situated in this popular development of retirement apartments in a quiet residential location with panoramic views of the River Itchen, this is a rare opportunity to acquire a two bedroom property within this well regarded development.  The corner position with a dual aspect lounge fully takes ad..."
"Your Move are pleased to present to the market this great two bedroom purpose built apartment in the popular residential area of Shirley, and situated in close proximity to Southampton's General Hospital. The property comprises; entrance hall giving access to the generous living room with f..."
Situated just off the Avenue only a few minutes walk from the popular Southampton Common lies this two bedroom eleventh floor apartment that would be a fantastic purchase. Offering stunning views over Southampton's skyline and as far this would be a perfect first time buy or investment purchase. ...
"Located in the award winning Empress Heights Development in the heart of the city, this beautiful second floor apartment is perfect for first time buyers or rental investment and is available with no onward chain. Entry to the building is via secure communal entrances with stairs and lifts to the..."
"Stunningly presented modern style apartment is now available on our market. the two bedroom apartment is very spacious throughout and benefits from Lounge with a Juliet balcony, Kitchen, Family Bathroom, two Bedrooms, and an En suite off Bedroom one. Local amenities are available close by."
"""CASH BUYERS ONLY"" Fox and Sons Southampton have pleasure in offering for sale this 2nd floor one bedroom apartment. The property is situated in the modern development of Ocean Village with partial marina views."
Kings Estates present this TWO bedroom RETIREMENT PROPERTY to the market suitable for buyers over the ages of 60. The property is located in the Highfield area of Southampton. Please contact Kings Estates to arrange a viewing.
"Enfields Property Services are delighted to offer for sale this stunning two bedroom purpose built first floor apartment situated in the popular residential location of Bitterne. The property comprises of a lounge/diner in excess of 15', kitchen with built-in oven and hob, two bedrooms and a thre..."
"A delightful period conversion garden flat located in the popular and convenient area of Banister Park. Offering well presented accommodation with a fully-fitted kitchen and bathroom, spacious bay fronted living room, two bedrooms, a shared rear garden and permit on road parking."
"Pavilion Court is an extremely desirable building located in the popular Banister Park area of the City, that is within easy reach of the City Centre, Mainline Train Station and Southampton Common. The apartment enjoys a top floor position with a sunny aspect and a wealth of spacious and well-pre..."
"An excellent opportunity for first time buyers or investors to purchase a first floor 2 bedroom flat. Located within walking distance to Southampton City Centre and Southampton Central.The property boasts a spacious living room, fitted kitchen and bathroom. The property also benefits allocated pa..."
Over 75% sold! Don't miss out on the these apartments enjoying city views across the surrounding area. AVAILABLE TO VIEW by appointment.
This spilt level maisonette is conveniently located in the desirable area of Shirley and is being sold via Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Upon entering you are greeted by a welcoming hallway equipped with built-in storage cupboards and access to the firs...
"A beautifully presented 1-bedroom house in the popular area of Shirley. This property benefits from a large garden externally. This unique property has a good sized living area and a good sized kitchen which benefits from lots of cupboard space. Upstairs, there is a 3-piece family bathroom and a ..."
Over 75% sold! Don't miss out on the these apartments enjoying city views across the surrounding area. SHOW HOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW by appointment.
"Charters are pleased to offer this two-bedroom, sixth floor apartment in Oceana Boulevard, Southampton. Enviably positioned a stone throw away from Oxford Street where an array of eateries and bars can be found. Ocean Village marina is situated nearby. Internally the property comprises of an entr..."
Welcome to Hurworth House! Positioned on the 2nd floor with the development of Centenary Quay in Woolston is this luxurious one bedroom apartment. The centre piece of this home is the WOW factor living area which enjoys an open concept between a glamorous lounge with full height windows which flo...
"A delightful one double bedroom apartment, located on the second floor and benefitting from a generous balcony within the highly desirable and sought-after Westwood Road location, convenient for both Southampton and Solent Universities. Furthermore, the apartment is within easy walking distance o..."
"Located in the popular residential location of Waldon Gardens is this two bedroom ground floor maisonette. Consisting of private entrance and front lawn, open plan lounge/kitchen/diner, large storage cupboard, master bedroom to the front aspect and bedroom two to the rear. Situated within easy vi..."
"Beautifully presented to the market is this spacious ground floor apartment, situated in the prime location of Moorgreen Road, West End. The property offers allocated off road parking, visitor bays, secured entry and maintained communal areas. The property would make the perfect first time buy o..."
"** CASH BUYER'S ONLY ** Enfields are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom seventh floor apartment situated in the popular residential location of Oceana Boulevard close to the City Centre. The property comprises lounge/diner, kitchen, two bedrooms, en-suite to master and a thr..."
"***INVESTORS ONLY*** A good investment opportunity in White Star Place. The second floor apartment offers a generous lounge/ diner with doors to a Juliet balcony, archway through to modern fitted kitchen and some integrated appliances, two double bedrooms and family bathroom with showe..."
"We are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom first floor flat with residents parking in the popular development of Irene Court, Rosoman Road, Southampton. The property consists of a lounge with Juliette balcony and French doors, kitchen, bathroom and two bedrooms. The primary..."
***INVESTORS ONLY*** Located on the first floor this purpose-built apartment comprises of a good size lounge/ diner with the bonus of a Juliet balcony allowing light to flood the room. An archway leads into the fitted kitchen which benefits from plenty of storage and space for all your...
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom, three reception room character house, situated in a great location, only a short stroll to the beach and Southchurch Park. This charming family home has been well maintained throughout and has a warm and homely feel. Further benefits include a large south ba..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are honoured to bring to the market this striking 14 room Marine residence occupying a terrific and bold corner plot on the iconic Thorpe Esplanade with 180 degree and uninterrupted Estuary views. The property is currently laid out as two apartments but can easily be converted ...
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended over three floors, this wonderful property boasts 5 bedrooms, 4 bathroom and 4 reception rooms and a landscaped rear garden with large outbuilding (4 car garage). F..."
"Located on the sought after Burges estate and situated in The Broadway is this magnificent and spacious 4 double bedroom detached family home with impressive accommodation throughout. To the ground floor is a grand entrance hall, two large reception rooms to the front, cloakroom, a boot and st..."
"This substantial six reception room, four bedroom, two bathroom detached house is situated in a wonderful established south backing setting, within Bournes Green School catchment area. The Broadway shops, mainline railway station and local Grammar Schools are all within just a short walk. A fabul..."
Situated in a popular location on a larger than average plot is this spectacular detached family home with huge potential to further extend to both sides of the property (subject to planning permission)
"Home In Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer this extended four bedroom detached house positioned on a sumptuous West backing plot within moments of the seafront, Broadway and Thorpe Bay mainline railway station. Driveway with parking for at least 3 cars & garage. Guide price £1,250,000 - £1,300,000"
"A fantastic penthouse overlooking gorgeous sea views offering spacious living throughout, your own private sun terrace and amazing amenities right on your doorstep!"
"** Guide £1,250,000 - £1,300,000 ** Located on the popular Burges Estate, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended, this wonderful property boasts 4 bedrooms, 2 bathroom and 3 reception rooms - made up in part by the ope..."
Three bedroom apartment for sale with stunning sea views and a roof terrace
"** Guide £1,250,000 - £1,300,000 ** Located on the popular Burges Estate and offering circa 2700sq ft of living space, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended, this wonderful property boasts 4 / 5 bedrooms, 3 bathroom a..."
"Stunning three bedroom penthouse apartment located in the sought-after Westcliff Parade. This unique property spans the entire top floor of the detached Stratton House, affording spectacular views across the Estuary from the private south facing roof terrace. Spacious neutral living spaces throug..."
"Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended, this wonderful property boasts 4 bedrooms, 3 bathroom and 4 reception rooms. Landscaped rear garden with swimming pool. Further benefits include new double glazed windows and doors throughou..."
"Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite family home. Sited within a short stroll of Thorpe Bay Broadway with its selection of shops and fine eateries, this substantial property boasts four bedrooms, three reception rooms, three bathrooms and a landscaped west back..."
"Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite family home. Having been extended and laid out over three floors, this wonderful property boasts 4 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms and 3 reception rooms - made up in part by the open plan kitchen / family room that opens directly onto..."
"This substantial four bedroom Neo-Georgian detached family home is situated in one of Thorpe Bays most desirable roads and within the highly sought after Burges Estate. Only a short walk to the seafront, Broadway shops and mainline railway station. This charming home benefits from a large plot wi..."
"A beautifully appointed Five bedroom, three bathroom detached period property, arranged over three floors, offering fabulous family accommodation with a wealth of original charm and character. This truly wonderful home has been greatly improved throughout, including a stunning ""open plan&quo..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £1,100,000 - £1,200,000* Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Sited within a short stroll of Thorpe Bay Broadway with its selection of shops and fine eateries, this extended property boasts four double bedrooms, four recepti..."
"Located on the popular Burges Estate and boasting EXTENSIVE ESTUARY VIEWS, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming family home. The property benefits from 4 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, ground floor W.C. and a large SOUTH backing garden. Further benefits include th..."
"Guide Price-£1,100,000-£1,300,000. Situated within the sought after Burges Estate is this impressive detached home offering three floors of spacious accommodation with an abundance of original character and charm"
** WITH OUTDOOR HEATED SWIMMING POOL ** An outstanding four-bedroom detached family home. This immaculately presented property has been equipped with the finest in luxury and convenience for the modern family.
This impressive detached home located in walking distance to excellent local amenities boasts a luxury lifestyle with stunning interior and spacious living throughout
A desirable and impressive detached family home boasting spacious open plan living throughout and situated in a wonderful neighbourhood surrounded by fantastic local amenities
"Occupying a double width plot (circa 65ft wide), Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite detached bungalow. The versatile living space is made up of four bedrooms (dressing room & en-suite to master), five reception rooms and beautifully landscaped garden..."
"A Rare Opportunity - This beautifully appointed four double bedroom detached house is situated in a very sought after road and within Bournes Green School catchment area. These ""Award Winning"" contemporary homes offer stylish open plan living and boast numerous wonderful design features..."
"As the sellers preferred agent, we are delighted to offer this versatile three/four double bedroom detached chalet style home, boasting a 65' x 45' South backing rear garden with swimming pool. Located within the Bournes Green School catchment area and easy distance to Thorpe Bay Mainline Station."
"Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this top floor flat to the market. This flat consist of two double bedrooms, bathroom/w.c, lounge/diner and modern kitchen. The property benefits from secure camera controlled parking with two allowed parking spaces whilst being positioned in an extremely c..."
"This beautifully appointed detached character house is situated in a wonderful established setting, within Bournes Green School catchment area and backing directly onto tennis courts. This deceptively spacious family home has been well improved throughout, blending a wealth of charm and character..."
"** Guide £900,000 - £950,000 ** Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended, this deceptively large property benefits from four bedrooms (en-suite and dressing room to master), three reception rooms and a utility / laundry ..."
"Occupying a large SOUTH BACKING plot, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite detached bungalow. Boasting circa 2300 square feet of versatile living space, this deceptively large property benefits from three bedrooms (en-suite to master), three reception rooms and..."
A substantial four bedroom detached family home situated within a sought after road within Thorpe Bay. This individually designed 'Thorby' built property has been owned by the current family since new and benefits from a large west backing rear garden. In and out driveway to front plus a large do...
"A deceptively large four bedroom, two bathroom detached house, situated in a sought after road within the ever popular Burges Estate. Only a short stroll to the seafront, Broadway shops and mainline railway station. This spacious family home has three excellent reception rooms plus a large establ..."
Hair & Son are delighted to offer for the first time to the market since 1965 this magnificent five bedroom detached house situated in the Westcliff-on-sea Milton Conservation area. With a wealth of original character features throughout and offered to the market with no onward chain. 
"A TRULY RARE OPPORTUNITY - This attractive three bedroom, two reception room detached double fronted bungalow is situated within the sought after Burges Estate, only a short stroll to the beach, Broadway shops and mainline railway station. The property occupies a beautifully established West back..."
"Guide Price £850,000 - £900,000
This incredible detached house has been beautifully decorated throughout to create the perfect family home close to excellent local amenities"
"** Guide £850,000 - £900,000 ** Occupying a large WEST BACKING plot, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been extended, this deceptively large property benefits from four bedrooms (en-suite to master), four reception rooms and a ..."
"Guide Price £850,000 - £900,000 Home Of Leigh are proud to offer for sale this beautiful period property, located in the sought after Milton Conservation area of Westcliff On Sea and therefore being within easy reach of Hamlet Court Road shops, bars and restaurants as well as the beach and mainli..."
"Being situated in a sought after location of Southchurch Boulevard, is this fully detached four double bedroom detached house offering spacious ground floor living accommodation and having the advantage of two en suites to two of the bedrooms, as well as a good size family bathroom. Attractive f..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £825,000 - £850,000*** - * No Onward Chain * Ultra impressive four bedroom semi-detached house, combining original Victorian features with stylish and modern accommodation to create a special family home. Located in the ever popular Milton Conservation area in Westcliff-on-Sea prov..."
"Bear Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this stunning renovated five bedroom executive detached family home within the heart of Thorpe Bay offering links to local train stations and local shops. Throughout the property there is five large bedrooms, two en-suites, main bathroom, open p..."
"A beautifully appointed, prime 'Burges Estate' detached double fronted bungalow offering a superb glazed family room, a contemporary fitted kitchen, a first floor guest suite and a gorgeous landscaped garden. No onward chain."
"** Guide £800,000 - £850,000 ** With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this spacious family home. Having been extended, the property boasts 4 bedrooms, 2 bathrooms and 4 reception rooms. Further benefits include the double garage and off street..."
"Home of Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market, this large and spacious 4 double bedroom detached property located in the popular Ladram Way. Within easy walking distance of Thorpe Bay mainline train station and Thorpe Bay Broadway."
"Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this beautiful family home. Having been extended, this immaculate property boasts four double bedrooms (dressing area and en-suite to master), three reception rooms and a landscaped, WEST BACKING rear garden. Further benefits include the u..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £800,000 to £840,000 Situated on the sought after Burges Estate and only a short stroll to the beach and promenade is this spacious 3 bedroom detached family home that requires some modernisation and offering NO ONWARD CHAIN. The family home offers an entrance hall, two good si..."
"*STYLISH & CONTEMPORARY LIVING* - This wonderful ""reverse plan"" detached house is situated in a sought after South backing setting, backing directly onto Thorpe Hall golf course and enjoying fabulous far reaching views! This bright and spacious family home boasts numerous wonderful ..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming family home. Requiring updating throughout, this detached property boasts three bedrooms, three reception rooms, and a separate utility area. Further benefits include the garage with off street parking t..."
"This deceptively large four double bedroom, three bathroom detached character home is situated within the sought after Burges Estate, only a short stroll to the Broadway shops and mainline railway station. This wonderful versatile property would be ideal for a family or retirement buyer and also ..."
"Are you looking for your forever family home? Look no further, this modern detached home is exactly what you are looking for"
"This wonderful detached family home is situated in a delightful established setting within the sought after Burges Estate, only a short stroll to the beach and promenade. The Broadway shops and mainline railway station are also nearby. This deceptively large property has been well cared for throu..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £780,000 - £800,000*** Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this four bedroom detached property to the market. This extended home comprises of two reception rooms, kitchen, utility room, ground floor WC, conservatory, four bedrooms, bathroom and additional En Suite. This prope..."
"RECENTLY REDUCED £750,000. Viewing by strict appointment only. This stunning, exceptionally large 4/5 bedroom end terraced house in the conservation area must be seen to be appreciated. There is a garage gym, 2 parking spaces, 3 receptions, 4 double bedrooms, original features and much more...."
"** Guide £750,000 - £800,000 ** Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this extended family home. This wonderful property boasts four bedrooms, two bathrooms and a large rear extension. The property benefits further from a large plot and off street parking..."
"Buy to Let investment only. Current rental income of both apartments - £32,400 per annum. Two luxury 2 double bedroom penthouse apartments situated in the heart of Southend-on-Sea High Street. Both top floor apartments have been completed to a very high standard, each with 2 double bedrooms, ..."
"Occupying a generous plot, this detached period property boasts three double bedrooms (originally four bedrooms), two bathroom suites, 28'5 kitchen/diner, 19'7 front reception room, 28'5 rear reception room (currently a snooker room) and 29' master bedroom with a South facing roof garden. Other b..."
"A great development opportunity awaits by virtue of this piece of land with full planning granted for three bungalows. The current planning comprises of two, two bedroom semi detached bungalows and one, three bedroom detached bungalow all with parking. Full details are available on request"
"** Guide £700,000 - £750,000 ** With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this spacious family home. The versatile accommodation on offer allows for ground floor living if necessary and is made up of 4 / 5 bedrooms, 3 reception rooms and 3 bathroo..."
"This large four double bedroom, two bathroom detached house is situated in a lovely cul-de-sac setting and within Bournes Green School catchment area. The Broadway shops, mainline railway station and seafront are all nearby. This wonderful family home, with three reception areas, has been well ca..."
"GUIDE PRICE - £700,000 to £750,000. This deceptively large four double bedroom, two bathroom detached chalet style house is situated in a lovely cul-de-sac setting, within Bournes Green School catchment area. The good size West backing rear garden backs directly onto the playing field..."
"Guide Price - £700,000 - £750,000
A stunning detached bungalow located in Westcliff-on-Sea offering spacious living from top to bottom, ample off street parking and amazing amenities all in walking distance"
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming family home. The detached property boasts 3 bedrooms (En-suite to master), 3 reception rooms and a ground floor W.C. Further benefits include the garage and off street parking to the front for sever..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming detached property. Offering uninterrupted views across Thorpe Hall Golf course to the rear; the property benefits from three bedrooms, two reception rooms and a SOUTH BACKING garden. Further benefits inc..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market with no onward chain this charming three bedroom detached house which requires general modernisation and in return offers fantastic potential. There is huge scope to extend subject to the usual consents.
"An ideal opportunity to purchase this superb semi-detached family home providing spacious living accommodation throughout and within walking distance to excellent local amenities. To the ground floor is the lounge to front opening into a dining room, a large fitted kitchen and to the first floo..."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this substantial four bedroom detached house benefitting from a large extended lounge, kitchen breakfast room, separate dining room, four good sized bedrooms and a south facing garden measuring approximately 60ft in length. The property is located withi..."
"A wonderful semi-detached home perfect for any growing family offering spacious living throughout, off street parking for two vehicles and excellent amenities nearby"
"A stunning detached property offering spacious living from top to bottom, ample off street parking, an extensive rear garden and amazing amenities nearby. This property is not one you want to miss!"
"Guide Price-£675,000-£700,000. Situated in a popular location only a stone’s throw from fantastic amenities is this detached Goldsworthy bungalow offering deceptively spacious living and unique interior throughout!"
"*GUIDE PRICE £650,000 - £700,000* This incredible detached house if is the perfect home for a growing or already large family offering three floors of accommodation and spacious living with plenty of space for everyone!"
"Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this substantial four/five double bedroom detached family home presented with no onward chain. Positioned in an enviable residential location, a stones throw from Thorpe Bay Train Station, providing direct access into Londons Fenchurch Street. Moments from ..."
"Guide Price- £650,000-£675,000
Situated in a highly desirable location and being sold with no onward chain, is this delightful detached bungalow that has recently been refurbished to a high standard throughout"
"GUIDE PRICE:- £650,000 TO £700,000. Winkworth are delighted to offer for sale this stunning Penthouse apartment situated on the top floor of this very sought-after modern development with a lift and well-maintained gardens. With fabulous views across the first fairway at Thorpe Hall G..."
"* THE BEST APARTMENT IN THORPE BAY * - This stunning Penthouse apartment is situated on the top floor of this very sought after modern development, with a lift and pretty gardens. Affording fabulous views across Thorpe Hall Golf course to the front, plus Thames Estuary views to the rear. This ver..."
"** Guide £650,000 - £700,000 ** Rarely available to the market and with NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this spacious penthouse apartment. Boasting circa 1450 sq ft of living space, the property benefits from a large open plan lounge with vie..."
"Lordsons are proud to present to you this stunning, spacious 2 double-bedroom property, newly renovated to a very high standard in the Southchurch area. Located within easy reach of excellent Primary and Secondary schools, local bus links, amenities, Waitrose, Garons Leisure Centre, g (cont.)"
"Abbotts are delighted to offer for sale this fabulous extended four bedroom detached house, boasting an impressive modern fitted kitchen/family room with bi-fold doors opening seamlessly to the generously established rear garden and is set in a popular location giving good access to Southend's po..."
"This attractive four double bedroom, two bathroom detached house is situated in a lovely cul-de-sac setting, within Bournes Green School catchment area. The seafront, Broadway shops and mainline railway station are all nearby. This bright and spacious property has been owned by the current family..."
"Guide Price £650,000-£700,000 A spectacular and very rare opportunity to purchase this incredible detached family home. As you enter this fabulous character home, you’ll discover a very welcoming entrance hall with multiple reception rooms and a well fitted..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this immaculate family home. The versatile accommodation on offer allows for ground floor living if necessary and is made up of 4 / 5 bedrooms, 3 reception rooms, and 3 bathrooms. Further benefits include the ground f..."
"**Guide Price £650,000 - £675,000** Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully appointed family home. The versatile living accommodation on offer is made up of three double bedrooms, two bathrooms and two reception rooms. Further benefits include the ut..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this wonderful detached bungalow. Located in the heart of the favoured Burges Estate, this charming property boasts three bedrooms and two reception rooms. Further benefits include the separate utility / wash room (W...."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this immaculate second and third floor duplex apartment being situated along the clifftop, within the prestigious Clifftown Conservation area. The property benefits from stunning views across the Thames estuary and offers quality fixtures and fittings th..."
Offering for sale this immaculate three bedroom second and third floor apartment situated in the desirable Clifftown Conservation Area
This bright and spacious three double bedroom detached chalet style house is situated in a lovely residential setting and within Bournes Green School catchment area. This home offers good sized accommodation to the ground floor with lounge and separate dining room overlooking the rear garden...
Ashleigh Stone are excited to market this stunning five bedroom semi detached character property. As you enter you are welcomed by beautiful limestone flooring and a feature stain glass window with doors to the reception rooms and downstairs shower room. The front of the property presents...
"A substantial four bedroom, three reception room detached family home situated in a lovely setting within the popular Wick Estate. This charming character property has a warm homely feel and benefits from a large un-overlooked West backing rear garden with raised patio area. Plus a large driveway..."
"** Viewing by appointment Saturday 18th March : Guide £625,000 - £650,000 ** With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this extended family home. The charming property boasts three double bedrooms, three reception rooms, ground floor W.C. and a tr..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £625,000 - £650,000 * Bear Estate Agents are thrilled to bring to the market for the first time in 19 years, this traditional, immaculate and extended four bedroom house, sitting in a residential location overlooking the iconic Southchurch Park."
"Horizon Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this outstanding two double bedroom, purpose built, forth floor seafront apartment. The property benefits from a large balcony which offers extensive views across the Thames Estuary, Fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, modern four piec..."
"Fabulous second floor seafront apartment in this iconic development located in the heart of Southend-on-Sea with stunning views over the estuary. Clifftown Shore occupies a spectacular south facing, beachfront location that is nestled into parkland behind. This apartment is truly unique offering ..."
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this extended three bedroom detached chalet style home offering spacious and versatile accommodation and being situated in a sought after Thorpe Bay position, within the highly prized 'Bournes Green School' catchment area. This spacious fr..."
"This deceptively spacious three bedroom, two bathroom detached chalet bungalow is situated in a great location, only a short stroll to the Broadway shops and mainline railway station. This wonderful Goldsworthy property has been extended and well improved throughout, blending original charm and c..."
"An outstanding, exceptionally spacious four double bedroom detached chalet bungalow situated in a sought after residential location. The property has been extended to the rear and refurbished to include a wonderful 'open plan' kitchen family room, two en-suite bathrooms, luxury family shower room..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN Located on one of Thorpe Bays most sought after roads and in the catchment of BOURNES GREEN SCHOOL is this three bedroom detached family home. Upon entering the home you are greeted by a particular large entrance hall with access to a Shower room/WC, front to back Lounge, a..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN - STUNNING SEA VIEWS *** Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this deceptively spacious house, cleverly arranged over three floors and offering breath taking views to the front over the Thames estuary towards the Kent coastline. The property enjoys lovel..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this charming four bedroom semi-detached Chalet Bungalow located on a sought after road in Thorpe Bay close to Thorpe Bay Golf course, mainline rail station and the iconic Broadway shopping centre. Guide Price £575,000 - £600,000"
"A spectacular and very rare opportunity to purchase this incredible family home. As you enter this remarkable character home, you’ll discover a very welcoming entrance hall with multiple reception rooms and a modern fitted kitchen, you will also find three great sized bedrooms, d..."
Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this Imposing three double bedroom detached bungalow to the market. This property is positioned on a double width plot in a quiet yet convenient location close to a wealth of amenities. Completely refurbished and adapted for disabled access. Boasting a hu...
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to acquire this sizeable 4/5 bedroom Victorian townhouse located in the heart of the Clifftown Conservation Area close to the bowling green and Prittlewell Square and within a few minutes walk from the seafront, city centre and Southend Central mainline station..."
"**CHAIN FREE** This delightful two bedroom bungalow is new to the sales market. Newly decorated and ready to move in. There are two bedrooms to the front, and to the rear; bathroom and both the kitchen and lounge leading to the large bright conservatory. Externally there is off street parking and..."
"Guide Price £550,000 - £600,000 Are you looking to move to Thorpe Bay in style, this two bedroom detached bungalow will definitely offer you that!"
"Guide Price £550,000 - £600,000 A detached family home with plenty of spacious accommodation throughout, off street parking and great amenities nearby"
"An impeccably presented two bedroom luxury penthouse apartment in exceptional condition from throughout, located in Southend-on-Sea with stunning views to wake up to!"
"PERFECT FAMILY HOME / SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION / CORNER PLOT / 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS / SIZABLE LIVING SPACE WITH 3 RECEPTION ROOMS / ENTERTAINMENT ROOM / 2 BATHROOMS / DOUBLE STORY EXTENSION / OFF STREET PARKING / LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN / TONS OF CHARACTER GUIDE PRICE £550,000 to &..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this substantial and character filled four bedroom semi-detached, on a popular road and close to the seafront, and the iconic Southchurch Park. The property comes with a minimal onward chain. Guide price £550,000 - £575,000"
4 Bedroom Extended Family Home | 2 Reception Rooms | Large Kitchen Dining Room | Utility Room | En-suite to Main Bedroom | Generous Garden | Garage Storage Space and Parking | Cont....
"Bear Estate Agents are exited to bring this sizeable four bedroom detached house positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac close to a huge selection of travel links, sought after schools and Southend Airport. Benefitting from sizeable living accommodation, ample off-street parking, an integral garage and ..."
"A good size three double bedroom detached house, situated in a lovely cul-de-sac setting and within Bournes Green School catchment area. This excellent family home has been well improved throughout and benefits from a west backing rear garden, plus a garage with extensive driveway parking. The Br..."
"*** Guide price £550,000-£575,000 *** Offering substantial living accommodation throughout, is this executive four bedroom, three reception room semi-detached home. The property is positioned on the popular Shaftesbury Avenue, a stones throw from the seafront, Thorpe Hall Golf Club and the ic..."
"GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000. This stunning one of a kind 4 bedroom penthouse apartment benefits from a large roof terrace offering panoramic views of Southend. Call us today!"
"We have been favoured with instructions to offer for sale this stunning two bedroom, self-contained ground floor apartment which is located along the much sought after Clifftown Parade, overlooking the picturesque Cliff Gardens and Thames Estuary and a stones throw from the seafront. This propert..."
"Being situated within the sought after Clifftown conservation area is this spacious and well maintained semi detached Victorian house having a wealth of character and offering off street parking. To the ground floor is an open plan lounge/diner, a roomy kitchen /breakfast room and a shower w/c. T..."
"Located in the Greenways school catchment area and close to Southchurch Park and seafront is this spacious and extended four bedroom semi detached family home. Benefits from having three reception rooms on the ground floor, ground floor shower room and a 23' kitchen/breakfast room. To the fir..."
"Guide Price £525,000 to £550,000. Winkworth of Leigh are delighted to bring to the market this amazing seafront penthouse apartment in the sought-after area of Thorpe Bay. Situated on the top floor the panoramic Estuary views over the Kent coastline and stretching from Southend to Sho..."
"Executive three double bedroom detached chalet, nestled on the tree-lined and well regarded Trinity Road to offer amazing access to a wealth of amenities and travel links. Benefitting from off-street parking, an integral garage and a large rear garden. Flooded with character and charm. A fantasti..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale, this deceptively spacious property with three generous sized bedrooms, consisting of large and bright open spaces. The property is positioned on a beautiful corner within close reach of major c2c rail links and the iconic Southchurch Park."
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous detached chalet style home boasting well presented and versatile accommodation, complemented with a glorious South facing rear garden, perfect to equally suit a young family or those looking to downsize in comfort. This won..."
"An attractive three bedroom semi detached character house, situated in the popular Southchurch Park area, only a short stroll to the park and seafront. Excellent local shops and Southend East mainline railway station are also nearby. This lovely family home has been well cared for throughout and ..."
"Winkworth of Leigh are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful two-bedroom detached character house which has been constructed in keeping with the local Conservation area style. The property also benefits from open plan lounge and lovely modern fitted kitchen, ground floor clo..."
"Located on this highly desirable, quiet residential road, yet just a short walk away to bustling Southchurch Village, with its comprehensive array of restaurants, bars and amenities. This three-bedroom detached house, oozes potential and surprises everyone that views it, of the the generous sized..."
"** Guide Price £500,000 - £525,000 ** Situated on the highly regarded Earls Hall Estate and within easy access to Southend Hospital and Grammar Schools is this immaculate, extended four bedroom semi detached family home boasting separate sitting room to the front, 24ft lounge/diner ov..."
We are delighted to offer for sale this sumptuously refurbished two bedroom apartment which forms part of this elegant Victorian building located along Clifton Terrace within the Clifftown Conservation Area. This property has undergone extensive refurbishment whilst retaining many of its period f...
"Offering NO ONWARD CHAIN is this spacious three double bedroom semi-detached family character home. To the ground floor is a large reception hall which could be also used as an office, two good sized receptions, fitted kitchen with built in appliances and to the rear a utility room with cloakroo..."
"Guide Price - £500,000 - £550,000
A gorgeous bungalow located in Southend-On-Sea ample offering off street parking, an extensive rear garden and amazing amenities in the surrounding area"
" Internal viewing is essential to appreciate this stunning 3 bedroom end of terraced family home. Completely refurbished throughout and situated in a highly sought after and convenient location close to shops, schools & town centre. Further benefits include off street parking (subject to plannin..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY - This attractive three double bedroom semi detached character house occupies a substantial plot with beautifully established gardens. The large private rear garden extends to a further large rear section with a detached 4 car garage, ideal for a small business or general stora..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming bungalow. Located in the heart of Thorpe Bay, this property boasts two bedrooms (En-suite to Master), two reception rooms, and a low maintenance SOUTH backing rear garden. Further benefits include the ga..."
"Home Estate Agents are delighted to offer the eagerly awaited final release in this iconic development located in the heart of Southend-on-Sea with stunning views over the estuary. Clifftown Shore occupies a spectacular south facing, beachfront location that is nestled into parkland behind. Every..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market, this luxury two bedroom ground floor apartment being offered with no onward chain, private parking space and patio garden area and located within minutes of the sea front and adjacent to Thorpe Bay golf course!"
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this sizeable and characterful four double bedroom semi-detached house positioned on a popular and well regarded residential road to offer fantastic access to all amenities a family could need. Within walking distance of Southend City Centre, multiple tra..."
"Coulson James are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi detached family home, situated in this sought after corner plot location, close to local amenities and within easy access of Arterial Road and Jones' Memorial Park. The property is also within easy reach of Southend Town Centre and (cont.)"
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious semi detached house offering ample accommodation across three levels and boasting a west backing rear garden, a garage and driveway and being excellently located for nearby amenities, transport links and schools, to make this a remarkab..."
"Horizon Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this immaculately presented period property which is conveniently located for Southend East Station, local schools and amenities. The property is set over three floors and offers five bedrooms, two bathrooms and two receptions. There is also a s..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale with no onward chain, this attractive and fully detached, three bedroom bungalow which is located on the ever popular Wick Estate Development. The property offers sizeable and versatile living accommodation plus occupying a very generous plot wit..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION ON THE 9TH MARCH 2023. *WITHDRAWN - REFER TO AUCTIONEERA vacant mid terraced commercial premises in the heart of Southend-on-Sea, measuring 7,350 SQ.FT (683 SQ.M) and most recently used as a musical instrument retail unit. "
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous two/three bedroom semi detached bungalow located in a highly sought after Thorpe Bay positon, enjoying a generous frontage & rear garden, and available with heaps of potential and no onward chain, making this an ideal move for those..."
"Situated on the popular Wick estate and offering no onward chain is this spacious three bedroom detached bungalow which offers good size accommodation having a 19' lounge/Diner to front, fitted kitchen, large bathroom with four piece suite and offering a lovely approx 50' rear garden with raised ..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this stunning and sizeable, three/four double bedroom-semi-detached house positioned within a mere 0.9 miles of Southend Airport Station. Within easy reach of sought after grammar schools, and Southend University Hospital. Benefitting from o..."
Three bedroom semi-detached house situated in a great location
"Price Range £475,000 - £525,000 This beautiful three-bedroom semi-detached home situated in the desirable Thorpe Bay/Southend on sea borders offers the perfect combination of modern living and traditional charm"
*No Onward Chain* Winkworth of Leigh are delighted to bring to the market this charming three-bedroom detached family house backing onto the sought-after Priory Park. Within walking distance of Prittlewell Railway Station which provides direct access to London Liverpool Street Station....
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - VIEWING ADVISED - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Purplebricks are offering for sale this detached bungalow that is situated on the sought after Wick Estate. Being offered with no onward chain, this superb property offers spacious living accommodation throughout and really is a MUST VI..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this deceptively spacious and fully detached bungalow comprising two/three bedrooms and superb living/dining space. The property is located on the ever popular Wick Estate and has no onward chain.
"Situated in a favourable location along Clifftown Parade within the popular Clifftown Conservation Area, we offer for sale this extremely spacious two double bedroom first floor flat. Boasting panoramic views of the estuary from a south facing balcony, with other features including a lounge meas..."
INVESTORS DREAM! Reed Residential are pleased to bring to the market this seven bedroom house close to Town Centre and local facilities. Ideal investment opportunity
"Seven bedroom HMO in central Southend, well located to local amenities, great transport links and the town centre"
"An impressive family house located close to the sea front and Southchurch Park. Extended to the rear and a loft conversion it offers 3 double bedrooms, an ensuite shower room, main bathroom plus a ground floor shower room this property has the footprint of a 4 bedroom house. There's even a sea view!"
"Boasting a fantastic Southchurch Village location, this great three bedroom corner plot house (with additional loft room), further benefits from three reception rooms and a four piece family bathroom and a double garage to rear. Bournemouth Park Road is a wide tree-lined road which runs from S..."
" Morgan Brookes believe - Located in a sought after location in the heart of Southend City is this impressive sea view maisonette which boasts stunning panoramic estuary views! This fantastic residence offers versatile accommodation which is very spacious throughout, a great seaside locatio..."
"* Registered HMO * Unique seven bedroom semi-detached house with two bathrooms, a large communal kitchen/living room and access to a private garden. Situated in the city center just minutes from excellent amenities, bus links and train lines."
"Guide Price - £450,000 - £475,000
A gorgeous family home located in Southend-on-Sea offering ample off street parking, spacious living from top to bottom and amazing amenities right on your doorstep!"
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous ground floor purpose built apartment, part of the highly sought after Fairlawns development with substantial grounds backing onto Thorpe Bay golf course and set within a short walk of Thorpe Bay seafront, to make a perfect home for thos..."
"CLOSING DATE FOR BIDS 24/03/2023 *£450,000 - £500,000* No Onward Chain * Three bedroom detached bungalow boasting sizeable living space, two shower rooms, off-street parking, a garage and a generous rear garden. Ideally positioned close to Southchurch Park, as well as the seafront, excellent scho..."
"This lovely home is well presented and finished to a high standard throughout. The kitchen is modern and highly functional with plenty of storage space thanks to the wall and gound-mounted units. There are two reception rooms, both of which are bright and airy with plenty of natural light creatin..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - Abbotts have the pleasure of welcoming to the market this fantastic opportunity to acquire this attractive three bedroom semi detached house, with a loft room giving a superb additional versatile space and being excellently located within just minutes of Thorpe Bay Broadwa..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this aesthetically striking and extended, four bedroom house occupying a lovely sized plot with a 75ft South facing garden and a log cabin/games room. An absolute must see!"
"**NO CHAIN** A fantastic investment opportunity to purchase this very large 7 bed semi detached house in the heart of Southend On Sea. Currently with works being done this property would be an ideal HMO investment. Having 7 good size bedrooms, two bathrooms, open dining/kitchen area and..."
"Guide Price - £450,000 - £475,000
A beautiful family home offering spacious living throughout, an extensive rear garden and amazing amenities in walking distance"
"Property located in Heygate Avenue, Southend On Sea"
"Currently let to a local charity is this seven bedroom semi-detached licenced HMO. Situated in he heart of Southend, just moments from the High Street and Seafront. The property benefits from a spacious open plan Lounge /Kitchen, two bathrooms, balcony and rear garden."
"** Investment Property - 7 Bedroom HMO ** A superb opportunity to purchase a seven bedroom semi-detached house located in the centre of Southend previously used as an HMO property. Seven bedrooms, two bathrooms, spacious communal kitchen lounge area, balcony to front and private rear garden. ..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this surprisingly spacious four bedroom period property which offers spacious living accommodation throughout along with a fabulous south facing rear garden. Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000"
"A wonderful three bedroom character property situated within the highly popular Southchurch Village area. Local amenities and transport links are located within a short stroll. This charming family home has been well improved throughout, including an 'open plan' living/dining room and a separate ..."
"Exquisite first floor apartment in one of the most sought after locations on the Westcliff Parade. This beautiful character property affords spectacular uninterrupted Estuary views from the lounge, kitchen and private balcony with the additional benefit of direct access to a rear courtyard garden..."
"This is a fantastic and exciting opportunity for investors to get their hands on this semi-detached registered HMO being sold with no onward chain offering generous living throughout and situated in the centre of Southend surrounded by great local amenities. Inside this spacious property, you?ll ..."
Superior ground floor flat with direct access onto beautiful communal grounds overlooking Thorpe Hall Golf Course providing ultra contemporary living and is decorated and fitted to a very high standard. **No Onward Chain and Share of Freehold**
"*** Guide Price £440,000 to £460,000 *** Offering luxury living at its best, this truly exquisite four bedroomed character home boasting exceptional interiors, sleek and stylish fixtures and fittings and a sought-after location in Southchurch Village. Benefits include extensive parkin..."
"Guide Price £435,000 to £450,000...A three bedroom detached house with good size ground floor accommodation. The property benefits from a bathroom with separate shower/laundry room, ample storage space and a summerhouse with pool table."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN!Pilgrims Close Southchurch SS2 4XF. Ramsey Moore is pleased to offer to the open market this charming Semi-detached bungalow. Boasting two bedrooms, one with direct access to the bathroom, a generous lounge, a separate diner, and a large south-facing rear garden. The property also..."
"Guide Price- £425,000 - £450,000
A gorgeous detached family home offering spacious living, off street parking and amenities in close proximity!"
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this substantial three bedroom semi-detached family home to the market, positioned on the sought after Manners Way to offer convenient access to a wide array of fantastic amenities. Well regarded Grammar Schools are close to the home, as is Southend Unive..."
"Making an ideal first time buy or investment purchase alike this two bedroom first floor apartment is centrally situated offering easy access to the city centre, rail stations and the seafront. Offering a spacious lounge, two good sized bedrooms as well as a modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, th..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this two double bedroom, bungalow with good size west facing rear garden, driveway to front and garage. Conveniently located within easy walking distance of Thorpe Bay mainline station and no onward chain. Guide price £425,000 - £450,000"
"OIEO £425,000. Don't miss out on this spacious and fully modernised 120sqm family home in a great location. Just moments from the beautiful Southchurch Park, iconic beaches of the Thames Estuary and Southchurch East train station. 4-5 Bedrooms and ready to move in."
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this magnificent three bedroom semi detached bungalow which has been extended and much improved, creating an impressive and well proportioned residence that is beautifully presented throughout, boasting a spacious modern fitted kitchen/dining room th..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 * GREAT LOCATION * DETACHED FAMILY HOME * SUMMER HOUSE * Coulson James are delighted to bring to the market this extremely lovely and well kept detached THREE bedroom family home. The property boasts excellent ground floor accommodation comprising of a (cont.)"
"Guide Price:- £425,000 to £450,000. Winkworth of Leigh are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three-bedroom detached home which is within both Heycroft school and Eastwood Academy catchment area, and is also a short walk to Morrison's supermarket. Local bus routes..."
Home Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this super three bedroom penthouse apartment which is positioned within Tower Court in Westcliff-on-Sea and boasts arguably one of the most impressive far-reaching views towards London and of the surrounding area. This spacious flat also benefits f...
* HUGE SPLIT LEVEL FLAT WITH SEA VIEWS * OWN DRIVEWAY AND GARDEN TO REAR * A superb duplex property which offers reverse living with the lounge kitchen being on the top floor enjoying views of the estuary. There is also a separate WC on the top level. The property boasts three great size bedrooms...
"Featuring an huge 30 ft x 20 ft garage workshop to rear, this imposing semi-detached character home offers extensive parking and many fine features throughout. The property comprises three well proportioned bedrooms, two large reception rooms, double-width conservatory, family kitchen, three-piec..."
" This 3 bedroom semi detached family home has been well lovedfor many years however is now in need of a new family and some modernisation.Situated in the heart of the prestigious Queens estate close to parks, schools,train station and seafront. Boasting ample off street parking, an East backing ..."
"Situated on Eastern Esplanade just moments away from the seafront is 'Alexander Villa.' This three bedroom home is spread over three floors providing spacious living accommodation throughout making it the ideal family home. The ground floor accommodation comprises of a large lounge, separate dini..."
"Reed Residential are proud to present this FULLY REFURBISHED, THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED family home located on a popular turning within walking distance of Priory Park, Prittlewell Station, Southend City Centre, making it a great home for commuters and families."
"Guide Price-£400,000-£450,000. A wonderful semi-detached home providing generous accommodation throughout, off street parking for two vehicles and fantastic amenities right on your doorstep"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000-£425,000 *** Bear Estate Agents are thrilled to offer for sale this deceptively spacious four bedroom house which is located in the City Centre and offers easy access to two major rail links which serve London's Fenchurch & Liverpool Street lines. The property enjoys wond..."
A spacious three-bedroom property located nearby to Southend Highstreet which contains a fine array of eateries and well-established shops. The property is also surrounded by transport links to London.
"A superb opportunity to acquire this beautiful character house located just a short stroll away from Southend City beach. Having been newly refurbished the property offers a large bay fronted lounge, open plan kitchen diner with newly fitted kitchen, three good bedrooms, newly fitted three piece ..."
"A Very Well Presented Four Bedroom End Terrace House With West Facing Garden And Garden Room, En-suite To The Master Bedroom And A Utility Room The property is situated in central Southend within close proximity to the city centre shopping facilities, amenities, Southend Central stati..."
"Guide Price: £400,000 - £425,000 Home Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale, with no onward chain, this fabulous two double bedroom semi-detached house in the heart of the 'Milton Conservation' area in Westcliff-on-Sea. This beautifully presented residence has been modernised and offers ..."
"** POPULAR ASTRONAUGHTS ESTATE LOCATION ** Bear Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this striking semi detached family home with three double bedrooms and a grand living dining room measuring an excessive 26 feet. Further benefits include a large modern fitted kitchen, three piece l..."
"Are you looking to upsize to a bigger family home? This is the ideal property. Boasting 4 bedrooms, 2 bathrooms, 2 reception rooms you will not be wanting for space. With a beautiful open plan kitchen/living area this is ideal for those who have a big family or who love to e..."
"REFURBISHED THREE BEDROOM HOUSE. CLOSE TO STATION AND SOUTHCHURCH PARK. We are delighted to offer for sale this completely refurbished three bedroom, semi-detached house located in a popular residential area conveniently situated for access to Southend East mainline station and within a few minut..."
"Guide price £400,000-£410,000 This beautiful 3 bed house is the perfect home for anyone who is thinking of starting a family or those who are looking to upsize. Location is key with this home! You will find yourself living in the heart of Southchurch with many b..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this charming three bedroom, semi detached house which is located in a pretty no through road and overlooks the iconic Southchurch Hall Park and Lake. Complete onward chain and on road parking. Guide Price £400,000 - £410,000"
"**MANAGERS CHOICE FOR GREAT VALUE** This modern, stunning, beautifully renovated home, is enviably located on lovely Poynings Avenue on the sought after Wick Estate. This beautiful, two bedroom bungalow, really is the ideal home with its top spec. stunning kitchen and generous sized, light flood..."
"Sandra Davidson Estate Agents are pleased to present this FULLY REFURBISHED, THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED family home situated on a popular turning within close proximity of the popular Priory Park and walking distance of Prittlewell Train Station and Southend Town Centre to make a perfect home fo..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this surprisingly spacious and extended family home with three generous sized bedrooms, with a grand principle bedroom, a large kitchen/breakfast room and two separate reception rooms. The property also benefits from a 40ft south facing gard..."
"Hair & Son are pleased to offer this detached bungalow. With three bedrooms, double glazing throughout, a double length garage, shower room & separate WC. There is potential to improve and extend to the rear and side as the bungalow is positioned on a larger than average plot. No onward c..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached home located close to Priory Park and Southend Victoria mainline rail station with a 100ft west facing rear garden and off street parking.
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring to the market, this deceptively spacious house which offers four bedrooms, two en suite shower rooms as well as a family bathroom and a luxury fitted kitchen. The property is located in an enviable position within easy access of ma..."
"Guide £400,000 - £425,000 Situated on the highly desirable Wick Estate is this immaculate semi-detached home providing luxury living throughout and incredible amenities right on your doorstep!"
"There is nothing quite like this home, from the quality of finish down to the location, a converted stables from where the house takes it name. A home that looks like it has come out of a magazine, this is a home that really is a must view!"
"Ideally located within walking distance of Prittlewell Train Station and local amenities is this great sized FOUR bedroom family home, featuring many ORIGINAL FEATURES throughout, large open plan living, conservatory, downstairs cloakroom, a good size garden, and parking for two cars. A MUST SEE!"
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000. FOUR BEDROOMS. TWO RECEPTION ROOMS. GARAGE. NO ONWARD CHAIN. A fantastic opportunity has arisen to acquire this extremely spacious family home situated in a popular residential area close to Southchurch Park and within walking distance of Southend Eas..."
A deceptively spacious three bedroom semi detached character house situated in the sought after Southchurch Village area. The property has been newly refurbished throughout to a high standard including a modern and contemporary fitted kitchen and bathroom. This charming family home also boasts of...
"A Well Presented Extended Three Bedroom Semi Detached House With Conservatory And South Facing Rear Garden The property is situated in a popular residential location within close proximity to local shops, schools, The Victory Sports Ground and Jones's Memorial Ground. In addition it i..."
"Guide Price - £400,000 - £425,000
A gorgeous detached family home boasting spacious living throughout, a well kept rear garden, off street parking and amazing local amenities"
"** Guide Price £400,000 - £410,000 ** An extended three bedroom, three reception room semi detached house situated in the sought after Southchurch Viillage area. This wonderful property has been improved significantly throughout to an exceptional standard, Including a wonderful Family..."
"This surprisingly spacious and versatile 5 bedroom Chalet bungalow is beautifully decoratedthrough and situated in a popular location close to shops, schools & trainstation. Further benefits include ample off street parking, a west backinggarden and both a shower & bathroom. Internal viewing..."
"Horizon Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this refurbished three bedroom semi-detached family home. The property has the advantage of a brand new fitted high gloss Kitchen, new Bathroom suite and double glazing. Situated within easy access to Southchurch village railway station and S..."
"Located within this popular residential location, close to local shops, amenities and schools, we are delighted to offer to the market this spacious FOUR BEDROOM family home which boasts an impressive size rear garden. With the added bonus of off street parking, we strongly advise an e..."
"A LINK DETACHED 3 BED FAMILY HOUSE, in this popular residential location, close to local amenities and schools. The property offers decent size family accommodation is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN!! Early viewing advised."
A deceptively spacious three bedroom semi detached house situated within the popular Southchurch Village area. This lovely family home has been greatly improved throughout including a modern and contemporary fitted kitchen and bathroom. The property boasts a large South backing rear garden with a...
"CLIFFTOWN CONSERVATION AREA. DUPLEX APARTMENT. THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS. GARAGE. We are delighted to offer for sale this extremely spacious three double bedroom duplex apartment located in the much sought after Clifftown Conservation Area, just a stone's throw from the picturesque Prittlewel..."
"Guide Price-£390,000-£410,000
Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac is this delightful semi-detached home which has been decorated to a modern standard from top to bottom and will impress anyone who visits"
"Situated in a quiet position and located conveniently for local shops the airport, mainline train station as well as Waitrose and Tesco superstores, is this extended and spacious three-bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow. The property to the ground floor offers two good size bedrooms, a thre..."
"Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to market this deceptively spacious, four bedroom house with a west facing garden measuring 60 feet. Located in an ultra convenient position close to major rail links, shops, schools and the seafront."
"This beautiful semi detached bungalow has been well maintained throughout but it also has potential for you to put your own stamp on the place and really make it your own and potential to extend to side with planning. It boasts two good sized bedrooms, a good sized kitchen and lounge overlooki..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this immaculate and spacious three bedroom semidetached house with modern open plan fully fitted kitchen/ diner, down stairs cloakroom, large lounge, three good size bedrooms and family bathroom, good size garden with summer house and storage. This property offers..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this stunning two bedroom first floor apartment boasting beautiful views across Southchurch Park to the market. Positioned in a sought after residential road to offer fantastic access to a wealth of amenities. Boasting ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £380,000 - £400,000 - This three bedroom semi-detached bungalow has so much on offer and is extremely spacious with HUGE POTENTIAL to extend subject to planning permission and NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
A PERIOD GRADE TWO LISTED FISHERMAN COTTAGE WITH PANORAMIC SEAVIEWS AND LARGE REAR GARDEN.
"• GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £425,000 • THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME • BOASTING APPROX. 1,117 SQ.FT. OF LIVING ACCOMMODATION • OFF STREET PARKING • TWO RECEPTION ROOMS • FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM/WC • 21' KITCHEN..."
"Introducing a beautiful extended character home in the desirable Bellevue Road, located in the heart of the vibrant city of Southend. This charming property boasts a stunning front lounge"
"This good size three bedroom house is situated in the heart of Southend-on-sea and therefore close by to all the convenient amenities of a town centre. There are three reception rooms, a ground floor shower room and first floor bathroom. The property would make an ideal HMO (House of Multiple Occ..."
" Morgan Brookes believe - Boasting a fantastic Southchurch Village location in the heart of Southend-on-Sea, is this fantastic semi-detached home! Superb accommodation can be found internally with an extensive garden to the rear, garage & off-street parking. Our sellers love - The convenience..."
"* 375,000 - 400,000 * Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented and refurbished two double bedroom detached chalet benefitting from off-street parking and a large rear garden. Positioned in a quiet residential location to offer access a wide array of ameni..."
This three bedroom semi detached house benefits from a large conservatory overlooking the generous rear garden
REF:-GW0451 - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED CHALET FAMILY HOME situated in a fantastic location only a stones throw (0.2miles) from Southend East Mainline Station on the C2C line into London Fenchurch St. This home is in need of some minor cosmetic modernisation but has plenty of potentia...
"Enviably located on Ashburnham Road, this four double bedroom character house with lots of potential, comprising two reception rooms, two bathrooms, cloakroom/WC, generous kitchen and a private rear garden. Other benefits include high ceilings, residents permit parking and scope to extend into lo..."
This lovely four bedroom terraced house is generous in size and is set in a great location
"We present this recently refurbished Victorian three (double) bedroom family home with an approximate 30ft rear garden and resident permit parking, which is situated in the heart of Southend-on-Sea and is offered to the market with no onward chain. The additional accommodation comprises an open ..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom semi-detached bungalow with own drive offering ample parking for several vehicles leading to attached garage, fitted kitchen, good size lounge diner, ground floor bathroom with separate WC, two good size ground floor bedrooms and a spacious main..."
"With expansive estuary views and and enviable location nestled right beside the prestigious Seven hotel on the borders of Westcliff and Southend seafront is this delightful two-bedroom first floor period home within the Clifftown conservation area.Offered in turn key condition, the property boast..."
"An extended character house offering 3 bedrooms, 16` lounge, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room and family bathroom. Externally there is a low maintenance decked garden and off street parking to the front. The property is located within close proximity of local shops & rail station."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom semi detached house with an impressive lounge, modern fitted kitchen/breakfast room with separate utility, ground floor wc, modern family bathroom, good size rear garden and off street parking for one vehicle. No onward chain. Our Ref: 18840."
"This stunning penthouse apartment is one to be experienced. With two large double bedrooms, this private home sits perfectly on the edge of Southend. A Private Roof terrace really sets this home apart. "
" Morgan Brookes believe - Located in an enviable seafront setting with scenic beach views is this stunning three bedroom family home! This property has been recently refurbished with high quality fittings & fixtures, offering contemporary accommodation throughout & a great-sized rear garden...."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this extended three bedroom family home close to the iconic Priory Park. Benefitting from ample off-street parking and two bathrooms, plus positioned close to a wealth of amenities and travel links with Prittlewell Train Station being within a stones thro..."
"** Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000 ** Situated close to Prittlewell Train Station with routes into London Liverpool Street and within easy access to the high-street boasting an array of amenities, shops and restaurants is this three bedroom character semi detached house having new do..."
"A well proportioned three bedroom character house situated within the sought after Southchurch Village area. This charming family home has been well maintained throughout and benefits from an 'open plan' Kitchen/Dining, Plus a large garden with the added advantage of a spacious Garden room/Home o..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this stunning family home. Having been updated throughout, the property boasts three bedrooms, two reception rooms and a landscaped rear garden. Further benefits include the ground floor shower room and bespoke kitche..."
"A Four Bedroom, Two Reception Room Terraced Home Offered As A Five Bedroom HMO Opportunity Offered Chain Free. The property is situated in the heart if Southend-on-Sea within close proximity to local shops, the town centre, amenities, bus station and mainline railway stations (Southend..."
"Welcome to South Avenue, a beautiful family home that has been brilliantly presented throughout by the current owners. If you're looking for a home you can move straight in to, then look no further. Call us today to arrange your viewing"
"Buy to Let investment only, Current rental income of £15,600 per annum. Luxury 2 double bedroom penthouse apartment situated in the period building, The Drapery, an iconic centerpiece on the border of the conservation area. The penthouse has been completed to a very high standard and offers 2..."
"Buy to Let investment only, Current rental income of £16,800 Per annum. Luxury 2 double bedroom penthouse apartment situated in the heart of Southend-on-Sea High Street. The apartment has been completed to a very high standard and offers 2 double bedrooms - the master complete with an en-suit..."
"Providing generous accommodation and a spacious feel, this three-bedroom period home offers and impressive open-plan lounge/diner, beautiful kitchen, and a modern family bathroom. External benefits include off road parking and 60' low maintenance rear garden with summerhouse Glenhurst Road is ..."
"Bright and spacious double fronted three bedroom mid terraced character family home which is positioned within minutes of Southend east train station and local shops along Southchurch Road. This well loved family home offers a wealth of living accommodation throughout with a 22'9 lounge/diner,..."
"WILLIAMS & DONOVAN Situated in a quiet side road, .5 miles from Prittlewell mainline railway station, is this well presented three bedroom house with lounge/diner, modern fitted kitchen, approx 65ft west facing rear garden and own driveway providing off-street parking. EPC Rating: D. Our Ref ..."
"Situated in this popular residential area giving excellent access to mainline station to London Liverpool Street , Southend airport, sought after schools and local amenities this spacious two bedroom detached bungalow which has own driveway and attached garage. The property has huge potential and..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this TWO/THREE bedroom semi-detached bungalow having benefited from being well maintained throughout and comes with a lovely garden, driveway providing off street parking and a utility room. Set in a sought-after location, convenient for Southend Airp..."
"AMPLE SCOPE FOR LOFT ROOMS.... A two/three bedroom, one/two reception versatile detached bungalow benefitting from 75ft SOUTH FACING rear garden and a 23ft outbuilding. The property is situated in a popular tree lined road. Scope for extending to rear."
"* 350,000 - 375,000 * Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this sizeable three double bedroom end terraced house to the market, positioned in a quiet and convenient Southchurch Village location to offer access to a wealth of amenities. Southend East Station provides direct access into Centra..."
"GP £350,000-£375,000. A three bedroom semi-detached house of approximately 1500 sq ft of accommodation to include large lounge/diner, kitchen/breakfast room and has a secluded rear garden, garage and own driveway. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC rating: D. Our Ref 18294"
Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic two bedroom semi detached bungalow which has been extended to provide spacious modern living accommodation which is complement by the exceptional 120ft south facing rear garden with patio area and a brick built shed. This su...
"**NO CHAIN, FREEHOLD, INVESTMENT** A great investment opotunity to buy 2 two bed flats along with the freehold. With a potential rental yeild of 5.48% Location is perfect as you are within walking distance to Prittlewell train station, Southend town centre and Southend seafr..."
"Located along Clifton Terrace in the Clifftown Conservation Area is this two bedroom garden flat which offers good size accommodation, and benefits from having its own entrance door and direct access to the rear gardens. The property benefits from a modern shower room/w.c, gas central heating an..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. FIVE BEDROOM HMO PROPERTY CLOSE TO TOWN CENTRE. An opportunity has arisen to acquire this spacious five bedroom, end terrace Edwardian house located close to the City centre, University Campus and within walking distance of both Southend Central and Southend Victoria mainl..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market for the first time in 29 years this traditional three bedroom semi-detached property occupying a large plot with a garden measuring 70 feet in length. The property offers incredible scope to extended, subject to the usual planning consents.<..."
"A Three Bedroom Semi Detached House With South Facing Rear Garden and Off Street Parking Offered To The Market With No Onward Chain The property is situated with close proximity to local shops, Prittlewell mainline railway station to London, The Victory Sports Ground and Jones's Memori..."
"An Extended Three Bedroom Semi Detached House With Two Reception Rooms, Garden And Off Street Parking The property is situated within close proximity to local shops, Temple Sutton Primary School, Cecil Jones College, the Fossett Farm retail park and Garon Park sports and leisure facili..."
"Two bedroom detached bungalow in Southend-on-Sea within close proximity to local travel links and amenities. Offers ample off-street parking via a shared driveway, as well as a well-landscaped rear garden. Guide Price £350,000-£375,000."
"Situated within the heart of the Clifftown Conservation area opposite the famous Southend Cliff Lift is this spacious two bedroom lower ground floor apartment being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property offers a front lounge, spacious entrance hall with space for a dining table as w..."
"WILLIAMS and DONOVAN are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom semi-detached house which is situated in the popular Manners Way estate location within easy reach of Southend University Hospital, Southend Airport and railway station for direct line to London, Liverpool Street. The property ..."
"Guide Price - £350,000 - £375,000
A desirable ground floor flat offering spacious living, a fitted kitchen with integrated appliances and amazing amenities right on your doorstep!"
"Exclusive retirement living in this sought after complex of one and two bedroom apartments. A two bedroom first floor apartment comprising open plan living/dining room with Juliet balcony overlooking landscaped communal gardens, en suite to master bedroom and shower room"
OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN THIS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DEATCHED HOUSE IN NEED OF MODERNISATION. Conveniently located within walking distance of local amenities and train station at Southend Airport with direct links to London Liverpool Street. Offering great potential to extend (SSTP) and create a ...
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful three bedroom bungalow that has been extended to the rear to provide plenty of versatile accommodation which is complemented by a 55ft south facing rear garden, making this home suitable for a young family as well as those looking to d..."
"A beautifully presented two double bedroom bungalow situated within a sought after residential location, Local amenities and transport links are nearby. The wonderful property has been greatly improved throughout by the current owners to an exceptional standard including a modern 'open plan' Kitc..."
"Bear Estate Agents are proud to present this well presented terraced bungalow, which accommodates two double bedrooms, an open plan kitchen/diner, a lounge and a four piece bathroom. Externally, there is a well-landscaped rear garden, rear access and off-street parking for two vehicles. Guide Pri..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £335,000 - £350,000 ** Three bedroom semi-detached house offered with no onward chain. Good size three bedroom home located in a popular residential area of Southend, ideal for local schools and amenities, good travel routes and walking distance of Prittlewell Station. Large op..."
"** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** A three storey house offering unusual split level accommodation and currently let out as rooms with a communal kitchen/ breakfast room and bathroom. With four letting rooms, one with en suite, the property generates circa £19,080 per annum and is situated within easy ..."
"Well presented family home offering four bedrooms and a sizeable open plan lounge/diner. Externally, there is a spacious South facing rear garden. Close by, you will find local schools and amenities, along with convenient travel connections. Guide Price £335,000-£350,000."
Bradleys Countrywide are pleased to offer this well kept Semi-Detached 2 bedroom Bungalow which benefits from OFF ROAD PARKING and good size SOUTH FACING rear garden. Ideally located for shops and transport links. 
REF:-GW0451 - *SENSATIONAL AND RARELY AVAILABLE THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR SEAFRONT APARTMENT* Boasting spectacular views of the Thames Estuary and Southchurch Park from it's own LARGE PRIVATE BALCONY. This spacious bright and airy apartment has the bonus of a SHARE OF THE...
"This superb two bedroom third floor apartment is well presented throughout offering two bathrooms (one en-suite shower room), private balcony and enviable location, moments from Southend Victoria, Southend Central and Westcliffe stations, for links into London via c2c and Greater Anglia lines. Th..."
Winkworth of Leigh have been favoured with instruction to offer for sale is this two-bedroom terrace house. Ideal for the first-time buyer or investment buyer and located on a quiet residential road in Eastwood. 
"This three bedroom terraced family house is situated in a great location being in the heart of Southchurch Village within Hamstel Schools catchment area and offering easy access to Southend East rail station and the variety of shops, bars and eateries on Southchurch Road. Offered with no onward c..."
" Abbotts are delighted to present this rare and exciting opportunity to acquire this superb semi detached bungalow boasting a fantastic 70ft garden which extends out to a width of around 80ft at the rear, to make a very special south facing rear garden, as well as offering a huge amount of p..."
Development opportunity! Land for sale with planning consent for a four bedroom detached family home.
"Delightful three bedroom end terraced family home positioned in a popular Southchurch Village location to offer fantastic access to an abundance of amenities. Sought after schools are within easy reach of the home, alongside well regarded Grammar Schools. The nearby Southchurch Road offers a sele..."
"Offering exceptionally well presented accommodation is this TWO double bedroom home, which offers the option of creating Bedroom Three by dividing the main front bedroom. The *WOW* factor is a truly sensational Home Office / Entertainment Room to the rear of the Garden! Seeing is believing!! The..."
"A well proportioned three bedroom semi detached family home situated in a central and convenient location, Close to local amenities and transport links. This charming home benefits from a good size South backing rear garden with detached single garage. Plus off street parking to side for at least..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are happy to bring to the market this two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow in sought after road. Requiring some modernisation required and situated on a generous south facing plot **NO ONWARD CHAIN**
" Morgan Brookes believe - Located in the heart of Southend-on-Sea in a quiet turning is this superb detached bungalow, occupying a large plot which offers potential to extend (STPP).  Our Sellers love - The quiet position as well as being located within walking distance of Southend Victo..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £335,000 Abode Estates are delighted to offer as the sellers SOLE AGENTS this magnificent three bedroom first/2nd floor apartment which boasts a fantastic view of Southchurch Park East Nature reserve. Upon entering the apartment you will find the accommodatio..."
"Offering no onward chain is this spacious 3 bedroom mid terrace family home with good sized rear garden. To the ground floor it offers 2 good sized reception room with lounge to the front, a separate dining room and kitchen area which leads onto to a utility area and further space with the lean t..."
"Offered with no onward chain this two bedroom semi detached bungalow is situated in a popular location and benefits from off street parking as well as a large south facing rear garden offering much potential to extend both into the loft space and to the rear, subject to the usual planning permiss..."
"Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this beautifully presented three bedroom end terraced house positioned in a sought after Southchurch Village location to offer convenient access to a wealth of amenities. Nearby train stations provide direct access into Central London, with a selection of..."
This three bedroom end of terrace house would make a perfect family home and is situated closely to an array of amenities
"** Viewing by appointment Saturday 18th March : Guide £325,000 - £350,000 ** With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this charming family home. The property boasts three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, a ground floor W.C. and a low mainten..."
"* No Onward Chain * New to the market is this two bedroom semi-detached house. Positioned close to well regarded schools, as well as excellent amenities and travel networks. Well presented throughout with a South Facing rear garden."
"This versatile three bedroom bungalow, (in a popular residential road) is competitively priced and has lots to offer both internally and externally. Boasting off-street parking for up to 4 cars, local shops and amenities at the end of the road and excellent transport links (with a mainline statio..."
" Morgan Brookes believe - This semi-detached home is superbly positioned in a convenient Southend-on-Sea location & offers brilliantly proportioned, versatile accommodation throughout with a large rear garden. Our Sellers love -  Being positioned within easy reach of Southend City Centr..."
A THREE BREDOOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH LARGE REAR GARDEN.
"* 325,000 - 350,000 * Stylish three bedroom end terraced family home positioned in a sought after residential road to offer access to a wealth of amenities. Benefits from well presented accommodation throughout and a good-sized, yet low-maintenance rear garden."
"This delightful two bedroom bungalow boasts spacious accommodation throughout, a generous entrance hall leading to two double bedrooms, lounge/diner, eat-in kitchen and a three piece family bathroom. Other benefits include a West facing private garden, garage with rear vehicle access and excellen..."
**** THREE BEDROOM END OF TERRACE HOUSE WITH 24' LOUNGE/DINER AND APPROX 50' REAR GARDEN **** This three bedroom family home offers a sizeable open plan lounge/diner with French doors leading to a generous sized rear garden where you can enjoy entertaining friends and family throughout...
This excellent three bedroom mid terrace house could be the perfect one for you if you are looking to get a foot on the property ladder. Make sure to call the team today to arrange your viewing to be one step closer to your first home
"Home In Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market with no onward chain, this fabulous third floor apartment offering uninterrupted Estuary views from a South facing balcony, 2 double bedrooms, garage and parking space."
"This superb opportunity for you to put your own stamp on this spacious 2 bedroom 2 reception detached family home with off street parking to front. The property to the ground floor offers two lovely sized reception rooms with the Lounge to front, separate dining room which leads onto the kitch..."
"This charming three bedroom, two reception room character house boasts three double bedrooms, two large reception rooms and a private 60' rear garden backing WEST. Other benefits include three piece family bathroom and great scope to extend into loft space (stpp)"
"BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY. We are pleased to offer for sale this well maintained three bedroom, two reception room terraced house located in the popular Southchurch Village area of Southend. Close to local amenities and shops, bars and restaurants along Southchurch Road and within walking distan..."
"An opportunity has arisen to acquire this fantastic three bedroom apartment situated on the top floor of a purpose built mansion block which is located just a stones throw from the picturesque Cliff Gardens and within a few minutes walk of Southend Central mainline station, town centre and seafro..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £315,000 - £330,000** Martin and Co are pleased to present this beautiful home in the heart of Southend. Boasting a private rear garden, 3 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms this home is perfect for a family. This property also benefits from having no onward chain. Call us today to ..."
A substantial two double bedroom apartment situated on the first floor of a modern development within the sought after Prittlewell area. This stunning apartment is within a short stroll of a mainline railway station with shops and other local amenities all being nearby. The property benefits from...
"* 315,000 - 335,000 * Well proportioned and conveniently located three bedroom terraced house in a perfect Southchurch location to offer convenient access to a wealth of amenities, with the nearby Greyhound Retail Park and Southend City Centre providing fantastic shopping facilities. Nearby Train..."
"***GUIDE PRICE - £315,000 - £330,000*** Bear Estate Agents are thrilled to bring this three bed terraced home to the market. This property consists of a spacious open plan kitchen/lounge/diner, three bedrooms, three piece suite bathroom and a well maintained rear garden. This property is close to..."
"Guide Price £315,000-£330,000 AMPLE PARKING TO THE REAR WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT RECENTLY FITTED OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER This THREE bedroom terraced house comes to the market with a really good feel, presented well, very clean and well kept by the current owners who have thoroughly enjoyed t..."
"***GUIDE PRICE - £315,000 - £325,000*** Bear Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market, this dramatically improved seafront apartment with two double bedrooms located on the first floor which benefits from panoramic sea views. There is secure communal parking and garage en bloc. The proper..."
"Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this well proportioned three bedroom semi-detached house to the market at a Guide Price of £315,000-£335,000. This property is positioned close to a wealth of amenities and travel links. Positioned in a quiet-cul-de-sac to offer convenient access to Prittle..."
"** Guide £315,000 - £325,000 ** With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this fantastic seafront apartment. Boasting stunning Estuary views, two double bedrooms, kitchen / breakfast room and secure off street parking with garage, this property wo..."
"We are pleased to to offer for sale this two double bedroom seafront apartment, just across the road from the beach and being on the upper first floor of this popular purpose built Marine development. This bright and airy, south facing apartment offers a security entry phone system, fitted kitche..."
"*OFFERS OVER £310,000* Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location is this wonderful home which boasts spacious living throughout and excellent local amenities"
"With a prime location within Southchurch Village, this generous three bedroom character house provides three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, family kitchen and a private garden with shed and summerhouse (with power & lighting) Other benefits include a three-piece bathroom and a useful L-sha..."
"Guide Price - £310,000 - £330,000 A detached house offering a relaxing atmosphere throughout with feature wood ceilings, two wonderful bedrooms and in great location to local amenities!"
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 TO £325,000 Offering a great opportunity to improve and add value, this large two bedroomed bungalow with an exceptionally large rear garden, is in need of a cosmetic improvements and offers well proportioned rooms and a popular residential address. The property s..."
"Home In Thorpe Bay bring to the market with no onward chain this great two bedroom third floor flat with a truly wonderful vista over the Thames Estuary towards the Kent coastline. Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000"
"STUNNING ..! Absolutely Beautiful Two Bedroom Bungalow, IDEAL First Time Buy, Retiree, or BUY TO LET. Decorated to a Very Good Standard and Offered with NO CHAIN so move in straight away. Open Plan Lounge to Dining Area then to Fitted Kitchen. Potential to Extend Upwards (STPP)"
"TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. ESTUARY VIEWS. SHARE OF FREEHOLD. We are delighted to offer for sale this extremely spacious two bedroom, third floor purpose built seafront apartment located just a stones throw from the beach, with Southchurch Park, Southend East mainline station and City Centre shopping al..."
"PACE are delighted to offer this 2 double bedroom PENTHOUSE suite split over two levels. Offering a neutral and fresh decoration throughout, double glazed windows, electric heating and off-street parking. NO ONWARD CHAIN sale.  "
"*No Onward Chain* *Guide price £300,000-£325,000* This stunning two bedroom apartment is set on the 9th floor of the prestigious Beaumont Court development, offering 24 hour concierge and secure entry phone system, one allocated off-street parking space, residents' gym and access to the top floo..."
"Managers Choice. Behold this light flooded, immaculately presented, stylish, modern bungalow is bright and incredibly spacious.   Boasting two bedrooms, spacious lounge, open-plan kitchen/diner and a modern family bathroom. The lovely home, also affords an immaculate, low maintenance s..."
** NO ONWARD CHAIN** An Ideal property for any first time buyer or investor. This beautiful 2 bed bunglow is stituated in a quiet area if Hampton Close. Near by you will find a lot of transport options including train links direct to London. Inside you will find...
"This spacious two double bedroom top floor seafront apartment offers beautiful side estuary views and simply has to be internally viewed to appreciate the accommodation on offer. With no onward chain the property boasts a 24'2 lounge/ diner, modern fitted 17'7 kitchen/ breakfast room, two double ..."
"**** GUIDE PRICE - £300,000 to £325,000 *UNIQUE TOWN HOUSE* Hair & Son offer this spacious end terrace house set over three floors. With two double bedrooms each with a balcony, open plan kitchen lounge, three piece bathroom, ground floor additional wc, utility room and potential of..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN ***Elliott and Smith warmly welcome you to view this spacious, light, bright, move-in-ready, two-bedroom semi-detached property, which has recently been extended.  All the work has been done for you, this property is immaculately presented and impeccably clean s..."
"Being offered with no onward chain and requiring updating is this double fronted, two bedroom semi detached bungalow with a 70ft appro rear garden. Convenient for Southend Airport, local shops and bus routes."
"OIEO £300,000. An extended 2 BED SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW, in a convenient location for access to Southend Town Centre & Hospital. The bungalow has been modernised to provide comfortable accommodation, and is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN!! Viewing advised!!"
"Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 No Onward Chain - A delightful property offering three floors of accommodation with generous living space throughout and great local amenities nearby!"
"Situated just yards from the seafront and within 0.5 miles of Southend East rail station and Southchurch Park, this well presented terraced home would make an ideal first time or investment purchase. Offering a lounge and separate dining room, modern kitchen and bathroom to the ground floor there..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 to £325,000 *** Scott and Stapleton are delighted to offer for sale this quirky and very individual two bedroom purpose built, duplex apartment, with two outside terraces from both bedrooms. Located within walking distance to Southend Airport and Station as well..."
" IN NEED OF MODERNISATION! This double fronted 3 bedroom endterraced family home is situated in a very convenient location for the towncentre, train stations and schools. Further benefits include double glazing, centralheating and no onward chain. Ideal investment or family home."
"This two bedroom bungalow is bright and spacious throughout, offering two double bedrooms and a low maintenance rear garden"
"A well appointed two double bedroom basement appartment situated within the highly sought after 'Southend Conservation area'. This charming property boasts two reception rooms, a bright and sunny south facing walled garden plus private allocated parking to rear. Offered for sale at a great price!..."
"WALK TO THE SEA FRONT: Castle Estate Agents are pleased to offer FOR SALE this well presented TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM BASEMENT APARTMENT set in the CONSERVATION AREA opposite the BOWLING GREEN within easy walking distance to SOUTHEND STATIONS, HIGH ROAD, SHOPS, BARS, RESTAURANTS and ALL BUS ROUTES."
"Finished to the highest standard a stunning two bedroom two bathroom apartment (approx. 825 sq. ft) with large private patio (approx. 764 sq. ft) and underground car parking, situated on the 2nd floor of modern development with 24hr concierge and landscaped roof-top garden."
"A Stunning Two Bedroom Second Floor Apartment With Own 40ft x16ft Sun Terrace/Patio, Allocated Parking In A Secure Gated Car Park, Audio/Visual Entry System And Offered Chain Free Victoria Central is a popular 2020 redevelopment complex situated in a prominent location on Victoria Ave..."
"****GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £310,000**** A vacant two bedroom house which is situated within a short walk to Southend town centre. With a lounge to the front, a good size kitchen/diner and two double bedrooms and three piece bathroom upstairs, central heating, double glazing and parking ..."
This two bedroom mid terrace house is of good size and is situated close to the City Centre!
"* 290,000 - 300,000 * Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring to the market this versatile two/three bedroom duplex in Southend offering ample living space, two bathrooms, a long 105 year lease and OFF-STREET PARKING. Located within easy reach of schools, the A127, TRAVEL LINKS and excellent AMEN..."
"** Guide Price : 290,000 - £300,000 ** PACE are delighted to offer this three-bedroom MID-TERRACED house is situated in Southchurch Village. The property is modern and offers a nice space for family living. There is also a private West-facing garden and modern kitchen and bathroom. NO CH..."
"We are favoured with instructions to offer for sale this attractive ground floor garden flat, being situated within the prestigious location of Prittlewell Square in the Clifftown Conservation Area within a converted Victorian townhouse. The accommodation comprises, lounge, kitchen diner, two bed..."
"A Well Presented Two Bedroom Mid Terraced House With Garden And Allocated Off Street Parking At The Rear The property is situated in a popular Southchurch location within close proximity to local shops, the city centre, amenities and mainline railway stations to London. In addition, ..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £310,000 *Located within close proximity to Bournemouth Park Primary School and Cecil Jones High School, mainline bus routes, local shops and amenities, we are pleased to offer for sale this linked mid-terraced house with accommodation comprising two bedrooms,..."
Home in Thorpe Bay are delighted to bring to the market with no onward chain this beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment situated just off the seafront and offers Estuary views from the balcony. This property would make a wonderful first home or suit those looking to downsize.
NO CHAIN.... Read on for more information.
"A Stunning Recently Refurbished Two Bedroom First Floor Flat Close To The Beach With South West Facing Balcony With Estuary Views, Own Garden, Long Lease And Offered Chain Free The property is situated in a highly sought after location just off the seafront and close to Southchurch Par..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this semi detached house of metal construction, which offers accommodation comprising three bedrooms, two reception rooms which include a lounge and dining room, kitchen, first floor bathroom and ground floor cloakroom/WC. The property is majority double glazed wi..."
"A perfect two-bedroom apartment situated on the Westcliff parade overlooking the sea, offering the most beautiful scenic views. This home offers space, and a modern interior and is just minutes from the hustle and bustle of seaside life!"
"WILLIAMS and DONOVAN are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom purpose built third floor ""smart"" apartment built in 2020 and situated within short walking distance of Southend University Hospital, Prittlewell Station and Priory Park and close to all the myriad of amenities on off..."
"Being comfortably used as a three bedroom home, this great two double bedroom, two reception room character home is presented to a lovely modern standard throughout. Benefits include a sunny West facing garden, huge first floor family bathroom and a large, stylish fitted kitchen. No onward chain...."
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this luxurious, third floor apartment (nobody is above) with wonderful open plan living spaces which include a luxury kitchen with high specification appliances plus Granite worktops and breakfast bar. There are two doubl..."
"****NEW 99 YEAR LEASE**** on Completion INCLUDED . We are very excited to bring to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN this beautifully located first floor apartment, suitable for first-time buyers and investors"
"Home in Thorpe Bay are excited to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom first floor apartment which is located directly off Eastern Esplanade and comes with not only its own private, west backing rear garden but a healthy lease and the huge benefit of no onward chain.The accommodation comprise..."
"Situated on the second floor and offering no onward chain, is this well maintained two double bedroom apartment with lounge/diner, fitted kitchen and bathroom with shower cubicle, toilet and sink, communal parking, and garage in block. The property benefits from being close to Thorpe Bay train stat"
"Ocean Residential have been instructed to market this two double bedroom terraced property, situated within walking distance of Southend seafront, Southchurch Park, local transport links, schools and amenities. The property comprises of two double bedrooms, a lounge/diner, kitchen and ground floor b"
Home Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this unique and superb two/three bedroom first and second floor duplex forming part of this historic building close to central Southend and mainline stations with secure gated parking.
"*WESTCLIFF SEAFRONT* With stunning views across the estuary to the front and Southend to the rear, this top floor two bedroom apartment is available with vacant possession and therefore no onward chain. Ideally situated for Southend town centre, Westcliff train station to London and seafront. "
"GUIDE PRICE - £270,000 - £280,000 FISKS are proud to introduce this recently refurbished three bedroom end terraced property located in the heart of Southend-On-Sea, the property is within easy reach to highly regarded schools, restaurants, bus stops and the popular city center which h..."
This three bedroom first floor flat is modern throughout and boasts spacious living
"* £270,000 - £290,000 * No Onward Chain * Bear Estate Agents are thrilled to bring exclusively to the market this unique triplex maisonette loft apartment. Cleverly arranged over three floors to incorporate two double bedrooms, a grand open plan kitchen/living space with an 11'4 vaulted ceiling a..."
"Guide price £270,000-£280,000 This charming two double bedroom extended property is full of character. Quirky, bright and lots of hidden extras, two reception rooms, an extended kitchen with high vaulted ceiling and skylight, modern bathroom and a good size garden. A viewing is essential."
"Modern two double bedroom first floor flat in Westcliff-on-Sea offering a garden, a long lease and off-street parking. Located within easy reach of Southend High Street for excellent amenities, train lines and much more. Ideal for first time buyers and commuters."
"Being situated in the sought after Clifftown Consevation area this attractive Top floor apartment comprising lounge, two bedrooms ( 1 double and 1 single), study, bathroom/wc with shower cubicle, fitted kitchen with integrated oven and hob, integrated fridge, dishwasher, utility room with rear ..."
"An Extended One Bedroom Ground Floor Flat With Two Reception Rooms, Own South Facing Garden, Off Street Parking, Offered With A 50% Share Of The Freehold And No Onward Chain The property is situated in a sought after location close to the seafront and facing Southchurch Park. In addit..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000 - £280,000
Offering for sale this modern two bedroom flat that comes with parking!"
Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this three bedroom terraced house offering the potential to make it your own. This property is positioned within the centre of Southend-on-Sea close to plenty of amenities such as train stations and well-regarded schools. This home is presented with no on...
"With a prime central location, this great two/three bedroom character house with South facing garden offers lots of potential to improve and add value. The property comprises two large reception rooms (one of which can be used as a third bedroom) fitted kitchen, ground floor Wet room/WC, two firs..."
"INVESTORS:- Winkworth of Leigh are delighted to bring to the market this lovely two-bedroom first floor apartment with a South facing lounge and balcony, offering superb Estuary views. Located with walking distance of Westcliff Mainline Railway Station and a stone' through from the se..."
An immaculate first floor retirement apartment benefiting from bright and spacious rooms. JULIET BALCONY with views over the communal gardens.
"Sorrell are favoured with instructions to offer for sale this spacious skilfully converted triplex apartment being situated in a popular residential location, close to local primary schools and within easy walking distance of Southend Victoria train station and Southend High Street. The property ..."
"Ashleigh Stone are thrilled to market this spacious two bedroom duplex maisonette boasting SEAVIEWS and in prime spot for the seafront, station and park. The ground floor boasts spacious lounge to the with access via double doors to the balcony and the modern fitted kitchen. Downstairs sees the t..."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire this spacious two bedroom, clifftop apartment situated in an enviable location overlooking Cliff Gardens and the Thames Estuary and within a short walk of Southend City Centre, seafront and Southend Central mainline station. Features include a spacious lounge m..."
"Situated in the heart of Southend on sea within walking distance of main Line station, shops, restaurants and bars with extensive views across the Thames estuary and overlooking cliff gardens is this Cliff top first floor apartment with two bedrooms, fitted kitchen, family bathroom, gas radiator ..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Looking to get onto the property ladder? Or are you an investor looking to build on your portfolio? This stunning two bed apartment located in the heart of Southend is now available. Boasting two double bedrooms, two bathrooms and an open plan..."
"Situated on the busy London Road in Southend-on-Sea, a short distance from Southend High Street and close to Hamlet Court Road. It has road links to the A127 and only 2.4 miles to Southend airport. The property comprise of an open plan retail/ office area and separate residential accommodation s..."
"An outstanding 'CHAIN FREE' one bedroom, third floor apartment in the highly sought-after Prospects Place development. The property is the largest one bedroom in the building, in excess of 600 sq ft, and situated in an excellent position within the block, with no apartment above and either side, ..."
"* NEW FLOORING THROUGHOUT * REDECORATED THROUGHOUT * LANDSCAPED FRONT GARDEN * This charming period two-bedroom terraced home offers a fantastic opportunity to get on the property ladder, as this is perfect for first-time buyers and investors. The property has two bright reception rooms with all ..."
This two bedroom modern ground floor apartment makes a great first home for those looking to step onto the property ladder
* 50% SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD * No Onward Chain * Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this one/two bedroom ground floor flat which is located in the prestigious Milton Conservation area and offers an abundance of character features and delightful westerly facing rear garden. The...
"** Guide £250,000 - £270,000 ** Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this fantastic 2 bedroom apartment. Located on the top floor of this popular development, this property would be ideal for any first time buyer or for those looking to downsize in style. The prop..."
"Bradleys countrywide are pleased to bring to the market this well kept 2 bedroom second floor flat, situated a short walk from Southchurch Park, shops and Southend East train station (C2C Line). This modern flat boasts off street allocated parking and sea views. For sale with no onward chain. "
" Morgan Brookes believe - This two bedroom apartment would be perfect for a first home buyer or as an investment opportunity. Located in a popular Southend-on-Sea location, benefiting versatile accommodation, a large rear garden, off-street parking & is offered with no onward chain! Our Sell..."
"*** STUNNING INSIDE AND OUT *** Bear Estate Agents are proud to offer for sale this striking ground floor flat which becomes available with the full Freehold. The property comprises two bedrooms, living room with feature bay window, modern fitted kitchen, and a luxury bathroom. Further benefi..."
"A Very Well Presented Two Bedroom 9th Floor Apartment With Stunning Views, Two Allocated Parking Spaces, An En-suite To The Master Bedroom And A Modern Open Plan Living Arrangement. The property is situated in the heart of Southchurch within close proximity to local shops, the town cen..."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A great opportunity to buy this stunning two double bedroom apartment in the sought-after Beaumont Court. Perfect for any first-time buyer or a buy to let investor looking to expand their portfolio. This pristine apartment boasts two beautifu...
"This spacious and beautifully presented two double bedroom first floor flat is situated in a popular location within the heart of Southchurch Village, just a short stroll from Southend East rail station and within easy access of the local shops and eateries of Southchurch Road. Offering a beautif..."
"Guide Price £240,000-£250,000 Are you an investor looking to add to your portfolio? Situated in the heart of Southend, you can take full advantage of being walking distance to Southend High Street which has a huge range of restaurants, bars and cafes, we can’t fo..."
"Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this beautifully presented two double bedroom first-floor flat to the market. Positioned within a stone's throw of Southend East Train Station for direct travel links into London Fenchurch Street. Also within walking distance of an abundance of shops, eater..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented ground floor retirement apartment which is located on the South facing side of the Centenary Place complex. The accommodation comprises one large double bedroom with a walk in wardrobe, an open plan lounge/diner, a modern fitted kitchen with..."
Bright and airy SOUTH FACING one bedroom apartment situated on the GROUND FLOOR with patio door from both lounge and bedroom. This apartment is situated in a popular MCCARTHY STONE retirement living development.
"This beautifully presented two bedroom maisonette boasts fabulous accommodation with its own private entrance, stylish reception room, luxury family bathroom and a kitchen/diner with direct access to a West facing balcony and section of garden. Other benefits include a long lease, private ground ..."
"Guide Price - £230,000 - £240,000 A beautifully decorated apartment throughout providing you with spacious accommodation and within convenient reach to local amenities!"
"Guide Price - £230,000 - £250,000 A lovely two bedroom ground floor flat perfect for first time buyers offering spacious living throughout, modern interior, off street parking and great local amenities nearby"
"Modern two double bedroom ground floor apartment with secure gated parking, close to wealth of amenities and transport links. Offering security entry phone system, lounge/diner, well equipped fitted kitchen, modern bathroom and a wonderful location within walking distance of seafront beaches. Oth..."
"Guide Price £230,000 - £250,000 A modern two bedroom flat located in Southend-on-Sea providing spacious living throughout and amazing amenities right on your doorstep!"
This stunning two bedroom apartment at Beaumont Court is modern throughout and would make a perfect first time buy for those looking to get onto the property ladder
Bear Estate Agents are proud to present this immaculate two bedroom flat positioned in the heart of Southend. The property is minutes away from Southend City Centre and travel links into Central London.
 A distinctive & visually stunning modern development offering a double bedroom 3rd floor luxury apartment for sale. The property is situated in a wonderfully convenient location close to the town centre & two mainline train stations providing an easy commute to London. Further benefits incl...
"Bairstow eves are pleased to be offering this two bedroom modern second floor apartment with lift access situated just off the sea front within yards of the beach and south church park, This property has been presented well with modern fitted shower room, open plan fully fitted kitchen/ lounge wi..."
"A Modern Two Bedroom Fifth Floor Apartment (With Lifts & Stairs) Offering An Open Plan Living Style With A Modern Three Piece Bathroom And An Allocated Parking Space The property it situated in the heart of Southend-on-Sea C ity Centre close to shopping facilities, restaurants..."
"Are you a first time buyer looking to get onto the property ladder? Look no further, this wonderful ground floor maisonette apartment has been decorated to a high standard and is surrounded by fantastic amenities"
"Offered with no onward chain is this stunning two bedroom fifth floor apartment at Beaumont Court, being modern throughout and makes the perfect first time purchase for those looking to get on the ladder. Alternatively, it would make a fantastic Buy To Let investment for those out their looking to e"
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £240,000 This two bedroom apartment is modern throughout and comes with parking!"
"* No Onward Chain * Two double bedroom second floor flat in the highly desirable Beaumont Court complex. Benefits from having one allocated off-street parking space, along with a communal roof terrace, gym, 24 hour concierge and secure entry phone system. Positioned within easy reach of the city ..."
"Situated just outside of Southend's Town Centre is this exceptional two bedroom upper floor flat. Southend High Street is a popular shopping destination that offers a wide range of shops and eateries, along with two major train stations that commute to London on the Greater Anglia and C2C lines. ..."
"Martin and Co have a wonderful 2 bedroom flat in the grand Beaumont Court. This Building has much to offer, 24 hour concierge, gym, roof terrace and secure entrances. The flat is situated on the 5th floor to the rear of the building where it is quiet and overlooks the car park and Southend roof t..."
"*** No Onward Chain *** This lovely property is the perfect purchase for those looking to get onto the property ladder, or even those looking to downsize. As you enter this incredible apartment you will find, a great size living area, two double bedrooms, a well fitted kitchen and a three-piece..."
"A Well Presented Two Bedroom Top Floor Apartment (71 Sq Meters) With Modern Open Plan Living, Lift, Allocated Parking In An Underground Car Park, En-suite To Master Bedroom And Offered Chain Free. The property is situated within close proximity to the Greyhound Retail park and Prittelw..."
"Situated in lovely Cheviot House, close to a wealth of amenities and transport links, this stylish penthouse boasts impressive living space with two double bedrooms, two luxury bathrooms and secure gated parking! The property features a double reception room with open-plan kitchen and a wonderful..."
Situated in an excellent location close to a variety of local amenities is this wonderful top floor flat which provides spacious living throughout
"A Well Presented Two Bedroom Top Floor Apartment With Modern Open Plan Living, Lift, Allocated Parking In An Underground Car Park, En-suite To Master Bedroom And Offered Chain Free. The property is situated within close proximity to the Greyhound Retail park and Prittelwell mainline ra..."
"Brown & Brand are pleased to offer for sale this 2 bedroom second floor flat located within easy access to local travel links including bus routes and Prittlewell Train Station as well as Southend High Street offering a fine array of established shops and eateries, whilst within walking dista..."
"Offering a prime location for transport links and amenities, this great two-bedroom flat offers its own front entrance and a private section of rear garden. Other benefits include a luxury bathroom, stylish fitted kitchen, access to loft space and a long lease in excess of 145-years. Peacefull..."
" NEW 125 YEAR LEASE! This 2 double bedroom ground floor flat is situated in the heart of the highly sought after Southchurch Village, close to shopping parade, schools & train station. Further benefits include, off street parking for 2 vehicles a private rear garden and no onward chain. Ideal bu..."
"Guide Price - £220,000 - £230,000 A gorgeous one bedroom flat located in Southend-on-Sea offering spacious and modern interior throughout, as well as amazing amenities right on your doorstep!"
"A Two Bedroom Purpose Built Second/Top Floor Apartment With An Open Plan Living Arrangement And Allocated Parking The property is situated just off the seafront in the popular secure gated complex of Audley Court. It is within close proximity to the beach, Southchurch Park, Southchurc..."
"***OPEN HOUSE, SATURDAY 29TH OCTOBER 10AM-2PM***
Yopa are delighted to present this TWO BEDROOM characteristic MAISONETTE, which is situated in the heart of Southend-on-sea. Look no further if you're searching for a property which oozes spacious and open planned living. Call us today!"
"Set within a classic period conversion close to the Seafront, this stunning two bedroomed flat offers ample living space with a superb mix of character and contemporary features, private section of garden, and valuable share of Freehold. No Onward Chain. The property is within walking distance..."
"Guide Price - £220,000 - £240,000
A wonderful ground floor flat offering generous accommodation throughout, off street parking for one vehicle and excellent local amenities close by"
"***GUIDE PRICE £220,000-£240,000*** * NO ONWARD CHAIN * SHARE OF FREEHOLD * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * NEWLY REFURBISHED GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE * SHARED GARDEN * GAS CENTRAL HEATING * CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES * GREAT BUY TO LET INVESTME..."
"Abbotts are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious two bedroom first floor flat being offered for sale with a coveted 'share of freehold' and a tenant in situ, currently generating an income of £895p/m, to make this an excellent investment opportunity. This impressive p..."
"GUIDE PRICE £215,000 - £225,000 Martin & Co are pleased to offer this LUXURY apartment . The property consists of two bedrooms, lounge/fitted kitchen with all INTEGRAL appliances, modern bathroom and communal garden. This property is an ideal investment or first home and is being o..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; BUY TO LET INVESTMENT: A TWO BEDROOM FREEHOLD HOUSE WITH TWO RECEPTION ROOMS AND TENANT IN OCCUPATION PRODUCING AN INCOME OF £11,257 PER ANNUM"
"A flat within close proximity of Southchurch Road shops and Southend East mainline railway station, two bedrooms, ground floor flat benefiting from a private garden, newly fitted kitchen, bathroom and double glazing. The property would make an ideal first time purchase "
"This spacious two bedroom first floor flat is situated in a central location offering easy access to Southend City Centre, rail stations and the seafront. The spacious property offers a 16'4 lounge, two double bedrooms as well as a modern fitted kitchen and bathroom. Externally there is a shared ..."
"Featuring its own private garden with direct access, this newly refurbished ground floor flat with two double bedrooms, generous lounge/diner, brand new fitted kitchen and a brand new bathroom. The property is well situated for Southchurch Park, Seafront and Train Stations to London. No Onward Ch..."
Home Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this superb two double bedroom first floor apartment in Southend-on-Sea which includes a spacious open-plan lounge/diner. This ideal first purchase also benefits from having allocated off street parking for one car.
"Modern two bedroom, two bathroom, second floor apartment with secure gated parking, close to local amenities and transport links. Offering security entry phone system, good size open plan accommodation consisting , fitted kitchen and private balcony. Lounge area and dining area. This apartment is..."
Martin & Co Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this superb two bedroom third floor apartment in Southend-on-Sea which is available with no onward chain and boasts approximately 850 sq ft of accommodation which includes two bathrooms and a spacious lounge. This ideal first purchase o...
"Fantastic one bedroom first floor flat located directly on the seafront and with south facing views across the Estuary. This charming property has a good size lounge to the front aspect, separate fitted kitchen, double bedroom and three piece bathroom. Private garden to rear. Offered with no onwa..."
"* No Onward Chain * Two bedroom ground floor flat boasting open plan living space, two bathrooms and allocated off-street parking. Perfectly positioned along Southend Seafront close to amenities and travel networks."
"Situated in the sought after Southend on sea location within easy access to local shops, transport links , schools and all other local amenities is this two bedroom first floor flat with fully fitted kitchen, lounge, modern bathroom, two good size bedrooms and own rear garden, this property has b..."
Spacious two bedroom apartment situated in a great central location
"AMAZING CONTEMPORARY APARTMENT consisting of two DOUBLE bedroom and generous living accommodation. The property has its own south–facing balcony, allocated parking and neutral decor. Close to the station and shops. NO ONWARD CHAIN.THE LOCATION...Situated in the heart of Southchurch Village ..."
"Home Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale a new development of luxury designed one bedroom and studio apartments, all with stunning interiors offering open plan living and high quality fixture and fittings with a 250 year lease."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well maintained two bedroom second floor apartment, located close to Southend seafront and conveniently situated for access to Southend City Centre, and Southend East mainline station. The property benefits from full double glazing, communal gardens and se..."
"Guide price £205,000- £215,000 Four beautifully designed one bedroom flats situated in the heart of Southend all built with high quality fixtures and fittings throughout providing open plan living and excellent local amenities right on your door step!"
Prospects Place - Fairfax Drive SS0. Ramsey Moore are very pleased to offer to the market this immaculate One Bedroom first floor Balcony flat. Internally this property is an ideal for a first time buyer as it has everything to offer. Walking in to the flat you are met with a sense of style and c...
Martin & co Southend with no onward chain this two bedroom mid floor purpose built apartment is situated within the popular 'Marks Court' gated development situated just yards from the seafront and within easy access of rail stations and the city centre. Ideal for homeowner or Investment BTL ...
" Morgan Brookes believe - If you are searching for a property located within walking distance to all Southend-on-Sea has to offer, then look no further than this superb one double bedroom maisonette! Positioned just a five minute walk into the High Street, a short stroll to the seafront & within..."
"Beautifully presented two double bedroom top floor apartment situated in the popular Marks Court development just yards from the seafront and within easy access of the city centre and mainline rail stations. Offering a spacious lounge, kitchen/ diner, two double bedrooms and a modern bathroom the..."
"
** TOWN CENTRE LOCATION ** OWN SHARE OF REAR GARDEN ** RESIDENTS PERMIT PARKING ** MUST BE VIEWED ** VIEWING IS A MUST on this beautifully presented maisonette that is situated within central Southend just moments from the High Street. Split over two levels the property offers spacious and mod..."
"We are pleased to be offering this well-presented and looked after two bedroom first floor flat with double glazing, gas radiator central heating, fitted kitchen, good size lounge, family bathroom and two good size bedrooms. This property benefits from 157 Year Lease and share of freehold, Conve..."
This lovely one bedroom maisonette is modern throughout and is situated in the Shorefields conservation area
"MODERN APARTMENT located within the ICONIC ex-Lloyd's building in Southend on Sea. High Banks offers outstanding and undisturbed views of Southend's skyline there are two communal lifts, secure undercover off-street parking for 2 cars and truly desirable. THE LOCATION... High Banks ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £215,000 - Abode Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this Excellent sized one bedroom third floor apartment. The property benefits from a long lease (121years), allocated parking for two cars, large double bedroom, Luxury modern kitchen/living room and..."
"Guide Price-£200,000-£220,000 A wonderful maisonette boasting generous accommodation throughout and amazing amenities within walking distance!"
"*** NO CHAIN & PARKING SPACE *** Bear Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this one bedroom 5th floor flat presenting excellent internal condition and incredible views, access to a private balcony and one allocated off-street parking space. Located within minutes of Southend High Str..."
This lovely two bedroom apartment is modern throughout and comes with allocated parking
"Guide Price £200,000-£225,000 ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Looking to get on the property ladder? Are you an investor looking to build on your portfolio? This extremely spacious two bed, ground floor flat is now available. Boasting two good size bedrooms, a very l..."
"Two double bedroom, two bathroom, purpose built flat in well sought after gated development, located on Southend Sea Front. The property can be purchased with tenant in situ (the property currently has a tenant in situ; rental income is £825 pcm equating to £9900 per annum)"
"*OFFERED WITH VACANT POSSESSION* Martin and Co are pleased to advertise this ideal opportunity for investors and home owners alike, Benefitting from 2 bedrooms, 2 bathrooms and allocated parking. Call us today to get booked in!"
This bright and spacious immaculate two bedroom ground floor apartment is priced to sell it is situated in a popular location being just yards from the seafront for evening walks and within easy access of Southchurch Park and Southend East rail station. It offers a good sized lounge with access t...
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** CASH BUYERS ONLY Luxury two bedroom and two bathroom 6th floor apartment, with lift, located in the heart of Southend with video entry phone. No onward chain."
Offered with no onward chain this modern well presented one bedroom top floor apartment is situated within walking distance of Southend Victoria and Southend Central Train Stations as well as Southend city centre. The specification of this modern apartment is of a high quality throughout and incl...
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £210,000 ** Being sold as an HMO investment opportunity - FULL DETAILS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST Situated within the heart of Southend on Sea and within walking distance of Southend High Street with its array of shops, restaurants bars is this purpose built three bedroom s..."
"This beautiful, purpose built second floor apartment on the desirable Southpoint development, must be viewed to appreciate the wide array of luxury specifications on offer, including the added benefit of underground secure parking. Boasting a contemporary, light flooded 23ft lounge/diner with gen..."
"* 190,000 - 210,000 * Bear Estate Agents are proud to bring this spacious ground floor flat to the market. The property benefits from beautifully presented interiors, a long lease and an unbelievable 70ft private rear garden. This property is perfectly nestled in a sought after residential road,..."
"No Chain. Balcony, Allocated parking, Two bedrooms, Ensuite."
"** BUY TO LET INVESTMENT ** This spacious TWO DOUBLE bedroom ground floor flat is situated within easy access of the seafront, city centre and mainline rail stations. The property further benefits from a 15'7 lounge, 10'2 fitted kitchen and white bathroom suite. Externally there is a rear garden ..."
"Situated on the desirable Southpoint development is this wonderful mid-floor flat providing open plan living, off street parking for one vehicle and in walking distance to excellent local amenities"
"INVESTORS we are pleased to offer for sale this one bedroom apartment situated on the 8th floor. with fantastic views across Southend and the Thames estuary. Modern open plan living accommodation with. modern fitted kitchen and shower room, good size bedroom. Secure entry phone system. Convenient..."
Stylish one bedroom second floor flat with sea views from the bedroom. Benefits from having off-street parking and is just minutes from the seafront as well as Southchurch Park.
"Impressive one bedroom first floor flat with private garden, in a central Southend location, convenient for local amenities and good travel links. Fully double glazed throughout with a spacious lounge, large kitchen/diner, double bedroom and a four piece family bathroom. Other benefits include va..."
"Offered to the market is this superb two bedroom apartment boasting off street parking and premium location, moments from the hustle and bustle of Southend's Marine Parade, city centre amenities and the station for c2c links into central London. The property comprises two bedrooms, bathroom and o..."
This lovely two bedroom apartment is modern throughout and is situated close to local amenities
"AMAZING CONTEMPORARY APARTMENT consisting of one DOUBLE bedroom and generous living accommodation. The property has its own south–facing balcony, allocated parking and neutral decor. Close to the station and shops. NO ONWARD CHAIN.THE LOCATION...Situated in the heart of Southchurch Village ..."
"Modern two double bedroom second floor apartment in Southend on Sea, located just a stones throw from Prittlewell Mainline Station. The property consists of a large open plan lounge/kitchen with integrated appliances, two double bedrooms with en-suite to master and separate three piece bathroom. ..."
"Being situated in the heart the historic Clifftown conservation area, within the sought after Cambridge Court development is this spacious garden apartment for the over 55's. The property is immaculately maintained and offers quality fixtures and fittings throughout. There are communal resident f..."
"his spacious one bedroom luxury penthouse apartment situated on the 9th and being situated in the heart of Southend on Sea. The apartment offers good sized accommodation, a fitted kitchen with integrated fridge freezer, washer/dryer, dishwasher, spacious Lounge, modern 3 piece bathroom with ra..."
"Located in a prime location, in the heart of Southchurch Village is this stunning two double bedroom apartment. This beautiful, well-equipped home is the epitome of modern, stylish living, with a Juliette balcony (West facing) and a spacious, sunny kitchen/lounge/diner. This open plan room offers..."
"This well presented two bedroom first floor flat is situated in a popular location just yards from the seafront and within easy access of Southend City centre and mainline rail stations. Offering a 14'3 lounge, two bedrooms, a modern fitted kitchen and shower room the property further benefits fr..."
*** CASH BUYERS ONLY *** Scott & Stapleton are delighted to offer for sale this super third floor purpose built apartment which is presented in exceptional condition and is located in a highly desirable development close to all amenities. Offering good size accommodation the property be...
"** MINIMAL ONWARD CHAIN & INCREDIBLE VIEWS ** Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this stunning one double bedroom, fifth floor apartment located in this desirable and iconic building close to Southend City Centre. The property boasts stunning views of the sea and local area along with ..."
"* GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000 * TOP FLOOR FLAT * PERMIT PARKING AVAILABLE * REFURBISHED BATHROOM * CLOSE TO BOTH SOUTHEND TRAIN LINES * NEARBY SEAFRONT AND HIGH STREET * REDECORATED THROUGHOUT * This first-floor flat sits within a stunning period building with a bright bay fronted lounge-dine..."
"Guide Price £180,000 - £200,000 Situated in the heart of Southend-on-sea, is this incredible top floor flat boasting an abundance of space throughout and secure off street parking for one vehicle"
"* CASH BUYERS ONLY * Stylish two double bedroom apartment positioned close to a wealth of amenities. Benefitting from a new kitchen and bathroom, alongside allocated gated off-street parking."
This modern apartment is perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder
"Turner Sales are happy to offer for sale this one bedroom first floor flat with Seaview's situated in Southcurch. The property offers a lounge/diner with door through to the kitchen, three-piece bathroom and double bedroom with a Seaview. There is allocated parking, and the property is situated o..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and spacious one bedroom ground floor flat, located in central Southend with an abundance of local shops and amenities close by, excellent transport links, and within 0.6 miles to Southend Victoria station with services to London Liverpool St..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this wonderful apartment. Boasting modern living throughout, this presents an ideal opportunity for anyone looking to jump onto the property ladder in style. Further benefits include the private balcony and luxu..."
"Bear Estate Agents are excited to bring this beautifully presented one double bedroom ground-floor flat to the market. This property is positioned in a convenient Southend location, within walking distance of the Greyhound Retail Park, bus links and train lines providing direct access into Centr..."
"Martin & Co Southend offer this two bedroom apartment situated close to Southend Victoria mainline station. The Pinnacle is a modern development of 60 two bedroom flats. TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN-SUITE TO MASTER, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN WITH APPLIANCES, FAMILY BATHROOM and SPACIOUS LIVING ARE..."
"Calling all Investors..... (Sold With Tenant) Located in the centre of Southend City, this apartment has fantastic views, modern interior and is being sold with a great tenant in situ. If you are looking for your next property for your portfolio or just starting out with BUY TO LET investment..."
"With NO ONWARD CHAIN, Goldings of Thorpe Bay are delighted to offer for sale this spacious, first floor flat. Burges Court is a much sought after complex offering superb retirement living. The block is well looked after and has a welcoming residents lounge, laundry room, parking and communal g..."
" BUY TO LET INVESTORS!! LONG LEASE & NO ONWARD CHAIN! This One DOUBLE BEDROOM first floor apartment benefits from a PRIVATE REAR GARDEN WITH DIRECT ACCESS, a good sized lounge and MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM! Situated in a prime location close to the town centre, train stations and shopping fa..."
"Looking for the perfect starter home or a fantastic investment opportunity? Look no further than this stunning 1 bed flat on Rylands Road in Southend-on-Sea!Located on the first floor, this flat offers the perfect blend of convenience and comfort. Featuring a spacious bedroom, large lounge"
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this truly stunning apartment in the sought-after Beaumont Court This luxury spec apartment offers a fantastic living space with a large open plan Lounge /Kitchen perfect for entertaining, along with one double bedroom . Situated in the ce..."
"A BRAND NEW LEASE 999 YEARS AFTER COMPLETION! The property is situated in a central Southend on Sea location and offers a one-bedroom, ground-floor apartment with a double bedroom. The property benefits from a 999-year lease and off-street parking."
A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Old Rectory Court was constructed by Anglia Secure Homes and comprises 41 apartments arranged over 2 floors each served by lift; a further 4 apartments on 2 floors and a three bedroom cottage in the converted Rectory. The car park is to the front of...
**SHARE OF FREEHOLD** ** NO CHAIN ** A great opotunity to buy this first floor 2 bed flat with a share of freehold. Ideal for any first time buyer or an investor looking to expand their portfolio. Location is perfect as you are within walking distance to Prittlewell tra...
"IDEAL FIRST TIME PURCHASE. CLOSE TO STATION AND CITY CENTRE. We are delighted to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom apartment located on the fourth floor of the popular Skyline Plaza development, just a few minutes walk from the City Centre, and Southend Victoria mainline station. The pr..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented one bedroom purpose built flat, located on the first floor of The Pavilions along Cambridge Road. Situated close to local amenities including Southend Central mainline station, shopping facilities in Southend High Street and Hamlet Co..."
"PACE are delighted to offer this one DOUBLE bedroom first floor LONG LEASEHOLD flat situated in the peaceful streets of Southend. The property is spacious and well cared for, with neutral decoration throughout there is the added bonus of double glazed windows and gas central heating. The property..."
Seven beautifully designed studio flats situated in the heart of Southend all built with high quality fixtures and fittings throughout providing open plan living and excellent local amenities right on your door step!
Bear Estate Agents are proud to bring this two bedroom first-floor flat that is positioned in a central location close to a wealth of amenities and travel links with the nearby Southend High Street being a short walk away. Mainline train stations providing direct access into Central London are al...
"NO ONWARD CHAIN Located on lovely Lancaster Gardens, this gorgeous character flat is presented to an excellent modern standard throughout! The property benefits from a generous lounge/diner, large master bedroom, stylish shower room and a well equipped fitted kitchen. Other benefits include a lon..."
A one bedroom flat in Southend-on-Sea offering generous living space throughout and in need of some refurbishment!
"Situated in the heart of Thorpe Bay is this retirement residence for the over 55s. With one good size bedroom, a lounge/diner, modern shower room, kitchen with appliances and excellent communal facilities. Off street parking and communal gardens and within a short walk of Thorpe Bay Broadway. "
"A beautifully maintained one bedroom Retirement flat, situated on the first floor of this popular purpose built development, located close to the Broadway shops, mainline railway station and bus stop. This bright west facing property enjoys views over the rear pretty communal gardens, plus has a ..."
"A well presented one bedroom retirement apartment, situated on the first floor of this popular purpose built development, located within just a short stroll to the Broadway shops, mainline railway station and bus stop. This charming property affords views beautifully maintained communal gardens, ..."
"A well presented one bedroom Retirement flat, situated on the second floor of this popular purpose built development, located close to the Broadway shops, mainline railway station and bus stop. This charming property overlooks the beautifully maintained communal gardens, and benefits from a newly..."
ANY REASONABLE OFFERS WOULD BE CONSIDERED - A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR OVERLOOKING THE PATIO AREA AND BENEFITING FROM A MODERN SHOWER ROOMNevyll Court comprises 50 one and two bedroom properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift for the over 60'S. Co...
"5.82% Yield! An opportunity to purchase a one bedroom top floor, purpose built flat in well maintained development with own parking space. The property is currently tenanted and therefore is offered to INVESTORS only. Currently achieving £800pcm. Within 5 minutes walk of Prittlewell station."
"RETIREMENT BUNGALOW. CLIFFTOWN CONSERVATION AREA. An opportunity has arisen to acquire this vacant one bedroom retirement bungalow, set within the popular Cambridge Court development in the heart of the Clifftown Conservation Area, and conveniently situated for Southend city centre, mainline tr..."
"Situated in the sought after Southend on sea location within walking distance of Southend East main line station, local shops and transport links is this good size three bedroom flat with fitted kitchen, family bathroom, three good size bedrooms, lounge with balcony, this property benefits from d..."
"A beautifully presented, large, bright and airy one bedroom purpose built flat in a well kept development. The property comes with one allocated parking space and communal garden. Perfect for a first time home, or investment. Conveniently located within 5 minutes walk of Prittlewell mainline stat..."
"Two double bedroom, two bathroom purpose built flat, situated in the popular Pinnacle Development. Offered with a long lease remaining, no onward chain and allocated parking space. The property is currently tenanted and is offered to Cash Buyers only. Call today to book your viewing!"
"A one double bedroom apartment situated within close proximity of Southend High Street and Southend Victoria Railway Station. This Purpose Built apartment benefits from a Spacious Lounge / Diner and Fitted Kitchen, Plus allocated parking- Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, A must view!"
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000 TO £180,000 **Managers choice for Value and central location.*** Featuring impressive dimensions, this huge one bedroom apartment (4th floor) offering the ultimate value! This stylish City Centre apartment offers far reaching views over Southend in a safe and secu..."
"Yopa are delighted to present Boston Avenue. The first floor one bedroom flat oozes character and would make the most ideal first time home, or buy to let investment. Boston Avenue is known for being one of the most amazing streets in Southend, it really is an outstanding location."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** An ideal property for any first time buyer or investor. This large 1 bed 1st floor flat has everything you need. A large reception room with bay windows offers plenty of space and light, a good size double bedroom, a lovely kitchen and a 3 peice ba..."
This one bedroom flat boasts spacious living and is situated in a fantastic location close to local amenities and a mainline train station
"SAFE & SECURE Ground floor retirement home, in a lovely community environment which promotes independent living. The property is well presented offering direct access to beautiful communal gardens, private front door, secure entry phone system, 24-7 Emergency support, on-sitelaundry room, a salon..."
**No Onward Chain** This one bedroom flat boasts spacious living and is situated in a fantastic location close to local amenities and a mainline train station. Situated in the centre of Southend with lots of local amenities close by and being a short walk to Southend Victori...
"Morgan Brookes believe - Rarely do apartments of this condition in this location come available! Superbly positioned within walking distance of Southend City Centre, the seafront & three mainline train stations, this property has it all on it's doorstep. Our Sellers love - The security of..."
"A well presented one bedroom split level first and second floor flat with communal garden and an allocated parking space and a lease in excess of 150 years The property is situated in the heart of Southchurch within close proximity of local shops, the town centre and amenities. In add..."
This spacious one bedroom purpose built second floor apartment is being offered for sale with no onward chain and is situated in a convenient location offering easy access to Southend City centre and mainline rail stations. Offering a large open plan lounge/ kitchen with integrated appliances the...
Winkworth are delighted to bring to the market this is a well maintained one-bedroom split level first and second floor flat with a communal garden and an allocated parking space.
"Situated in the sought after Southchurch location within easy access to local shops, schools, transport links and Southend sea front with all its attractions is this one bedroom upper floor flat with fitted open plan kitchen /lounge, master bedroom, family bathroom, double glazed, electric heatin..."
FOR SALE BY AUCTION....A beautifully presented 2 bedroom flat with its own section of garden. The property currently has a 62 year lease. The vendors have started the process of a lease extension but is sold (SEE MAIN DESCRIPTION FOR HOW TO BID)
This one bedroom third floor apartment is very spacious and it comes with allocated parking. It will make the perfect first home or be a great buy to let investment. Call now to view!
"Home in Thorpe Bay are pleased to welcome to the market this charming one bedroom Retirement flat situated on the second floor of this popular purpose built development, within moments of Thorpe Bay Broadway shops, mainline railway station and bus stop. Offered with non onward chain."
" Morgan Brookes believe - This ground floor apartment is prominently located in the heart of Southend-on-Sea & would be a great purchase for a couple or single person alike! The accommodation has been well kept throughout & comprises of a spacious living/dining room, kitchen, master bedroom ..."
"This one bedroom ground floor flat is situated in a central location offering easy access to Southend town centre, the seafront and rail stations. Offering an open plan lounge/ kitchen, double bedroom and shower room, the property further benefits from double glazing and gas central heating and i..."
We are pleased to offer for sale this fifth floor apartment being situated within a central location close to Victoria railway station and Southend town centre. The property boasts a spacious open plan lounge/kitchen and folding doors leading to a Juliet balcony. The double bedroom includes fitt...
"GUIDE PRICE *** £150,000-£170,000*** Spacious one bedroom first floor flat in the popular Vantage Court complex just minutes from Prittlewell Train Station and the A127. Benefits from having one allocated off-street parking space and open plan living accommodation. Building Insurance, water and S..."
"A Two Bedroom First Floor Retirement Apartment Offering Independent Living for the Over 60's The property is situated in a sought after location just of Southchurch Boulevard within close proximity to local shops on Southchurch Road and within easy reach of Southend East Station, Sout..."
"This one bedroom ground floor flat is situated in a central location with Southend city centre, rail stations and the seafront all close by. Offering a 996 year lease and a share of the freehold the property features a spacious open plan lounge/ kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and a small rear ..."
"*£145,000 - £165,000* Bear Estate Agents are delighted to bring this two bedroom to the market. This first floor flat in the heart of Southend-on-Sea, within walking distance are amenities, train stations, bus links and Southend Seafront. Benefits from having double glazing, one allocated PARKING..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale this purpose built ground floor one bedroom apartment located within the popular Pavilions development on Cambridge Road, which is conveniently situated for access to Southend Central mainline station, seafront and City Centre. The property benefits from secure a..."
"ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT. OVER 55'S ONLY. CLIFFTOWN CONSERVATION AREA. We are delighted to offer for sale this one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment, located within the popular Cambridge Court development in the heart of the Conservation Area. Conveniently situated for acc..."
"Hair & Son offer this good size one bedroom first floor flat. With gas central heating, double glazing. The property benefits from off street parking and recently extended lease. Situated in close proximity to Southend seafront and town centre with its many amenities. Offered with no onward c..."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY. We offer for sale this recently converted two bedroom, top floor apartment located in the High Street in the heart of Southend town centre and therefore close to the many shops, bars and restaurants and within walking distance of Southend seafront and Southend Central mainline s..."
LOT 46 **FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION** on 02/03/2023 09:30
"** OFFERS CONSIDERED BETWEEN £135,000 - £145,000 WITH EXTENDED LEASE UPON COMPLETION ** This one bedroom first floor flat is situated in a central location offering easy access to Southend Town Centre, the seafront and mainline rail station. Offering a spacious open plan living room/ kitchen, dou..."
"A well appointed one bedroom Retirement apartment situated on the first floor of this sought after purpose built development, within stone's throw of Thorpe Bay mainline railway station and Broadway shops. The property is located to the rear of the block and overlooks the pretty communal gardens...."
"Griffin Property Co. are delighted to offer to market this one bedroom third floor flat in Southend-On-Sea. Conveniently situated within walking distance of Southend High Street, and both mainline railway stations, this property presents a fantastic investment opportunity. The property benef"
"Guide price £130,000-£140,000 **NO ONWARD CHAIN** A great opportunity for any first-time buyer or investor! This very spacious 1 bed apartment is the ideal for anyone looking to build on their portfolio or a first-time buyer looking to get onto the pro..."
"** GUIDE PRICE of £130,000 - £140,000 ** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY... PACE are delighted to offer this one DOUBLE bedroom, first floor leasehold flat situated in the HEART of SOUTHCHURCH VILLAGE. The property is spacious, centrally located and ideal for an investment purchase. There i..."
"** CASH INVESTOR REQUIRED ** GUIDE PRICE £130,000 - £140,000 - ABODE offer as sole agents this 2nd floor apartment which has the rental potential to achieve £950 PCM. The property offers 2 Double bedrooms, Large lounge/Diner leading out onto a enclosed balcony, kitchen with spac..."
"* Over 60s only * Beautifully presented one double bedroom first floor flat benefitting from lift access, communal parking and a healthy lease. Positioned close to a wealth of amenities and travel links."
"This spacious two bedroom flat is located on the first floor and although in need of some basic refurbishment is situated in a popular location overlooking playing fields and within easy access of local shops, schools and bus routes. There is a spacious lounge with an enclosed balcony which is op..."
"IMMACULATE ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT CLOSE TO TOWN CENTRE AND MAINLINE STATION. We are pleased to offer for sale this immaculate one bedroom first floor retirement apartment, located within the popular Sunningdale Court development which is conveniently situated for access to Southend tow..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; RESIDENTIAL INVESTMENT: A VACANT FIRST FLOOR FLAT WITH LONG LEASE AND OWN SECTION OF GARDEN WITHIN EASY ACCESS OF SOUTHEND EAST RAILWAY STATION"
"A charming one bedroom Retirement flat situated on the first floor of this popular purpose built development, within stone's throw of Thorpe Bay Broadway shops, mainline railway station and bus stop. The property is located to the rear of the block and overlooks the pretty communal gardens. Offer..."
"Situated in the sought after location of Southend on sea within easy access to Main line station , Southend high street with local shops, restaurants and bars and close to Southend sea front is this over 60s well maintained one bedroom upper floor retirement flat with fitted kitchen, bathroom , g..."
"A Two Bedroom 15th Floor (Top) Apartment With Stunning Views Of The Local Area, Situated In The Heart Of The City Centre Offered To Cash Buyers Only And With No Onward Chain. The property is situated in the heart of the City Centre within close proximity of the high street shopping fac..."
Are you over 60? This 1 bed GROUND FLOOR apartment might be for you. A luxury flat in a supported housing development. Situated close to local shops. The flat is self-contained with off street parking and beautiful communal garden. Situated on the ground floor and consists of large lounge with Mo...
"** CASH OFFERS BETWEEN £110,000 - £115,000 CONSIDERED DUE TO LOW REMAINING LEASE TERM (64 years) ** This one bedroom ground floor flat is situated in a central location offering easy access to Southend town centre, the seafront and rail stations. Offering an open plan lounge/ kitchen, double bedr..."
**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Vacant First Floor Two Bedroom Garden Flat Leasehold. The property is held on a 99 year lease from 15th Novem...
"Bear Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this fourth floor, studio flat with lift service to all floors and will generate a yield of 7.8% - 8.7% per annum. The property boasts a long lease, secure parking and easy access to all major amenities including Southend City Centre plus major rai..."
"A Bright And Well Presented One Bedroom Second Floor Retirement Apartment Offering Independent Living For The Over 60's And Offered Chain Free The property is situated within close proximity to the Greyhound Retail Park, local shops and Prittlewell mainline railway station to London Li..."
"Conveniently located for local shops in the Greyhound estate and easy access to the city centre is this spacious one bedroom second floor retirement apartment which offers a double bedroom, open plan lounge to a modern fitted kitchen and a good size newly fitted bathroom. The complex offers lift..."
"**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Ground Floor One Bedroom Flat Subject to an Assured Shorthold Tenancy Producing £10,200 Per Annum Lease..."
"Turner Sales offer a fantastic opportunity to get onto the property ladder. A 50% SHARED OWNERSHIP first floor flat with Seaview's situated in Southcurch. The property offers a lounge/diner with door through to the kitchen, three-piece bathroom and double bedroom with a Seaview. There is an alloc..."
"Conveniently located within just a few hundred metres of the Southchurch Road shopping parade and public transport links including Southend East C2C station, a well maintained retirement apartment in this popular sheltered housing development with no onward chain. Pembridge Court provides excell..."
A spacious double bedroom retirement apartment situated on the ground floor of a popular purpose built retirement development. The property benefits from direct access to pretty communal gardens via the lounge with residents parking nearby. The development boasts a well presented residents lounge...
"This one bedroom first floor retirement apartment located within the popular Martins Court development, which is conveniently situated for local amenities, and with excellent transport links. Features include double glazing, 24 hour emergency call system, resident's lounge, conservatory and ..."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY DUE TO SHORT LEASE. We offer for sale this self-contained one bedroom ground floor apartment, situated conveniently for access to Southend town centre and C2C mainline stations. Benefiting from allocated parking and no onward chain."
"A well-presented and generously sized, two double bedroom terraced character cottage, which is ideally positioned within the heart of the city centre, allowing easy access to the mainline train station, nearby shops/amenities and the historic open spaces of Verulamium Park. The attrac..."
"Remax UK are pleased to offer onto the market this amazing Investment opportunity. Alban House has a total of 11 apartments bringing in a annual income of over £174,000, comprising, two 2 bedroom apartments, Four 1 bedroom apartments and Five studio apartments. They have all been finished an..."
"An impressive and luxuriously appointed gated family residence of approx. 6,400 sq ft, set on a private and secluded plot in stunning and picturesque grounds of approximately six acres, the property is located in the peaceful village of Park Street, Hertfordshire. This unique contempo..."
A beautifully presented six bedroom detached family home offering flexible living accommodation arranged over three floors ideal for modern family living and entertaining.
"Development Opportunity in excellent location in St Albans, Hertfordshire"
A unique Grade II listed detached house on a generous plot
"32 Avenue Road is a striking modern detached family residence in the heart of thriving St. Albans, offering over 4,500 sq. ft. of flexible accommodation arranged over three light-filled floors."
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Situated on a PRIVATE and SUBSTANTIAL PLOT adjacent to Verulamium Park, this IMPOSING handsome RESIDENCE spans over three floors and offers vast living space of OVER 8400 SQUARE FOOT."
"After being carefully extended and refurbished by the current owners, to incorporate almost 8,500 sq ft of living accommodation, this 6-bedroom period family home offers generously proportioned spaces across three levels and offers both a modern and versatile home. Retaining many superb period fe..."
A substantial detached family home enjoying a centrally located and exclusive cul de sac position. Stepping into the property you are welcomed by a wide entrance hall with doors leading to off to amply proportioned and exquisitely decorated reception areas including a stylish living room with fea...
"Dating back to circa 1850 is this stunning four bedroom DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated within a PRIME and central CONSERVATION SETTING close to the historic Abbey and a short walk to the wide variety of excellent shops, eateries and reputable local schools."
"A beautifully presented five/six bedroom detached family home, which is set on an imposing plot close to the heart of Marshalswick. The vastly extended and improved accommodation is divided into two main buildings, the main house, and an adjoining two-storey annexe. The main house com..."
"An exciting opportunity to reserve one of a pair of brand new luxury four double bedroom, four bathroom detached houses currently under construction with the option to customise to your own personal taste and style. Each stylish house offers superbly planned accommodation over three floo..."
Situated on a substantial level plot in a highly sought after location this property has been a much loved family home for many years and now needs modernising and improving throughout by the next generation. With five bedrooms and three receptions already there is further scope to enhance the a...
"Situated within one of St Stephen’s most prestigious roads and ideally positioned for nearby schooling, motorway links and the city centre, is this impressive four bedroom detached family residence. The beautifully presented property comprises internally on the ground floor of an..."
"A simply stunning individual detached self built home with FIVE double bedrooms located in the highly popular St Stephens area, to the south of the City centre. Approximately a half hour's walk through the beautiful Verulamium Park and lake, past the Cathedral and onto the High Street. This beaut..."
"Located in an exclusive gated development is this stunning SIX BEDROOM DETACHED family home providing stylish, well planned accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS enjoying over 2970sqft of space. The property has real flexibility and can be laid out to suit different buyers needs enj..."
"Immaculately presented family home of circa 2,100 sq ft to include a super open plan Kitchen / Dining / Family room, built by the highly regarded Laing Homes. Additional benefit of a double garage. Ellis Fields is a peaceful spot and ideally located for schooling."
"Phase 2 now available 50% reserved. This stunning, sustainable brand new home has been designed with a high specification in mind offering spacious living accommodation laid out over three levels. Enjoying a sought after location in St Stephens on the southside of St Albans, this contemporary dev..."
"WITH ONE ALREADY SOLD, WE ARE NOW ABLE TO OFFER THIS SPECIAL UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT FOR SALE - OCCUPATION EARLY 2023 Over 2,000 square feet of accommodation. Located in the sought after family friendly residential area Imagine are delighted to bring to the market this contempora..."
"Nestled within a peaceful location and in one of St. Albans most desirable modern developments, this immaculate, five double bedroom, extended detached family residence offers effortless living with a sense of space and style, set in beautiful surroundings. The property flows beautifully over tw..."
A Georgian-style detached family home in a quiet city centre location within walking distance of the station and amenities.
"WITH ONE ALREADY SOLD, WE ARE NOW ABLE TO OFFER THIS SPECIAL UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT FOR SALE – DUE FOR OCCUPATION EARLY 2023 Over 2,000 square feet of accomodation. Located in the sought after family friendly residential area Imagine are delighted to bring to the market th..."
"WITH ONE ALREADY SOLD, WE ARE NOW ABLE TO OFFER THIS SPECIAL UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT FOR OCCUPATION EARLY 2023 Over 2,000 square feet of accommodation. Located in the sought after family friendly residential area Imagine are delighted to bring to the market this contemporary dev..."
"A spacious ground floor purpose built two bedroom flat with private south facing balcony. The property is requiring some modernisation, offered for sale chain free and benefits from its own garage and a long lease. Avenue Road is an attractive and sought after location with convenient access ..."
"A three bedroom end of terrace period property located on a popular road within close proximity of the local amenities, schooling and the mainline train station with direct services to London. The property benefits from an entrance hall, a bright and airy lounge/diner with patio doors ..."
A contemporary style immaculately presented 4 bedroom detached house in one of St.Albans finest locations in the heart of the Old Conservation Area in a private cul-de-sac enjoying superb views across to St.Albans Abbey and St.Albans School. Within easy reach of the city centre amenities and a sh...
Freehold sale with development opportunities. The site consists of 3-bed semi-detached house and adjacent former Sports and Social club building situated in central St Albans with ample parking.
A wonderfully bright and spacious five bedroom detached house located on a highly south after road within a mile of the City train station to St Pancras International. The accommodation begins with an open porch and part glazed front door into a welcoming entrance hall with stairs to the...
"A unique detached house, with the opportunity to create a self-contained annexe,located on a most sought-after private cul-de-sac in the heart of the old conservation area."
"This stylish five double bedroom home provides impressive well planned accommodation arranged over three floors. The property enjoys over 2,400sqft of space and the layout is ideal for a sociable family lifestyle. The stunning open plan kitchen/diner/family room with bi-fold doors open..."
A truly unique opportunity to purchase approx. 1/3 acre plot with two approved planning permissions to build a stunning modernist style two storey 4000+sq.ft. and larger three storey home situated within a few minutes’ walk of St Albans vibrant City centre and train station into St Pancras Intern...
"Chiswell Greens best road, offers this four bedroom detached property. Spacious living and a very high specification, this wonderful end of road plot is perfect for anyone looking to upsize or change to a modern, low maintenance lifestyle. Viewings Highly Reccommended!!!"
"An imposing and well presented four double bedroom detached family home with over 2,200 Sqft, which is situated in a prestigious Marshalswick location, close to highly sought after schooling, a wide variety of shops and beautiful countryside walks. Three reception rooms | Kitchen dining r..."
"With an outlook over a green open space, a detached, contemporary family home situated within easy reach of the city's amenities."
This spacious FOUR BEDROOM bay fronted home is offered for sale with the added advantage of NO UPPER CHAIN. The property provides well planned accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS and has the advantage of APPROVED PLANNING PERMISSION for a substantial extension Planning Reference 5...
"Bowgate Mews is an exciting, gated development of just nine newly built, high specification homes, safe, secure and tucked away but yet in the heart of the city centre. Plots 1-5 are all three bedroom mews with spacious accommodation approaching 1,500 square feet. On the ground floor t..."
Offered for sale is this SPACIOUS and beautifully presented FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED family home situated within a POPULAR LOCATION close to excellent amenities and walking distance to reputable local schools and the mainline railway station.
A SPACIOUS and beautifully presented FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED family home situated in a sought after cul-de-sac close to excellent amenities and reputable local schools.
"Do you enjoy open plan living - space for family and friends to get together, to cook, eat drink and have fun?The kitchen/dining / living area provides exactly that as it expands the full width of the house. It also features direct access into the garden through bi-fold doors and a h..."
"This modern detached CHAIN FREE substantial home is situated in a very popular location in Chiswell Green close to Killigrew school, local amenities and the M25/M1 motorway networks."
"A superbly presented, extended 4 double bedroom detached family house with 3 bathrooms, 2 reception rooms, bespoke breakfast room / kitchen and 100ft rear garden in sought after setting close open countryside, yet accessible to City Centre amenities and main line station into St. Pancras Internat..."
"A spacious 4 bedroom Detached Family House with self contained 2 bedroom Annexe and a 150' south west facing rear garden in highly regarded residential area close Beaumont & Sandringham Secondary Schools. Potential for use as a self contained annexe, possible ""airbnb"", home office or rec..."
"An ideal opportunity has arisen for not only a family looking to put their own stamp on a property, but also for the investment buyer who is looking for a project. Subject, to planning consents the property has the potential to be converted into flats. An imposing six bedroom character property..."
An attractively presented four bedroom detached house located approximately 801 meters of the outstanding Beaumont secondary school and the thriving shopping parades at the Quadrant and Fleetville. The property offers further potential to extend/reconfigure to your own taste and requirements (sub...
This property would ideally suit a buy to let INVESTORS. This six bedrooms property over four levels includes kitchen/breakfast room with utility area and two receptions rooms. This period property is in the sought after area of St Albans within a short distance to the town centre.
"A truly exceptional four/five bedroom detached family home located in the highly desirable Highfield Park development of St Albans. Heavily extended to the ground floor and completely renovated in recent years, this outstanding property includes a stunning bespoke Hacker kitchen with full range o..."
Belvoir St Albans are delighted to present this magnificent SIX bedroom ** CHARACTER DETACHED ** property located less than a mile into St Albans Town Centre. ** AN IDEAL INVESTMENT OR DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY STPP ** for a conversion into flats. Situated very close to the mainline Thame...
"£1,000 A MONTH TO HELP WITH YOUR MORTGAGE PAYMENTS* Call for more informationHome 82, The Fletcher PlatinumImagine what you'd look for in a family home and the chances are you'll find all this and more in the Fletcher Platinum.
Do you enjoy open plan living - space for family a..."
"A simply stunning four bedroom end of terrace family home, ideally positioned within a quiet cul-de-sac which provides excellent access to nearby schooling, motorway links & shops/amenities. The property has been recently renovated internally and comprises an entrance porch, sittin..."
"A substantial and attractive four/five bedroom detached family home positioned on a sizeable plot, situated in a most sought after road in Bricket Wood. The large gravelled, in and out front driveway not only provides off road parking for several cars, but also a hint of what to expect inside. Wi..."
"Reserve by 20th March to get a £50,000 Stamp Duty Contribution PLUS £1,000 a month to help with your mortgage payments* Call for more informationHome 80, The Fletcher PlatinumImagine what you'd look for in a family home and the chances are you'll find all this and more in the Fle..."
Enjoy living in this spacious FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM bay fronted semi-detached home providing well planned family friendly accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS. The ground floor can be laid out in a variety of different ways to suit individual family needs. On the upper floors all the...
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN and approaching 1700 square feet of accommodation is this well presented FIVE BEDROOM semi detached FAMILY HOME situated within the highly sought after Fleetville area of St Albans and within walking distance to the mainline railway station.
"A well-presented five bedroom extended ‘Nash’ built semi-detached family home which is situated close to the outstanding Skyswood primary and Sandringham secondary schools. The ground floor accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, sizable living room, an impressive ope..."
"Ideally positioned within a highly sought after road approximately 0.6 miles from the city centre, is this impressively sized 4/5 bedroom semi-detached family home. The house is beautifully presented throughout and comprises internally on the ground floor of an entrance hall, w/c, stu..."
"Positioned on an enviable plot with fantastic potential for extension and development subject to the usual planning consents, is this three bedroom detached home with off road parking and a large rear garden. This property benefits from an entrance lobby, large lounge, separate kitchen..."
"Tewin Close is a prestigious and peaceful cul de sac in the Marshalswick area of St Albans well-placed for excellent schools, including Skyswood and Wheatfields primary schools and Sandringham secondary school."
"A 17th Century, GRADE II LISTED barn conversion in a small hamlet set within the stunning & exclusive grounds of Salisbury Hall."
Situated in a semi-rural location is this stunning Grade II Listed barn conversion which dates back to the late 17th/early 18th Century. Landsdowne offers some wonderful character features including exposed beams and vaulted ceilings and benefits from a secluded rear garden and detached garage.
"NO UPPER CHAIN This 1930s three-bedroom semi-detached home comprises entrance hall, bay-fronted living room, dining room, and kitchen. On the first floor, the main bedroom has a walk-in wardrobe, two further bedrooms, a bathroom, and a separate cloakroom. The property has excellent sc..."
A stylish contemporary family home with a large private garden in the prestigious Napsbury Park development
"Ref: MS0129 With over 1,960 SQ FT of internal living space, this stunning Grade 2 listed Barn Conversion offers any new buyer a chance to tick many positive attributes from their property wish list. Presented to the highest standards of interior design, this family home is located in a..."
18 Jove Gardens is an attractive four-bedroom family home set in the leafy St Albans’ suburb of Smallford 
"£1,000 A MONTH TO HELP WITH YOUR MORTGAGE PAYMENTS* Call for more informationHome 85, The Fletcher ExecutiveThis home features open plan living - a place for family and friends to get together, to cook, eat drink and have fun. Plus, the benefit of a separate living room, a study and..."
A substantial semi-detached townhouse with off street parking in a central conservation area location
"A SPACIOUS and well presented FOUR BEDROOM semi-detached PERIOD PROPERTY situated on a sought after road close to excellent amenities, reputable local schools and a short walk to the mainline railway station."
"A spacious FOUR BEDROOM period semi-detached family home situated on a HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER ROAD close to excellent amenities, reputable local schools and a short walk to the mainline railway station."
"A spacious living room and French doors to the garden, the Wilton is perfect for entertaining."
"A beautiful four bedroom detached family home set well back from the main road in an enviable elevated position with 125' of landscaped garden backing directly on to a private meadow and woodland. The property is located in the popular village of Sandridge, within walking distance of three pubs, ..."
"An extended three bedroom semi detached family home situated in this popular location within the catchment of the Ofsted outstanding Beaumont school. The property features a stunning open plan kitchen/family room with underfloor heating and bi fold doors leading onto the mature, west facing rear ..."
A very well proportioned detached family home on a good size corner plot in a cul-de-sac in highly sought after Highfield Park. This home is very well presented with a stunning fitted Kitchen/Breakfast room and attractive walnut flooring to the principal rooms. With versatile accommodation to sui...
"A very well presented ONE BEDROOM retirement apartment, boasting a WALK-OUT BALCONY accessed from the living room, ENJOYING VIEWS of the COMMUNAL GARDENS. The development offers EXCELLENT COMMUNAL FACILITIES including a restaurant, landscaped gardens and lounge where SOCIAL EVENTS take place."
"Situated within the heart of St Albans city centre and conveniently between both the mainline train station and the High Street, is this stunning four bedroom family home. The spacious accommodation is arranged over four levels and comprises on the ground floor of a bright living room ..."
"A deceptively spacious four bedroom semi- detached home in a superb location. This extended property is in a quiet location with far reaching views over the golf course, yet has the considerable advantage of being less than a mile from both the city centre and the St Albans City Station."
"Boasting generous reception space, this detached four double bedroom family home is located in a popular and tranquil cul-de-sac in the catchment of excellent schooling, just moments from the city centre and mainline station. Offered in excellent decorative order throughout, the property has off-..."
"A rare and exciting opportunity to purchase a house and land package for a superb five-bedroom detached executive home with large west facing garden, located on one of St Albans premier residential roads. The full cost of the package is £2,200,000, comprising £1,100,000 for..."
"Situated on one of the area’s most SOUGHT AFTER ROADS, this IMPOSING DETACHED RESIDENCE is situated within close proximity to a range of facilities and local landmarks including Clarence Park, outstanding schools and the mainline station."
"A substantially extended five bedroom semi-detached family home enjoying this popular Marshalswick location within a short walk to Sandringham School. The property offers generous and versatile accommodation of approximately 2100 square feet to include living room, family/dining room, family roo..."
"*PLOT 1 SOLD, PLOT 2 NOW AVAILABLE * JW&Co Langleys are delighted to offer for sale two impressive four bedroom LUXURY SEMI-DETACHED houses, which is finished to the highest of standards and situated in a sought-after location in a development of four homes. The accommodation c..."
Enjoy living in this attractive FIVE BEDROOM bay fronted semi-detached period property providing tastefully presented well maintained accommodation. The property is arranged over THREE FLOORS and carefully blends period features with a modern touch. On the ground floor there is a welco...
"The Langdale four bedroom home has a unique L-shape layout, and has proven popular amongst our buyers."
A beautifully presented four double bedroom 1930's semi-detached house with a multi-functional outbuilding located in a quiet and friendly cul-de-sac within five minutes walk of the mainline train station into St Pancras International. The accommodation begins with a covered porch and f...
"An impressive five bedroom Edwardian style home offering generous room proportions, a wonderful rear garden and located in the popular Fleetville area of St Albans. The accommodation begins with a covered porch leading into the welcoming entrance hallway with an attractive tiled floor an..."
"Enjoy living in this wonderful four bedroom home located in the heart of St Albans. The property enjoys a wealth of character features with spacious well planned accommodation arranged over two floors and offers the further scope to extend into the side return and a large loft, subjec..."
An attractive red brick family home offering light-filled flexible accommodation.
"A beatuifully presented, four-bedroom, detached family home within easy reach of excellent schooling, local amenities and St Albans City train station."
"10 Cornwall Road is a semi-detached property,that displays several attractive period features alongside elegant, modern décor and fittings throughout."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached bungalow on a substantial plot in a highly desirable address in the St Stephens area of St Albans. The property offers superb potential to update, extend or demolish to create a fabulous home (subject to planning permission) with the be..."
"A spacious four bedroom semi-detached home which has been extended to create a stunning kitchen/family room to the rear along with a principal bedroom and ensuite on the second floor, providing superb views over Batchwood and beyond."
"A beautifully presented four bedroom semi-detached family home, ideally positioned just 0.3 miles from the mainline train station and 0.8 miles to the city centre. The attractive property comprises internally of an entrance hall, re-fitted downstairs w/c, impressively sized living/din..."
"A unique spacious four bedroom, three reception room detached family home with off street parking for several cars, large rear garden and a fantastic self-contained annex in the popular Napsbury area of London Colney close to local amenities and major motorway networks. FLEXIBLE LIVING ACCOMMODATIO."
"This beautiful three bedroom home situated in the heart of St Albans has the added benefit of off-street parking, a private and intimate garden and is only a short walk from the mainline train station and city centre."
"Excellent detached house situated in a highly desirable cul-de-sac setting close to Prae Wood School, Columba's College and a Waitrose Supermarket. Verulamium Park and lakes and the wider amenities of St Albans centre are within a short walk.."
"Available for sale for the first time in three generations, Wayside is a pretty three/four bedroom detached period home, located along Sandpit Lane, on the eastern side of the city. Now needing updating throughout, this is a fabulous opportunity to explore any further potential as it is a huge pl..."
A delightful detached house in need of modernising offering excellent accommodation throughout situated in a popular residential road.
Offering wonderful views and spacious accommodation is this three bedroom town house located on a private gated development set in the beautiful surroundings of the ever popular Napsbury Park development. The property provides a wealth of flexible living accommodation over three floor...
An attractive five bedroom bay fronted Victorian town house arranged over three floors with approx. 1710 sq.ft. of accommodation in a wonderful location in the heart of the City. The accommodation begins with a covered porch an attractive part glazed front door leading to a welcoming en...
"Located on one of Marshalswick’s most popular roads is this beautifully presented four-bedroom SEMI-DETACHED family home. The ground floor comprises of an open plan living/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, cloakroom and a study/art room. Upstairs are four double bedrooms, o..."
"A chain free, extended Nash built family home set in the Marshalswick area close to highly regarded schools | Generous garden with a sunny aspect | Extension potential subject to planning permission  |  Two reception rooms | Off street parking and a double length garage
"
"Exclusive Four Bedroom Detached Family Home in St Albans Welcome to this Freehold Brand New luxury four bedroom detached family home located in the highly sought after area of Smallford, St Albans. Oaklands Lane is also situated within the catchment for outstanding local schooling. The d..."
"Enjoy living in this deceptively spacious FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM link detached family home in a highly regarded residential CUL-DE-SAC. The accommodation is arranged over two floors, has a well-tended rear garden, DRIVEWAY, and a SINGLE GARAGE. On the ground floor there is a spacious welc..."
"Situated in a sought after and convenient location, this gated property offers a versatile floorplan for the growing family. The property starts with an entrance hallway, there is a spacious lounge that flows into a fully fitted kitchen diner. Off the hallway is a purpose built office id..."
"Measuring in excess of 1700 sq ft is this beautifully presented five bedroom detached family home, located in Chiswell Green. This impressive property provides excellent access to local schools, the city centre and motorway links. This accommodation briefly comprises of an entrance ha..."
"A spacious and well-presented FOUR BEDROOM LINKED DETACHED family home situated within one of St Albans PREMIER ROAD close to excellent local schools, and walking distance to the mainline railway station."
36 Hedley Road is a rendered family home offering light-filled accommodation arranged over two floors.
"Located in a quiet cul-de-sac is this rarely available four bedroom LINK-DETACHED home. The ground floor comprises of a large entrance hall, shower room, dual aspect living room, dining area, conservatory and modern fitted kitchen. Upstairs are four well proportioned bedrooms and family bathroom...."
"Offered with no onward chain is this unique opportunity to purchase a characterful, four bedroom semi-detached family home close to the city centre with significant potential to extend subject to the necessary planning consents. This stunning property sits on a large plot and internall..."
"A SPACIOUS and beautifully presented FOUR BEDROOM semi-detached family home situated on a POPULAR ROAD close to excellent amenities, good local schools, and a short drive to the vibrant city centre."
"A spacious four bedroom, two bathroom link detached family home with conservatory, driveway and double tandem garage situated in quiet cul-de-sac location in the highly sought after area of Marshalswick in St Albans. Close by to local amenities and OUTSTANDING SCHOOLS."
Beautifully presented inside and out this substantial four bedroom extended detached family home is situated in one of Bricket Wood's premier roads. The home starts with a light filled entrance hallway giving access to multiple rooms. To the front of the property there is a generous size...
"A completely re-modelled and refurbished four bedroom end of terrace house tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac with excellent access to the city centre and the local schooling, the property is presented over three floors and makes an ideal family home. This thoughtfully extended house be..."
We are delighted to offer for sale this very well proportioned family home offering well balanced accommodation over three floors.
An appealing four bedroom detached family house situated in a quiet cul de sac forming part of St Michaels Village. The property requires a degree of modernisation but offers potential for re-modelling and extension (subject to relevant planning) and is conveniently offered with no onward chain. ...
"Located close to the mainline station with regular trains into London St Pancras, is this bay fronted SEMI-DETACHED house providing accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS. On the ground floor there is a welcoming entrance hall and THREE RECEPTION ROOMS and a separate kitchen. On the..."
"A classic 1930's detached three bedroom period home situated in a row of similar homes, in a little known no-through road which is a mere stroll from the top of the City High Street. Needing updating and with further extension potential (stp), this is a perfect long term family home. Complemented..."
"***NO UPPER CHAIN*** Nestled in a quiet and very sought after cul de sac location in the heart of Bricket Wood, this well presented four bedroom detached home is perfect for the growing family. The property's accommodation begins with an entrance hallway, to the front of the property is..."
At attractive three double bedroom 1930's semi-detached which has been skilfully extended to the side to provide bright and spacious accommodation with replacement period style part-stained glass double glazed windows. There's further potential to extend into the loft to create an additional bedr...
A superb Victorian bay-fronted townhouse over four floors situated in a very centrally located cul-de-sac close to the mainline station. 
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase a detached property with the wonderful advantage of an attached self-contained annex suitable for a mature relative or au-pair. The house is situated in a quiet close in the sought-after area of Chiswell Green, close to local shops, schools and open countryside..."
"This DETACHED family home is set back just off this popular road in CHISWELL GREEN close to excellent amenities, reputable local schools and a short drive to the excellent motorway links including M1 & M25."
"Are you looking for a detached house? Then look no further than this stunning brand new two bedroom detached family home with driveway in St Albans. This quiet close is ideal for a young family, first time buyers and potentially someone downsizing. You also can't get much quicker acc..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a 5-bedroom family home with an annexe attached, ideal for multi-generational living. A welcoming entrance hall grants access into both the main residence and the annexe. The main property benefits from an excellent dual-aspect reception room with a..."
"Situated on this popular road and within a SHORT DISTANCE OF MAINLINE STATION and range of local facilities, this beautifully maintained FOUR BEDROOM home has been extended from its original design to offer SPACIOUS WELL DESIGNED ACCOMODATION. "
"A beautifully presented four bedroom detached family home built by Bovis and situated close to the outstanding Sandringham secondary school in Marshalswick. The extended accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living room, contemporary open-plan kitchen/family/dining room ..."
Occupying a generous plot is this extended four bedroom semi detached ‘Nash’ family home ideally situated close to outstanding primary and secondary schools in Marshalswick. The well presented accommodation comprises of an entrance hall and a spacious living / dining room t...
"A truly impressive four bedroom detached home extremely well presented and positioned in the ever so popular Highfield Park development. This property has a mature rear garden and offers excellent scope for an extension if a buyer requires, subject to the necessary planning permissions..."
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN is this spacious THREE BEDROOM DETACHED family home situated on an established road in CHISWELL GREEN.
"LABC 10 Year Guarantee. A brand new high specification three double bedroom detached house with off street parking located on Watford Road enjoying underfloor heating throughout the ground floor. Upon entering the property, you are greeted by a generous porch, through into t..."
"A large house and annexe, ideal for multi-generational living. A rare opportunity to acquire a large five bedroom detached property in a popular location with the considerable benefit of a substantial one bedroom, single storey annexe."
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN is this well presented three bedroom DETACHED HOME situated on one of St albans most sought after roads close to excellent local schools and walking distance to the mainline railway station.
A three double bedroom detached family home in the popular Chiswell Green area to the south side of St Albans. The property provides well proportioned rooms throughout with scope for further extension subject to planning permission should you require. The property also includes three reception ro...
"This beautifully presented and re-modelled detached four bedroom family home, is just one of four other similar properties, nestled in the corner of a peaceful cul de sac with no through traffic. The current owners have extended this original good sized modern home to substantially enhance the or..."
"Located in the quiet village of Sandridge is this beautiful four-bedroom SEMI-DETACHED family home with a large SOUTH FACING garden. The real showpiece of this home is the fantastic kitchen/dining/family room with skylights and bi-fold doors to the south facing garden, perfect for ent..."
"A spacious four bedroom detached chalet bungalow in a beautiful setting on a private road. With flexible accommodation arranged over two floors, this spacious property has off-street parking for several vehicles and a lovely south west facing garden."
Stunning historic Grade II listed semi-detached house in a small hamlet.
"Located in a lovely cul-de-sac location is this four bedroom family home with a generous corner plot, conveniently located for excellent schools and good local amenities within Jersey Farm. The property is in need of some updating and has the potential to enlarge or create open plan living if so ..."
"Located in a highly sought after area, this bright, spacious open-plan home perfectly meets the needs of todays modern family. Generous interior proportions and stylish modern finishes are immediately apparent throughout this three bedroom 1930s semi detached house. To the ground floor are three ..."
"A rarely available four bedroom bay fronted detached family home occupying a generous plot, which is situated on a elevated position within a short walk of the ever popular Wheatfield's primary and Sandringham secondary schools. The thoughtfully extended accommodation comprises of a si..."
"A beautifully presented four bedroom semi-detached family home located within a sought-after residential area and in close proximity to fantastic local schooling, the M1, M25 and A1M and the mainline train station, which allows access into St Pancras in approximately 20 minutes. This e..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN Situated in a cul-de-sac in the heart of Jersey Farm is this fantastic FOUR bedroom DETACHED family home. The property is within walking distance of Jersey Farm Woodland Park and the local OUTSTANDING SCHOOLING. The ground floor comprises of an entrance hall, ..."
Cassidy & Tate are delighted to offer a beautifully presented and spacious four bedroom semi-detached property positioned in a popular and convenient location. Situated close to good local schools to include Garden Fields and St Albans Girls school and near to the excellent amenities of the city ...
"Stunning New Three Bedroom Detached Family Home in St Albans Welcome to this Brand New luxury three bedroom detached family home located in the highly sought after area of Smallford, St Albans. Oaklands Lane is also situated within the catchment for outstanding local schooling. The devel..."
"** POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP) ** Located on a generous sized plot with potential to extend (STPP) is this already extended family home with off road parking and garage. The property internally comprises of a good sized living room, kitchen, dining room, cloakroom, three bedrooms and fa..."
"Located to the south of St Albans city centre and presented with a stylish modern decor throughout, this rarely available four bedroom detached property also offers potential for further extension, subject to the relevant permission. The property comprises of a welcoming entrance hall..."
"This deceptively spacious FOUR BEDROOM home which is over 2100 sq ft enjoys flexible accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS which can be arranged in a variety of different ways to suit buyer’s needs. On the ground floor there is a welcoming entrance hall, spacious living room w..."
"A spacious three bedroom two bathroom semi-detached family home with two reception rooms, conservatory, two utility rooms, large driveway and good sized rear garden situated in the HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER area of Marshalswick in St Albans. Close by to local amenities and OUTSTANDING SCHOOLS."
"A simply stunning three/four bedroom townhouse located within the highly sought-after residential area of Goldsmith Way. The generous accommodation is thoughtfully arranged over three levels, with the ground floor comprising of an entrance hall, shower room, garage, utility room, 4th ..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN A beautifully presented four bedroom SEMI-DETACHED home located to the east side of St Albans in the hamlet of Sleapshyde. The ground floor comprises of a bright entrance porch, living room with open fireplace, kitchen/breakfast room, playroom that could be c..."
"Being sold with no onward chain and occupying a generous plot, is this extended three bedroom semi-detached Nash built family home ideally placed close to highly regarded schooling and local shopping parade. The accommodation comprises of an entrance porch and hall that leads to sizab..."
"A traditional terraced Victorian house with three double bedrooms and a wealth of period features which combine beautifully with modern conveniences. The property is arranged over three floors with lounge, an open plan family room and kitchen/dining area, three bedrooms, a spacious first floor ba..."
"JW&Co Langleys are pleased to offer this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE situated in a sought after location in Chiswell Green close to local amenities, public transport, well regarded local schools and motorway links to include M25 & M1. The accommodation comprises porch, entrance hall, lounge, dini..."
"Beautifully presented, fully refurbished three/four-bedroom Victorian terrace house located in the heart of St Albans providing four floors of accommodation in excess of 1300 sq ft."
"A unexpectedly large two bedroom semi detached period home, which is set on the delightful Riverside Road in St Albans sought after conservation area. The property is perfectly located only a short distance from the mainline station with direct access to London, the vibrant St A..."
An attractive family home in need of some cosmetic modernisation located set in a 1/4 acre plot in a sought-after area close to the city centre
"Occupying a generous plot is this much sought after four-bedroom bay fronted detached family home that has been much improved by the current owners. The well presented accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living room with French doors leading onto the fantastic rear gar..."
"Situated within 1/4 acre this detached family residence offers superb potential to refurbish and extend as required (subject to planning permission). The house offers spacious, well-proportioned accommodation with the benefit of ample off-street parking, garage and extensive rear garden."
"A truly impressive modern build four double bedroom detached home located in the ever so popular Park Street location with the added advantage of a single garage and parking. Upon entering this impressive home, you are greeted by a Storm porch opening into a large entrance hall, large ..."
"Being sold chain free and situated within the highly sought after residential area of King Harry Park and providing excellent access to the city centre, nearby motorway links and the historic open spaces of Verulamium Park, is this modern and attractive three bedroom end of terrace family home."
"JW&Co Langleys are delighted to offer for sale a four bedroom LUXURY SEMI-DETACHED house, which is finished to the highest of standards and situated in a sought-after location in a development of four homes. The accommodation comprises; kitchen/dining room, lounge, cloakroom, utility. T..."
"An exciting opportunity for you to secure a brand new, three bedroom, detached family home, situated in a sought after road with shops, schools and transport all close by. Yet to be constructed by J. Murphy Developments Ltd, reputable builders of quality construction and design, this contemporary..."
A unique opportunity to acquire a mixed-use building occupying an enviable position within St Albans City Centre. The property is currently made up of a commercial premises (Harry’s Take Away) with residential space above laid out as a duplex maisonette. The Cathedral City of St Albans i...
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac is this three bedroom ‘Nash’ built semi-detached house that provides an excellent opportunity for the buyer to extend and create a large family home close to Sandringham school, subject to planning. The current accommodation comprises an entra..."
"A beautifully presented four double bedroom detached family home, located within a popular residential area and just a short walk to How Wood station. This spacious house benefits from an entrance hall, separate lounge, snug, w/c, open plan kitchen/diner and a utility room on the groun..."
This unique and charming three/four bedroom period residence is situated in the very heart of the city centre which is bathed in history and surrounded by Roman remains. The property spans over three floors offering well-presented and versatile living spaces where a contemporary atmosphere is ble...
"A stylish four bedroom home situated in the popular Garden Fields Conservation Area. Thoughtfully extended, this property is close to the city centre and well-regarded schools, as well as being within walking distance of the mainline station."
A traditional three bedroom Victorian semi-detached house in a sought after road in the popular Fleetville area of the City. The house offers a wonderful opportunity to update to your own taste and style with fantastic extension potential to the rear and into the loft to create a fourth bedroom (...
"Situated in a sought after road is this two double bedroom, detached bungalow positioned close to local shops and amenities. An opportunity to acquire a property such as this is a rarity. The home is in need of modernization and with obtaining the relevant consents there is potential to extend (s..."
"The contemporary, sunny open plan kitchen/diner is a real show piece of this spacious family home. There are bi-fold doors opening onto a generously proportioned south east facing rear deck which steps down to a large family sized garden. On the ground floor there is also a cosy livin..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom Victorian house arranged over three floors with a delightful south-west facing rear garden in the heart of Bernards Heath, close to the City centre, mainline train station and Heath. The stunning accommodation begins via a front door with bespoke sta..."
*** Chain Free *** 1 Bedroom cluster house with off street parking and front garden. The ground floor contains; living room and semi-open plan kitchen The first floor contains; double bedroom and family bathroom The property also has an allocated off street parking space and front garden. Due...
A beautifully presented three bedroom detached period home with a clever juxtaposition of contemporary and period features in this highly popular road on the Eastern side of the city. With much retained character and extended to the rear with a crisp kitchen and a delicious vaulted breakfast area...
"This EXQUISITE CHAIN FREE DETACHED home, boasting four double bedrooms and a fantastic garden, is ideally situated for a range of school and transport facilities in Chiswell Green."
"An extended four bedroom detached family home being sold with no upper chain, situated in a highly regarded residential development. The property has been extended on the ground floor to provide a stylish modern Kitchen/Breakfast room filled with light from the skylight, windows and F..."
"A modern four double bedroom detached property with detached double garage to the rear, situated within the exclusive Napsbury Park development. The property benefits from well-proportioned accommodation comprising an entrance hall, cloakroom, dual aspect sitting room, study/playroom and a stylis..."
"A vastly extended and improved three/four bedroom semi-detached family home, which is set on the outskirts of St Albans with views over the surrounding countryside. The beautifully presented accommodation comprises an entrance hall, living room, open-plan kitchen/family/dining room wit..."
An attractively presented four bedroom detached house located in a favourable position in a sought after close in the Jersey Farm area of St Albans. The accommodation begins with a covered porch leading into a welcoming entrance hall with a convenient cloakroom/w.c. and doors to rooms. T...
"A characterful three bedroom bay fronted semi detached property with scope for further extension subject to the usual planning consents. Harlesden Road is located in the heart of Fleetville, within walking distance of the mainline train station, well regarded local schooling and the picturesque o..."
Situated on this POPULAR RESIDENTIAL ROAD is this lovely DETACHED family home that has been within the family for several generations and is now being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"Set in a popular and convenient location, this substantial four bedroom detached family home is ideal for the growing family. The property starts with a spacious and welcoming entrance hallway with doors leading to all rooms. A large family sitting room is on offer which is ideal for en..."
"A splendid recently modernised THREE BEDROOM mid-terraced home which has accommodation arranged over THREE FLOORS and benefits from a wonderful mature southeast facing rear garden and OFF STREET PARKING. On the ground floor there is a welcoming entrance hall, bay fronted living room, s..."
"A modern four-bedroom semi-detached family home, built by Taylor Wimpey on the highly sought after Oaklands Grange development. The contemporary accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living/dining room with French doors to the rear garden and fitted kitchen with integrat..."
"Located in the sought after Oaklands Grange development is this beautifully presented four-bedroom SEMI-DETACHED home. The ground floor comprises of a welcoming entrance hall, modern kitchen, cloakroom and a living/dining room with French doors out to the rear garden. On the first floo..."
"A beautifully appointed four bedroom, two bathroom semi-detached cottage with far reaching views over neighbouring fields, extensively landscaped garden and detached garage/office with planning permission to extend and convert into a summer house ideal for additional living space or potential ren..."
"A modern and attractively presented three bedroom semi-detached home located in a quiet position in a close, within a ten minute walk of the mainline train station to St Pancras International. The house benefits from excellent energy efficiency and also offers tremendous potential to carry out a ..."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi-detached home with exciting potential for extension (subject to the usual planning permissions and regulations). Set in a quiet cul-de-sac location, this property has a lovely south facing plot and is conveniently positioned around a mile f..."
"Ref: MS0129 Situated in the pretty village of Colney Heath is this Four Bedroom Detached family home, with scope to extend its current living space of 1,600 Sq Ft (Approx) into the loft and to the side. Even the rear (STPP) . This well presented house is situated on a private r..."
"A generous size five bedroom detached family house situated in this highly desirable residential cul-de-sac enjoying far reaching views. Accommodation is arranged over three floors (1,855 sq. ft) comprising entrance hall with cloakroom, good size living/dining room interconnecting to conservatory..."
"Situated within the highly sought after Bernard’s Heath conservation area, is this beautifully presented, four bedroom character property. The house has been renovated to a high standard throughout and comprises internally on the ground floor of a stylish living room with bay wi..."
Located in a sought after residential city centre location and only a short walk from the mainline station with regular trains into central London is this wonderful bay fronted period property with a well-tended southeast facing private mature garden at the rear. The property enjoys a ...
"JW & Co. Langleys are proud to present this completely refurbished/updated extended four-bedroom semi detached property along The Mall, Park Street. Internally the property comprises; entrance hallway, separate lounge, extended kitchen/dining room, downstairs WC, utility area, four bedrooms and t..."
"Located on one of Bricket Wood's premier roads, this four bedroom extended detached bungalow comes to the market in excellent decorative order and the added benefit for further expansion into the loft space. The property begins with an entrance hallway, a spacious well appointed fitted ..."
A stylishly presented and skilfully extended four bedroom house located in a quiet road in a popular residential area conveniently positioned for sought after local schooling and within easy reach of the City centre and the main line train station. A covered porch and front door lead int...
A stunning TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED Grade 11 listed property situated within a prime and central location in London Colney Village.
"***NO UPPER CHAIN*** Beautifully constructed and expertly finished this outstanding newly built three double bedroom detached chalet bungalow is conveniently located in the heart of Bricket Wood. The property begins with a light filled, inviting entrance hallway. A door leads to a spaci..."
"JW & Co are proud to present a spacious THREE bedroom mid-terraced family house located in a quiet CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION and within easy reach of local shops and schools. The property comprises an OPEN PLAN living-dining room with a separate fitted kitchen, and family bathroom and WC, plu..."
"This four bedroom, three bathroom detached chalet bungalow is well presented throughout and offers deceptively spacious and versatile family accommodation. Ground floor accommodation comprises an entrance hall, lounge/diner with patio doors that open to the garden, a modern refitted kitchen, thre..."
Situated in a sought after road within a quiet turning in the heart of the Conservation Area. This excellent character house has been extended and improved over recent years.
"A FANTASTIC MODERN FOUR BEDROOM HOME, situated on a popular residential close a short distance from a range of facilities."
"An attractive bay-fronted Victorian semi detached three bedroom property located in the popular Bernards Heath area of St Albans. This beautifully presented home retains many traditional features throughout and comprises a lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility room, downstairs wc and a first flo..."
"Set at the end of a cul de sac, behind trees, screened from the main Watling Street to the South of the City centre, this is a three bedroom semi detached period home requiring complete modernisation. Located just half a mile walk from the King Harry Public House, at the top of St Stephens Hill a..."
"A charming three bedroom character property located in the conservation area in St Albans. This location provides excellent access to the vibrant city centre, mainline train station and highly regarded local schooling. This property has been thoughtfully extended and modernised over ti..."
CHAIN FREE five bedroom DETACHED home with SAUNA in SOUGHT after VILLAGE location.
"*** Chain Free Sale *** Set in the heart of Bricket Wood, a spacious 3 double bedroom detached chalet bungalow set on a corner plot with large double length garage and extensive gardens. The ground floor contains; very large double reception / dining room, shower room, kitchen, 3rd double bedro..."
"Connells are delighted to offer this this attractive 3 bedroom semi detached home in Chiswell Green, St Albans. This property has been extended and is positioned perfectly for families looking for good schools and a short distance to main motorways and St Albans town centre."
"**RARE OPPORTUNITY**EXTENDED**DOUBLE STOREY ANNEX** A three bedroom semi detached property which has been extended to the side and to rear which was created a double storey annex. A unique property on a sizeable plot, potential to be reconfigured to create a large family home or to have keep two..."
"JW&Co. are pleased to offer this unique Two/Three bedroom detached home, located in a sought after location of Bricket Wood just a short drive from St Albans City Centre and excellent motorway links. The property comprises entrance hallway, kitchen, a lounge and dining rooms, conservato..."
"Situated on a sought after and convenient road in the heart of Bricket Wood, this three bedroom detached chalet bungalow located on a corner plot is the perfect family home home with the opportunity for further expansion. The property begins with an spacious welcoming entrance hallway, ..."
An attractive family property located half a mile from St Albans Thameslink Station and with access to all of the towns facilities.
"Situated in a sought after location within Park Street St Albans, this four bedroom detached family home offers perfect living accommodation. The property begins with a welcoming entrance hallway giving access to multiple rooms. There is a generous sized sitting room overlooking the fron..."
"Located in an enviable position in this gated cul-de-sac on the popular Napsbury Park development this well presented three bedroom town house offers flexible accommodation over three floors. Shops, amenities and open countryside are nearby and the property offers excellent access to the motorwa..."
"A fantastic, spacious FIVE BEDROOM linked DETACHED family home with desirable HOME OFFICE, stunning and mature rear garden, GARAGE and off-road PARKING located in Colney Heath village."
"***NO UPPER CHAIN*** Positioned on one of the area's leading roads, this four bedroom detached bungalow with potential for further expansion is a blank canvas for a buyer to create their dream home. The property begins with an entrance hallway, located to the front of the home is a spaci..."
A modern and stylish three bedroom semi-detached family home with driveway parking located in the popular area of Chiswell Green.
"JW&Co Langleys are delighted to offer for sale a BRAND NEW LUXURY DETATCHED home, situated in a sought-after location in Park Street, St. Albans. The property comprises entrance hallway, large separate lounge, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining room, UTILITY ROOM, downstairs WC, three double bedrooms and o..."
"An attractively presented four bedroom semi-detached house located in a quiet close in the popular village of Bricket Wood. The accommodation begins in a welcoming entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, useful storage below and doors to rooms. The generous 23ft lounge has a bow wi..."
OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO UPPER CHAIN Presented in excellent condition throughout is this attractively decorated THREE BEDROOM period property forming part of a peaceful established centrally located residential street. The property provides well planned accommodation arranged over THRE...
"A modern and well presented detached three bedroom, two bathroom home with a beautiful, easy upkeep south facing garden. Set close to vibrant Fleetville, outstanding schools and walking distance from the mainline station."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom extended family home located on the ever-popular Oaklands Grange development. This property benefits from an entrance hall, sizable lounge, the inner hall leads to a useful utility room and cloakroom. An impressive kitchen /dining room with bi fol..."
"This stylish, three double bedroom Victorian terraced house carefully blends character features with modern touches to create a wonderful home. This property further benefits from granted planning permission for a ground floor side return kitchen extension. Further details can be fo..."
"JW&Co. are pleased to offer this unique Two/Three bedroom detached home, located in a sought after location of Park Street just a short drive from St Albans City Centre and excellent motorway links. The property comprises porch, entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen/breakfast room, large..."
"Beautifully presented inside and out, this extended four bedroom semi detached family residence is positioned in one of the areas leading roads in the heart of Bricket Wood. The property starts with an entrance hallway with doors leading to all rooms, there is a larger than average loun..."
An extended and beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home positioned within the ever popular New Greens area of St Albans which is within easy access to the City centre and excellent schooling.
A beautifully presented three bedroom end of terrace house situated in the heart of the conservation area. Normandy Road is a sought after address on the North-West fringes of the City centre. There are many well-regarded primary and nursery schools nearby and the mainline railway station is also...
"This end-of-terrace house provides a rare renovation opportunity in a highly convenient, central St. Albans location"
"A superb opportunity to purchase a three bedroom detached bungalow with double garage on a substantial corner wrap around plot. Offered for sale chain free the property also provides off street parking and huge scope for extension subject to planning should it be required. Located in a popular, q..."
A SPACIOUS and well presented DETACHED family home located in this QUIET CLOSE in the centre of Bricket Wood village being well served by its local amenities and popular schools.
"Back on the market! A four-bedroom, detached, family home. Situated in the sought-after village of Bricket Wood. With good quality local schools for all ages, including Mount Pleasant Lane, Park Street JMI, How Wood and Parmiters. The commuter is well served with great access to ..."
"An extended and attractive three bedroom semi-detached house located in a popular residential close in Marshalswick, close to highly sought after senior and primary schools. The property is neutrally decorated and benefits from a wonderful rear garden with a spacious garden room/home office and a..."
Located in a popular family friendly area is this THREE BEDROOM end of terrace house which enjoys a mature corner plot offering SCOPE FOR EXTENSION and a LOFT CONVERSION or POTENTIAL REDEVELOPMENT subject to the necessary planning consents. There have been a number of similar homes in ...
"A recently refurbished and extended four-bedroom link-detached family home situated in the popular Jersey Farm residential area. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living/dining room, brand new kitchen with fitted appliances, utility room, three bedrooms and a bat..."
"Positioned on a substantial plot this four bedroom detached family home has charm and a spacious floorplan, situated on the very popular Park Street Lane this home comes to the market with the added benefit of no upper chain. Upon entrance there is a welcoming hallway, to the right ther..."
"A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH OWN DRIVE AND GARAGE located in the village of Colney Heath where a number of local amenities can be found. These include a local shop incorporating a post office, public house and the Colney Heath JMI school."
Located in the heart of Bernards Heath is this attractive BAY FRONTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED character home. The property enjoys stylish well planned accommodation arranged over two floors and the current owners have made a significant improvements to the property to create a com...
"Ideally positioned within a highly popular residential area just 0.4 miles from the mainline train station, is this well presented, modern three bedroom end of terrace family home. The property offers generous living accommodation and comprises an entrance hall, downstairs W/C, sizeabl..."
"An incredibly well presented and unique four bedroom detached property located in the cul de sac of Tovey Close, London Colney. The property has been well maintained and updated by the current owners and is substantially larger than similar properties nearby as the property boasts a double storey..."
"CONNELLS are delighted to offer this three/four bedroom property in the sought after area of St Albans. The property comprises three/four bedrooms, two reception rooms and downstairs shower facilities. Viewings are highly recommended."
A TALE OF TWO HOMES
"In the same ownership since 1952 is this delightful semi-detached home which could benefit from a degree of modernisation and offers superb potential to extend if required (subject to obtaining relevant planning permission). The house benefits from an extensive garden, parking and detached garage."
"Built on an enviable plot this three bedroom detached bungalow has the potential for further expansion to the side and rear of the property. The Uplands is a very desirable and quiet location. The property begins with a welcoming entrance hallway, the fully functional kitchen diner is l..."
"Conveniently offered with no onward chain, this extended 4 bedroom semi-detached family home requires some modernisation but offers approximately 1500 sq ft of flexible living accommodation throughout and provides excellent access to the vibrant city centre and mainline train station with direct ..."
"Maryland Place is a two double bedroom, top floor apartment, forming part of a luxury development built by Beechcroft Homes and is exclusively for the over 55's. The private development enjoys a peaceful setting located just off Townsend Drive, surrounded by stunning communal gardens. St Albans C..."
"An exquisite, five bedroom detached property which has been expertly renovated by the current owners. There is a large driveway to the front, south-facing rear garden and separate annex."
"Nestled at the end of an exclusive cul-de-sac this brand new 3 bedroom semi-detached property is presented over three floors offering over 1100 sq ft of living space and also benefit from 2 off road parking spaces. The properties comprise of an entrance hall with cloakroom, open plan..."
A spacious semi-detached property in a popular and convenient location. This well planned four bedroom home offers potential for extension subject to the usual consents and has the considerable advantage of off street parking.
"*** Chain Free *** Charming 4 bed semi-detached house set in the heart of Bricket Wood, opposite Woodbury Field, on a large south-west facing plot of land with garage to side and lots of potential (STPP). The ground floor contains; Entrance Hall, W/C, Living room with bay window and feature fire..."
"Situated within the heart of Fleetville and within walking distance of nearby schooling and the mainline train station, is this attractive three bedroom character property which was completely refurbished in 2020. The property comprises internally on the ground floor of an entrance ha..."
A SPACIOUS and BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED CHAIN FREE THREE/FOUR BEDROOM 1930’s SEMI-DETACHED family home situated on a popular road close to excellent local schools and walking distance to the vibrant city centre and mainline railway station.
A charming Victorian three bedroom semi-detached family home with two reception rooms and an enclosed rear garden in the POPULAR FLEETVILLE AREA of St Albans close by to HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLS and within easy reach of St Albans City Centre and the mainline railway station into London St Pancras.
"This three bedroom home located in the ever popular Bernards Heath area of St Albans providing excellent access to the city centre and the outstanding local schooling. This home is well presented with the added benefit of a first floor bathroom and a lounge/diner on the ground floor.
"
"Semi detached house and annexe - A rare and exciting opportunity to acquire a three bedroom home with a self-contained separate annexe to the rear. With off-street parking to the front, this unusual property is offered to the market with the benefit of no upper chain."
"A bright, extended three bed bedroom home with off street parking and a garage. Set in a quiet location, this property is just over a mile from St Albans mainline station."
"This a pretty detached two bedroom bungalow that is now needing modernisation or has potential for further development , subject to planning. Situated on a good size plot with a very pretty garden, in a highly convenient location. Watford Road is positioned in the sought after Chiswell Green area..."
1st Choice Properties are pleased to offer for sale this 2-bedroom detached bungalow which is situated overlooking The Netherway Open space. This property has scope for redevelopment or Conversion subject to the necessary planning permission being obtained. The current property benefits from gas ...
"LOCATION This affluent cathedral town is the premium office centre in Hertfordshire and businesses are attracted here because of its historic and quality town centre and strong business environment. It is very conveniently located for access to the M1, M25 and A1(M), approximately 22 miles ..."
Located in the property family friendly area of New Greens is this three bedroom home providing well planned accommodation arranged over two floors. On the ground floor there is a spacious open plan kitchen dining and family room which overlooks the rear garden and a separate living ro...
"A light and generously proportioned two bedroom first floor apartment, which is set in the peaceful over 55's Maryland Place development only a short distance from the historic St Albans City Centre with its wide variety of shopping and transport facilities.
"
"A spacious three bedroom, three reception room extended family home with two bathrooms, driveway and garden in the highly regarded New Greens area of St Albans close by to WELL-REGARDED SCHOOLS and within easy access to the city centre and mainline railway station to London."
"This superb, quiet three bedroom Victorian cottage has been beautifully extended and is tastefully decorated, with a fantastic downstairs space for socialising. Located in the popular Bernards Heath area of St Albans, this house has a sought after infant school at the end of the street..."
"BC-0270 We are pleased to market this bright and spacious beautifully presented three bedroom detached family home. The property is situated in this small private close Bricket Wood, a short walk from the local shops and amenities. Internally the property comprises of a bright entrance hall, s..."
"An impressive period home, in excellent condition throughout, featuring two reception rooms, spacious loft room, two double bedrooms and a low maintenance rear garden with newly installed home office."
This THREE BEDROOM pretty Victorian cottage is arranged over THREE FLOORS and is offered to the market with the added advantage of NO UPPER CHAIN. On the ground floor there is a bright and airy open plan living/dining room leading through to fully fitted kitchen with French doors open...
"A simply stunning two bedroom character property, measuring in excess of 1,000 square feet and ideally located within the ever popular Bernard’s Heath conservation area. The house has been extended to provide a stunning open plan kitchen breakfast room with skylight, allowing a ..."
NO UPPER CHAIN Located in a cul-de-sac in the peaceful and sought after village of Sandridge is this spacious three/four bedroom semi-detached home with the countryside on its doorstep. The property enjoys well planned accommodation arranged over two floors with a versatile ...
"An amazingly spacious six bedroom family home which is set in the highly sought after Jersey Farm area, close to highly sought after schools, a wide variety of shops and beautiful countryside. Well presented throughout |Two reception rooms | Two Bathrooms | Enclosed rear garden 
"
"A superb opportunity to purchase an attractive two bedroom link detached bungalow in a quiet residential cul-de-sac to the Eastern side of St Albans. Requiring some modernisation the property provides huge scope for extension to the front, side and rear subject to planning consent. The property i..."
"A wonderfully spacious four-bedroom terraced family home occupying an enviable position close to the city centre, mainline station, and excellent local schooling. The property is currently let out as a 'House of multiple occupancy' (HMO) with a very generous yield. Ideal for investors and..."
Occupying a generous plot and offering wonderful scope to extend subject to local planning consent is this bay-fronted three bedroom semi-detached family home ideally placed in the ever popular Colney Heath. The property provides beautifully presented living accommodation to include a...
"A lovely 4 bedroom bunaglow located on a sought-after road in Park Street, Mayflower Road. Briefley comprising; porch, welcoming entrance hall, bedroom 2 and 4 (either suitable for a further living room or a study if required), bathroom with both bath and shower, large fully-fitted kit..."
"A superbly extended and recently refurbished four bedroom semi-detached family home situated in one of the villages most sought-after residential roads in Park Street, Hertfordshire. The accommodation comprises, two good size receptions rooms, a kitchen with utility area, guest cloakroom, master ..."
A charming THREE BEDROOM Victorian cottage located in a peaceful side street in the heart of St Albans. The character cottage has been well maintained by the current owner and has a recently installed fitted kitchen with fabulous skylight and integrated appliances. Wooden floorboards a...
Offered for sale with no upper chain is this four bedroom detached house that would be perfect for someone looking to create a good size family home ideally situated in a private slip road of only four houses. Although requiring some modernisation the property has modern Everest window...
"A particularly spacious and superbly extended FIVE bedroom semi-detached family house, boasting a good size lounge/dining, separate sitting room, study, cloak/shower room and a large kitchen/breakfast room. potential to extend further to the rear (stpp), the property is ideally located just a sh..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial four bedroom detached house situated in the delightful town of Hertfordshire. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering three reception rooms and two bathrooms, the property benefits from having gas cen..."
"A beautifully presented three-bedroom top floor apartment situated in this exclusive gated development and forming part of this stunning Grade II listed conversion of just eight apartments. The accommodation comprises a large entrance hall, living/dining room with lovely views to the f..."
"An extended character style, three bedroom property located in the heart of the City Centre."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this three bedroom semi-detached family home with excellent potential to extend to the side, rear and into the loft subject to planning permission and the house is offered with no onward chain."
"An attractive three double bedroom period property situated within the Fleetville area of St Albans close to highly regarded schooling and within walking distance of the mainline railway station. This property benefits from an entrance hall, separate lounge with bay window, dining room..."
"Presented in beautiful condition is this spacious four bedroom Victorian family home, ideally placed just moments away from the local shopping parade and highly regarded schools. The extended accommodation is bright and neutrally decorated throughout and comprises an entrance hall, ba..."
"LABC 10 Year Guarantee. A brand new detached two bedroom bungalow which was built by local reputable builders to a high specification benefitting from underfloor heating throughout, parking and a private garden. Watford Road is located on the south side of St Albans close to..."
"An opportunity to acquire a property such as this is a rarity, especially one that has a lot of potential for you to create a home that will suit your needs and requirements. With the relevant planning consents there is scope to enlarge and improve the property. Positioned in a prime location is ..."
"Situated within the popular village of Park Street and providing easy access to St Albans, nearby motorway links and the Abbey Flyer station, is this well-presented and generously sized three bedroom detached bungalow. The property comprises of a sizeable entrance hall and porch, larg..."
Steven Oates are delighted to offer for sale this Extended 1930 Semi Detached house situated in a sought-after road close to open countryside and within easy reach of the Village centre. The property has great potential to extend further STPP and stands on a good-sized plot with ample parking for...
"A ready to go development opportunity for a large family home in a much sought after area. The property benefits from approved planning permission with full building regulations in place for a four bedroom, three bathroom family home without compromising rear garden space. Ready to commence ..."
Situated on a generous southerly facing plot is this THREE BEDROOM semi detached family home located on a POPULAR LANE close to excellent amenities and the vibrant city centre.
"This beautiful property boasts many advantages including, large garden with potential to extend (stpp). Large driveway providing off road parking for multiple cars. This property also benefits from having two reception rooms one of which is currently being used as a fourth bedroom. Viewings Advised!"
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN is this well presented TWO BEDROOM terraced property situated within a popular location close to the vibrant city centre and reputable local schools.
A very well presented and spacious three bedroom property situated in a popular location within 1 mile of the main Thameslink Station and walking distance to St Albans town centre.
One of just four brand new two bedroom town houses in this convenient gated courtyard style development within a mile of the City station with excellent local amenities immediately at hand including Ofsted rated outstanding schooling. The property has accommodation thoughtfully arranged over thre...
"This CHAIN FREE, three bedroom, semi-detached property with garage is located in the sought after area of Park Street and within a short drive from St. Albans City Centre."
"JW&Co Langleys are pleased to offer this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated along Spooners Drive, in the sought after location of Park Street. Within easy reach of local amenities and public transport which includes How Wood Station and great motorway links to include M25 & M1. The accom..."
A beautifully presented TWO BEDROOM modern terraced property situated on a popular road within the popular HIGHFIELD PARK area of St Albans.
"Situated close to Sandringham secondary school and occupying a generous plot is this three-bedroom semi-detached family home that has been extended to provide spacious family living space. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, living room, family bathroom and a sizable kitchen ..."
"A modern and beautifully presented three-bedroom terraced family home, located within a popular residential area which is ideally positioned nearby to the city centre, sought-after schooling, Batchwood golf and leisure centre and also allows easy access to the mainline train station. T..."
"""THE FUTURE IS BRIGHT"""
"Cassidy & Tate are pleased to present this attractive two bedroom, two reception room end of terrace property, located in the heart of the conservation area with the rare advantage of off road parking. This pretty cottage has a contemporary feel as you step inside with accommodation arranged on t..."
This well presented and thoughtfully extended three bedroom property provides spacious living accommodation throughout and is located in the ever popular New Greens area of St Albans. The local amenities and schooling are close by and the vibrant city centre and motorway networks are just a shor...
This charming TWO BEDROOM VICTORIAN COTTAGE is situated in a sought after CENTRAL LOCATION between the city centre and St Albans City station. It comes with the added advantage of OFF STREET PARKING and enclosed private SOUTH FACING GARDEN. 
"Located on the south side of the City, is this impressively sized three/four bedroom family home that has been extended to provide spacious and flexible living accommodation, located within a popular residential area and that sits upon a corner plot with driveway parking for multiple cars."
An attractive three bedroom Jarvis built end terrace house in a quiet cul-de-sac location to the eastern side of St Albans within easy reach of Ofsted rated outstanding Oakwood Primary and Beaumont secondary schools. The property has been well maintained by the current owners and offers scope for...
GREAT INVESTMENT - 6 BED HMO - ABBOTS PARK High rental yield - All information available. Book your appointment for a viewing now!
"An incredibly well presented extended three bedroom semi detached property located along Alexander Road, London Colney. Well maintained and updated by the current owners, the property boasts a single storey extension to the rear, with further extension potential (S.T.P.P). Internally the property..."
"An attractive Victorian style three double bedroom end of terrace house built circa 2017 with the benefit of a garage, off street car parking and an electric car charging point. Located in a popular residential area to the east of the City centre with excellent local schooling and a 15 minute wal..."
"Located in a peaceful residential CUL-DE-SAC and close to well-regarded schooling is this THREE BEDROOM semi-detached house with PLANNING APPROVED for a substantial extension to the side, rear and into the loft, for those buyers that require additional space. The property enjoys a spac..."
"A wonderful family home which is set in a delightful cul de sac location close to highly sought after schooling and close to the motorway networks | Modern kitchen breakfast room | Living & dining room | Conservatory | Attractive bathroom | Stunning rear garden | Off street parking
"
"Impressive views with incredible light 270 degree aspect apartment. If you enjoy light, high-quality living in an enviously located stylish building, and want to be in the centre of the most exclusive city in Hertfordshire then this the apartment for you"
This CHAIN FREE semi-detached three bedroom chalet style bungalow with driveway parking is situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac within close distance to St Albans City centre.
"A fantastic three bedroom LINK-DETACHED house located in the heart of Jersey Farm close to the local outstanding schooling. This property benefits from entrance hallway, a large dual aspect lounge, kitchen/diner and cloakroom on the ground floor. On the first floor there are three good size bedro..."
"This beautifully presented, CHAIN FREE, modern, three bedroom property is situated on a sought after road in Bricket Wood."
"Offered for sale with the added advantage of NO UPPER CHAIN is this spacious three double bedroom bay fronted home providing well planned accommodation arranged over three floors. On the ground floor there is a welcoming entrance hall, bay fronted living room and a separate dining room..."
"JW&Co are offering this four bedroom mid terrace property situated in a quiet residential location in Park Street, St Albans. This property offers three double bedrooms, one single and a family bathroom on the first floor and en-suite to the main bedroom on the second floor. Downstairs offers a L..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom end of terrace house that has benefited from a double storey extension and has been modernised throughout. This property comprises of an entrance hall, separate lounge, open plan kitchen/dining room with patio door leading to the garden. Upstairs ..."
A spacious and attractively presented three bedroom semi-detached house in a popular residential close over-looking a green to the east of St Albans City centre close to popular local schools. The house offers excellent potential to extend to the front rear and into the loft The propert...
"A surprisingly spacious two double bedroom (formally Three) semi-detached bungalow occupying a generous plot in need of some general modernisation and offering tremendous potential to extend and build into the loft (stpp), the accommodation comprises of a living room over looking the garden, larg..."
"Situated in one of Bricket Wood's most sought after roads, this three bedroom extended semi detached family home has potential for expansion and further upgrading. The property begins with an entrance hallway, this leads into a well presented cosy front lounge perfect for relaxing. A do..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN A 1930's THREE BEDROOM, TWO RECEPTION ROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE, located on a bold West facing plot and offers potential for extension to the rear, side and loft space, subject to obtaining local authority planning consent. The semi-rural village of Colney Hea..."
"An impressive ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT, situated in a stunning setting surrounded by four acres of private wooded parkland and lawns, in Napsbury Park."
"Set in the 'HEART' of Colney Heath, this DETACHED property is in need of TOTAL REFURBISHMENT but has HUGE scope to extend (STPP). Offered CHAIN FREE and ideally located within easy access of all local motorway links."
"With the interior design transformed by an architect, this stunning duplex apartment also has its own balcony and private patio right in the heart of this sought-after Cathedral city.The property enjoys an elevated position above the bustle of the City centre."
A CHAIN FREE three/four bedroom semi-detached house which offers scope to improve & extend with planning permission already granted located in the Sandridge area of St Albans close by to local amenities and OUTSTANDING SCHOOLS.
"Cassidy & Tate are pleased to present this charming two bedroom mid-terrace Victorian cottage, positioned in a prime conservation area, surrounded by St. Alban's Roman Heritage. The property is arranged on two levels offering flexible and functional accommodation to include a living room, dining ..."
"A traditional style three-bedroom semi-detached family home, which is situated within a short walk of the ever popular Wheatfields primary and Sandringham secondary schools. ***PLANNING TO EXTEND GRANTED*** The current ground floor accommodation comprises an entrance hall,..."
"Situated in a sought after and popular location, this three bedroom semi detached family home offers the opportunity for further expansion and with a cosmetic update this will unlock it's full potential. The property starts with a spacious entrance hallway. There is a large through loung..."
"An extended family home which is set in a quiet cul de sac location in the sought after Jersey Farm area of St Albans. Highly regarded local schools | Close to a wide variety of shops, eateries and beautiful countryside | Cul de sac | Completed upper chain  
"
"**NO UPPER CHAIN** Situated on Dell Rise a sought after location within Park Street, this two bedroom semi detached bungalow is a perfect opportunity for downsizers. The property starts with an entrance hallway and has doors leading to all rooms. To the front of the home, there are two g..."
"An attractive two bedroom Victorian cottage in a quiet road nestled in the heart of the Old Conservation area with a stylish kitchen extension and bi-folding doors opening onto a south facing garden. This bright, elegant property is accessed via a part- glazed front door opening into an..."
"An immaculately presented terraced 4-bedroom property located in the highly desirable locality of Park Street. With a sleek interior and stylish décor, this property is conveniently located within close proximity to the excellent local amenities, surrounding motorway network and close to train li..."
"LITTLE GEM! This gem of a house is waiting to be discovered and polished to perfection. A three bedroom semi detached house in the ever popular village of Bricket Wood. Located in catchment areas to well regarded schools, and in close proximity to both M1 and M25 the location is ideal. Downst..."
"A beautifully presented three double bedroom home with off-street parking and a garage, situated in a popular location, providing easy access to St. Albans city centre and highly regarded local schools. Offered to the market with a complete onward chain."
"A thoughtfully extended and beautifully presented four bedroom family home measuring approximately 1300 sq ft, ideally located within the highly popular Village of Park Street. The property comprises internally on the ground floor on an entrance porch/boot room, large living room with ..."
"SUPERBLY PRESENTED retirement apartment benefitting from a spacious living room with a PATIO AREA. Modern kitchen with BUILT-IN APPLIANCES. TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, CONTEMPORARY WET ROOM and GUEST CLOAKROOM. The apartment comes with an ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. The development offers EXCELLENT COMMUNA..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN ... This spacious 2 bedroom bungalow is located in Bricket Wood and comes with a garage and potential to extend
"
"SUPERBLY PRESENTED, second floor apartment benefitting from a spacious living room. Modern kitchen with BUILT IN APPLIANCES, Two double bedrooms with BUILT-IN WARDROBES, CONTEMPORARY wet room and GUEST CLOAKROOM. The development offers EXCELLENT COMMUNAL AREAS, restaurant and landscaped gardens."
"Situated in sought after and desirable location, this modern three bedroom end of terraced home positioned on a private development is the perfect property for the growing family. The property begins on the ground floor with a welcoming entrance hallway. The modern fitted kitchen comes w..."
"A very spacious two bedroom cottage which tapers out to the rear where the property is wider, along with having two double bedroom and a large kitchen / diner. Entering this lovely character cottage you are greeted by a large open plan living area with door through into the kitchen / d..."
"A four bedroom detached family home situated on a good sized plot in a popular road in the St Albans village of Colney Heath. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, living room, kitchen/dining room, conservatory, family room, four bedrooms with an en-suite shower room to the pri..."
"Situated in a position set back from the road in the ever popular Chiswell Green, beautifully presented three DOUBLE bedroom semi-detached family home offering further potential to extend. The property comprises internally of an entrance hall, modern downstairs cloakroom, under stairs storage, a..."
ATTENTION INVESTORS!! A wonderful opportunity to buy this two bedroom cottage in a highly popular central St. Albans location. This property has the potential to be renovated and extended to create a much larger home (stpp).
Situated within a highly sought after cul-de-sac in the heart of the city centre is this attractive two bedroom character cottage. The property is beautifully presented internally and comprises a large open plan living/dining area complete with working feature fireplace and sash window...
A beautiful three/four bedroom family home located in St. Albans with driveway for up to three cars.
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase a detached bungalow sitting on a generous plot with superb scope to re-develop and build an impressive detached home, or a pair of houses (subject to planning permission). A similar plot next door has just been granted permission for two semi-detached..."
"A chain free, great size, semi detached home with potential to extend subject to panning permission. The property is set in the popular village of Sleapshyde, offering great access to the road networks including the the A1M and the M25. There are beautiful countryside walks jus aroun..."
"A charming, and rather unique, Victorian terraced family home set in the heart of London Colney offering a bright modern interior whilst retaining many of the original features & character such as original cast iron fireplaces. The property has been greatly improved by the current owner and brie..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN This two bedroom semi-detached BUNGALOW is located in a popular residential area and has been well maintained. The accommodation is arranged over one floor, enjoys a spacious living room, modern kitchen, two double bedrooms, a bathroom and a pleasant CONSERVAT..."
"More for your money! Extended, larger than normal mid terraced house in the sought after area of London Colney. The property has four bedrooms a large enclosed private garden. Lounger/diner and kitchen/breakfast area."
"Ref: MS0129 Create your dream home from this semi detached bungalow situated in the prime location of Bricket Wood. Being only a few hundred yards from local shops and good schools and only a minutes drive for both the M25 & M1, this bungalow is ready with planning permission alrea..."
"An extremely spacious two bedroom ground floor luxury apartment of almost 1000sq ft, positioned within a highly sought after gated development, with stunning communal gardens and allocated parking."
"Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this rarely available Penthouse Apartment with INDOOR SWIMMING POOL! Located on one of St Albans most prestigious roads is this spacious three bedroom penthouse apartment formerly a beautiful detached residence.The heated indoor pool, with changing area, toilet..."
Verona Court is a dual aspect penthouse apartment offering light-filled single storey accomodation throughout.
This three bedroom character property with open-plan living is arranged over three floors and situated in the popular village of Park Street.
"This split-level two-bedroom apartment is set in a highly desirable position in the centre of St. Albans, just moments from the shops, restaurants and local amenities."
"Located in the 'HEART' of London Colney Village, within very easy walking distance of local amenities and Village Green. Extending OVER 1450 SQ FT,this FOUR bedroom home offers very generous accommodation on three floors. Offered CHAIN FREE !!"
"Available chain free is this luxurious two double bedroom, first floor apartment providing beautifully presented accommodation combined with a most convenient location. Set behind electronic gates in a prestigious development the apartment boasts large and inviting living spaces melded with a tas..."
"A delightful and charming two bedroom character style property presented in excellent decorative order, located east of the City Centre offers residents parking."
"Occupying an enviable plot within one of Colney Heath's most sought-after roads the property is a spacious three-bedroom semi-detached family home with potential to extend, subject to obtaining the necessary planning permissions.  Colney Heath is a charming village with glori..."
"A delightful and larger than average two bedroom period cottage, ideally located only a short distance to St Albans Station, City Centre and the beautiful Clarence park. | Open living dining room | Gally kitchen | Two well proportioned bedrooms | Attractive bathroom | Enclosed garden
"
"An extended three bedroom end terrace family home with further potential for expansion available on Alexander Road, London Colney. The property is situated within easy reach of well-regarded local schools, amenities and public transport. The accommodation comprises of entrance hall, dining area, ..."
"A stunning CHAIN FREE, two bedroom character property located within close walking distance of St Albans City Station."
"A well-presented three bedroom two bathroom family home with loft room, conservatory, driveway and rear garden located on the south side of St Albans providing excellent access to the motorway links, local amenities and well regarded local schools. In a GREAT LOCATION and offered CHAIN FREE."
A charming and characterful two bedroom cottage positioned within the heart of St Albans conversation area just a short walk to the City centre and mainline railway station.
A two double bedroom penthouse apartment with a balcony providing panoramic views over 8 acres of communal grounds of this exclusive and stylish development on the outskirts of St Albans City. Offered with the benefit of no upper chain. The property is accessed via a security controlled ...
"NO UPPER CHAIN Located in a quiet cul-de-sac in Colney Heath is this lovely three bedroom END OF TERRACE home with a beautiful rear garden. The ground floor comprises of an entrance porch, cloakroom, living room, dining room and kitchen. Upstairs are three well-proportioned ..."
"Experience modern living at its finest with this stunning two double bedroom end-of-terrace home in the highly sought-after location of Highfield Park. Surrounded by beautiful green space and woodlands, the property benefits from its close proximity to outstanding local schools and nurser..."
"This spacious ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM, well presented, top floor apartment with underground allocated parking is conveniently located close to the M1 and M25 in the popular village of Bricket Wood."
"Located in the desirable area of Colney Heath, situated in a quiet cul-de-sac is this lovely three bedroom family home offers driveway parking, garage and a well maintained private rear garden and is offered for sale with no onward chain."
"Do you want a nice quiet location with beautiful views over the park and excellent transport links? Look no further than this spacious three double bedroom family house with detached garage and huge extension potential (STPP) Located in the popular area of London Colney, Chantry Lane which..."
"This attractive two double bedroom period cottage is offered to the market in excellent condition throughout, this larger than average two bedroom house has been lovingly cared for by the current owners. The property briefly comprises living room, dining room with feature fireplace, k..."
3 Bedroom Detached Family Home with Garden * Popular Colney Heath Location * 4.2miles to St Albans Station * No Upper Chain * 2 Double Bedrooms + 1 Single Bedroom * Upstairs Shower Room * Large Lounge * Family Room * Guest Cloakroom * Good Storage * Driveway Parking * C/Tax Band E * EPC Band D 
"A charming two bedroom period property in the heart of the Abbey conservation area within walking distance of Verulamium Park, Cathedral and conveniently placed for St Albans City Centre and mainline station into London St Pancras. The property begins with a front door giving access to a..."
"A two/three bedroom semi-detached house with lounge, dining room, kitchen, bathroom, en suite, garage and parking situated in the HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA of Marshalswick to the north of St Albans close by to local amenities and WELL-REGARDED SCHOOLS. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
Nestled in a quiet location within the popular residential development of Highfield Park is this mid terrace home which has been totally refurbished to a high standard throughout offering beautifully presented living accommodation. Boasting bright and well planned living spaces including a 18ft l...
Occupying an enviable position within a popular residential street just a short distance from both the city centre and mainline station the property is a spacious three-bedroom family home with a private rear garden and a garage in a nearby block. The property is offered to the market wit...
"Located in one of London Colneys MOST SOUGHT AFTER locations!! This three bedroom semi-detached home has scope and previous plans passed to extend into a larger family home. Offered CHAIN FREE and within walking distance of schools, shops and parks."
"Forming part of the prestigious Birklands Park development, this two bedroom, two bathroom ground floor property with sun terrace offers beautiful views. Birklands Park is exceptionally located on the South East side of the City Centre and is convenient for excellent transport links."
A stylishly presented three bedroom split-level ground floor apartment of circa 1000sq.ft. within an attractive Victorian style building. The property benefits from direct access into the communal courtyard garden and no upper chain. Perfectly located just as short walk from both the mainline tr...
"A STUNNING executive apartment in excellent condition, offered for sale CHAIN FREE, situated within a PRIVATE GATED DEVELOPMENT just 0.8 miles from the mainline railway station and walking distance to the vibrant CITY CENTRE which has a wide variety of independent and nationally represented resta..."
"Extended two/three bedroom, two/three reception room family home backing onto allotments, in the ever popular ""Bernards Heath"" area, within a short walk of the outstanding ""Bernards Heath School"" local shops and bus routes. The town centre, Quadrant and train station, are also just a short driv..."
A TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM VICTORIAN character cottage situated in a wonderful pedestrianised section of this charming St Albans backstreet. The pretty cottage offers a sociable open plan lounge/diner on the ground floor perfect for professional couples or a young family hoping to secure a F...
"Forming part of the prestigious Birklands Park development, this well presented and spacious two bedroom, two bathroom first floor apartment offers beautiful views from the private balcony overlooking well maintained communal grounds."
"Occupying a generous plot and offering scope to extend / development opportunity is this three bedroom semi detached family home set within a quiet cul-de-sac just off the High Street in London Colney. The house comprises internally on the ground floor of an entrance hall, cloakroom, s..."
A bright and spacious two bedroom terraced house located in a quiet close surrounded by parkland and the Sopwell Nunnery. The property is situated within 0.5 miles of St Albans thriving City centre and mainline train station to St Pancras International and close to St Albans Abbey Station and Sai...
"Our superb 2 bedroom apartments at our brand new development Verla are just minutes away from St Albans town centre & St Albans City Station with trains into London in just over 20 minutes! This apartment consists of an open-plan kitchen/living/dining area with terrace/balcony, Mai..."
"Measuring over 1000 square feet, this stunning, bright and impressively sized two double bedroom top floor apartment with access to a beautiful communal garden is conveniently located within the sought after development of Goldsmith Way. The property is accessed via a communal entrance..."
"A CHAIN FREE three bedroom staggered terraced house with lounge/diner and kitchen, cloakroom, garden and garage situated in the Sandridge area to the north of St Albans close by to local amenities and WELL-REGARDED SCHOOLS and within easy reach of St Albans town centre. EXCELLENT LOCATION!"
"Ideally placed is this charming three bedroom family home set within a quiet cul-de-sac location in this popular village, having good commuter links, highly regarded schooling and local amenities including the Colney Fields Shopping Park. The ground floor comprises a entrance hall, use..."
"BUILDING PLOT WITH PLANNING APPROVED. A fantastic DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY for a circa 1400sqft, four-bedroom detached home in a prime residential part of St Albans. This home will be nicely set back from the road and will benefit from a driveway and a large rear garden. Hami..."
"BUILIDNG PLOT WITH PLANNING APPROVED. A fantastic DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY for a circa 1400sqft, four-bedroom detached home in a prime residential part of St Albans. This home will be nicely set back from the road and will benefit from a driveway and a large rear garden. Hami..."
"Being sold with no onward chain, measuring in excess of 1,300 square feet and situated within the popular village of Park Street, is this impressively sized three bedroom townhouse. The accommodation is arranged over three levels and comprises on the ground floor of an entrance hall, ..."
"WINTER WONDERLAND! Upon entering this beautifully refurbished three bedroom house, the stylish interior greets you with a warm, welcome home. Downstairs the rear of the house features an ultra modern kitchen with island workstation and open plan to the bright dining room which looks out through d..."
10 Year New Build Warranty. Enjoy living in this stylish NEW BUILD two bedroom end of terrace home located in a popular residential area on the east side of St Albans. The property provides well planned accommodation arranged over two floors with UNDERFLOOR HEATING throughou...
"A stunning EXECUTIVE apartment in PRISTINE CONDITION, situated within a SMALL DEVELOPMENT just a short walk from the mainline railway station and walking distance to the vibrant CITY CENTRE which has a wide variety of independent and nationally represented restaurants, shops and leisure facilitie..."
Located in the centre of St Albans in this quiet residential street this 2 bedroom mid terraced property requires full refurbishment throughout and is available with no upper chain.
"Positioned close to the heart of the City Centre and sitting comfortably amongst other modern properties, is this delightful two double bedroom semi-detached home that is conveniently situated for ease of access to the St Albans bustling town centre. On the ground floor the property enjoys a spac..."
"A spacious and well-presented THREE BEDROOM family home situated within a popular location In PARK STREET VILLAGE close to excellent amenities, reputable local schools and excellent motorway links."
Investors only * Stunning Central Triplex Maisonette * 2 Double Bedrooms * 2 en-Suite Bathrooms * Share of Freehold * Spacious 100m² Floor Area * 1 On-site Parking * Fully Fitted Designer Kitchen * 15 min Walk to Station * Private Entrance * Guest Cloakroom * No Chain * Council Tax D * EPC ...
"A recently refurbished three bedroom end-terraced house situated in the popular Marshalswick area, close to outstanding schools. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, large open plan living/dining/ kitchen room, three bedrooms and a re-fitted bathroom. Further benefits include..."
"A well presented family home which is set in a pleasant cul de sac location, close to the city centre and popular local schooling. Modern Kitchen | Living/dining room | Three generous bedrooms | Attractive bathroom | Off street parking
"
"**CASH BUYERS ONLY** A beautiful one bedroom apartment forming part of the conversion of a stunning listed building. Located in the heart of the Abbey Conservation Area, this spacious property has the considerable benefit of a private parking space."
"Location is a key factor when considering this spacious two bedroom Art Deco property, converted from a 1920's hat factory, close to the vibrant city centre and the mainline railway station linking St. Albans to London, St Pancras. On the ground floor is a large open plan living room with vaulted..."
"Solo Homes are pleased to offer this brand new 2 bedroom mid-terrace property at the eagerly anticipated, Oaklands Grange development. This particular property is available on a SHARED OWNERSHIP basis, providing buyers with a more affordable solution to their next home purchase. Oaklands Grange..."
"A charming 2 bedroom character cottage with parking for 2 cars in a picturesque semi-rural location surrounded by acres of woodland and countryside but within a short drive of local amenities. Well presented and retaining many period features, living room with feature fireplace, country..."
"A lovely, chain free, family home that is in need of some loving, but with fantastic potential to extend significantly, subject to planning permission. Kitchen/breakfast room | Attractive Garden | Garage and parking
"
" A chain free well sized three bedroom family home, which is ideally situated in the highly sought after Marshalswick area, close to popular local schooling. Well presented | Large living room | Great size kitchen | Three well proportioned bedrooms | A must view
"
"
Built in recent years by Messrs Grange Developments to a high standard, this three bedroom end of terrace family home offers character with a well planned layout and offered in excellent condition throughout & CHAIN FREE. The property benefits from a large open plan living area, integral garag..."
"Located in the heart of the St Albans city centre is this beautifully presented two bedroom, two bathroom split level maisonette. This apartment oozes charm and character and has been tastefully modernised throughout while keeping the original period features. Coming in off the street ..."
"A well presented three bedroom family home situated to the south of St Albans city centre and nearby to popular local schooling, excellent motorway links and useful shops/amenities. The property comprises an entrance hall, downstairs W/C, separate kitchen, under stairs storage and a l..."
"This well presented THREE BEDROOM terrace cottage is situated in the area of NAPSBURY, positioned between London Colney & St Albans giving ease of access to the M1 & M25 motorways and well served for LOCAL SCHOOLS and leisure facilities of the area."
A stunning two bedroom split level apartment converted from a large Grade II Listed Tudor house within the Abbey precincts. The property has been thoughtfully and sympathetically refurbished and has retained many character features including structural beams and timberwork. The accommoda...
"An extended, chain free semi detached bungalow which is in need of some love. The property is set in a popular residential location and a short distance from a wide variety of local shops and the historic St Albans City Centre. Large living room | Two generous bedrooms | Garage 
"
"This well presented apartment offers bright, spacious accommodation and is ideally located in the heart of the city centre within easy access to all local facilities and the Thameslink Station. The property benefits from allocated underground parking and access to a communal gymnasium."
"A beautifully presented two double bedroom duplex apartment with its own private roof terrace, located within walking distance of the mainline train station, nearby amenities and popular schooling. The apartment comprises internally on the third floor of a stylish entrance hall with e..."
"A stunning two bedroom, first floor, luxury apartment situated within a modern and contemporary building that provides executive internal and external living space. Ideal for first time buyers, commuters and also those looking to downsize. The apartment benefits from an entrance hall ..."
"A beautiful, chain free, Grade II Listed home which in need of some love and is set in the lovely Sleepshyde area, close to beautiful open space and with great access to the motorways and St Albans City Centre. A wealth of period features | Two reception rooms | Large side and rear&n..."
"This two bedroom terraced property has the rare benefit of an off-street-parking space and is located just one mile from the City station. It also offers a South-West facing garden, is close to the area’s most sought after primary schools and had planning permission approved in 2021 to exte..."
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN is this spacious and well-presented TWO BEDROOM first floor apartment situated within a sought after development CLOSE TO THE VIBRANT CITY CENTRE and walking distance to the mainline railway station.
"Overlooking a small green is this beautifully presented two-bedroom terraced house that is situated in a quiet development close to open-fields, local shops and doctors surgery in the popular Jersey Farm area of St Albans. The property has been modernised by the current owner and provi..."
A charming two-bedroom period home offered to the market with no upper chain and in need of some modernisation. The property occupies an enviable position just a short walk from local schools and amenities. The main City Station is also just over one mile away.
"An immaculate first floor apartment within this prestigious and exclusive gated development set amongst six acres of communal gardens which also includes a communal tennis court. Offered for sale with the benefit of no onward chain, the property boasts newly fitted bathrooms, a modern kitchen, an..."
"An elegant two double bedroom first floor apartment situated in this period property within one of St Albans most sought after roads, minutes from the city centre and train station, boasting two allocated parking spaces. The accommodation is spacious and bright with a large living/dini..."
"A beautifully presented chain free home, which is set in a pleasant close overlooking green space. The property is ideally located only a short distance from some of St Albans most sought after schooling, a wide variety of local shops and fantastic countryside. Open plan living dining roo..."
"Situated in a popular close only moments away from open spaces and recreation park, this spacious three / four bedroom townhouse provides very flexible living accommodation arranged over three floors. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, good size reception / bedroom and ..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom family home occupying a generous plot, ideally situated in a popular cul-de-sac close to Wheatfields and Sandringham schools in Marshalswick. The spacious and flexible living accommodation comprises of a welcoming entrance hall, well proportioned liv..."
"Offered with no onward chain is this three bedroom terraced family home in need of modernisation, ideally located close to local amenities and the local schooling. This property benefits from a large lounge/diner, kitchen, entrance porch, utility cupboard and a w/c on the ground floor..."
"An attractive, period, terraced home with a lovely courtyard garden set in an excellent central Conservation Area location and within walking distance of St Albans City Station."
"Set in beautiful grounds that overlook the sought after open spaces of Verulamium Park, is this spacious and stunning two double bedroom apartment that has been refurbished to a high standard throughout. The property comprises of an entrance hall that leads to a sizeable living/dining ..."
"A Luxury Apartment just a few minutes walk from St Albans City Train Station and a further five minutes walk into the city centre. Offering an open plan living environment with kitchen/dining/living room in one. Two good size bedrooms one with an En-suite and built in wardrobes, Family b..."
"Being offered with no onward chain is this modern and rarely available two bedroom property which benefits from stunning vaulted ceilings, open plan living, re-claimed wood flooring and a split level mezzanine bedroom. Etna Road is located in the heart of St Albans within a short walk the City St..."
"A bright and spacious two double bedroom apartment situated just short walk from both the City Centre and mainline station. Additional benefits include underground parking, communal gardens and an on-site gym. Offered CHAIN FREE !!"
"A chain free top floor apartment, set in an amazing private gated development with beautifully kept mature gardens and grounds complete with a communal tennis court. Large living room with balcony | Generous kitchen diner | Two bathrooms | Garage
"
"A delightful two bedroom, two bathroom first floor apartment within this prestigious gated development set amongst six acres of communal gardens to include a communal tennis court. The property also benefits from a east facing balcony, garage and ample further parking. Requiring some modernisatio..."
Offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN is this well presented TWO BEDROOM first floor GARDEN maisonette situated within a sought after location close to excellent amenities and WALKING DISTANCE to the vibrant city centre and a short walk to Verulamium Park.
"Stunning first floor two bedroom maisonette available in Cranbrook Drive. This property offers a large private rear garden, garage and a driveway suitable for two cars."
We are delighted to offer this beautiful two bedroom maisonette Charmouth Court its a quiet close off Charmouth Road set in generous communal gardens. with a great community feel within walking distance of outstanding local primary and secondary schools.
"A recently built 2 double bedroom ground floor apartment in the exclusive Oaklands development. Although situated within a few minutes walk of the main train station (for a 20 minute link in London St Pancras) and walking distance to the City centre, it offers a peaceful environment set amongs..."
"A well-presented three bedroom end terraced family home with open plan lounge/diner, separate kitchen, enclosed rear garden, driveway parking and garage en bloc situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location in Park Street village in St Albans."
Being offered to market with no onward chain is this spacious apartment boasting character details throughout and benefitting from a spacious private garden to the rear The property overlooks the popular open spaces of Clarence park and is within a short walk from the St Albans City r...
"A charming two-bedroom cottage which is beautifully presented and ideally situated on the outskirts of St Albans in the sought-after village of Sandridge. This lovely home boasts many period features and currently comprising a living room with a beautiful brick fireplace and stove, a f..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi-detached house which requires full internal refurbishment and is located in the semi-rural location of Colney Heath, outside is a rear garden with access to parking for one vehicle which is in front of the garage. QUIET VILLAGE LOCATION."
A charming two double bedroom character cottage arranged over three floors with an enclosed courtyard garden located in the heart of the quaint village of Sandridge in St Albans close by to local amenities and the delightful Heartwood Forest. LOVELY VILLAGE LOCATION!
A chain free two bedroom end of terrace property in a cul de sac location in the popular residential development of Jersey Farm to the east of the City centre . The property has been well maintained throughout. Conveniently located for Ofsted rated outstanding schools and good local amenities inc...
"A fantastic maisonette ideally set in the sought after St Albans conservation area close to both the city centre and the mainline station. Own garden with a sunny aspect | Long lease and a share of the freehold | Modern kitchen and bathroom.
"
"A well-presented two bedroom terraced house situated in a slightly elevated position on London Colney High Street. The property has been modernised throughout and provides accommodation comprising an entrance porch, living room, contemporary fitted kitchen/dining room with integrated ..."
"Set back from the road, just a stone’s throw away from St Albans city centre is this well-proportioned tree lined GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE enjoying its own PRIVATE ENTRANCE, one to be truly seen to appreciate the benefits this home has to offer. The property itself comprises priva..."
"Located within walking distance of the City centre and mainline station, this two double bedroom first-floor apartment is offered to the market with no onward chain and has been meticulously refurbished throughout."
"We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Second Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.GUIDE PRICE - £400,000-425,000"
"A very well presented two/three bedroom, end of terrace family home located in the quiet cul-de-sac on Perham Way, London Colney. This property will be perfect for first time buyers or a small family. Situated within easy reach of Colney Fields shopping centre, there is public transport and great..."
"Offered for sale with no upper chain and nestled in the corner of a highly sought after cul-de-sac to the south of St Albans city centre, is this spacious and well presented two double bedroom ground floor apartment. This property benefits from an entrance hall, large open plan lounge/..."
"A luxurious two bedroom top floor apartment that provides over 900sqft of beautifully presented accommodation in this exclusive development. The property comprises an entrance hall with two storage cupboards, living room with feature fireplace and stunning views across the surrounding..."
"A beautifully presented two double bedroom elevated ground floor apartment which is set in the heart of St Albans City, close to the mainline station | Chain free | Stunning, contemporary open plan living/kitchen/dining room with gorgeous windows | Attractive bathroom | Two well proportio..."
"** EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** TENANTS CURRENTLY IN SITU ** *Offers in Excess of £400,000 - £420,000+* Wonderfully presented 2 bed house located in St. Albans, Hertfordshire. Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Well-app..."
"An attractive one bedroom Victorian character cottage, located in a secluded position set back from the road and within a short walk of the city centre and mainline station into central London (St Pancras international). The property offers scope for conversion into a two bedroom house (subject..."
A modern light and airy two bedroom first floor maisonette with a private rear garden and parking for two cars in a popular area of St Albans close to local amenities and well regarded schools including Fleetville Primary and Beaumont Secondary schools. Perfect for FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS
"Offered with no onward chain and situated in the heart of the City Centre is this stunning two bedroom, ground floor apartment with its own private garden. Internally the property comprises an entrance hall, bright and recently re-fitted kitchen/dining room, modern shower room with wat..."
We are pleased to offer this two bedroom apartment with a large and open plan kitchen/living area. Double aspect large windows with a wraparound balcony. Large bedrooms with loads of natural light and storage. En-suite in the master bedroom and a large family bathroom off the hall.
Positioned on the first floor of this purpose built development is this south facing FIRST FLOOR flat enjoying its own private BALCONY. This home gives a new owner the opportunity to style and create the property to their own tastes and needs. The property is offered for sal...
A brilliantly presented two bedroom upper floor apartment located within a sought after development which allows a walk of approximately 0.5 miles to the mainline station. The property has been refurbished internally to a high standard and comprises of an entrance hall with storage cu...
A beautifully presented two double bedroom top floor apartment located within walking distance of St Albans mainline City Station and City Centre. The property is offered to the market with no upper chain. The accommodation is stunning and is briefly comprised of a welcoming entra...
"A superbly maintained two double bedroom cottage, in a quiet semi rural location close to the villages local shops and school. the property benefits from two separate reception rooms, modern fully fitted Kitchen, a bathroom with separate w/c, plus a low maintenance south east facing rear garden, ..."
"Forming part of a characterful conversion located in the heart of St Albans City Centre, this stunning two double bedroom apartment provides incredible access to the vibrant city centre and mainline train station with direct trains to London. The apartment has been designed to exacting..."
"This beautifully presented, modern, two double bedroom apartment is situated approximately 0.5 miles from St. Albans City station and features an en-suite bathroom, juliet balcony and allocated parking."
"A refurbished and spacious TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR flat situated in an extremely popular development within a short walk of the city centre and mainline station along with a COVERED CAR PORT. In brief the property comprises entrance hall, two double bedrooms, family bathroom, kitchen ..."
A two bedroom top floor apartment in a superb central location less than half a mile from the mainline station. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and has the unusual advantage of a garage.
"TO BE SOLD BY AUCTION .....This Three bedroom link-detached house is situated in the popular and established residential area of Chiswell Green, St Albans in close proximity to local primary schools and a short distance from transport links for the M25, M1 and A1. Now in need of a full programme ..."
"A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY to purchase this wonderful TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW exclusively for the over fifty fives, offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN set within a superb location."
"LOCATION, LOCATION, LOCATION!! This LIGHT AND SPACIOUS, TOP FLOOR, Two bedroom, TWO BATHROOM apartment is located just a SHORT STROLL FROM ST ALBANS STATION. Boasting a DEDICATED PARKING SPACE this property is a GREAT INVESTMENT BUY or FIRST TIME PURCHASE!"
"2 Bedroom Detached home available in Spielplatz Naturist in Bricket Wood, St Albans. Built by the current owner to an amazing standard! Escape the city life and enjoy the oldest naturist park in the UK with this wonderful plot. EweMovie VIDEO TOUR!"
"A beautifully presented two bedroom, two bathroom apartment situated in the ever popular development of Charrington Place and providing excellent access to the mainline train station, city centre and nearby amenities. This top floor apartment internally comprises of an entry hall with..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment located in the Highfield area of St Albans offered to the market chain free. The property is accessed via a secure entry door that leads to an entrance hall, open plan living and kitchen area, family bathroom and two, well-propo..."
"Stunning two bedroom, two bathroom apartment situated in this highly popular modern development close to the mainline station."
"A superbly presented and modern two bedroom first floor apartment situated to the east of the City centre. The accommodation itself is briefly comprised of an open plan fully fitted kitchen/living/dining room (ideal for entertaining), two bathrooms, double glazing, gas central heating & alloca..."
"A very well presented two bedroom semi-detached house situated in a small gated development close to local amenities and public transport. The property was built approximately in 2012 and was finished to a very high standard offering Bosch appliances, granite worktops and oak doors. A perfect opp..."
"SUPERBLY PRESENTED and in an 'AS NEW' condition, a first floor apartment benefitting from a WALK-OUT BALCONY overlooking the communal GARDENS and views of the GOLF COURSE beyond."
Occupying an enviable position within the popular Charrington Place development the property is a light and airy two double bedroom first floor apartment. The property is located within walking distance of the mainline station and Town Centre.The accommodation itself is briefly comprise...
"Our superb 1 bedroom apartments at our brand new development Verla are just minutes away from St Albans town centre & St Albans City Station with trains into London in just over 20 minutes! This apartment consists of an open-plan kitchen/living/dining area with terrace/balcony, plu..."
NO UPPER CHAIN This two DOUBLE BEDROOM ground floor apartment forms part of a purpose built residential development in a central location. The property benefits from a pleasant living room and an archway leading through to a galley style kitchen. The master bedroom enjoys a...
Large & Light ground floor 2 bedroom flat. Modern development that is popular for commuters due to its proximity to St Albans Thameslink. Particularly interesting to First Time Buyers and Investors.
"Ideal for first time buyers and investors alike, this attractive, modern, first floor apartment is set in a highly popular location with excellent transport links and local amenities. Also, within walking distance there are sought-after schools and open green space. This stunning apa..."
This TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT is WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT and benefits from LEAFY GREEN VIEWS FROM ALL SIDES. Situated on the FIRST FLOOR of the highly regarded CASSON COURT in POPULAR NAPSBURY PARK this DELIGHTFUL PROPERTY is avalable CHAIN FREE!
"RESERVE NOW - SECOND FLOOR 2 Bedroom luxury apartment set in an EXCLUSIVE NEW DEVELOPMENT. 2 double bedrooms, ensuite to master, spacious balcony accessible from the lounge. The stunning kitchen/ living/ dining area provides the perfect example of OPEN-PLAN living, perfect for young professionals!"
"Apartment 6 is a stylish brand new two double bedroom luxury apartment, positioned on the second floor of this contemporary designed building. The property enjoys a high specification throughout with an impressive open plan living space with engineered oak Herringbone flooring, quality..."
NO UPPER CHAIN An impressive light and airy TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR apartment. The property boasts an open plan living/dining and kitchen area as well as two good size bedrooms and a recently refurbished bathroom. The property is attractively presented throughout and als...
A well presented two bedroom warden managed retirement cottage with its own patio area and communal gardens in the desirable Harvest Court development in Jersey Farm in St Albans. A viewing is highly recommended!
"This retirement apartment offers luxurious facilities combined with a spacious and well-presented apartment, that is available for residents over 70 years of age. Located close the City centre and local amenities, Eleanor House provides stunning surroundings in an ideal location for those looking..."
A beautifully presented one bedroom first floor garden apartment perfectly positioned in the heart of the city centre with its wide range of boutique shops and restaurants and the mainline station with direct services to London. This chain free maisonette benefits from its own front d...
"A bright and spacious ground floor maisonette forming part of a modern development in the popular Camp/Fleetville area of St Albans, close to local shops and services. A private front door gives access into the impressive dual aspect kitchen/diner/living room featuring a lounge area with..."
A much improved two bedroom home situated close to Wheatfields primary and Sandringham secondary schools that would be an ideal investment or first time purchase. The flexible living accommodation has been updated and remodelled and now comprises an impressive open plan dual aspect li...
"**OPEN PLAN** Charming and contemporary chain free TWO BEDROOM apartment that is ideally located for those wanting to be within close proximity of St Albans City Station and City Centre, which has an abundance of amenities."
A spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment situated approximately 10 minutes walk from St. Albans city train station into London St. Pancras International. The property benefits from no upper chain and a long lease. A secure entry phone and front door give access to the communa...
"A stylish first floor apartment offered for sale with NO UPPER CHAIN and in first class condition throughout. The property enjoys a welcoming entrance hall, storage cupboard, spacious living room with Juliette balcony, a well-planned kitchen with integrated appliances, a generous doubl..."
A well presented first floor retirement apartment benefiting from a SPACIOUS living room with doors leading onto a JULIETTE BALCONY *price reduced for a limited time period*
"A beautifully presented first floor 75% shared ownership apartment with the option to purchase less if you require. Built on the site of a former Convent, Maryland Place enjoys a quiet setting off Townsend Drive just north of St Albans and is an exclusive development for the over 55s
"
"RESERVE NOW 1 Bedroom luxury apartment set in an EXCLUSIVE NEW DEVELOPMENT. 1 double bedroom, separate bath, full length ROOF TERRACE/BALCONY accessible from the lounge. The spacious kitchen/ living/ dining area provides the perfect example of OPEN-PLAN living, perfect for young professionals!"
"Presented to a high standard throughout and offering bright and spacious living, this rarely available apartment has a wealth of character features including high ceilings, deep sash windows and solid wooden floors, and delightful far reaching views across the lawned gardens and comes with a shar..."
"A two bedroom second floor flat with communal gardens and allocated parking for one car in the DESIRABLE JERSEY FARM AREA of St Albans with local amenities including a pub, shop, doctors surgery, pharmacy and a community centre. A VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!"
"Measuring at over 930 square feet is this impressively sized and well-presented two double bedroom first floor maisonette, that is conveniently located within the popular village of Park Street which provides easy access to nearby motorway links, popular schooling and local shops/amenities. "
"A very well presented top floor flat situated in a sought after development on the Jersey Farm residential estate. The property features a modern kitchen and modern bathroom and a good sized lounge/dining room with bay window. Further benefits include double glazing, electric heating, security en..."
"A CHAIN FREE modern one bedroom apartment ideally located within walking distance to the mainline train station servicing London St Pancras. The property offers a modern fitted kitchen, modern fitted bathroom, double bedroom with built in wardrobes and open plan living room."
"Located in a prime position in between the vibrant city centre and the mainline train station, this two bedroom apartment in a private gated development is well presented and offered with no onward chain. The apartment is set behind remote controlled gates which lead to the private car..."
"SUPERBLY PRESENTED, second floor apartment benefitting from a spacious living room and JULIET BALCONY enjoying GARDEN VIEWS. Modern kitchen with BUILT IN APPLIANCES, double bedroom with WALK-IN WARDROBE and a CONTEMPORARY wet room. The development offers EXCELLENT COMMUNAL AREAS, restaurant and..."
"A bright and spacious, chain free apartment which is in a sought after location only a short distance from the mainline railway station and St Albans City Centre. Long lease | Open plan living/kitchen/diner | Two bathrooms | Allocated parking | A must view
"
"Solo Homes are pleased to offer this brand new 1 bedroom maisonette. Available on a shared ownership basis, this is a great way to make your next home purchase more affordable. Oaklands Grange is ideally placed for town and the countryside. With local routes leading to the A1, M1 and the M25, ..."
"A perfectly placed TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR apartment with its OWN PRIVATE BALCONY, set amongst beautifully and regularly maintained grounds in Abbots Park. The property benefits from RESIDENT PARKING and is well positioned for the city centre and MAINLINE station."
"BELVOIR WELWYN are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented, one bedroom retirement apartment in the extremely sought-after ST ALBANS area. Eleanor House is one of McCarthy & Stones Retirement Living PLUS range and is facilitated to provide homeowners with extra care, if neede..."
** SPLIT LEVEL MAISONETTE ** Located above the shops in the Quadrant parade and the popular area of Marshalswick. The property boasts well proportioned and versatile living spaces that provides a bright and airy ambience throughout. This property is being sold with tenants in situ. The property c...
"A beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor apartment within walking distance of the mainline train station, city centre and local amenities. Internally the property comprises of an entrance hall, lounge/dining room with bay front, separate kitchen, large double bedroom and a fami..."
"A well presented ground floor two bedroom flat occupying an enviable position within a peaceful development. The property is located in between the City centre and the main train station with its 19 minutes link into London St Pancras. The flat itself is briefly comprised of two bedrooms, en-s..."
"Offered CHAIN FREE a spacious two DOUBLE bedroom first floor maisonette, with the benefit of its own private garden & driveway providing off street parking. Occupied by the same owner for over 55 years this charming property briefly comprises of an entrance hall, providing access to a large usea..."
"A fantastic example of a centrally located two double bedroom ground floor apartment. Internally the property comprises of an entrance hall, two generous bedrooms, a sizeable lounge/diner with bay window, separate kitchen and a family bathroom. The apartment has undergone modernisation..."
"Situated within the highly popular development of Newsom Place, is this modern one bedroom ground floor apartment. The property comprises internally of an entrance hall with storage cupboard, generous open plan kitchen/living room, family bathroom and a sizeable double bedroom. Externa..."
"Idyllically situated in a quiet part of the delightful gardens of this highly sought after development for the over 55’s, this property provides a rare opportunity to acquire a TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE. The property is presented in good decorative order with the unusual featur..."
"***£320,000-£435,000*** Orton Place, St Albans, AL4 9RF is an exciting new development of just eight 1 and 2 bedroom apartments that are ideally placed only moments away from local shopping and highly regarded schooling. The Quadrant shopping parade and Marks & Spencer Foodha..."
"Built in 2014, this is a modern TWO BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM APARTMENT. Well presented throughout this property boasts a LONG LEASE and RESIDENTS CAR PARK with AMPLE VISITOR SPACES. This property is ideally situated for local shops, amenities and with GREAT ROAD and TRANSPORT LINKS. OFFERED CHAIN FREE!"
"A well presented modern two bedroom, two bathroom apartment located within Kings Court, conveniently positioned for London Colney High Street. Internally the property comprises entrance hallway, main bedroom with en suite bathroom, additional bedroom, family bathroom, lounge/dining room and fully..."
"A stunning, first floor, one bedroom, luxury apartment in the City centre with a beautiful 27ft private balcony, located a stone's throw from the mainline station."
"This modern DUAL ASPECT apartment is located on the top floor of this HIGH-QUALITY development, situated in a prime location just a short distance from St Albans City Station and an array of local shops and services."
"A beautifully presented and very spacious one bedroom apartment in this prestigious development to the southeast of St Albans for a short drive to the station and easy access to the A414, M1 and M25 motorways.Set in acres of picturesque parkland, this second floor property boasts high c..."
"No Upper Chain! Available to buy comes this two double bedroom first floor maisonette along Meadow Close, London Colney. Internally the property comprises entrance hallway, two bedrooms, lounge, kitchen and bathroom. The property also benefits from loft space, large rear garden, garage en block, ..."
"An unusual opportunity to acquire a TWO BEDROOM flat in this delightful Conservation Area development for over 55s, with beautiful gardens leading down to the River Ver footpath. There is a 24 hour emergency call system, security entry phone, outside laundry drying area and two on site c..."
"A beautifully presented two double bedroom, top floor apartment located in this stunning private gated, character conversion. Green Oak House is situated to the south side of St. Albans offering convenient access to the M1/M25 as well as being only approximately 3.5 miles from St. Albans City Centre"
"Situated in the HEART OF LONDON COLNEY VILLAGE with easy access to LOCAL SHOPS and GREAT BUS AND ROAD LINKS is this TWO BEDROOM , FIRST FLOOR FLAT. Boasting a GENEROUS PRIVATE REAR GARDEN and a GARAGE EN-BLOC this property also benefits from a LONG LEASE and LOW CHARGES. Call OLIVER AND AKERS ANY..."
"This executive 1 double bedroom, 1 bathroom apartment in Ridgmont Plaza with contemporary design and modern finishes, is located in a sought after position in central St Albans. Ridgmont Plaza launched in 2015, is only a few minutes' walk to the City station with a quick commute into St Pancras Inte"
"A lovely two bedroom first floor apartment located in the Camp/Fleetville area of St Albans and within an easy reach of the mainline train station and other local shops and amenities. The property comprises of a bright and airy lounge, fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms and a bathroom. The block..."
"A bright and spacious one double bedroom, top floor apartment in this popular residential development located opposite Verulamium Park and Westminster Lodge sports centre. The property is offered with the benefit of no upper chain. A secure entry phone system gives access to the communal..."
"Located on cul-de-sac just a short walk from the mainline train station and close to the sought after local amenities, this spacious two bedroom property is perfectly positioned and conveniently offered with no onward chain. The property comprises an entrance hall, sizeable lounge, sep..."
"A beautifully presented LUXURY APARTMENT, with PRIVATE BALCONY, situated in a MODERN development within walking distance to the CITY CENTRE and MAINLINE STATION to London St Pancras. Being sold with no onward chain."
An immaculately presented one bedroom mews house with parking. Located in an attractive village setting on the edge of Heartwood Forest and within easy reach of St Albans City Centre.
"Offered for sale with no upper chain and ideally placed just off the village High Street is this two bedroom first floor maisonette with its own enclosed garden and single garage. This spacious home would make a great first time or investment purchase and comprises of a living room, fi..."
"A bright and spacious top floor apartment which is ideally located only a short distance to both the mainline station and the vibrant St Albans City Centre. Modern open plan living | Two allocated underground parking spaces | Characterful double bedroom | Attractive bathroom
"
"A well-presented, executive ground floor apartment located in the sought-after Oaklands development in the heart of St Albans - only a short walk from the City centre and a few minutes walk to the main train station for a 20 mins train link into London St Pancras. The property is ..."
An extremely well presented two double bedroom first (top) floor purpose built maisonette with own section of garden situated within the popular village of Colney Heath. The property offers well balanced living space with plenty of storage throughout comprising own ground floor entrance with stai...
"Apartment 5 is a stylish brand new luxury apartment, positioned on the second floor of this contemporary designed building. The property enjoys a high specification throughout with an impressive open plan living space with engineered oak Herringbone flooring, quality fitted kitchen wit..."
"Situated in popular Abbots Park is this well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment, located approximately within a 15 minute walk to the mainline train station into London St. Pancras and within one mile of St. Albans city centre. Viewing highly recommended!!"
"A superbly located one bedroom first floor apartment situated in close proximity to St Albans train station and a short walk from the City centre. The property benefits from a voice entry system, entrance hall, spacious lounge/dining room, separate kitchen, double bedroom and a bathroo..."
"Located a stone's throw away from the mainline railway station, is this well maintained ground floor, one bedroom apartment. Set within an attractive building, just off Beaconsfield Road and within walking distance of the city centre. Internally the property is presented in good decorative order ..."
"Apartment 3 is a stylish brand new luxury apartment, positioned on the first floor of this contemporary designed building. The property enjoys a high specification throughout with an impressive open plan living space with engineered oak Herringbone flooring, quality fitted kitchen with..."
A good size one bedroom ground floor flat with allocated parking and communal garden close by to the lovely heartwood forest in the quaint village of Sandridge in St Albans. This property is in a STUNNING VILLAGE LOCATION and is ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS.
"Apartment 8 is a stylish brand new luxury apartment, positioned on the top floor of this contemporary designed building. The property enjoys a high specification throughout with an impressive open plan living space with engineered oak Herringbone flooring, quality fitted kitchen with i..."
"TOP FLOOR PENTHOUSE STYLE 1 Bedroom luxury apartment set in an EXCLUSIVE NEW DEVELOPMENT. 1 double bedroom, Large bathroom. The spacious kitchen/ living/ dining area provide the perfect example of OPEN-PLAN living, perfect for young professionals!"
This one double bedroom ground floor apartment with juliet balcony is located in the popular and convenient Charrington Place development.
"A fantastic ground floor maisonette with its own rear garden, set close to sought after schools and stunning countryside. Modern kitchen | Living room opening directly to the garden | Two well proportioned bedrooms | Attractive bathroom | Completed chain
"
"The property has tenants in situ. A beautifully presented and modern very modern one bedroom, second floor apartment in the sought after development of Ridgmont Plaza only a stone's throw away from St Albans train station with its 20 mins link into London St Pancras. The city centre is also ne..."
"An attractive modern top floor apartment with fantastic open plan living, which is set in a popular location with excellent access to St Albans mainline railway station which is only 1.4miles away | Entrance hall | Modern kitchen/living/dining room | Allocated parking | Great local amenities i..."
"A rarely available two bedroom top floor apartment for the over 55's within this very conveniently located City centre development with views to a South/Easterly aspect and lift to all floors. Shops, cafes and restaurants as well as Doctors surgeries and all other amenities are close at hand. Dav..."
NO UPPER CHAIN Ideally located within walking distance of the nearby shops and within easy reach of highly regarded local schooling is this two double bedroom top floor apartment. The property is located in a peaceful side road in the heart of Marshalswick and benefits from a long lea...
"A two bedroom warden controlled first floor RETIREMENT MAISONETTE, which is situated close to a small parade of shops including a Tesco Metro with a cashpoint, post office, doctors and dentist's surgery as well as other local amenities in Jersey Farm. In a GREAT LOCATION and offered CHAIN FREE."
"A bright and spacious modern apartment with pedestrian lift access located in the luxury development of Charrington Place in St Albans, close to St Albans City main line Station into London St Pancreas."
"Being offered with no onward chain is this modern one double bedroom second floor apartment with lift access to all floors in the block, outside space and allocated parking. The property is available to view immediately. The apartment is conveniently located within close proximity to l..."
"** NO CHAIN ** Located in St Albans City Centre within close proximity of St Albans train station is this first floor apartment. Internally the property comprises of a double bedroom, living room, family bathroom, separate kitchen and storage."
"A beautifully presented, one double bedroom, first floor apartment situated in a central and convenient position. This lovely apartment will attract the astute investor buyer, the commuter or the professional person looking for a city lifestyle where good restaurants, plenty of places to socialis..."
"JW&Co Langleys are delighted to offer for sale this GROUND FLOOR, two double bedrooms apartment, situated in a sought-after location. The accommodation comprises; separate kitchen, lounge/dining room, two bedrooms, family bathroom. The property benefits from a communal garden and allocat..."
"A stunning one bedroom apartment of impressive proportions with off-street parking. Conveniently located just a mile from the St Albans City Station, this spacious property is offered to the market with the benefit of no onward chain."
This larger than average two bedroom spacious retirement property is ideal for over 55`s seeking space and privacy whilst enjoying the benefits a retirement development has to offer such as careline alarm service and residents management staff.
"JW&Co are pleased to offer this two-bedroom apartment. Comprising of Kitchen, a generous LOUNGE/DINER, TWO BEDROOMS, comummunal GARDEN and store shed. This property is located within Park Street, which is only 3 Miles to Radlett mainline train station which links to London Kings Cross and Luton. ..."
"Situated in the popular village of London Colney, this three bedroom property is ideal for investors and families seeking generous living accommodation."
A spacious first floor two double bedroom split level maisonette in the popular residential area of Bricket Wood. Conveniently located to the South side of St Albans with great access for motorway links and easy access back into St Albans or Radlett for the mainline station. The property will be ...
"This beautiful apartment, being sold with NO UPPER CHAIN, has been cared for and updated to an extremely high standard. Situated within the HEART OF ST. ALBANS Centre, this wonderful property is within a SHORT WALK to a variety of amenities including restaurants, shops, mainline train station, an..."
"A one bedroom, second floor, purpose built flat located in a convenient location within walking distance of the station, park and local shops. Good first time buyer property with parking *****CHAIN FREE******"
"A smart, one-bedroom ground floor apartment, set in a highly desirable cul de sac location only a short walk from St Albans mainline station | Chain free | 999 year lease from 2008 | Modern open plan living/dining/kitchen with a Juliette balcony | Double bedroom | Attractiv..."
A two bedroom first floor RETIREMENT maisonette built by Bovis Homes with residence parking and communal gardens situated in a popular cul-de-sac location within the Jersey Farm area of St Albans and close by to local amenities. OFFERED CHAIN FREE.
"A bright and spacious one bedroom first floor maisonette close to local shops and services and approximately 15 minutes walk to the mainline train station. The accommodation is well proportioned and briefly comprises of a spacious kitchen/breakfast room flooded with natural light, lounge..."
"A stunning apartment, set in a popular development only a short distance from St Albans vibrant City Centre & the station | Entrance hall | Comtemporary open plan living | Modern kitchen area | Attractive bathroom | Bedroom area |  Allocated parking
"
"* Cash Buyers Only Due To Low Lease* Situated in a desirable and sought after position is this beautifully presented one bedroom first floor apartment, close to the Verulamium park, within walking distance of St Albans City Centre and the mainline railway station, and only a stone's throw away fr..."
A wonderfully bright one bedroom ground floor maisonette with parking.
"This GROUND FLOOR one bedroom apartment is located in the heart of the sought after Marshalswick area. The property consists of a living room, separate kitchen, double bedroom, and wet room. The property has added benefits of an external store cupboard, GARAGE en bloc, communal gardens and on roa..."
"A bright and sunny south facing second floor RETIREMENT FLAT forming part of this exclusive and luxurious development built by Bovis Homes within an easy level walk of the shopping facilities in the city centre. Attractively presented with garden views, benefiting from double glazing, ne..."
This WELL PRESENTED SOUTH FACING second floor ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM apartment benefits from VIEWS ONTO the beautiful communal GARDENS to the rear and is being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"This immaculately presented top floor, two bedroom apartment comes with a long lease and is chain free. The property is situated within easy reach of Colney Fields shopping centre in London Colney. There is public transport and great motorway links located close by. The property is modern and lig..."
"NO UPPER CHAIN A well presented two bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment located at the top of Beech Road. The property comprises of an entrance hall, kitchen, bathroom, two bedrooms and a dual aspect lounge/dining room. The property has recently been painted throughout and fitted with new c..."
"A beautifully presented one bedroom top floor apartment for the over 55's within this very conveniently located City centre development. Shops, cafes and restaurants as well as Doctors surgeries and all other amenities are close at hand. Davis Court also benefits from a residential manager, 24 ho..."
"A two double bedroom apartment with resident parking, located East of the City Centre, ideal for first time buyers and investors."
A one bedroom top floor apartment to the north of the City centre created to provide a high quality living space using renewable energy sources where possible aimed towards a generation of first time buyers and investors. The property is offered for sale chain free and includes a balcony over loo...
"This wonderful, chain-free two bedroom maisonette, is set in a sought-after development, designed for the over 55's. With its close proximity to the vibrant city centre, a designated estate manager, residents and visitor parking, and delightful communal gardens, this property is one not to miss!<..."
"NEWLY RENOVATED, first-floor APARTMENT, set in an AWARD-WINNING DEVELOPMENT, EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE OVER 55’s. The development offers secure living with LIFTS TO ALL FLOORS, WONDERFUL AREAS and GARDENS, and AMPLE CAR PARKING for both residents and visitors. Set n a desirable ST ALBA..."
"Offered for sale chain free, a beautifully presented one bedroom ground floor apartment for the over 55's within this very conveniently located City centre development. The flat has been well maintained and modernised over recent years with a modern shower room and kitchen and an open plan lo..."
Situated within a sought-after development and within a short distance of the mainline station is this wonderfully presented one bedroom top floor apartment.
"Solo Homes are pleased to offer this brand new 2 bedroom mid-terrace property at the eagerly anticipated, Oaklands Grange development. This particular property is available on a shared ownership basis, providing buyers with a more affordable solution to their next home purchase. Oaklands Grange..."
"LEASEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C We are delighted to offer to the market this modern 1-bedroom ground floor apartment on Ridgmont Plaza, St Albans offering no upward chain suitable for a first time buyer or representing a suitable investment opportunity. The property..."
A charming one-bedroom apartment occupying an enviable position just a short walk from both the city centre and St Alban's City station. The property is offered to the market with no upper chain. The accommodation itself is briefly comprised of a large open plan kitchen/living roo...
A recently converted one bedroom first floor apartment within this development of just six homes finished to a high standard offering light and airy open plan accommodation.
"No Upper Chain. Available for sale is this large two bedroom first floor flat enjoying 1000sqft of living space. This large two bedroom first floor flat enjoys its own private entrance, an en-suite and a spacious living room and further benefits from a long lease. New House ..."
"RETIREMENT PROPERTY Abeny gate, off Belmont hill. Conservation area. Second floor flat with lift. Sealed unit double glazing throughout."
"Located in the heart of St. Albans city centre and a stones throw from St. Albans City mainline train station connecting to London St Pancras, this modern one double bedroom apartment offering approximately 432 sqft of accommodation is ideal for first time buyers and investors."
"A spacious one double bedroom second floor retirement apartment ideally situated just short walk from both the City Centre and mainline station. The accommodation itself is briefly comprised of a welcoming entrance hall, spacious lounge/dining room, re fitted kitchen, a three piece suite showe..."
"A GROUND FLOOR OVER 55'S / RETIREMENT FLAT in this most attractive and popular purpose built, award winning, development, within close walking distance of the city centre. The rear entrance to the Maltings Shopping Centre is just across Marlborough Road. The flat is offered for sale in g..."
"Centrally located in this sought after development, a well presented one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment. Set within this very convenient location for buyers who are over 55. The property has been much improved to include a refurbished kitchen with built in appliances. Davis Court benef..."
A beautifully presented top floor retirement apartment (with lift access) occupying an enviable position just a short walk from both the city centre and the mainline train station. The property is offered to the market with no upper chain. The accommodation itself is briefly compr...
"A spacious GROUND FLOOR one bedroom flat in this prestigious Bovis development purpose built for the over 55's, located a short level walk from the city centre. The flat benefits from double glazing and west facing windows including the kitchen. The development provides an on site Manage..."
Sensible offers will be considered. Davis Court is an AWARD WINNING DEVELOPMENT exclusively for the over 55s market. It’s CENTRAL ST. ALBANS LOCATION provides perfect access for all that this HISTORICAL CITY has to offer. It is within walking distance to a wide range of shops and resta...
"This well presented chain free retirement apartment is available for those over 55 who desire a property that is a short walk away from St Albans City Centre. Comprising of a double bedroom, bathroom, living area and separate kitchen, this apartment looks out onto attractive views of t..."
"A one bedroom top floor apartment for the over 55's within this convenient City centre development with lift to all floors and offered for sale chain free. Shops, cafes and restaurants as well as Doctors surgeries and all other amenities are close at hand. Davis Court also benefits from a residen..."
"An attractive apartment for the over 55's in this prestigious Bovis development within a short level walk of the city centre. There is a Resident Manager, 24 hour alarm system, security entry phone system, Residents social lounge, most attractive secluded communal gardens and on site par..."
"A modern and extremely well presented one bedroom ground floor apartment to the north side of St Albans. The location offers easy access to the A1(M) and M1 motorways. It is also just a short drive from the city centre.The property is briefly comprised of a welcoming entrance hall, a do..."
** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** OPEN PLAN living room and kitchen. ALLOCATED PARKING. Close proximity to St Albans City Station. Direct access onto communal courtyard garden.
"Offered to the market CHAIN FREE is this spacious one bedroom ground floor flat located on a popular close in the quaint village of Colney Heath. The property is offered in good condition throughout and briefly comprises of entrance hall, spacious Living /Dining room, modern fitted kitchen a do..."
A well presented and spacious first floor maisonette occupying an enviable position within Park Street and just a short distance from How Wood Station and excellent road links. The property could be a fantastic investment purchase as demand for rental property in the area is very high.T...
"Situated on the second floor (with lift) in a prestigious development within a short walk of the city centre, this delightfully presented flat features bright and spacious accommodation with windows on three sides (including the kitchen and bathroom) providing exceptional levels of natur..."
A well presented studio apartment located within this desirable city centre development. Use of a private gym is included in the service charge. St Albans city station is 0.3 of a mile. Available with No Upper Chain
A well-presented one double bedroom ground floor apartment offered to the market with no upper chain. The property is located within easy reach of Colney Fields Shopping Park and great motorway links. The accommodation itself is briefly comprised of a large lounge/dining room with...
This fabulously located studio apartment is set in a popular development only a short distance from St. Albans vibrant City Centre with fantastic transport links and leisure facilities. Verulamium lakes is only a short walk away from this property.
"RECENTLY REFURBISHED throughout, this TWO BEDROOM park home is IDEALLY SITUATED for local shops and with GREAT BUS AND ROAD LINKS. Boasting OFF STREET PARKING FOR 2-3 CARS and with GENEROUS VISITOR PARKING , this property is situated on a POPULAR DEVELOPMENT with NO MINIMUM AGE REQUIREMENT. This ..."
"A one bedroom first floor apartment with lift access in need of some updating for the over 55's within this very conveniently located City centre development. Shops, cafes and restaurants as well as Doctors surgeries and all other amenities are close at hand. Davis Court also benefits from a resi..."
"This one bedroom retirement property is dedicated to the over 55's, offering private self-sufficient living arrangements. Its well maintained and looks onto a private well kept garden for the exclusive use of residents. Situated in the popular city centre location."
"Situated in the renowned lively social development in the city centre, just a very short walk from the Maltings, this exceptionally sunny flat enjoys a south facing outlook with the added advantage of a window in the kitchen. Having just been professionally decorated and with brand new c..."
"*CASH BUYERS ONLY* New to market comes this two bedroom first floor flat located along Wyedale, London Colney. Situated within easy reach of London Colney Shopping Fields, public transport and great motorway links. Internally the property comprises: entrance hallway, two bedrooms, bathroom, loung..."
We are delighted to offer this one bedroom top floor apartment ideally situated within walking distance to the High Street and its many amenities. The property offers bright and spacious accommodation throughout having been recently painted and new carpets laid throughout.
"Approximately 73 years remaining on the lease, Reception Room/Kitchen, Bedroom, Bathroom/WC, Approximate GIA 45 sq m (484 sq ft), Virtual tour available below, Located in St Albans City centre with access to shops, restaurants and bars, St Albans City Rail station is approximately 0.7 miles to th..."
"This superb value ground floor well-presented warden assisted two bedroom retirement apartment is immediately available & is in a practical location for the City centre. There is an on-site warden, out of hours emergency call & a residents communal lounge. Dedicated to the over 55's,"
"Available with no upper chain comes this one double bedroom first floor flat with lift access located along Beaconsfield Road, St. Albans. Internally the property comprises; entrance hallway, storage cupboard, double bedroom with fitted wardrobes, bathroom, kitchen and lounge/dining room. The pro..."
A well-presented one bedroom first floor over 55's apartment with lift access to all floors and is offered for sale with immediate vacant possession. The property is conveniently located within easy access to both St Albans City Centre and St Albans City Mainline station. Offered CHAIN FREE.
"This one bedroom third floor apartment is available to purchase at Eywood House, St Albans for a 50% share - exclusively for the over 55s."
"This lovely one bedroom ground floor flat for the over 55's is conveniently situated directly opposite Clarence Park and a short walk from the city station and local shops and restaurants on Hatfield Road. The flat is well presented throughout and comprises a modern kitchen, bright light filled l..."
A one double bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of a popular over 55's development with direct private access out to the attractive communal gardens. A security intercom system provides access to the welcoming communal entrance hall with stairs and a lift to all floors and acce...
"A well-presented CHAIN FREE one bedroom ground floor apartment located in an OVER 55's development in the heart of St Albans City. Within a stones throw of Clarence Park and a plethora of local amenities, this would make your ideal next purchase."
"A ground floor apartment for the over 55s, with an attractive outlook over communal gardens and close to the station and local shops on Hatfield Road. This one bedroom property requires updating and has 63 years remaining on the lease. Accommodation comprises of a hallway, a bright well proportio..."
A single garage for sale with parking space to the front on the Ridgeway in the sought after area of Marshalswick in St Albans. The garage is situated in a row of garages with an up and over door and is close by to the Quadrant Shopping Area of Marshalswick and other local amenities.
"**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Plot of Land Measuring Approximately 350 sq m (3,767 sq ft) Freehold Guide Price = £10,000+ Location T..."
"**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Vacant Plot of Land Measuring Approximately 172 sq m (1,851 sq ft) Freehold Guide Price = £10,000+ Loc..."
100m2 £9000.200m2 £16000.300m2 £20000.400m2 £24000.Multiple plots or larger areas available if required.
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS! A well presented two bedroom mid terraced property situated in the very popular and convenient area of Basford, close to nearby amenities, Royal Stoke University Hospital and nearby commuter links! The property benefits from no onward chain and early vie..."
"Freehold development opportunity - Planning is granted and implemented for a landmark student accommodation scheme comprising 1,357 bedrooms - Possible alternative uses Co-living , Private residential scheme or commercial development"
"A portfolio of part pre let student rental investments for sale within the city of Stoke on Trent/ Newcastle under Lyme. The portfolio comprises nine completely modernised houses the majority of which are let till summer 2023. The current passing rental is £115,358 with a potential income o..."
"An opportunity to acquire the Long Leasehold interest (109.5 years unexpired) of this modern 18 unit apartment block.Forest Edge Apartments was completed in 2012 and offers a mixture of modern 1 & 2 bedroom apartments, with five 2-bed duplex penthouses. "
"Three properties for the price of one! A unique opportunity to acquire a substantial detached house which has been re-modelled to form 3 separate dwellings: a pair of semi-detached houses and a detached 2 bed bungalow, making it an ideal investment property and particularly suited to multi-genera..."
"This traditional six bedroom stone constructed farmhouse offers superb family accommodation, spectacular views and a versatile layout which could quiet easily be re-configured to include a separate annex from the main house, or an air bnb opportunity, (subject to the relevant approval). The prope..."
"Heather Edge, a prestigious five bedroom detached residence. A rare opportunity to acquire this modern country dwelling set in an elevated and commanding setting with panoramic views to the surrounding countryside. Nestled on 0.60 of an acre, the property is located in the ever popular residentia..."
I Want More - I Want More - Yes I hear you and this stunning home has much more to offer than first meets the eye and once viewed you won't be able to stop yourself shouting the words......I love it!!!! Through the entrance porch you are welcomed by a huge entrance hall which gives access to ...
"An excellent development opportunity to purchase this plot of land with planning approval and reserved matters, granted on the 16th December 2022, for the erection of 5 detached dwellings. Positioned within a highly desirable location of Lightwood, the site is nestled on the western side of ..."
"An impressive four bedroom detached property in Staffordshire, offering an abundance of spacious accommodation that's nestled on a substantial plot with good road side access. Located in the highly sought after Hamlet of Stanley the property lies on the outskirts of Stockton Brook positioned ..."
* SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION * SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION THROUGHOUT * BEAUTIFUL GARDENS * UNIQUE PROPERTY * DOUBLE GARAGE * OFF ROAD PARKING
Immaculately presented five bedroom detached family home occupying a generous corner plot position in a highly desirable part of Trentham.
"Nestled in the Staffordshire Moorland Countryside, with exquisite views reaching over the fields and down to the Canal, sits ""East View"". Having been extended and renovated to an exceptional standard by the current owners, with high quality fixtures and fittings throughout, East View is one of th..."
"***STUNNING EXECUTIVE 6 BED DETACHED HOUSE*** Occupying a desirable, prominent position, offering versatile living accommodation with internal and external home offices. A beautiful, private, south facing Garden with sweeping driveway for multiple vehicles. Highly sought after property."
"POTENTIAL BUSINESS / INVESTMENT OR DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY. PRICE £595,000 (PLUS VAT) The Trent Country Club offers the potential for a variety of uses as a business/investment or development opportunity (subject to necessary planning permission) The property is currently a licenced venue..."
"A most impressive and substantial double-fronted detached period property in Penkhull featuring five double bedrooms and four reception rooms! Full of character and period features, including Minton tiled flooring in the hallway and sash windows"
"A unique individually designed detached residence in an exceptional prestigious location in the Staffordshire Moorlands, Stockton Brook. Situated in an elevated and private location overlooking neighbouring countryside whilst being nestled on an impressive plot. The property is in excess of 1625s..."
"This substantial four bedroom period family home is overflowing with character and charm Set well back from Lightwood Road and approached by a long sweeping driveway you will feel like you have turned into a Country Mansion. Close to open country side, schools, amenities and great transport links"
Stunning and unique four bedroom detached family home situated in the popular and sought residential area of Trentham. This ones even got its own brook in the back garden.
"Every blank canvas has the potential to become a masterpiece, it has endless possibilities to be what ever you want it to be. To create your own monument, perfection or bring to life your wildest dreams! Well I give you, your very own blank canvas in the form of Victoria House. A period detached ..."
"Beech View boasts a fantastic three bedroom detached bungalow sitting in a large plot with double garage. Located on a private road and enjoying 0.25 acres or thereabouts. Beech View has been extended to provide large and spacious open plan accommodation. Internally, Beech View has three double b..."
" The Ash is a beautifully designed, five bedroom, detached family home with detached double garage set within the sensational Trentham Fields development where convenience and conservation have become one. Set over two floors, the ground floor lends itself to modern day living perfectly with a ..."
"What a wonderful world! A perfect place where you can just unload your belongings and enjoy your new surroundings! No need to design a new bathroom, forget about budgeting for that extension, put those paintbrushes and colour charts to the back of your mind.....they are not required here! A simpl..."
Farm View is a block paved roadway of only six high quality homes. House No. 2 was built in 2015 to a high standard of construction and insulation and it provides practical and extremely stylish accommodation in a particularly convenient location for access to the University Hospital of North St...
"A modern, smart and beautifully presented two bedroom home in a very popular location. Energy Efficient and of modern construction, this is the perfect starting point for First Time Buyers and an excellent opportunity for those looking to downsize. Very well located with easy access to local amen..."
"Location, Location, Location. Perhaps the first thing we think about when buying a home and doesn’t this superb four-bedroom end terrace property boast just that! Walking distance to Royal Stoke Hospital as well as the A500, M6 and A34 all within a small distance, outstanding local amenitie..."
"Of all the views that you could have in the world, this one has got to be our favourite… with rolling hills, sit back and take in the peace and tranquillity whilst you enjoy being surrounded by beautiful Staffordshire countryside. This property offers the best of both worlds, having a love..."
A substantial individual build project property providing extensive and most versatile accommodation over three floors. Holding a much sought after semi rural hillside location situated to the easterly edge of the City and enjoying superb far reaching elevated panoramic views across the City and...
Austin & Roe have great pleasure in offering for Sale this beautiful Three Bedroom Detached property in this semi-rural and sought after location. The property comprises an Entrance Hal...
"""It takes hands to build a house, but only hearts can build a home"" An Executive Four Bedroom Detached Residence on the Popular Meir Park estate, extended and updated to an excellent standard, providing versatile accommodation well suited to family life."
"""It's all about Location on this property! Situated on the outskirts of Stoke On Trent, with some beautiful countryside on the doorstep and within close proximity to local amenities, the location and generous proportions make this fabulous home ideal for family life"""
When a tiny little acorn grows into a giant Oak tree it settles in that place it calls home forever which is exactly what has happened here at Oakhurst Crescent. Just like the mighty Oak tree this family home has been lovingly looked after and cherished for years. Located in the desirable area of...
"A CUT ABOVE THE REST - Get ready to fall head over heels for this incredible four DOUBLE bedroom family home which is positioned in a fantastic location, close to excellent shops and amenities. Complete with a well-presented and homely interior, this unique detached property is certain to tick al..."
"Everyone loves a good cake, the soft sponge, the yummy filling, the sweet icing but no perfect cake is complete without the CHERRY on the top! What if I tell you, you can have it all the sweetest of cakes, the most scrumptious icing and shiniest red CHERRY on the top! Well I give you CHERRYwood, ..."
"LARGE THREE BEDROOM BUNGALOW, GARAGE & GARDENS WITH BUILDING REGULATION APPROVAL FOR ADDITIONAL FIRST FLOOR BEDROOM AND BATHROOM Graham Watkins & Co. are pleased to offer for sale this delightful three bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW, ideally situated in the popular semi-rural location of Ligh..."
"A house is made of bricks and beams, a home is made of love and dreams. Here is your chance to call a place home with this fantastic three-bedroom dormer bungalow, with an ANNEX taking its stance on Bagnall Road, Light Oaks."
" Available for Early Bird Reservation The Hornbeam is a substantial, five bedroom detached home with detached double garage and open plan living on the ground floor. The ground floor consists of a large lounge to the front of the property accessed from the main entrance hallway along with a home..."
An impressive five bedroom linked detached property with two reception rooms and newly converted garage having the potential for further accommodation and bathroom. Nestled on approximately 0.80 of an acre being made up of a 0.59 acre paddock of land being suitable for equestrian use or livestock...
"A stunning five-bedroom property, with bags of potential, in a highly sought-after area"
The opportunity to acquire a freehold development opportunity with outline planning permission for up to nine units. The site is situated in the suburb of Langton approximately 3.5 miles from Stoke city centre having easy access to the A50. Planning Application number 64656 dated 18th October 2019.
"*WITH LAND TO THE REAR* A fabulous contemporary property with easy access routes to major road and rail networks like Manchester, Birmingham and Liverpool!Consisting of four double bedrooms, a spacious kitchen diner and utility, two fabulous bathrooms, and roughly an ac..."
"Plots 10 and 23 available The Birch is a sensational four bedroom, detached, family house with spacious bedrooms, three bathrooms and a detached double garage all set within the Trentham Fields development where conservation and convenience have become one. A substantial family home set over tw..."
Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Executive Six Bedroom Detached House situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in the much sought after location of Trentham. This is one of the finest properties you will find in the Trentham area. Immaculate inside and out! The spac...
"Plots 24 available to reserve The Rowan is a traditionally designed, four bedroom, detached house with detached double garage to the side. The door opens into a hallway that runs through the centre of the property with formal lounge off to the left and home office and guest WC to the right. The..."
"Situated in a very desirable part of highly regarded Trentham, this well presented four bedroom detached family home enjoys spacious and well planned accommodation comprising: entrance hallway, downstairs cloaks/WC, dual aspect lounge with window to the front elevation and French doors to the rea..."
"A deceptively large immaculate four bedroom detached property set in an elevated position providing with far reaching views over the surrounding countryside occupying a fantastic spot within the semi-rural location of Light Oaks. The property modern home boasts two reception rooms, delightful ful..."
"Life isn't about how many breaths you take, but it's the moments that take your breath away! And with this picture perfect view at the beautiful Light Oaks Avenue you will definitely be short of breath. Beautifully positioned at the end of the cul-de-sac this spacious detached property overlooks ..."
"Definitely one of the best houses we've seen in this part of Lightwood, a house with some outstanding features and its being sold with no upward chain! Step into the full height reception hall and look up to the galleried landing and you'll see what we mean. Walk through into the superb lou..."
"The house that Jack built, this is not! It's a gorgeous home and it's got the lot! Detached, extended and in sought after Light Oaks it does sit This amazing family home you don't want to miss! There's FOUR BEDROOMS on offer and character all through And let's not forget about..."
"If I had a pound for every time someone said 'if only I could pick this house up and move it, I wouldn't be selling' then I'd be a millionaire!! Well, once you've made this your forever home, there'll be no need to ever move again, you have the size, you have the location, you have the views, as ..."
"Move in right away - First time buyers and investors must see this property in person! With no onward chain. This property has been fully renovated from top to bottom, with a new kitchen, electrics, guttering, contemporary bathroom, and modern flooring.&nbs..."
"**OPPORTUNITY IS KNOCKING AT LIGHTWOOD** LOOK WHAT WE HAVE HERE FOR YOU** TWO FOR ONE** UNIQUE IMPOSING PERIOD PROPERTY REQUIRING MODERSATION, WHILST OFFERING ENORMOUS POTENTIAL**FOR SALE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** The RESIDENCE is SET WELL BACK FROM THE ROAD, offering A HIGH DEGREE OF PRIVACY. POTEN..."
"This lovely family home with outstanding views is being offered for sale with no onwards chain. In brief the property comprises: Storm porch, dining room with original parquet flooring, large lounge with front and rear aspet, breakfast kitchen and WC. To the first floor there are thee double..."
"Martin & Co are delighted to bring to market this handsome detached property situated opposite Hanley Park. Currently let as a 6-bedroomed licensed HMO, the property retains many original features and could continue as an HMO or would require little work to alter to a 4/5-bed family home wit..."
WOW what a stunning family home with a great blend of tradition and modern. This four bedroom home is a credit to the current owner
"Maison Haus are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional house in the highly sought after Trentham Court. This Grade II listed property is situated in the corner a charming herbaceous courtyard, tucked away and surrounded by greenery."
"A bespoke and beautifully presented, detached dormer bungalow, situated in a highly regarded and very popular location, on a spacious plot with charming surroundings. The property benefits from a large open plan living room with a dining area to the side, in addition to a bespoke and truly enchan..."
"Located within a quiet cul-de-sac of similar properties, is this small development of three dormer style bungalows built to a high specification. One of just two properties remaining constructed by a local developer of repute"
"Be the Boss of the property ladder at Boscombe Grove! A highflyer of a detached family home in the heart of Trentham situated on a superb corner plot! Living space comes in abundance with something for the entire family, no one will be disappointed with what's on offer here! Excellent schools..."
"Unique four bedroom detached home located on the Florence Estate. Fantastic layout, excellent condition throughout and amazing home-work option. Call Butters John Bee Longton to arrange a viewing"
"This beautiful five bedroom property located on Gainsmore Avenue in Norton Chase really needs to be seen to be appreciated. Boasting three separate reception rooms, study room, fitted kitchen with separate utility area and WC to the ground floor and five bedrooms, two benefitting from ensuite sho..."
"Sugar, ah honey honey, you are my candy home and you've got me wanting youuuuu! All of your hearts desires will be answered with this fabulous four bedroom detached home in the popular Lightwood development. Internally comprising an entrance hallway having access to the downstairs living space. A..."
"THE FIRST BLOOMS OF SPRING, ALWAYS MAKE MY HEART SING and YOUR HEART is bound to be singing, when you step inside this IMMACULATELY PRESENTED five-bedroom detached home located on Woodland Avenue in the sought after area of Norton in the Moors."
"An extended four bedroom semi-detached period home which is full of character and immaculately presented, featuring a garage and generous rear garden!"
Marvellous four bedroom detached family home in the sought after location of Trentham. Recently renovated and modernised throughout. Available with no upwards chain. Possibility to extend subject to planning permission.
"An beautiful recreation of a suburban family home in a popular and sought after location on the outskirts of Trentham. The house has been extended by over 30%, remodelled and refurbished from top to bottom by the present owners to offer comfortable and spacious accommodation which is presented to..."
"Let me introduce you to the king of KINGFIELD OVAL. A majestic and exceptional detached family residence located within this very quaint and pleasant little oval in Basford. Call BRAMPTONS to make arrangements to discover what this superb property has to offer, with a drive, single garage (cont.)"
"DRAFT DETAILS.  Beautifully presented detached house, ideal for a growing family, has spacious accommodation throughout and comprises of Entrance hall, cloakroom W,C, lounge, fabulous dining kitchen which leads into an Orangery, useful utility room with access into the double garage. To t..."
"Queen's Gate offers an exciting range of 2, 3, 4 & 5 bedroom homes in a choice of 12 delightful designs. Set around a private cul-de-sac located off Queens Road, Penkhull, the development is conveniently situated close to the centre of Newcastle-under-Lyme, home to the award winning New Vic Theatre "
OPEN HOUSE EVENT 11TH AND 12TH MARCH! COME ALONG AND MEET THE TEAM!
A superior FOUR bedroom detached residence occupying a generous commanding plot within the highly popular residential area of Trentham. Holding a pleasant position within a small quiet cul-de-sac on the edge of the development nearby to local woodland area and walks. Viewing is a must!
"FOUR bedroom, modern detached family home located on Boscombe Grove in the highly sought after location of Trentham. Within walking distance to local canals, Wedgewood village and Trentham Gardens. Viewing is highly recommended."
Orders up! Today we are serving you with a wonderful four bedroom detached family home situated in trusty Trentham and we promise you won’t be disappointed with what’s on offer here! Everything is well thought-out and this home certainly caters for the entire family. The ground floor ...
"*EXECUTIVE DETACHED PROPERTY*TWO RECPETION ROOMS*Breakfast Kitchen*WC, FOUR BEDROOMS, EN-SUITE to Main Bedroom, plus JACK & JILL EN-SUITE to Bedrooms Two & Three, Family Bathroom. Externally the property has a block paved driveway providing parking for vehicles & access to the Integral Garage. To..."
GOOD SIZED DETACHED THREE BEDROOM STONE BUILT PROPERTY WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. An excellent opportunity to acquire this delightful three bedroom detached home situated in an elevated position commanding far reaching views over the surrounding fields and countryside. Rocklea is a uniquely ...
There’s one final home remaining at Victoria Park! If you’re dreaming of making the Houghton home at Victoria Park your new home then act quick as we’ve only got two left for sale!Now included in our Feb
SIMPLY STUNNING AND DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH STUNNING VIEWS. With open fields to the rear of the property and within a short walking distance into Caverswall.
Absolutely stunning four bedroom semi detached period property located on Queens Park Avenue in Dresden.
"The Kingsley is a BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME with a DETACHED GARAGE. It features a large OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN AND DINING AREA with a utility room. There is also a SPACIOUS LOUNGE which is the perfect place to relax with the family. Upstairs you will find THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, wi..."
"A select development of just five, four bedroom detached homes located in the sought after Staffordshire Moorlands village of Brown Edge. Offering excellent local amenities on the door step as well as access to the good local schools in the immediate and surrounding area"
"**MEIR PARK LOCATION**TWO RECEPTION ROOMS**FOUR GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS** This DETACHED HOUSE comprises of Entrance Hall, Kitchen with a range of fitted, SOFT CLOSE, wall, base & draw units, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES & Breakfast Bar, LOUNGE/DINING ROOM with feature fireplace housing living flame gas fire..."
"Beautifully appointed three bedroom detached family home in Trentham - steeped in original features, with the added advantage of a brand new boiler and generous accommodation throughout including three reception rooms, three double bedrooms and spacious family bathroom with separate WC."
"A well presented three bedroom detached property nestled on an impressive plot located in the sought after and affluent Stockton Brook, within ideal proximity to popular and reputable schools, public houses, local amenities whilst having excellent commuting links. Boasting superb proportions over..."
The Kingsley is a beautifully presented FOUR-BEDROOM family home with a DETACHED GARAGE. It features a large OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and DINING AREA with a UTILITY ROOM. There is also well-proportioned LOUNGE which is the perfect place to relax with the family. Upstairs you will find THREE DOUBLE BEDRO...
* PLEASE FORM AN ORDERLY QUEUE FOR THIS OUTSTANDING FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE * ENTRANCE HALL *LOUNGE * KITCHEN * DINING ROOM/STUDY * LARGE CONSERVATORY * UTILITY * CLOAKS * EN SUITE * BATHROOM * FRONT AND REAR GARDEN * PLENTY OF PARKING
"**** PERFECT LOCATION **** Abode are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented family home in Meir Park. The property benefits from upvc double glazed windows and a gas heating system and in brief offers an entrance hall with guest cloakroom, lounge with a new fitted fire place,..."
"This substantial four bedroom detached family home has been renovated to an excellent standard throughout and offers further potential for a prospective purchaser. The property has an annex to the side, which is currently utilised as further reception rooms, but has its own independent access an..."
"A fabulous private detached property, on a quiet end plot within a cul-de-sac, with potential for a range of uses, such as an extension or second dwelling; subject to planning permissions. A unique oppo..."
Plot 3 - Addison Mead have worked alongside this property developer for many years and are delighted to now present the Foxley Close development.
"The Property I bet all of your life you've searched for a home like this one! This stunning gem on TRENTHAM ROAD certainly is of true stunning beauty. Wonderfully renovated throughout to an exceptionally high standard, it's ready and waiting for you to put your own stamp on it. The absolute jewe..."
"Plot 5 - boasting the only wrap around garden, positioned furthest from the canal."
"The property Jersey Crescent is a superb home with a high standard of presentation throughout and workmanship of the highest quality in all of the internal features. The residence adopts a very pleasant location, in a quiet part of Lightwood on the Florence Estate which is on the outskirts of L..."
"Butters John Bee are excited to bring to market ""The Bowyer "" set on a development of stunning New Homes. Offering great sized living accommodation and finished to a high standard"
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Bowyer is a double-fronted detached home with 3 DOUBLE and 1 single bedrooms. a SPACIOUS OPEN-PLAN kitchen, family and dining area with French doors to the garden and useful utility room. LARGE lounge, OPEN HALL and STORAGE. "
"UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET! LET'S ROCK AROUND THE CLOCK TONIGHT, and dance our way down to Redrock Crescent in Kidsgrove where you will discover this stupendous family four bedroom detached home"
"An immaculate four / five bedroom detached family home, having recently undergone renovation works the home now includes a 27ft fully integrated kitchen / dining room, two reception rooms, utility room and two bathrooms. The home has been finished to a good standard throughout with quality fixtur..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^***The Reedmaker * OPEN PLAN kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS to garden and INTEGRATED APPLIANCES * utility room * EN SUITE to bedroom 1 * brand new and chain free * 10 year NHBC warranty. Discover more about this home today"
"*** MUST BE VIEWED *** A well presented, four bedroom detached residence situated on the highly desirable Florence estate. Offering spacious living accommodation which caters for the whole family and more! Call us to view!"
"If you can't see the wood for the trees in your search for a property Then look no further, this beautiful family home you really must see! Standing proud in Norton Heights on Hollinwood Close It's immaculate, stunning and of high standards of the upmost! FOUR BEDROOMS, DETACHED a..."
An opportunity to acquire a **BUILDING PLOT** End of Cul-de-Sac. Planning permission granted for a TWO STOREY DWELLING - THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE. Popular and convenient residential area. We understand all mains services are located close by and should be available for connection onto the s...
"A spacious two/three bedroom detached bungalow in Penkhull with a double garage, utility room and a conservatory to the rear! Offered for sale with no onward chain and occupying a prime plot on Franklin Road"
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Much Improved Large Extended Semi Detached House. Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in the prestigious older part of Trentham, it will make an ideal family home. The spacious accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge, Stunn..."
"Leadbeater Avenue, a quiet cul-de-sac, is situated in the historic village of Penkhull, walking distance from the village centre. The property itself is full of character, charm and a real sense of history with grand entrance hallway and sweeping staircase to the upper level. On the ground ..."
"A well precented three bedroom detached property nestled on an impressive plot situated in the ever popular suburb of Bucknall in Staffordshire. The property itself boasts two reception rooms, impressive conservatory, contemporary bathroom and sperate WC, detached garage and large driveway offeri..."
"This is a truly exceptional opportunity to purchase a very high specification property in an exclusive development. These bespoke four bedroom family sized homes have spacious rooms, fully fitted kitchens, underfloor bathroom heating and the list goes on! The landscaping on this development has n..."
*PROPERTY TOUR NOW AVAILABLE VIA TOUR LINK* Are you looking for a property with an extra reception room where you can work from home? Would you love an additional extra family room? And also a spacious family sized lounge that adjoins a sizeable conservatory which offers further & ve...
"The Stambourne is a THREE STOREY TOWNHOUSE. Your ground floor has a modern OPEN-PLAN LAYOUT and features a KITCHEN, DINING and FAMILY AREA with FRENCH DOORS that open out onto your rear GARDEN. Completing your ground floor is a WC and spacious under stair STORAGE CUPBOARD. The first floor has two..."
*** BRAND NEW BUILD *** HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT *** FOUR LARGE DOUBLE BEDROOMS *** EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM *** ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN *** OFF ROAD PARKING *** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ***
"Live like a king in this substantial semi detached residence located in one of the areas finest locations. Located just a short walk away from Newcastle town centre, Kingsfield Oval is a quiet and highly regarded area worth exploring. Offered with no upward chain the property enjoys a good (cont.)"
"The Lutterworth is a MODERN AND SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME. The kitchen includes a FAMILY DINING AREA and is filled with natural light with FRENCH DOORS THAT OPEN TO THE GARDEN. The DUAL ASPECT LOUNGE has its own set of French doors. Upstairs, the MAIN BEDROOM ENJOYS AN EN SUITE while the..."
"This beautiful three bedroom family home has space and light throughout with a spacious OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and DINING AREA with FRENCH DOORS, perfect for entertaining family and friends.  There's also a handy DOWNSTAIRS W.C and a light and airy LOUNGE with French doors to the garden. On the first ..."
"*Fantastic Position* Ideal for Families*
A Detached Property occupying a cul-de-Sac position within this modern and desirable development, with well balanced accommodation providing Four Bedrooms & Four Reception Rooms. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with w.c, a study and a snug, a ..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**This WELL PRESENTED, Three Bedroom, (ORIGINALLY FOUR) DETACHED House is located in a highly sought-after residential location. Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge with feature fireplace housing gas fire, OPEN PLAN LIVING DINING KITCHEN with HIGH GLOSS..."
"WHEN YOU HAVE A DREAM, YOU HAVE TO GRAB IT AND NEVER LET GO and when you GRAB this STUNNING home on Danebower Road you certainly won’t be letting go!"
"WONDERFUL DETACHED HOUSE WITH FOUR EXCELLENT BEDROOMS. Two reception rooms, modern breakfast-kitchen complete with integrated appliances, home office, utility area, stunning family bathroom and ensuite shower room to the master bedroom. This property is very well presented and enjoys a lovely qui..."
"Once upon a time, nestled in a picturesque neighbourhood close to a tranquil canal, stood a magnificent 4 bedroom detached home. This enchanting abode boasted an open plan living concept that was both spacious and inviting. As you enter through the front door, you will be greeted by a warm and we..."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Executive Modern Four Bedroom Detached Family Home situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in Lightwood. The property backs onto woodland and is very private. The accommodation is spacious and comprises of: Entrance Hallway, Lounge..."
Comprises mid-terrace 4-bed HMO (all rooms ensuite)
"Spacious detached family home, situated within the popular and sought after residential area of Meir Park. The property represents excellent value for money, offers convenient access to all commuter routes including, A50, A34, A500 M6 motorway network."
"Have you had enough of fanciful fluff and nonsensical nuances? Excellent! For here I have a house, a good house, a detached house in a great location close to city and country, sitting on a superb plot and beautifully presented throughout! The spacious accommodation includes an entrance hallway a..."
"Drum roll please... as we present to you a three-bedroom detached property with extensive living space that we guarantee caters for everyone. Beautifully presented throughout, this property also benefits from an extension and is ready for you to move straight in! The location is great as there ar..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS** This SEMI-DETACHED Property comprises of Entrance Porch, Lounge with Feature fireplace housing electric fire, DINING KITCHEN having a comprehensive range of wall, base & draw units, breakfast bar, CONSERVATORY with French Doors giving..."
* EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME * OPEN PLAN LIVING KITCHEN WITH CENTRAL ISLAND & ADJACENT FAMILY/DINING AREA * SPACIOUS FAMILY LOUNGE * GROUND FLOOR W.C. & SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM * MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM * ATTRACTIVE WELL MANICURED GARDENS * INTEGRAL GARAGE A spacious and...
"Are you looking for a spacious and well planned Three bedroom detached bungalow on The Wood in Meir, Then look no further, Redlands could be the one for you"
"Purplebricks are proud to offer to market this superb five/six bedroom, detached property. Located on the popular, Maythorne Road and just a stone through away from Longton Park. This property has undergone a number of renovations to make it the wonderful home it is today, including new windows..."
"Are you looking for love??? Well they do say 'Home is Where the Heart is' and with this stunning detached property in the popular area of Birches Head you will be sure to fall head over heels! Immaculately presented throughout, this family home oozes style and sophistication. Boasting a large lou..."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Four Bedroom Detached House. Much sought after Meir Park location, it will make an ideal family home. The spacious accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge, Stunning Modern Kitchen, Dining Room, Conservatory, Utility Ro..."
"The Norbury is versatile and cleverly designed home over three stories. Downstairs there's an open plan lounge with French doors to the garden, a modern kitchen and  a handy WC. On the first floor you'll find two double bedrooms and a family bathroom. The top floor completes this home with an imp..."
Butters John Bee are pleased to offer for sale this stunning family home in a quiet location of Kidsgrove
"Immaculate presentation throughout! A beautiful two bedroom true detached bungalow in a highly sought after and very well regarded location offering views of the nearby Trentham Estate, stunning gardens, driveway parking and spacious internal proportions. Hosting a large rear aspect lo..."
"A beautifully presented detached home with ample accommodation to suite a large family. The property is located in the highly regarded Birchenwood Country Park development with a fishing pool, nature reserve and playing fields close by"
"Belvide Grove is a beautiful four - bedroom detached residence located in the popular Chatterley - Whitfield, new build estate. This home is tucked away in a nice quiet location within the estate. It has pleasant views and outlook to the front, with a small garden, a driveway for one vehicle an..."
"Queen's Gate offers an exciting range of 2, 3, 4 & 5 bedroom homes in a choice of 12 delightful designs. Set around a private cul-de-sac located off Queens Road, Penkhull, the development is conveniently situated close to the centre of Newcastle-under-Lyme."
"Situated in the desirable area of Penkhull, this three bedroom detached new build home offers spacious family living. "
"Spacious EXTENDED four bedroom detached family house, situated in an extremely popular/desirable residential area, within walking distance to local shops and amenities."
Plant an acorn and watch it make roots and develop into the beautiful OAK tree! Well come and plant your roots firmly at this stunning detached bungalow on Light OAKS Avenue! Nestled away down a private lane surrounded by mature trees and open views to the rear this spacious bungalow sits on a si...
"A truly special, one of a kind property that has been refurbished at great length! First impressions are everything so when you walk through the door at this home on Fir Tree Road, you can tell it is something very unique. With four bedrooms in total, two on the ground floor and two on the f..."
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate this spacious three bedroom semi detached property in the ever popular residential area of Trentham. In Brief the accommodation comprises of:- entrance hall which leads to the dining room that has double doors leading onto th...
"The Kendal is a four-bedroom detached home. The kitchen/diner/family room enjoys an open aspect with French doors to the rear garden. There's a bright living room, downstairs WC, fitted cupboard and integral garage. There are four good-sized bedrooms - bedroom one is en-suite, and a family bathroom."
"Available to reserve right now! Set within the new Queen's Gate development in the heart of Penkhull you will find these beautifully presented four bedroom homes. With spacious ground floor accommodation including living room, fully fitted kitchen with integrated appliances and separate WC. P..."
"A B C, it's easy as, 1 2 3, as simple as, Do Re Mi, A B C! Let me make it plain and simple for you as this is the easiest property purchase you will make! Fully refurbished and move in ready this immaculately spacious detached bungalow is sold with no upward chain and waiting for a new owner to c..."
Located on the new Queens Gate development in the heart of Penkhull this four bedroom semi-detached home offers versatile accommodation throughout. 
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - SOLD WITH A 6% LEASEBACK OPTION TO THE DEVELOPER GENERATING £18,299.70 PER ANNUM - If you're looking for an investment property where you get an immediate return this could be the one. The house builder is offering a leaseback option where you would purchase this from the..."
"An extended three bedroom detached bungalow at the head of a cul-de-sac within Hanford, featuring a double-length tandem garage and delightful gardens. Backing onto an open green space and offered for sale with no onward chain!"
"Know your WORTH! And never settle for less than you deserve! No need to settle here, I have the perfect, spacious detached bungalow for you on SelWORTHY Road in the delightful area of Norton Green. Beautifully maintained throughout the accommodation on offer comprises a lounge, modern fitted kitc..."
"A WELL PRESENTED DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION AND CLOSE TO GOOD SCHOOLS, AMENITIES AND MAJOR COMMUTER LINKS, ALSO WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO TRENTHAM GARDENS ESTATE!"
"An extended five bedroom semi detached family home situated in a well established area of Trentham. The conservatory and loft conversion are a wow factor!!! with rear views overlooking the brook. Benefiting from gas central heating, UPVC double glazing and gardens to the front rear."
"I'VE GOT A HOUSE, WITH YOUR NAME ON IT! ... And it sits on a large end plot on Pengrove Close, Kidsgrove!"
Lovely family home in the sought after location of Trentham. This three bedroom detached property is just waiting to be your next family home. The location of this property is absolutely perfect for all the local schools with a minimal commute and most in walking distance.
"**MUST BE VIEWED ** A four bedroom detached property located on Padstow Way, Trentham, Close to good schools, canal walks and Trentham Gardens this is certainly a great location!"
"This spacious three bedroom semi detached property, situated in the sought after Trentham area of Stoke on Trent, is an ideal family home. There are excellent schools close by and the property is also good for transport links, local amenities such as shops and golf course. The property is also c..."
For those of you aspiring to take the next step up the property ladder then Blithfield Way should be on your list of properties to view. Located on the extremely popular Norton Heights estate this lovely family home is well presented throughout and offers a wealth of living space for the growing...
Four detached family home situated on Ferncroft Close in need of a little modernisation. NO UPWARDS CHAIN.
Immaculate family home in the quiet cul-de-sac location of Penport Grove. Beautifully Presented Much Improved Modern Four Bedroom Detached House.
Yopa are pleased to present this charming semi detached home in the sought after location of Trentham. Offered for sale with no upward chain!
"BRAMPTONS have been chosen to market this pleasant and very nicely positioned detached bungalow located off the very sought after development of Tolkien Way. Tucked away towards the bottom of the grove this attractive residence boasts a good size plot including a drive, single garage and ea (cont.)"
"***NEW INSTRUCTION*** MORE DETAILS TO FOLLOW *** This delightful four double bedroom extended home is situated on an enviable corner plot and is located in the popular residential location of Packmoor, benefiting from ample off-road parking for multiple vehicles plus a caravan/motorhome. T..."
"The Lumley is a four-bedroom home featuring an open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden. There's also a utility room, living room, handy storage and a cloakroom. The first floor has three bedrooms, one with an en suite. The top floor bedroom also has an en suite."
A 3 bedroom home located on the new build development in the desirable area of Penkhull. Offering spacious accommodation throughout and with local amenities close by.
"**NEW PRICE**Supreme and Stunning are two underestimated words to describe this 'Dazzling' Spectacular recently refurbished FOUR BEDROOM Executive Style Detached Family Residence, presented and offered to 'Show Home' standards by the present owners. The property has been reconfigured to the grou..."
"A very well presented and high specification, detached family home of modern construction in a popular location. Briefly comprising of a large lounge downstairs, wide entrance hallway, downstairs WC, modern glossy white kitchen with built in utility cupboard and French doors leading on to the gar..."
The site comprises a level parcel of land extending to 0.26 acres having a frontage of 50 meters to Grove Road and an average depth of approx. 24 meters. The area of land is undeveloped and forms what will become an extension of residential stock along Grove Road. The acquisition of this site c...
*NEW RELEASE* The Fletcher features spacious THREE STOREY LIVING with OPEN PLAN living / dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden and modern separate kitchen to the front of the home. TWO DOUBLE bedrooms with the master located on the top floor with private EN SUITE and DRESSING AREA
* AN EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW * SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER * KITCHEN * BATHROOM * SHOWER ROOM * DRIVEWAY PROVIDING AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING * GARDEN * GARAGE
"Available on the Sales & Leaseback Scheme only. Get up to 6%* yield from us. *T&Cs apply, please speak to our Sales Executive for more information. .Plot 155: The Neston is a thoughtfully designed with great spaces for everyone to get together and catch up.Available on the Sales & Leaseback Schem..."
"Combine the benefits of a Lightwood location, open outlook and extended family accommodation and you are describing 9 Melchester Grove. Features of this property include three first floor bedrooms with the benefit of an en-suite shower room to the master bedroom as well as an additional grou..."
"Do you believe in love at first sight? If not, we have something that will certainly change that! Prepare to be swept off your feet with this stunning three bedroom detached home on the popular Meir Park development that is perfectly positioned in the corner of a quiet cul-de-sac. With plenty of ..."
"Austin & Roe are delighted to offer For Sale this beautifully presented Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Property with Detached Garage to rear of Property, with garage offering off road parking for num..."
"Wonderfully presented 4 bed detached family home in Stroke-on-Trent, Staffordshire. Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hall way Open-plan modernised kitchen / diner with breakfast bar Access to private patio and garden via french doors Spacious and cosy liv..."
You may need to pinch yourself as your certainly aren’t dreaming… we really do have this beautifully presented four-bedroom semi-detached family home on the ever-popular Trentham Manor development available and waiting for its new owners! You won’t need to lift a finger as this...
"A stunning 4 Bedroom Victorian Townhouse with lots of original features. Located close to the Royal Stoke University Hospital and just a short journey to the City Centre, Hanley & Newcastle. Consisting of 4 Double Bedrooms, 3 Bathrooms, 2 Reception Rooms, Kitchen, Utility and even has a lovely..."
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Mason is a 3-bedroom home that features an en suite to bedroom 1, a contemporary family bathroom, an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area, and a separate living room. Discover more about this home today"
The home of great value! The Grange is a stunning home that features a contemporary open-plan kitchen-diner. Across the hallway a bright and spacious living room opens onto the garden creating a seamless indoor-outdoor space. This home also benefits from a useful utility room and a pr...
"The home of great value! The Lanesborough is a beautiful 4 bedroom detached home that features a spacious living room leading into a contemporary kitchen-diner, with French doors leading out to the garden and a useful utility room. Upstairs you'll find a main bedroom complete with a l..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a semi detached property, which is set over three floors and boasts three good size bedrooms and lovely views of both the rear garden and  separate garden which we have been advised amounts to approximately a third of an acre."
"*** MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! LOVELY 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED, gas central heating, double glazing, KITCHEN DINER, living room, study / playroom..."
"RED, AMBER, GREEN, GO GO GO! We just know that you will want to give this home the green light!"
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer For Sale a great sized detached residence of approx 116sqm which must been seen to be fully appreciated! Comprising reception entrance hall, cloaks/w.c, good sized lounge, study, breakfast kitchen, dining room with French doors, four double bedrooms, two ens..."
"The ground floor is the perfect family space with an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM and a spacious LOUNGE; both featuring FRENCH DOORS opening out to the back GARDEN. A bright and airy hallway with STORAGE welcomes you and there's also a handy DOWNSTAIRS W.C. Upstairs are two double bedrooms, the ..."
"A lovely three bedroom extended detached property which has recently been updated by the current owners to include a new kitchen and bathroom, re carpeting and re decorating throughout. Occupying a pleasant position only a stone's throw from the canal tow path and ideally located for local sch..."
"A delightful 3 storey detached property backing onto fields, thus providing a private garden to the rear. The ground floor of this accommodation is comprised of entrance hall, w.c, cloakroom and separate utility area.
There is a good sized bay-fronted lounge and a large fully-fitted kitchen-dine..."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Three Storey Four Bedroom House. 'The Tower' is the former show home on this much sought after development. A rare opportunity to buy this stylish family home. The spacious accommodation comprises of: Entrance Hallway, Stu..."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Five Bedroom Extended Detached House situated in a quite location in the much sought after area of Blurton. With an abundance of space, it will make an ideal family home. The spacious accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, L..."
"The Clayton Corner features an open-plan kitchen diner and impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden, a utility room, WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs you'll find three bedrooms, including a large en suite bedroom one, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
"A stunning property for an aspiring family; extended, and finished superbly throughout, one NOT to be missed! Come and take a look… "
*	An extended and stylish 3 bedroom detached bungalow*	Impressive modern kitchen with integrated appliances *	Open plan living/dining room*	Luxury family shower room with sleek walk-in shower*	2 double and a single bedroom*	Main bedroom with unique features *	Low maintenance rear garden
IMMACULATELY PRESENTED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION - This outstanding three bedroomed semi-detached family home oozes quality and will definitely win you over! This home has been beautifully presented by its current owners and is a home anyone would be proud to call their own. Boasting stunnin...
Originally a bungalow but now with the advantage of two well proportioned upstairs bedrooms as well as ground floor accommodation offering not only a large lounge and fitted kitchen but also a family bathroom and two spacious double bedrooms one of which is currently used as a dining room. T...
Butters John Bee are pleased to offer for sale with no on going chain this Four bedroom detached family property in a sought after location in Kidsgrove
"Not just a bungalow, this house would make a perfect family home"
"A four bedroom detached residence on the popular development of Brindley Village. The property is found tucked away at the back of the development benefitting from modern accommodation throughout, en-suite to the master bedroom, generous garden space and off road parking with car port. An idea..."
"Three bedroom detached family home located on the popular residential development, Meir Park, offered for sale with no upward chain with private garden to rear."
Findahome are excited to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Much Improved Extended Three Bedroom Detached House situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in the highly sought after location of Parkhall. This is one of the finest properties you will find in the ST3 area. Immaculate inside and out...
3 bedroom detached in a quite peaceful cul-de-sac * Open plan kitchen/dining room * Fantastic sized living room with patio doors to the conservatory * Good sized Conservatory * Guest cloakroom * Two double bedrooms with fitted wardrobes Garage with workshop
"Before you can hit the jackpot you have to put a coin in the machine! Well I hand you the shiniest of coins and will even blow on it for you for good luck! Not that you will need it when you set your sights on this stunning semi detached property in the popular area of Baddeley Green, you will fe..."
"Occupying a enviable plot within the Prime part and sought after area of Trentham with its shops, local amenities, award winning schools and attraction gardens and within a stones throw of all major road and transport links"
"NO CHAIN! This delightful four bedroom detached property is located in the sought after Trentham area and ideally located for the Royal Stoke Hospital, close to Trentham Gardens and with excellent local schools and transport links, this property is an ideal family home and is available with ..."
"Light and airy, the Becket boasts generous amounts of space for the whole family to enjoy. The ground floor features an open plan kitchen-dining-living room with a separate laundry room, storage cupboard and WC. In the master bedroom you’ll find a large en-suite as well as a spaciou"
Plot 85: The Neston is a thoughtfully designed with great spaces for everyone to get together and catch up.
"The Hatfield Corner benefits from a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The bright front-aspect living room, separate utility room, handy storage and cloakroom complete the ground floor. Upstairs, the master bedroom is en suite and there’s a family bathroom."
"NON ESTATE LOCATION - EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE OFFERING SPACIOUS & WELL PROPORTIONED ACCOMMODATION comprising of Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Reception Room/Dining Room with feature fireplace with marble hearth & modern living flame chrome electric fire & wood flooring, Lounge with Brand ne..."
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom home, with a perfect layout for downsizing. The heart of your new home is the spacious LOUNGE that leads to an attractive, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with FRENCH DOORS leading to the REAR GARDEN, perfect for family get togethers and summer BBQ's. Upstairs you w..."
"This EXTREMELY WELL PRESENTED and LOVINGLY CARED for traditional FIVE bedroom DETACHED home would suit YOUNG FAMILIES & GROWING FAMILIES. Close to schools. shops, local amenities and benefiting from EASY COMMUTER access via the A50."
YOU WILL FEEL LIKE YOU'VE STRUCK GOLD when you come to view this FANTASTIC DETACHED HOME in the popular location of Packmoor.
"Guide Price £270,000 - £280,000 BRAND NEW ON THE MARKET, a beautiful family home, located IN A QUIET & DESIRABLE CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION, This IMMACULATELY PRESENTED DETACHED HOUSE compromises of an Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen Diner with newly fitted units, a Conservatory and..."
Beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow on the popular and sought after Eastwick Crescent.
You need to be 'Bright and Beadie Eyed and Bushy Tailed' to get your hands on this period family home!! The vast accommodation comprises of a large living room to the front elevation with feature fireplace surround and mantle. The spacious dining room to the rear elevation has a useful un...
"Situated on a corner plot with ample parking, hardstanding, carport and garage this individually designed detached house has generous room sizes throughout and represents the unique opportunity to purchase a well planned and spacious home in a convenient and popular location."
*** BRAND NEW PROPERTY *** HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND FAMILIES *** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED *** 
"A deceptively large property in a sought after residential location with no upward chain! Three bedroom properties in Trentham are very popular especially at this price. This house on Woburn Close, just off Oldacres Road is set behind a block pave driveway which leads to a detached brick gar..."
"A well presented two / three bedroom detached bungalow located in the popular Weston Coyney within the sought after area of Terson Way, Parkhall being close proximity to the nearby country park. The bungalow boasts two reception rooms, conservatory, garage, and low maintenance rear garden. Origin..."
"The Maidstone is a THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME. Downstairs is a SPACIOUS LOUNGE leading to an ATTRACTIVE, FULLY-FITTED CONTEMPORARY OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with FRENCH DOORS LEADING TO THE GARDEN. Going upstairs you will find an EN SUITE TO THE MAIN BEDROOM, a double bedroom, a single bedroom and a..."
We have no doubt that you will be delighted not only by the location of this property but by the beautifully presented accommodation within. Features include a superb fully fitted kitchen with an outstanding range of integrated appliances together with a very pleasant dining area. There is ...
"*** No UPWARD CHAIN *****Outstanding and beautifully appointed, this substantial mature family home is marketed by BRAMPTONS and must be viewed to appreciate. Enjoying gas fired central heating together with Upvc double glazing this fantastic residence offers spacious living accommodation th (cont.)"
"PRICED TO SELL! Offering a fantastic corner plot, this delightful four bedroom detached property offers everything a growing family could need. Internally on offer there is an open plan lounge dining ..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Beautifully Presented 1870's Gr...
"*DETACHED BUNGALOW* STUNNINGLY PRESENTED* Accommodation comprises of Spacious Entrance Hall, Dining Kitchen, with plenty of fitted units & room for a table, Lounge, overlooking the Rear Garden. Two Double Bedrooms, Main Bedroom having recessed wardrobes, recent new Shower Room. Externally the ..."
"A modernised three bedroom semi-detached property is situated on the Lee in the popular suburb of Trentham close to the local primary school. This three bedroom semi-detached property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing front and rear gardens and a garage. Accommodation comprises en..."
"***BACK ON THE MARKET*** This three bedroom detached bungalow, located on the outskirts of the ever popular Meir Park estate is not one to be missed! Close to local amenities with great access to commuter links"
"This individually designed detached bungalow occupies a spacious, elevated plot within a popular residential location offering excellent access to The Royal Stoke University Hospital, local amenities, schools, commuter and transport networks. This impressive property requires selective modernisat..."
"A fantastic 4/5-bedroom family home in a quiet cull de sac with access to outstanding local schools. It is spread over three floors, offering spacious, modern living. The ground floor comprises of a stylish kitchen/dining area with patio doors leading out onto a pleasant patio area and garden ..."
"This is a stunning family home located in a very popular part of the City - with many amenities close by and also excellent commuter links. To and from the City, Blythe Bridge, Uttoxeter and East Midlands - Derby, Nottingham and Leicester. The property is stylish and well presented throughout a..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN**REQUIRING MODERISATION & OFFERING ENORMOUS POTENTIAL** This DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM HOUSE comprises of Entrance Porch, Lounge with wall mounted electric fire, Dining Room, Breakfast Kitchen with a range of fitted wall, base & drawer units, Shower Room with white sui..."
ALL OUR DREAMS COME TRUE IF WE HAVE THE COURAGE TO PURSUE THEM AND PURSUING THIS STUNNING PROPERTY WILL CERTAINLY BE EVERYTHING YOU’VE EVER DREAMED OF AND MORE!
*** BRAND NEW PROPERTY *** AVAILABLE WITH 5% DEPOSIT *** THREE BEDROOMS *** EN-SUITE TO MASTER *** SOUGH AFTER LOCATION *** HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT *** ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN *** IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND FAMILIES *** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ***
"We are excited to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Three Bedroom Detached Family House situated on a corner plot in the much sought after location of Meir Hay. This property will make a Perfect Family Home. The well planned out accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge, Fitted K..."
"The Rufford is a three-bedroom family home. The open-plan kitchen/dining room has French doors leading into the garden. The front porch, inner hallway, downstairs cloakroom and cupboard take care of everyday storage. This home also has an en suite to bedroom one, family bathroom and integral garage."
"A place in the country? This beautifully presented good sized semi detached bungalow adjoins open countryside to the rear garden and is set within lovely landscaped gardens! Comprising a large conservatory to the rear, a breakfast kitchen, dining room, a bay window lounge, two bedrooms, a bathroo..."
"Butters John Bee Kidsgrove is pleased to offer for sale this Four bedroom Detached family home located in a popular area near to Schools, Doctors + Pharmacy and Kidsgrove Athletic FC"
"A significant development opportunity in the highly sought after location of Stockton Brook. Multiple residential, commercial, and land is available for purchase via auction. Come and take a look... | Immediate Income Upon Completion! |"
Lets cut to the chase and not beat around the bush!! We have for you a highly desirable property at Juniper Close!! This three bedroom link detached house in Meir Park is sure to be popular! The accommodation comprises of a porch useful for storing all your shoes leading to the hallway which open...
"Ladies & Gents this is the moment you've been waiting for!! Its everything you ever want, its everything you ever need and its here right in front of you, this is GREAT Row Grove. A spacious detached property located on the popular Norton Heights estate. Internally, the property offers a good siz..."
"Riley Avenue is a superb detached property on a corner plot - situated in a very pleasant and secluded location. Riley Avenue is situated very close to High Lane in the Stoke On Trent district of Burslem. This property will be appealing to the masses, we have no doubt! Located close to many amen..."
"You need to see this house to truly appreciate the attention to detail! Brand new throughout including a new fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, a ground floor wet room and a tiled bathroom upstairs. Oak style doors really add a quality feel and a big welcoming entrance hall greets you th..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**NON-ESTATE LOCATION** Accommodation comprises of Storm Porch, Entrance Hall with Minton floor, Lounge with feature fireplace housing log burner, Kitchen, Dining Room, Utility Room, Extension, Shower Room with White Suite. First floor accommodation comprises of..."
Have we found the right property for you? This might just be the apple of your eye... taking its place in the sought after location of Packmoor situated on Appledore Grove. Why not feast your eyes on this WELL PRESENTED DETACHED property.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a detached bungalow in an area which always draws a crowd! This well presented, two bedroom bungalow on Rushmoor Grove, Meir Park is definitely not one to be missed!"
"Offered for sale with no upward chain!! This charming mature FOUR BEDROOM semi detached house, offers many fine features of charm and character and occupies a prime enviable position overlooking Tunstall Memorial Park. The property offers great dimensions throughout and should be of particular k..."
Yopa are please to present to the market this detached home located just off Reginal Mitchell Way close to the A500 commuter road. Offering spacious accommodation which prospective purchasers can update to suit their own style this property is certainly worth viewing!
Detached bungalows that come up for sale in Meir Park are in great demand but so often they are in need of full modernisation. That's definitely not the case here and all that's needed is some general freshening up throughout. The bungalow has a modern fitted kitchen complete with oven and ...
"Available on the Sales & Leaseback Scheme only. Get up to 6%* yield from us. *T&Cs apply, please speak to our Sales Executive for more information. .Plot 156: The Raven is our modern home built for family life boasing three spacious bedrooms."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - SOLD WITH A 6% LEASEBACK OPTION TO THE DEVELOPER GENERATING £14,999.70 PER ANNUM - If you're looking for an investment property where you get an immediate return this could be the one. The house builder is offering a leaseback option where you would purchase this from the..."
"""The only way is up, baby, for you and me now"" The only way is Ovaldene Way!! Situated in the perfect spot in Trentham close to plenty of amenities with great local schools too, it has everything that you need and more! Step inside this beautiful three-storey property that is very well ..."
"Butters John Bee are excited to bring to market ""The Turner"" set on a development of stunning New Homes. Offering great living accommodation and finished to a high specification"
The Turner is a brand new home featuring a generous OPEN-PLAN living / dining area with elegant FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden and separate fitted kitchen and downstairs CLOAKROOM. The master bedroom benefits from an EN SUITE with a modern family bathroom for the others. Discover more today...
"You know what they say, out with the old and in with the new… and this superb three-bedroom detached property is the new that you have been searching for! Its time for a new home and this one is sure to tick all of the boxes. Located in the perfect spot in the heart of Trentham, having exc..."
Your Move are delighted to bring to market this stunning Bellway Homes new build. The Turner has three bedrooms and finished to a high specification. On the ground floor there is a living and dining area with French doors that open on to the garden. The kitchen is equipped with a...
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Turner has three bedrooms - one of which has an en suite - a modern family bathroom, an open-plan living and dining area, and a separate kitchen. Contact us today to arrange your personal appointment and start your move today..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - SOLD WITH A 6% LEASEBACK OPTION TO THE DEVELOPER GENERATING £14,459.70 PER ANNUM - If you're looking for an investment property where you get an immediate return this could be the one. The house builder is offering a leaseback option where you would purchase this from the..."
"Available on the Sales & Leaseback Scheme only. Get up to 6%* yield from us. *T&Cs apply, please speak to our Sales Executive for more information. .Plot 157: Our stylish Shipley home is designed to work around modern life with plenty of space to socialise and relax."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Extended Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow situated in the highly sought after location of Meir Hay. Much Improved by the current owners, this is one of the finest bungalows you will find in the ST3 area. Adaptable accommodat..."
There are acres of landscaped open space at the end of Stroud Close and this impressive detached bungalow is one of only four properties in the cul-de-sac. Bungalows presented to this standard are hard to find and this property has been subject to extensive updating in recent years. Features ...
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**LOCATED IN A DESIRABLE RESIDENTIAL AREA**OFFERING SPACIOUS & VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION**REQUIRING MODERNISATION** This DETACHED DORMER BUNGALOW comprises of Entrance Porch, Lounge with Feature Fireplace, Inner Hallway, Kitchen with a range of fitted wall, base & dra..."
"DRAFT DETAILS. This is a mature semi detached house, which has just undergone a complete renovation  and is now ready to welcome new buyers who are looking for a lovely home in a great location. The property has entrance hall with mosaic black and white tile floors, Two reception rooms, m..."
"Sat within a substantial corner plot stands this good sized three bedroom detached property enjoying gardens to three sides and benefiting from two separate driveways providing ample secure off road parking. The spacious accommodation comprises: entrance porch and hallway, lounge, dini..."
"The Express Estate Agency is proud to offer this Three Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £240,000 - £260,000*"
Are you looking for a deceptively spacious Four bedroom detached house in an a popular area with off street parking to the front and open views to the rear?
"Red! Amber! Green! Start your engines and get your skates on, you'll need to be super speedy to secure this sensational house as your new home! This semi-detached family home in ever popular Trentham has been updated within an inch of its life! It is truly immaculate and if that isn't eno..."
"Delightful three bedroom semi detached family home situated in the popular and convenient area of Lightwood. The property has been tastefully modernised and benefits from two log burgers and French patio doors in the through lounge/diner! Externally, the property benefits from off road parking to..."
"Fantastic Offer:New price reduction in effect . Available to reserve with £1,000 per month Mortgage Contributions for 12 months OR reserve with a 5% deposit, using our Deposit Unlock scheme. Upgraded Kitchen. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 59: Designed to suit modern family life, the sty..."
"With over 1000sq/ft of living space the Stratton would make the perfect home for a growing family in our opinion. Set over three storeys with a traditional layout the ground floor offers a hallway, lounge, WC and open plan kitchen diner with French doors opening out onto the rear garden. On the f..."
"Situated on the new Hollington Grange development in Fegg Hayes, this property would be ideal for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder! The property offers spacious accommodation throughout which comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom W/C and kitchen/diner to the gr..."
*** DEPOSIT UNLOCK SCHEME AVAILABLE *** BRAND NEW PROPERTY *** THREE SPACIUS BEDROOMS *** BRAND NEW PROPERTY *** SOUGHT AFTER ESTATE *** 10 YEAR NHBC WARRANTY *** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ***
"Fantastic Offer:Reserve with £500 per month for 12 months towards your mortgage payments. Available to reserve with 5% deposit, using our Deposit Unlock scheme. New price reduction in effect. Turf to Rear Garden. Upgraded Kitchen. Outside Tap. .Plot 65: The Bamburgh is our contemporary show-stopp..."
"Fantastic Offer:New price reduction in effect. Upgraded Kitchen. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 77: The Bamburgh is our contemporary show-stopping three-storey, three-bedroom family home."
"Fantastic Offer:New price reduction in effect. Upgraded Kitchen. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 76: The Bamburgh is our contemporary show-stopping three-storey, three-bedroom family home."
"Purple bricks are delighted to be selling this superb, characterful property in the popular suburb of Dresden - which is in close proximity to Trentham and the City Centre. This is a wonderful property which has been beautifully modernised, to such a wonderful standard internally and externally...."
"As beautiful as the flower itself, 'The Clematis' is a stunning new build bungalow situated in the popular location of Penkhull and is not one to be missed! Within easy reach of local amenities including shops and just a short walk to a bus stop giving access to the city centre"
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this desirable and spacious extended semi detached home situated in this ever popular Trent Vale location which provides ease of access to North Staffs NHS Hospital as well as being well placed for the A34 & A500. This desirable ho...
"A very well presented semi detached family home situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac within the popular village of Penkhull. The property is within easy reach of local schools, shops, amenities, North Staffordshire University Hospital, commuter and transport networks. The accommodation comprises ent..."
"9 Paul Ware Street is a superb , modern property, adopting a corner plot location in the heart of a new build estate. This property is so well presented internally that it is essential to book your viewing....today directly via the Rightmove Advert - and its available 24/ 7 ! Internally the p..."
"House to sell? Then you could move with Part Exchange
We know that buying and selling isn’t easy, but we are here to change that. We can save you time, money and energy with our Part Exchange scheme. How?
Well, we’ll be"
"BRAND NEW HOUSE WITH UPGRADED KITCHEN- A spacious and inviting three bedroom property located on the new Hollington Grange development. The property briefly comprises of; Entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, ground floor W.C, landing, three bedrooms, ensuite and a family bathroom."
Fantastic Offer:New price reduction in effect. Upgraded Kitchen. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 78: The Raven is our modern home built for family life boasing three spacious bedrooms.
Brand New Property | High Specification Throughout | Viewing Highly Recommended Ideal For First Time Buyers | Modern Fixtures And Fittings | Enclosed Rear Garden Off Road Parking | 10 Year NHBC Warranty
"Belvoir Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the sales market with no upward chain this substantial period mid terraced property. Located in the popular area of Basford it is ideally placed within easy reach of local amenities, commuting links, Royal Stoke Hospital and Stoke Railway stati..."
"This unique property is not to be missed. Deceptively spacious throughout, located in the sought after location of Penkhull. Within easy access of The Royal Stoke university hospital and all commuter links such as A34 A500 and the M6. With excellent investor potential"
"This is a beautiful end-terrace property that has been extensively modernised, which means that it is just waiting for the right buyer to enjoy it in all its glory. No work is required to make this lovely home move-in ready. Featuring a beautifully-appointed kitchen and located on the outskirts ..."
*NO CHAIN* Close to Royal Stoke Hospital grounds* An impressive end town house occupying an elevated corner plot position within a local conservation area. The property has recently been partly renovated and there are some finishing touches yet to be done. The spacious accommodation comprises: e...
***AN IDYLLIC HOME SET IN THE DESIRABLE HARTSHILL VILLAGE*** Boasting an impressive Open Plan Living Room/Diner set against a modern and rustic Kitchen which leads out onto a superb Garden with Decked Area. To the front is a driveway which offers off road parking for one vehicle. A real MUST SEE!
"A well-presented traditional semi-detached family home within the highly desirable Trentham area. The spacious accommodation comprises; entrance hall, a bay-fronted lounge with double glazed doors leading to the dining room, conservatory, There is a fitted kitchen and w.c. The first fl..."
"433 Weston Road is a very spacious and stylish home - offering a really modern way of living . The property is located in popular area of Stoke On Trent and internally consists of entrance hallway with downstairs cloakroom, understairs storage, large kitchen with dining area and lounge with pati..."
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Much Improved Two Bedroom Detached Bungalow. Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in the much sought after Meir Park area. Immaculate throughout, it is ready to move straight into. The accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge..."
"Three bedroom semi-detached property located in Trentham. The property is ideal for first time buyers and benefits from new windows and doors, three bedrooms, large tandem garage, block paved driveway and good sized rear garden."
"Situated on a highly desirable residential estate, a rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this MODERN THREE BEDROOM LINK DETACHED HOUSE set over two floors offering a contemporary style designed home. From the entrance door you are greeted by an entrance hallway with convenient WC, next is..."
"HOME SWEET HOME - Situated in the sought-after and highly regarded area of Penkhull stands this fantastic three-bedroom home is located within walking distance of the Royal Stoke hospital and Penkhull village! Featuring a spacious and well-kept interior, this wonderful property boasts a great amo..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain!! This THREE BEDROOM detached family home is located within one of the most sought after local developments, being perfectly located for having easy access to local schools and excellent major road links.  The property occupies a well appointed corner p..."
Stunning three-bedroom semi-detached waiting for a family to call home!
"Looking for a home to move straight into! THREE bedroom DETACHED bungalow, renovated and fully modernised throughout with no expense spared to very high standard! SHOW HOME QUALITY!"
"This modern family home is situated within the beautiful historic village of Penkhull. Situated in The conservation area, within walking distance of the neighbourhood shops, good schools and The Royal Stoke hospital. The property has recently undergone a number of upgrades such a..."
A beautifully presented 2 bedroom new build bungalow in the desirable area of Penkhull. Offering spacious and well planned accommodation throughout.
"A rare opportunity to purchase a MODERN AND EFFICIENT new build 2 bedroom semi-detached home in Penkhull. The Clematis has a light, spacious kitchen with a FAMILY DINING AREA and FRENCH DOORS on to the rear PATIO AREA. The LOUNGE is REAR FACING and there is AMPLE STORAGE with PARKING for 2 cars."
Fantastic Offer:New price reduction in effect. Upgraded Kitchen. Carpet and Vinyl Flooring Package. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 135: The Raven is our modern home built for family life boasing three spacious bedrooms.
A HOUSE IS MADE OF BRICK AND BEAMS BUT A HOME IS MADE OF LOVE AND DREAMS and your dreams are certainly about to come true with this SPECTACULAR semi-detached home on John Ritchie Street in Stoke.
"The home of great value! The Limerick is a beautiful home perfect for modern living. A bright living room featuring an open staircase leads through to a spacious kitchen-diner, where French doors open onto the garden creating, an open-plan flexible living space. Upstairs are two doubl..."
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKET, being sold with NO UPWARD chain a beautiful bungalow located on a quiet cul-de-sac On entering the property there is a porch and hallway which leads to the Kitchen, lounge, bathroom, bedroom, and a small room with stairs leading up to the second double bedroom.  ..."
"This versatile four/five bedroom end of town house boasts deceptively spacious accommodation over three floors. An ideal family home having two reception rooms, dining kitchen, ensuite to bedroom one, low maintenance private rear garden and garage. This family home is offered to the market with..."
"Supreme and Stunning are two underestimated words to describe this three storey three bedroom semi detached house, occupying a prime enviable position with far reaching open views to the front elevation of the property.  The property is presented to 'Show Home' standards by the present owne..."
"A splendid three bedroom detached bungalow which could represent the blank canvas you have been searching for! A generously proportioned home benefitting from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing, but also offering plenty of scope for further improvements. There are good sized gardens al..."
"A large six bedroom HMO situated close to Staffordshire University. Currently rented until summer 2023 at a gross rental of £30,157. The property has been extensively modernised and benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. Accommodation comprises, hallway, living room, kitchen,..."
"A great family sized house in a great location on the ever popular Florence Estate at Lightwood! You'll definitely be surprised by the extent of the accommodation on offer here which includes a small but extremely well fitted kitchen with a breakfast bar and integrated appliances, a big open ..."
An impressive semi detached dormer bungalow in a location that always draws a crowd! The property is to be found situated in a pleasant residential locality close to Longton Park. The generously proportioned accommodation includes three good bedrooms. A driveway provides ample off road parking an...
A wonderful extended traditional three bedroom semi detached house offering generously proportioned family accommodation. Many features include gas central heating and double glazing. Car owners will be pleased to note that there is a driveway providing off road parking with the addition of a det...
Opportunity to acquire a residential development site with outline planning for the erection of four dwellings situated in a residential site in the suburbs of Longton with good access to Stoke city centre. Outline planning City of Stoke on Trent Council Ref: 67775/OUT
"A lovely DETACHED home perfect for a family Sitting on Derek Drive, make sure you come and see! Boasting reception rooms of TWO and bedrooms of THREE Plus an open plan kitchen diner where you can enjoy your tea! Outside is simply beautiful, fully landscaped and low maintenance "
"First Homes Scheme property. The Danbury is a two-bedroom home with a good-sized living room, an open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and useful storage space on both floors. Upstairs there are two spacious bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom and a lifestyle room for a range of different uses"
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** The Tailor benefits from an OPEN PLAN kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS into the rear garden. A front-facing living room, TWO DOUBLE bedrooms with an EN SUITE shower room to the master and family bathroom. GARAGE and DRIVE"
"DETACHED, TRUE BUNGALOW with VACANT POSSESSION How does this sound? This property will definitely make an impression! With a spacious lounge diner and breakfast kitchen And a lovely conservatory for you to relax in! A lovely shower room and bedrooms of two Low maintenance rea..."
"We have a unique opportunity available to purchase these newly built detached homes in a stunning development. Situated proudly in Abbey Hulton, these gorgeous detached homes are ideal for any growing family, with every detail carefully crafted to utter perfection."
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKET, Located in a quiet cul-de-sac, within the popular location This spacious property comes with a generous size plot with gardens surrounding from the front round to the side and rear of the house. To the rear is a garage with parking space.  On entering the ..."
"FREEHOLD TENURE, GARAGE & GREAT FAMILY ACCOMMODATION - Situated on a highly sought after development on Birchenwood Country Park, close to many local walks and pools, this superb FOUR BEDROOM townhouse has accommodation spanning over three floors and would make an ideal purchase for any upsizing ..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME, located on Warners Drive, Weston Coyney. Close to open countryside, local amenities and schools with good transport links"
*** BRAND NEW BUILD *** HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT *** THREE SPACIOUS BEDROOMS *** EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM *** ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN *** OFF ROAD PARKING *** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ***
Space may be the final frontier but here at Festival Close we have outdoor space in abundance. With gardens to the side and rear of this detached property you can enjoy your very own slice of gardening heaven. Hunters invite you to view this family home which benefits from the addition of a conse...
This bungalow has a most impressive appearance together with the advantage of one double bedroom on the ground floor and one double bedroom at first floor level. The property has been extended considerably to the rear which means that it now offers an impressive lounge as well as a fitted an...
"**IMMACULATELY PRESENTED DETACHED HOME** If you have been in search of a beautiful family home with a great sense of space, well planned layout throughout, quality fixtures and fittings as well as a good size rear garden, then scroll no more, this three bedroomed Llinked End Town House is t..."
"A spacious three bedroom end townhouse occupying a very generous plot with a substantial rear garden and close to Royal Stoke University Hospital! Beautifully presented throughout, with two bathrooms and a sizeable kitchen/diner"
"Feeney Estate Agents are excited to bring to market this mature, three bedroom, semi detached home on Drubbery Lane, Stoke on Trent. Oozing character and charm this property is a true delight! You wil..."
"Purple bricks Estate Agents are delighted to be selling the property 72 Riverside Road in Stoke On Trent. This beautiful residential dwelling, maintained and modernised to a very high standard throughout with . Situated on a popular tree lined avenue, enjoying a convenient location close to the ..."
NO CHAIN!!!! This extensive DETACHED home has been recently modernised and is not to be missed with a viewing welcomed to truly appreciate the potential. Residing in the much SOUGHT AFTER area of Baddeley Green on Field Avenue. An ideal location within easy reach of local amenities.
Strike is pleased to present this property in Stoke-on-Trent. This is a very appealing TWO-bedroomed SEMI-detached house occupying a sought-after position close to popular local schools and all local amenities. PERFECT FAMILY HOME!! The property (in short) comprises a spacious ...
"This stunning home is well presented and finished to a high standard throughout. The kitchen is perfect for modern lifestyles and has plenty of storage from the base and wall-mounted units, there is also a utility area and a downstairs W/C. The living room has plenty of natural lig..."
"We have a unique opportunity available to purchase these newly built detached homes in a stunning development with only two of their kind, estimated to be completed in Feb/Mar 2023. Situated proudly in Abbey Hulton, these gorgeous detached homes are ideal for any growing family, with every detail ca"
"First Homes Scheme property. A three-bedroom home, the Souter has an open-plan kitchen/diner, living room and three bedrooms. Bedroom one on the top floor benefits from an en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs WC, two storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
"IDEAL FIRST HOME - A brand new three bedroom semi detached house situated on this new development on the outskirts of Fegg Hayes. Beautifully designed with a modern family in mind, this home has a great layout throughout that will certainly tick all of your boxes. Coming with a 2 year Keepmoat wa..."
Fantastic Offer:£500 per month for 12 months towards your mortgage payments. Upgraded Kitchen. Turf to Rear Garden. Outside Tap. .Plot 66: The Danbury is the perfect home for growing families or those looking for a little more space. 
Brand New Property High Specification Throughout Viewing Highly Recommended Ideal For First Time Buyers Modern Fixtures And Fittings Enclosed Rear Garden Off Road Parking 10 Year NHBC Warranty
"A detached family home in a popular and sought after location, at the heart of Hanford with a host of amenities right on the doorstep. The house has been extensively updated by the present owner offering comfortable, well appointed accommodation and does offer further potential, benefiting from a..."
"First Homes Scheme property. The Sutton is a home designed for modern-day living. Its family-friendly features include a kitchen/dining room, a front-aspect living room and a downstairs WC. There are two first-floor bedrooms along with the family bathroom; the master bedroom is on the second floor."
"Beautifully appointed two bedroom extended detached bungalow with stunning landscaped gardens complete with summer house. The beautifully presented accommodation comprises: generous reception porch with built in storage closet, hallway, modern fitted kitchen, lounge, extended master be..."
"Who fancies a tipple in your own bar?!? Book yourself a viewing on this three bedroom, semi detached home on the popular Vienna Way, Staffordshire - quickly! Internally you will find a welcoming loung..."
SOMETHING SPECIAL!...There is some serious space on offer here in this beautiful three bedroomed detached family home that requires some refurbishment but could create a wonderful family home. Backing onto fields with great potential to extend (subject to planning) what more could you want? <...
"* This extended three bedroom semi-detached property offers some excellent sized accommodation and is presented to an a high standard throughout. * The property is located on a generous sized corer plot and situated in a very popular and well established residential area at Birches Head, offe..."
"It's time to take flight and soar into the sky! Because like the great speed of the SPITFIRE fighter aircraft, this superbly, stunning semi detached property on SPITFIRE Way will surely fly off the market."
"**NEW TO MARKET** Located on the outskirts of the popular village location of Forsbrook with lovely views of open countryside to the rear, you can relax in your garden in total peace!
Close to local amenities and schools with great commuter links!"
"Amazing 3-bedroom property available in Baddeley Green. With 3 bathrooms, large garden, kitchen, huge living room with great views over looking the canal. "
"3 Bedroom semi detached * Large extension to the rear and side * Lounge, Dining Room with French doors to the rear garden * Large Kitchen, Utility and Downstairs WC * 2 double bedroom, Single bedroom, Bathroom * Garage"
"We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £210,000 - £230,000*"
Perfect presentation and a prime location on the Minton Wood Development off Shelton New Road is this 3 bed semi-detached town house which is a very desirable property indeed!
Nearly new three bedroom semi detached property. Ideal first time buyer opportunity. NO UPWARDS CHAIN
"***NO CHAIN***Are you looking for Quality, well take a look at this stunning Two Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow in Weston Coyney and you will NOT be disappointed"
"STUNNING SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE. This beautifully presented property will be sure to appeal to a varied range of purchasers having been lovingly renovated by its current owner this property is perfect for first time buyers, through to those looking to downsize."
Stunning 3-bedroom semi detached home located on a quiet estate.
"***NO CHAIN*** THREE BEDROOM DETACHED *** Located in the ever popular area of Meir Park ! In need of some slight updating, Close to local amenities with excellent commuter links close by"
"Head along the driveway of this two bedroom detached bungalow, step inside, close the door and leave the hustle and bustle behind to enjoy a warm welcome in a home that's cosy, quiet and just lovely."
"A three bedroom semi-detached house in the popular location of Weston Coyney. An ideal first time buyer property or someone looking to upsize. Benefitting from modern accommodation throughout, detached garage and large tarmac driveway providing space for multiple vehicles. The property is loca..."
"Do you like to walk on the WILD side, well take a step over the road and head on over to WILDing Road where you will find this extremely spacious detached family home. Well maintained throughout the accommodation on offer comprises a large lounge. dining room with multi fuel log burner, fitted ki..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**Ideal for First Time Buyers or Downsizers**DETACHED HOUSE** Located on MEIR PARK. Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Kitchen & Conservatory, with Two Bedrooms & Bathroom, with white suite to the First Floor. Externally the property has a t..."
"**New to Market** Spacious three bedroom detached property, located in a popular area close to local amenities, good schools , doctors surgery's and commuter links"
Ingelow Close is most definitely one of the most desirable locations for a bungalow on the ever popular Seddons estate in Blurton! This property has clearly been well maintained and is ready to move into as it is but will perhaps benefit from a little bit of general updating in due course! ...
"Hunters are delighted to present this two bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW. Located on a spacious corner plot and with a driveway offering off road parking and a detached single garage. The property comprises porch, entrance hall, lounge, two bedrooms, shower room, kitchen and conservatory. Beautifully ..."
"This is a bungalow unlike any that you will have seen in the local area! Located in a quiet cul de sac position, this two bedroom detached bungalow is immaculate both inside and out. It boasts a tarmac driveway providing comfortable off road parking, a well landscaped Indian stone patio and..."
"Looking for a home full of charm and full of potential? Take a look at this Detached Home situated in the sought after residential area on the outskirts of Stoke-On-Trent, on The Grange. With an enclosed aspect to the rear and offering a driveway to the front. Situated within a short distance to ..."
Bonnard Close is just off Canberra Cresent and is a desirable Meir Park location! This detached bungalow is set back from the head of the cul de sac behind a wide block paved driveway with a further section of driveway leading to the attached brick garage. The bungalow will most definitely ben...
"Spacious period town house located in close proximity to Royal Stoke Hospital with space for parking located on a separate area to the side of the property. The generously proportioned accommodation comprises: entrance hallway, cellar, lounge to the front elevation with feature fireplace, ba..."
"Feeney Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market, Broadlawns Drive, Staffordshire, this three bedroom detached home is sure to be a popular one! Sat in an ideal location, this home is perfect..."
BRAND NEW - TWO BEDROOM DETCAHED BUNGALOW!! This fantastic newly built detached bungalow may be just what your looking for! CALL NOW FOR MORE DETAILS AND TO ARRANGE AN EARLY VIEWING.
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKET,  a lovely detached family home situated on a spacious corner plot close to local schools, amenities and major commuter links. The accommodation has been beautifully decorated throughout and comprises of entrance hall, lounge/diner, kitchen and bedroom three t..."
"*Cul-de-sac Location* Close to Local Shops* A well presented semi-detached property with a conservatory to the rear aspect. The accommodation briefly comprises:- Entrance hall, spacious lounge with a recently fitted electric fireplace, and a modern fitted kitchen-diner with sliding patio doors i..."
"Residential Development Site
with Outline Planning Consent for 8 Houses"
" A three bedroom cottage style terraced property (bedroom two accessed via bedroom three) in need of some cosmetic improvement and updating but offering excellent potential.  Situated in a much sought after residential location conveniently placed for local schools, amenities a..."
"**IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, FAMILIES OR DOWNSIZERS**Set in a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION on ever popular MEIR PARK**This well presented property affords Entrance Hall, TWO RECPETION ROOMS, Kitchen, THREE DOUBLE Bedrooms, one with the benefit of an EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOM, in addition there is the M..."
Foster Court off Longton Hall Road is a desirable place to live and this three bedroom detached bungalow has immense potential. The property will benefit from general updating but is surprisingly spacious and has low maintenance gardens to both the front and rear. Features include a det...
"BRAND NEW DEVELOPMENT!!!! Summerbank Terraces is a combination of 1 x 3 bedroom detached house and 5 x 3 bedroom terraced houses in Stoke on Trent less than 10 minutes from Staffordshire University and great commuter links to the A50 , A500 and M6. Stamp Duty and Legal fees PAID!!! "
"Outstanding investment opportunity comprising of three properties, which are currently let with an annual income of £16,680 (tenancy agreements awaited) One property is a potential development opportunity subject to relevant planning permission to increase the annual income for this inve..."
"Hit a STRIKE with this truly stunning modern detached house, new on the market and with NO CHAIN! Sitting on a large corner plot and with THREE bedrooms, this chique property also comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/dining room, utility and ground floor cloaks/w.c, upstairs the bedrooms and ..."
"* A pleasantly situated modern link detached bungalow. * Quiet cul-de-sac position * Sought after residential location. * Two double bedrooms, lounge, fitted kitchen and bathroom. * Gas central heating and upvc double glazing. * Off road parking facility and low maintenance ga..."
NOT YOUR AVERAGE SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY! Located in Blurton this 3/4 bedroom property must be viewed to appreciate what is on offer! Close to local amenities with excellent commuter links
"Lovely jubbly!!! In the words of DEREK Trotter you would be a right plonker! If you let this spacious semi detached on DEREK Drive pass you by. The accommodation of offer comprises a large lounge, fitted breakfast kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally the propert..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**REQUIRING SOME MODERISATION & OFFERING ENORMOUS POTENTIAL**BENEFITTING FROM GAS CENTRAL HEATING & UPVC WINDOWS**SET WELL BACK FROM THE ROAD, this traditional SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, is a real opportunity. Internal accommodation comprises of Entrance Porch, Reception ..."
*** DETACHED THREE BED BUNGALOW*** Great potential to turn into your forever home!
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Two Bedroom Detached located on Brookhouse Lane, Ash Bank. This detached bungalow is recently refurbished to a high standard. Ideal for those looking to downsize or move upmarket. The property has a long entrance hall through the middle of the proper..."
Cupid will be reaching for his golden arrows and aiming directly for your HARThill! Love has struck yet again! A home of amorous proportions with stylish modern touches and cosy character combined. A deceivingly large three bedroom detached home that gives the gift of living and snoozing spaces i...
A truly exceptional and very desirable semi-detached house which faces the park and is on the market for the first time in very many years. As well as a prime location and a traditional appearance this house has an unusually large garden as well as massive potential for general updating and ...
"Are you a first-time buyer? We can help you with our First Time Buyer Boost scheme*
Save when you reserve the "
"Hunters are proud to present this beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached property. Located on the popular residential Norton Heights development with easy access to Hanley town centre, and the more rural area of Leek. The property comprises entrance hall, kitchen, cloakroom and lounge ..."
"Enjoy this beautifully presented property situated within easy reach of Burslem Town Centre. Benefiting from large living space with a bay window, a conservatory opening out into the garden and a kitchen/dining space.  Upstairs boasts a master with an ensuite, a double room and one singl..."
"An attractively presented three bed semi detached house, ideal for growing families or first time buyers. Benefits from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. There is an excellent fitted kitchen/diner giving access to the lovely enclosed rear garden. A brick block driveway provides ample..."
Your Move are delighted to bring to market this stunning Bellway Homes new build. The Joiner has two bedrooms and finished to a high specification. On the ground floor there is a front-facing living room which lead on to the open plan kitchen / dining area which benefits from an integ...
"***SAVE UP TO £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Joiner benefits from an OPEN PLAN kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS into the garden, a front-facing living room and downstairs CLOAKROOM. Upstairs TWO DOUBLE bedrooms and a modern family bathroom. "
"If you’re looking for a show home style property, please call us for a viewing on this fabulous three bedroom semi detached property on Trentham Road. With a fabulous fin..."
"A stunning 2-bedroom link detached house offering modern open plan ground floor living. This two-bedroom link detached home in Trentham offers a comfortable and convenient lifestyle. Located in a quiet residential area, the house features modern open-plan living on the ground floor perfect for..."
"Hunters are proud to present this modern three storey semi detached home. Located on a new development close to Hanley town centre, convenient for road and rail links. The property comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen/diner and lounge on the ground floor, two bedrooms , family bathroom and..."
"Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this desirable detached bungalow situated in a cul de sac location in Packmoor which provides ease of access to local shops, schools and amenities. As you would expect this property offers the modern day comforts of Upvc double gla..."
"Priory Property Services are pleased to offer for sale a THREE BEDROOM detached house, occupying a prime well appointed cul de sac position offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN. The property offers great dimensions throughout and an early appointment to view is highly recommended to appreciate the great ..."
"Purplebricks are happy to bring to market this well maintained three bedroom semi-detached property, located in the popular and sought after area of Longton. Benefitting from close access to local amenities, main transporting links such as the A50 and on the door step of the Sandford Hill Primary..."
"NO UPWARDS CHAIN. Recently updated two bedroom detached bungalow in a great location offering easy access to the main transport links, shops and amenities. Sitting on a larger than average corner plot this property offer loads of outside space and also has its own detached garage."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer a nice opportunity to acquire a detached bungalow within a well regarded location and no onward chain, the property is within landscaped gardens with garage, comprising, hallway, breakfast kitchen, lounge/dining room, two bedrooms, conservatory, a shower roo..."
"If you're looking to bag yourself a unique property Look no further, this is a great opportunity! A semi detached Bungalow on a good sized plot Located on Bagnall Road in a lovely spot With a good sized lounge, and bedrooms of two Does this sound like the right property for yo..."
"A recently renovated three bedroom semi-detached house in the popular location of Trent Vale. The property is within very close proximity to the Royal Stoke Hospital. An ideal first time buy or buy to let investment, as the property has undergone a full renovation. Close to amenities, commuter..."
"You can now save up to £19,995* when you reserve Plot 156 – The Mirin.
Was £209,995. Now £190,000 & Ready to move into for Spring 2023.
*Terms and conditions apply. "
"Let BRAMPTONS take you on a guided tour of this lovely and well cared for semi detached residence located in Blurton. Offered with no upward chain the property has been well looked after over the years, benefiting from full Upvc double glazing and a combination gas central heating boiler. (cont.)"
"Occupying a prime corner plot in the heart of Birches Head in Staffordshire you will find this conveniently located home close to local amenities, transport links and schools. Boasting three great siz..."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer a brilliant opportunity to acquire a great sized semi detached house located within open fields to the side. Internally the house comprises a lounge with French doors to the garden, inner hall, dining room, a 20' breakfast kitchen, conservatory, ground floor..."
"Beautifully presented end town house situated on the popular Florence Estate. Fantastic road links to A50, A500, M6 and Longton Town centre. Benefits from three bedrooms, gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. There is a single garage situated at the right hand side of the row of properties..."
It's rare to find a semi-detached house for sale on the ever popular Florence Estate at Lightwood and 93 Charolais Crescent is in a great location and has the potential to add value. Features include three bedrooms together with an en-suite shower to the master bedroom whilst on the ground f...
"A spectacular refurbished detached bungalow on a quiet cul de sac which must be seen to be fully appreciated, comprising a beautiful interior with a lovely layout, a back to brick internal refurbishment with a reconfiguration of the original layout, comprising a lounge to the rear with patio door..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN** DETACHED BUNGALOW SET ON A CORNER PLOT** The Property offers versatile accommodation comprising of Kitchen, Lounge/Diner, Three Bedrooms & Bathroom. Externally there is a Detached Garage with separate vehicular access, The frontage to the property is enclosed ha..."
"First Homes Scheme property. The Alnmouth has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining/living room. It features flexible first-floor rooms, a good-sized family bathroom, handy storage cupboards and parking. Ideal if you are a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"The home of great value! The Glin is a contemporary three bedroom house style that is ideal for family life and perfect for entertaining. The spacious open-plan kitchen-diner features a large L-shaped worktop, while French doors open from the bright living room onto the garden, for se..."
"A large five bedroomed HMO situated close to Stafford University. This modernised property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing . It has been completely modernised in recent years. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room,Wc, kitchen and a further bedroom to the groun..."
This traditional semi detached house offers stylish & generous sized accommodation to create the ideal family home. Upon inspection you are sure to be impressed by the living space it beholds which comprises of two adjoining reception rooms & three good sized bedrooms. Ideally located close ...
"Three bedroom semi-detached family home in Oakhill. Located on a quiet cul-de-sac, nicely tucked away offering a good degree of privacy, whilst still being within of The Royal Stoke University Hospital and nearby amenities."
"You can now save up to £19,995* when you reserve Plot 157 – The Mirin.
Was £204,995. Now £185,000 & Ready to move into for Spring 2023.
*Terms and conditions apply. "
"DRAFT DETAILS. Viewing is recommended on this modern semi detached house which has views over fields to the front elevation. It briefly comprises of entrance hall, cloakroom W.C. attractive lounge, fitted dining kitchen with built in oven and hob. To the first floor there are three bedrooms, e..."
This may look like a standard semi-detached house from the outside at the front but when you view you'll soon appreciate that it has been substantially extended at the rear. Outstanding accommodation is now on offer to include a large ground floor double bedroom together with en-suite shower...
"BRAMPTONS have for sale this superb and well presented semi detached residence located in the sought after area of Trentham. With a spacious drive, single detached garage and delightful rear garden the property also benefits from full Upvc double glazing and a combination gas central heatin (cont.)"
"A Gem of a property we have for you here A beautiful semi with amenities all near Located in Milton this is a wonderful family home A place you will be proud to call your very own With THREE BEDROOMS, spacious lounge and dining kitchen This will be a property you can't wait t..."
* FOUR BEDROOM TWO STOREY SEMI DETACHED HOUSE * EXCELLENT FAMILY ACCOMMODATION * POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION * MASTER BEDROOM WITH SHOWER EN-SUITE * FIRST FLOOR FAMILY BATHROOM AND GROUND FLOOR WC * GARAGE AND PARKING TO THE REAR
"A large five bedroomed HMO situated close to Stafford University. This modernised property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing and has been completely modernised in recent years. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room,Wc, kitchen and a further bedroom to the ground..."
Looking for SOMETHING SPECIAL then stop look and read This STUNNING THREE BEDROOM DETACHED property could offer all you need With a welcoming entrance and cosy dining/lounge that's a lovely sight And a STYLISH FAMILY KITCHEN which really will delight There's a family bathroom a...
6 Curland Place will definitely exceed your expectations! Look at the front of the property and its hard to imagine the extent of the accommodation within which features a total of three bedrooms including a master bedroom with an en-suite shower room as well as a family bathroom and ground flo...
"For sale by public auction at The Double Tree Hilton Hotel Stoke-on-Trent, on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm. Remote bidding is also available via Telephone/Internet/Proxy.
Directly opposite Longton Park, This property could be one to adore!"
"Beautifully presented three bedroom extended semi-detached property situated in the popular residential area of Saxonfields. The spacious accommodation comprises: entrance hall, lounge and extended fitted dining kitchen to the ground floor. To the first floor there are three bed..."
"If it is modern you are after, then look no further than The Mirin. The ground floor features an open plan kitchen–diner with French doors that fill the room with natural light. Upstairs includes a spacious master bedroom with en-suite and built-in wardrobe which is ideal for unwinding in"
"**** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY **** Abode are delighted to bring to the market this well maintained home in a popular cul de sac location. The property benefits from upvc double glazed windows and a gas heating system and in brief offers a hall, lounge, fitted din..."
"A three bedroom detached property situated in a much sought after residential location.  Ideal for purchasers and investors alike having a potential rental income of £695 PCM.  The property is ideally placed for local amenities, schools, Central Forest Park, good bus rout..."
"Hot off the press, read all about it, read all about! A spacious, semi detached bungalow in the popular area of Baddeley Green is making headline news today! Beautifully positioned on a corner plot at the start of a cul-de-sac Cranbourne Avenue is looking for a new owner. The accommodation on off..."
For sale by public auction on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6:30pm prompt at the Double Tree By Hilton Festival Park Stoke-on-Trent
"... No Onward Chain ... Spacious two-bedroom semi-detached situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location on Constance Avenue with access to locally rated schools, excellent transport links, and close to local amenities. Inside the property is bright and spacious throughout and the accommodation..."
"Nestled into a popular location on a quiet suburban residential street, this is a wonderfully proportioned and well presented semi-detached family home, ideal for first time buyers. The property hosts two well sized reception rooms downstairs, with a bay-fronted lounge/diner to the front aspect a..."
"*Guide Price £180,000 - £200,000* Awesome Stoke-on-Trent Home is situated in Longport. The home includes 5 bedrooms and a kitchen with a microwave and an oven."
Butters John Bee is proud to offer for sale with no on going chain this recently built modern semi detached house in Packmore. With three double bedrooms a family bathroom and master en-suite shower room
A great home for First Time Buyers or someone looking to upsize. This three bed semi detached home is located in the popular area of Birches Head and has been extended on the ground floor
"A beautifully presented three-bedroom mid-terrace property sitting on a quiet and sought-after area of Hanley. Offering a lovely, spacious, and modern open-plan kitchen and living room on the ground floor with integrated appliances and a separate toilet. The stairs lead to the first floor wher..."
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKET, A  STUNNING family home in Meir Hay! This extremely well presented THREE bedroom SEMI DETACHED property boasts of a generous sized rear garden and ample off street parking.  On entering the property there is a entrance hall, which allows access to the..."
"This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold Limited. This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days of the draft cont..."
Reeds Rains are delighted to welcome to market this well laid out modern town house. The development is ideally located with easy access to all major road and public transport links and is located 5 min walk away from the Royal Stoke University Hospital. Local include amenities Tesco s...
"Step inside this beautiful 3-bedroom semi-detached home. This With 3-good sized bedrooms, 2 bathrooms and a good-sized garden what more could you possibly want? "
"Recently fully updated and refurbished by the current owners, this well presented and deceptively spacious family home occupies a pleasant position. The property is also conveniently situated within close proximity to The Royal Stoke University Hospital, local amenities, schools, commuter and tra..."
"Purplebricks are proud to bring to market this beautifully presented, modern semi-detached property situated in a cul-de-sac position. Offering easy access to local amenities and major transporting links such as the A50. This property briefly compromises, to the ground floor - living room, dini..."
"*REDUCED* PERFECT INVESTMENT/HMO OPPORTUNITY! VIEWINGS AVAILABLE THIS WEEK - PLEASE CALL US TO BOOK!Investors are invited to view this massive high yield investment opportunity, with five bedrooms and two bathrooms..."
 * A REFURBISHED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED IN A VERY POPULAR LOCATION & CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL SCHOOLS & AMENITIES * THREE BEDROOMS * GOOD SIZED OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/KITCHEN/DINER WITH UTILITY ROOM OFF * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS C.H. SYSTEM * GOOD SIZED LANDING * ...
"With amazing far reaching city views, Feeney estate agents are thrilled to bring to market this fabulous property in need of TLC, Homeleigh in Stoke on Trent. Offered for sale with no onward chain, th..."
 * A MATURE DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED IN A VERY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION & CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES * TWO GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS (BEDROOM ONE WITH FITTED WARDROBES) * LARGE FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. WITH GOOD STORAGE OPTIONS * GOOD SIZED LOUNGE TO FRONT * DINING AREA WITH BUI...
"Traditional semi detached house, situated in a popular Cul-de-Sac Location convenient for access into Hanley City Centre. The property benefits from a good sized established rear garden, off road parking and an open plan kitchen / dining area overlooking the rear garden. The property is offere..."
 * A LINK DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED IN A QUIET CUL-DE-SAC POSITION & CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL SHOPS & AMENITIES * THREE BEDROOMS * MODERN FITTED KITCHEN WITH FURTHER DINING ROOM OFF * FAMILY ROOM TO REAR * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS C.H. SYSTEM * FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM SUITE * WELL MAI...
"Mixed commercial and residential property for sale in Stoke marketed by Samuel Makepeace Bespoke Estate Agents, Milton"
"A substantial end of terrace home with three double bedrooms and two reception rooms, close to the Royal Stoke University Hospital and offered for sale with no onward chain!"
"A modern three bedroom semi-detached house in the sought after location of Meir Hay. The ground floor benefits from a hall, spacious lounge, open plan and modern kitchen/diner and sliding doors to the conservatory. The first floor has three bedrooms and a white family bathroom suite...."
Let me draw your eyes to this little gem looking for a new family! 69 Linnburn Road is a three bedroom semi-detached home located in the popular area of Meir Hay in Stoke on Trent. It is well presente...
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this up to date semi detached home situated in this ever popular Longton location. The property offers the modern day comforts of Upvc double glazing along with gas central heating and in brief the accommodation comprises of entran...
"Steeped in history and boasting many character features throughout, this three bedroom property is apparently the oldest house in Hartshill dating back to approximately 1780.  Situated in a much sought after residential location, ideally placed for the local amenities of Hartshill, UHNM H..."
"A pre-tenanted student investment property situated in the heart of Shelton. Gross annual income £22,480 pa. This large five bedroom HMO is the let till summer 2023 and benefits from double glazing and central heating. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, Wc washroom, kitc..."
"**TRADITIONAL THREE BED SEMI**NON-ESTATE LOCATION**SET WELL BACK FROM THE ROAD** This SEMI-DETACHED property comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge with Feature Marble Fireplace housing gas fire, Dining Kitchen with HIGH GLOSS, fitted wall, base & drawer units, Integrated appliances, Utility Room..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi-detached house in the popular location of Sneyd Green. The property benefits from generous accommodation including two reception rooms, detached brick built garage and off road parking. An ideal first time buyers property close to amenities, schools and comm..."
"This property on Soames Crescent really is the complete package, with three well proportioned bedrooms and a popular residential location. The house has recently installed UPVC double glazing and a gas combi boiler. On the ground floor you will find a spacious lounge with feature fireplace a..."
"STUNNING THREE BEDROOM MID-TOWN HOUSE ON MEIR PARK. Great starter home for a families, or for those looking to downsize - with all the perks of Meir Park on your doorstep! Close to the A50 and routes into the potteries towns, easy access to Stone and good public transport links. Beautifully prese..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Three Bedroom Detached House on Zodiac Drive, Packmoor. This corner plot house offers a large private garden as well as conservatory and detached garage! Located within walking distance to local schools/shops and other amenities this would be a fantast..."
"A well presented two bedroom semi detached property located in the ever village of Penkhull, being within close proximity to local amenities the home offers contemporary living. Penkhull offers great transport links throughout with Stoke Train Station 5 minutes drive away, easy access to A50, A34..."
"And suddenly you know... It's time to start something new and trust the magic of new beginnings! Well why don't you start your new next chapter with this spacious semi detached property on Melrose Avenue. Well presented throughout the accommodation comprises lounge, dining room, modern fitted kit..."
"A SPACIOUS house in Hanley, available CHAIN FREE with VACANT possession, ideal for INVESTORS or FIRST TIME BUYERS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to welcome to the market this charming five bedroom end terrace house in Hanley, available with no forward chain.Th..."
"Newly carpeted, freshly decorated and ready to move into! 96 Waterdale Grove is a family sized semi-detached house in a really popular spot. The property is being sold with no onward chain and as well as UPVC double glazing it benefits from a NEW Energy efficient Vaillant Gas Condensing Comb..."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer For Sale a refurbished semi detached house with no chain, comprising entrance porch, hall, a bay window lounge, dining room, breakfast kitchen upgraded fittings and double oven and with french doors to the rear garden. Two double bedrooms, a first floor upda..."
"Time to set sail, the sun is on the horizon, the coordinates are set, the anchor is up... were heading SOUTH! Plain sailing all the way over to Baker Crescent SOUTH where you will find this immaculate semi detached townhouse nestled away in a cul-de-sac in the popular area of Baddeley Green. The ..."
"A SPACIOUS house in Shelton, available CHAIN FREE with VACANT possession, ideal for INVESTORS or FIRST TIME BUYERS. Call to enquire!Bettermove are pleased to welcome to the market this four bedroom terraced house in Shelton, available with no forward chain.The property is current..."
"Onsetter Road is located on the outskirts of the city centre - on an established new build style estate. The property briefly comprises of entrance hallway, lounge with full length under stairs storage cupboard, kitchen diner, three bedrooms with an En suite to the master bedroom, separate w c ..."
"DETACHED GARAGE / EXTENDED KITCHEN / REAR GARDEN / GREAT SIZED ROOMS / HUGE POTENTIAL ON OFFER / OFF ROAD PARKING / Feeney Estate Agents are pleased to bring to market this mature, three be..."
"A traditional semi detached house. Situated in a pleasant residential locality close to Park Hall Country Park. The home benefits from a variety of features which include uPVC double glazing, gas central heating and two double bedrooms. There is a driveway that provides ample off road parking lea..."
*** SUPERB FAMILY HOME *** This three bedroom semi detached property is beautifully presented and offers great space and is finished to a high standard throughout. Viewings are recommended to appreciate this property
"Quote Ref: JS0070. A NEWLY MODERNISED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Comprising briefly; entrance porch, entrance hallway, lounge with new carpets and feature electric fire, a MODERN DINING KITCHEN with central island and a rear porch. To the first floor is the la..."
There's plenty of off road parking space in the block paved drive in front of this traditional semi-detached house and it also has the benefit of a decent sized garage! Cedar Grove is a popular cul-de-sac location off Hollybush Road conveniently close to local schools and neighbourhood shops...
"Hunters are proud to present this traditional three bedroom semi detached property. Located in a cul de sac in a desirable part of Weston Coyney. The property comprises entrance hall, lounge diner and kitchen on the ground floor and with three bedrooms and a family bathroom on the first floor. Wi..."
"Currently consisting of a ground floor hairdressing salon which has been trading for many years together with a self contained first floor flat. However, potential buyers may wish to consider the possibility of residential conversion of the ground floor to create a second flat and the location o..."
"Perfectly designed with you in mind, The Kemble two-bedroom home is the ideal size for someone starting their journey on the property ladder or looking to downsize. This home has everything you need, from the open plan kitchen-diner, featuring soft closing doors, to a fully fitted family ba"
Wherever you leave your hat that's your home. Tip your cap with a smile for this property feels like home. Hunters welcomes to market this traditional three bedroom family property. With a drive way providing off road parking to the front of the property and a courtyard area to the side and rear ...
Yopa are pleased to bring to the market this beautifully refurbished semi detached home. Offered For Sale with no upward chain you'll love the KitchenDining room and large rear garden!
"A SPACIOUS 3 BED SEMI on FENLOW AVENUE - with a FABULOUS KITCHEN, you can be the perfect host - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED all the way through - This really is a property everyone should view - With SPACIOUS LIVING - it has an easy flow - Plenty of space fo..."
""""" NEW TO MARKET"" A three bedroom, modern extended property! Located within walking distance to Longton Town Centre, on the outskirts of the popular Meir Hay estate, close to local schools and amenities"
"LARGE REAR EXTENSION & HUGE CORNER PLOT - Looking for the perfect first home? We think you may have found it here with this beautiful two-bedroom, semi-detached property located in this highly popular part of Blurton. You'll find excellent shops and amenities nearby, and the property itself is wo..."
"**FOR SALE WITH NO VENDOR CHAIN**POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION** This SEMI-DETACHED Bungalow is located on a CUL-DE-SAC in the DESIRABLE AREA of Weston Coyney. Accommodation comprises of Carport with electric roller door, Entrance Porch, Reception Hall, Lounge/Diner with French doors leading t..."
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market this well presented and spacious semi detached home situated on a corner plot which offers a potential buyer scope to extend to the side (Subject to usual planning and building regulations). The location is perfect for access to loca...
"New home, new beginnings, new memories! Is it time for a fresh start? A new place to call home? I have the perfect opportunity for you to purchase a spacious semi detached property, nestled away down a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular area of Sneyd Green. Sold with no upward chain, the accommodati..."
"To be offered For Sale by Public Auction to be held on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm at the Doubletree by Hilton, the Festival Park, Stoke-on-Trent"
Situated in a convenient cul de sac location on the Eaton Park Estate. Internally you will find that the bungalow has been modernised to a good standard throughout. And a viewing is strongly recommended. Council Tax Band B. EPC Grade D.
"What you want, baby I got it! What you need, you know I got it! All im asking is for you to come and view me! A stunning semi detached property in the popular area of Sneyd Green. St Margarets Drive is immaculately maintained throughout and the accommodation comprises a lounge opening into a dini..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE Findahome Online are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £160,000 for 10 Lynn Street, Weston Heights, ST3 6QL. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Findahome Online, 80 Victoria Road, Fenton, ST4 2JX, before exchange of contracts."
"Purple bricks are delighted to be selling this property in a very quiet and private cul de sac location with no upward chain. Internally the property briefly comprises of entrance hallway, lounge with working log burner, large kitchen with space for breakfast bar/island and plumbing for a dishwa..."
"DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME, POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION. This deceptively spacious family home is situated in a popular residential location offering excellent access to local amenities, schools, hospital, commuter and transport networks. Selective modernisation is required offering poten..."
"Findahome are pleased to offer to the market this Well Presented Two Bedroom Semi-Detached House situated in the much sought after area of Weston Coyney. Tastefully decorated throughout, this lovely home is ready to move straight into. The spacious accomodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge with..."
"Exceptionally well maintained end terrace property in a well sort after quite area of Penkhull boasting high levels of insulation to walls, floors, ceilings & roof. Painted in neutral colours enabling the new owners to put their stamp on it including period features. No work required just sim..."
"A modernised four bedroomed student investment property, situated in the heart of Shelton close to Staffordshire University. This four bedroom, property comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, kitchen and bathroom at ground floor level with three bedrooms to the first floor. The property benefit..."
"*NO CHAIN* If you are searching for a quiet space to enjoy, you are invited to view this well-maintained substantially sized, 2 BEDROOM, DORMER BUNGALOW on the quiet Selworthy Road with no onward chain. All the living space y..."
"This is a property that will make you say ""WOW"" So do not delay, arrange your viewing NOW! On popular Milton Road this beautiful house sits With it's THREE BEDROOMS and useful loft room, it's sure to be a hit! Offering open plan living and plenty of space for a family Driveway..."
"A fully modernised four bedroom HMO property situated in the heart of Shelton close to Staffordshire University. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and is partially let till summer 2023 at £10,296 inc bills. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, ..."
"First time buyers, investors, this ones perfect for you! The location is great, with everything you need close by including schools, shops, amenities and good commuter links."
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - A well presented, tenanted, spacious two bed semi detached house set on a large corner plot and in a sought after residential location. The property is being sold with tenants in situ and benefits from kitchen/diner, lounge, porch, two double bedrooms, bathroom, detached do..."
"A completely modernised four bedroom terraced property situated close to Staffordshire University producing £14,820 per annum including utility bills. The property benefits from Double glazing and central heating. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, WC, living room kitchen and office ..."
"New to the market with no upward chain! Belvoir Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the sales market this traditional semi detached property occupying a generous corner plot in the popular area of Meir, with ease of access to A50 commuting link, local amenities and schools. This spacious..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION - MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! LOVELY 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT, MODERN KITCHEN, living room / diner, downsta..."
In the same ownership for many years and a traditional semi-detached house which clearly has a great deal of potential for general updating and possibly extension to the rear subject to appropriate consent being obtained. This house is in a very popular location within walking distance of Lo...
"SUMMER DAYS DRIFTING AWAY TO OH OH THE SUMMER NIGHTS! EVERY DAY WILL BE SUMMER FOR THE LUCKY OWNER OF THIS ABSOLUTELY BEAUTIFUL HOME. You will be amazed when you come to view this THREE BEDROOM HOUSE, that has that feeling of being semi detached, on Summerville Road, Trent Vale, Newcastle Under Lyme"
"Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Beautifully Presented Modern Two Bedroom Mews. Situated on the much sought after Florence development, it will make an ideal first time buy. Sensibly priced, excellent value for money. The accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Stunning Modern Fi..."
Very well maintained and expensively updated and improved by the present owner and a property that is situated in a very good location just off Highfield Drive and within comfortable distance of local schools and access to the A50 at Heron Cross. This property benefits from triple glazing thro...
ATTENTION INVESTORS - EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY YIELDING ABOVE 5% NET! Three bedroom townhouse in a very popular residential location in Stoke-on-Trent.
YOU MAY HAVE BEEN SAILING THE SEA’S LOOKING FOR YOUR PERFECT HOME but this property on BOATMAN CLOSE is where you’ll be throwing down the anchor. This STUNNING three storey town house is the perfect purchase for any first time buyer or family alike.
"RED, AMBER, GREEN, GO GO GO! We just know that you will want to give this home the green light! Make sure you are in ""first gear"" to move ahead as soon as possible... as opportunities like this one don't come along every day!"
"ATTENTION INVESTORS!!! **VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE** This spacious mid terrace home is offered for sale with the added benefit of being sold with a tenant in situ with no onward chain, and would be a superb find for any aspiring first time Investor, or existing landlord wanting..."
"When you swim you don't grab hold of the water, because if you do you will sink. Instead, you relax, and float and if you keep on floating you will be greeted at the end with this beautiful property on Ivory Close."
Just off Weston Road and the first house at the Weston Coyney end of Brookwood Drive. This semi-detached house was sold by us to the present owner back in 2018 but it now has a totally different feel. An orangery has been constructed at the rear of the property and access to the loft has...
"A hidden gem tucked away down a quiet lane overlooking Longton Cemetery is a beautifully presented Terraced home. The spacious family accommodation briefly comprises: Two reception rooms, three double bedrooms and first floor bathroom. Benefits from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. T..."
NEW INSTRUCTION! Available For Viewings. (Full Details Will Follow Once Approved By Our Vendors.) 
You'll find this excellent modern semi-detached house on a small and popular development close to the Mitchelin/Sideway access to the A50/A500. The house really is in a very convenient location and contains practical accommodation which is ready to move into and has UPVC double glazing throu...
"Recently refurbished four bedroomed student property situated in the heart of Shelton close to Staffordshire university. This modernised property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and a newly fitted kitchen and bathroom. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, kitch..."
NO CHAIN!!! IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS!!Delightful two bedroom mid town house is situated on a popular and sought after newly built modern residential development offering a fantastic ideal home for first time buyers.
"Purple Bricks are delighted to be selling this home in the popular Fenton suburb of Stoke On Trent. Internally the property is deceptively spacious offering a unique layout and very pleasant home for a family or couples alike. The property briefly comprises of fore-courted entrance with porch, ..."
We are pleased to welcome to the sales market this three bedroom semi-detached family home. Smithyfield Road is situated in the ever popular location of Norton Stoke On Trent. Having undergone a full refurbishment the property is being offered for sale with no onward chain the property offers wel...
"DRAFT DETAILS. Well presented semi detached house, situated on the outskirts of Longton Town Centre, with great commuter links to the Potteries and Derby Towns. The accommodation has an attractive lounge with stairs off, modern fitted dining kitchen, to the first floor there are two bedrooms a..."
"We'll forget the sun in his jealous sky, as we lie in FIELDs of gold! You will feel like you have well and truly hit the jackpot with this stunning semi detached property on MAYFIELD Avenue. Beautifully presented throughout the property has been refurbished to a high standard and is move in ready..."
"**INVESTORS ONLY- TENANTS IN SITU* New to the market with no upward chain! This quirky three bedroom cottage is ideally located within close proximity of Royal Stoke Hospital, nearby town of Newcastle, local amenities, commuting links and recreational park area."
"For sale by public auction at The Double Tree Hilton Hotel Stoke-on-Trent, on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm at the DoubleTree by Hilton Stoke on Trent, Etruria Hall Festival Way, Stoke-on-Trent ST1 5BQ"
"Findahome are pleased to offer to the market this Impressive Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House situated in the much sought after location of Adderley Green. Offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN, the property is available for immediate occupation. The accomodation briefly comprises of: Ent Hall, Spacious ..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Three bedroom Semi-Detached House on Dickenson Road East, Sneyd Green. This property has undergone improvements by the current seller and now just needs the finishing touches adding to complete the transformation into a modern family home. The proper..."
Attention first time buyers. Fully modernised and renovated throughout by the current owners and ready to move straight in to. Available with no upwards chain.
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market this traditional double bay fronted semi detached home in need of modernisation / upgrade to the market in this popular and convenient location The property is majority Upvc double glazed and offers gas central heating and in brief t...
We are pleased to welcome to the sales market this very well presented three bedroom family home situated on a popular modern development in Hanley. An internal viewing is essential to appreciate the size and condition of this family home. To the ground floor there is a WC open plan kitchen/lo...
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION - MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, modern breakfast kitchen / living room..."
"An internal viewing is essential to appreciate both the size and condition of this immaculately presented three bedroom family home. To the ground floor there is a useful WC and the open plan kitchen/lounge which benefits from upgraded units and appliances, there are also double glazed patio door..."
"A family sized extended semi detached house in a popular locality. Ideal for first time buyers but would also suit investors. The generously proportioned accommodation comprises: Lounge, GF bathroom/WC, kitchen/diner, conservatory and three bedrooms. There is a driveway providing off road parking..."
"You MAY be thinking it's time to get on the property ladder and build your investment portfolio? Well look no further, we MAY have just found you the perfect opportunity on MAYfield Avenue. Sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN you MAY need to act fast to secure this ready-made home. This extremely spacious ..."
"A wonderful modern two bedroom semi-detached house in a highly regarded residential neighbourhood. The property boasts a host of outstanding features to include gas central heating, UPVC double glazing and driveway providing ample parking. There are pleasant gardens to the front and rear. The att..."
"This semi-detached home has a lot to offer its new owners and
presents a great opportunity for buyers searching for a property to put their own stamp on. With three bedrooms, two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, a three-piece bathroom, a large garden, on-street parking and more. This property i..."
"Are you a first time buyer looking for a spacious traditional home suitable for you and your family? Look no further with this beautiful, fully renovated three bedroom home, complete with a brand new kitchen and three lar..."
"*NO CHAIN* A well positioned and well presented semi-detached house, set back from the road via a long garden and a detached garage. The layout consists of an entrance hallway with a staircase leading to the first floor, a lounge-dining room with an attractive gas fireplace and an extended fitte..."
A three bed semi detached property that has been cared for and loved for many years by the current owner is now available for you to buy!
"A three bedroom end townhouse in the popular location of Milton within walking distance to the village. The property benefits from double glazing, en suite to master bedroom and off road parking. An ideal first time buy or buy to let property. Close to amenities, commuter links and schools. Vi..."
"Semi detached bungalow with generous sized plot, ample parking and garage which is situated in a popular residential location. The property requires modernisation throughout and is offered with no chain involvement. "
* A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE * SPACIOUS LOUNGE * KITCHEN/DINING ROOM * DRIVEWAY PROVIDING AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING * GARDEN TO THE REAR.
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN*** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET INVESTMENT*** Your Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this spacious three bedroom semi detached property offered For Sale with no onward chain situated on the outskirts of Longton Town Centre. In brief...
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer to the market place this superbly presented two bedroom semi detached House. The property has been thoroughly refurbished by its present owners and comprises of the following: Entrance hall, open plan lounge/dining room/conservatory. In addition there is a fully..."
"*** ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS *** This stunning property has been renovated to a high standard throughout and certainly needs to be viewed to be appreciated. Located in Weston Coyney, this is one not to be missed!!!"
"A fantastic family home at an affordable price! Much sought after location, close to Longton Town Centre and within easy walking distance of the highly regarded, St Thomas More Catholic Academy. The spacious accommodation comprises of: Ent Hall, Lounge, Attractive Dining Kitchen, Ground Floor WC,..."
"We are pleased to bring to the sales market this extended traditional three bedroom Semi Detached house. Situated in the popular area of Chell, has been modernised over the years. In general the property sits on a generous plot and benefits from a having a driveway and a lawned area to the fron..."
"SPRING: A LOVELY REMINDER OF HOW BEAUTIFUL CHANGE CAN BE...THIS HOME IS CERTAINLY GOING TO BE A BEAUTIFUL CHANGE FOR YOU. We are delighted to present this STUNNING three-bedroom, semi-detached property located on Greasley Road in the popular location of Bucknall."
"*** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY*** MUST BE VIEWED*** This Property is situated within the area of Meir and is absolutely perfect for a FIRST TIME BUYER OR SOMEONE UP SIZING. The property is close to all amenities, commuter links such as the A500 and A50 and has schools nearby and a viewing is stron..."
"*Two bedroom semi detached bungalow in a quiet secluded location * Currently one bedroom, could easily be converted back to a 2 bedroom * Tucked away on the quiet and leafy spot"
"BTL investment with sitting tenant paying £750pcm. This three bedroom semi detached property is being offered with no upward chain. Located with easy access offered to the Royal Stoke hospital, Newcastle Under Lyme and the A500. Plenty of shops and local amenities on hand literally just dow..."
3 bed semi detached house in Hartshill
"This three bedroom semi-detached home is perfectly placed within Trent Vale, occupying a prime position close to Royal Stoke University Hospital and St Joseph's College! this home should tick a number of boxes for families looking to purchase a home in an incredibly convenient location. "
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Your Move Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this delightful semi-detached true bungalow situated within the popular and convenient residential area of Westonfields offering easy access to local amenities and transport links. The property is well presente...
"PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. We are pleased to bring to the sales market this stunning three-bedroom townhouse/end terraced house which is perfect for investors. As you enter the property through the front courtyard, there is a nice-sized hallway which leads to the lounge area then through t..."
"4 Bedroom, 2 reception rooms, 2 bathrooms - Ideal Investment property "
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully restored and updated town house situated in this convenient Longport location. The vendors have gone through this property with a fine toothcomb and restored the charm and character this wonderful home has to offer...
"Austin & Roe are pleased to bring to the market this Three Bedroom Terraced Property with on street parking close to local amenities. The property comprises an Entrance Hall, Living Roo..."
"A four Modernised bedroom student property, situated close to Staffordshire university. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, kitchen and bathroom are ground floor level with three bedrooms to the first floor. At the rear is a paved yard with pedestrian access. The property is le..."
"Attention first time buyers and buy to let investors. Superb opportunity to acquire this delightful modern day semi detached family home situated in this ideal Burslem location providing ease of access to local shops, schools and amenities along with being near local access roads. "
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN*** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY*** Your Move are pleased to bring to market this well presented two bedroom semi detached property situated in Meir. It was originally a three bedroom property but the previous owners converted it to a two bedroom with a first floor shower room W/...
Three bedroom semi detached property situated in Blurton. Wonderful first time buyer opportunity ready to go and move in to. This property has been well maintained and modernised over time by the current owner and would be a great opportunity to get yourself on the property ladder.
"IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY / FAMILY HOME.
This very well presented three bedroom semi detached family home is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac within easy reach of local schools, amenities, commuter and transport networks. The accommodation comprises, entrance porch, hallway, lounge, dining room, modern ..."
"Hunters are pleased to present this semi detached property located in a cul de sac with open green space close by. The property comprises entrance hall, kitchen lounge on the ground floor and with two bedrooms and bathroom on the first floor. There are gardens to the front and rear and with a dri..."
 * A MATURE SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED IN A QUIET POSITION AND CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES * THREE BEDROOMS * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. * GOOD SIZED THROUGH LOUNGE/DINER * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS C.H. SYSTEM * FITTED KITCHEN * CONSERVATORY * FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM SUITE * LOW MAINTENANCE RE...
"Findahome are pleased to offer to the market this Newly Renovated Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House situated in the highly desirable location of Meir. Offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN, the property is available for immediate occupation. It will make an Ideal First Time Buy. The accomodation briefly c..."
"A spacious three bedroom end terraced property situated in a much sought after residential location ideally placed for local amenities,  schools and UHNM Hospital Complex making it an ideal purchase for buyers and investors alike with a potential rental income of £695 PCM. "
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Two Bedroom Semi-Detached Bungalow located in a quiet residential area. Benefiting from an Upvc entrance porch, spacious kitchen diner, large lounge, low maintenance garden with detached garage and large conservatory this Bungalow would be ideal for ..."
"LOOKING FOR SOMETHING A LITTLE DIFFERENT - A well presented three bedroom semi detached house which is set over three floors. This fabulous home is terrific for any budding family! Situated within close proximity to excellent local shops and amenities, this has been kept to a fantastic standard t..."
Are you searching for THE ONE. Well this one could be it! A lovely 2 bed Semi Detached Home in Park Hall could be just what you have been searching for
"A well presented two bedroom semi-detached home in Hanford, featuring three reception rooms including a Conservatory to the rear, as well as a generous rear garden! An ideal first time buy or family home, close to schools and commuting links"
***VIEWING RECOMMENDED*** Your Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented three bedroom semi detached property within the popular residential area just on the edge of Bentilee. Situated on Calvery Crescent this property is located within easy reach of all th...
We are pleased to welcome to the sales market this three bedroom semi-detached family home. Pinfold Avenue is situated in the ever popular location of Norton Stoke On Trent. Having been well maintained and improved by the current vendors the property would be of particular interest to first time ...
Looking to get onto the property Ladder? Looking to downsize? Don't let this fantastic opportunity pass you by! This fabulous three bedroom townhouse has been tastefully updated throughout and is well maintained by the current owners being ready to move straight in to! To the ground floor there i...
"Deceptively spacious three bedroomed mid townhouse located in Goldenhill, Stoke on Trent - with garage and parking to rear."
"Chaplin Road is situated in a very popular and much sought after suburb of Stoke On Trent. With many local amenities and school close by and all within walking distance - along with the local Longton Cottage Hospital nearby. The road links are very good and the A50 links you to Stoke On Trent,..."
"For Sale by Online Auction, Starting Bid of £140,000 Terms and Conditions Apply. A fantastic opportunity to buy a Four Bedroom Terrace House situated in the heart of Shelton, within easy walking distance of Staffordshire University. Offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN, it is available with immediat..."
"On your marks, get set… go! The race is on for this fantastic two bedroom mews property in Penkull, perfectly positioned with great commuter links, close to the Hospital and within walking distance to plenty of amenities! First time buyers, investors and those looking to downsize this prop..."
ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A LOVELY THREE BED SEMI DETACHED HOME IN BLURTON- THEN LOOK NO FURTHER
IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET THREE BEDROOMS LOUNGE AND DINING KITCHEN EPC GRADE D GAS CENTRAL HEATING AND DOUBLE GLAZED MODERN BATHROOM W/C GROUND FLOOR CLOAKROOM W/C GARDENS FRONT AND REAR DRIVEWAY VIEWING RECOMMENDED
"Call us 9AM - 9PM -7 days a week, 365 days a year! Be a bright spark and head straight for Brighton Street to find your perfect recently refurbished home. If you are looking for something to move straight into and relax then you won't regret viewing this one as it has new bathroom and kitchen,..."
"Are you looking for a superbly presented two bedroom town house, conveniently located for schools, amenities and Longton town centre?"
"IDEAL FAMILY HOME, CONVENIENT LOCATION.
This extremely well presented, semi detached family home is situated on the periphery of the City Centre offering excellent access to local amenities, schools, commuter and transport networks. The accommodation comprises, entrance hall, cloakroom w/c, fanta..."
"A well positioned semi-detached property offering plenty of potential, requiring some cosmetic improvement. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with staircase to the first floor, a spacious lounge and a modern fitted kitchen-diner and a lobby with a w.c.
The landing provides access into e..."
"Perfect for first time buyers, this well presented home would suit those looking to get their feet firmly on the property ladder. Dividy Road is an ideal first home and must be viewed to be appreciate..."
"Findahome are pleased to offer to the market this Large Three Bedroom Terrace House. Currently operating as a Hair Salon, it could continue to be used for commercial purposes or easily converted into a house of multiple occupancy. Prime central location, close to Hanley City Centre. The spacious ..."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer For Sale a beautifully presented town house with a spacious and high specification interior within! Comprising lounge/dining room, a stunning white kitchen diner, three bedrooms, a first floor landing, an updated good sized bathroom with a separate shower. E..."
"A modern three bedroom end town house ideal for buyers and investors alike with a potential rental income of £620 PCM.  Situated  in a popular residential location giving easy access to local shops, amenities, retail park and giving access to commuter road links. "
** INVESTORS ONLY ** Findahome are delighted to offer to the market this Immaculately Presented Large Three Bedroom Town House situated on a quiet street in the much sought after location of Dresden. Ideal for Buy-to-let investors. The property has a tenant in situ. The tenant is paying £550...
Martin & Co are pleased to bring to the market this well presented three bedroom semi detached home. Located in the popular are of Bucknall this property offers well planned accommodation throughout. An early viewing is highly recommended.
" A larger than average two bedroom fore courted town house situated in a popular residential location, ideally placed for Stoke Town Centre, railway station, the UHNM Hospital Complex, local schools and giving access to excellent commuter roads. "
"Shiny and sparkly and beautifully brand new, lovingly wrapped up in a colourful bow! This stunning, end terraced property has been fully refurbished to the highest of standards. With no corner left untouched, this spacious and bright property is on the market and looking for a new owner to call i..."
"23 Kensington Road is situated on a very pleasant and quiet road in the popular area of Oakhill, Stoke on Trent. Oakhill is a lovely area and has close links to nearby Penkhull Village, Stoke town centre and the Royal Stoke University Hospital. The area has many amenities all within walking dist..."
"Happy home hunters let me marry you up with this immaculate and spacious semi detached property and you can be like two PEAS in a pod!! This well maintained and move in ready property on PEAScroft Road is one not to be missed! Boasting a spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen/diner, utility room ..."
 * A MATURE END TOWN HOUSE SITUATED CLOSE TO WESTPORT LAKE & ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & GREAT COMMUTER LINKS * THREE BEDROOMS * FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. * CONSERVATORY TO REAR * FITTED KITCHEN * U.P.V.C DOUBLE GLAZING * GAS C.H. SYSTEM * GARAGE TO REAR & DRIVE TO FRONT ...
"Attetntion all first time buyers!!! Three bedroom semi detached house, with off road parking, offering good sized rooms with the potential to improve. Set in a cul de sac location in the sought after location of Blurton this property is crying out for someone to make it there own! "
"YOU'VE GOT THE ""GREEN"" LIGHT TO TAKE THIS STUNNING PROPERTY TO MAKE IT YOUR OWN! This property on Drayton Green in the popular Bucknall area is certain to be the perfect buy!"
"A three bedroom town house situated in a popular residential location. Benefiting from off road parking, 16ft living room, downstairs WC and is offered to the market with no upwards chain. Accommodation within briefly comprises of an entrance hall, cloakroom housing WC, kitchen, living room and..."
"The Property on Evesham Way is in a desirable and very quiet location - situated on the outskirts of Weston Coyney and Longton town centre. The property itself comprises of entrance hallway, bathroom, one double bedroom to the rear, lounge, kitchen and externally it benefits from a driveway and..."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Stoke-on-Trent.
In a really popular position on the service road which runs alongside Dividy Road at Berryhill. You'll definitely be impressed by the size of the bedrooms that this town house has to offer as well as the fact that it has UPVC double glazing throughout and a modern gas fired combi boiler for ...
"Conveniently situated for some excellent local shopping facilities within the area, this terraced, cottage style property is ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS & INVESTORS!!! Viewing is a must"
"*** NEW TO MARKET *** Three bedroom semi detached property situated in Greenway, Blurton, quiet cul-de-sac location, close to local amenities and with great commuter links"
Reeds Rains Hanley are proud to offer to the market this spacious Three Bedroom Mid Town House Situated within the popular and convenient residential area of Adderley Green. The property is well presented throughout with modern décor and is sure to appeal to first time buyers and families ...
"Good size EXTENDED END TOWN HOUSE, set well back from the road, with pedestrian gated access leading to the front garden. Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Breakfast Kitchen, Bathroom, with Three Bedrooms & WC, wash hand basin on the first floor. The rear of the pro..."
"Beautifully appointed two bedroom end terraced property situated within the popular residential area of Penkhull, giving easy access to Royal Stoke Hospital and a number of other local amenities. The stylish and deceptively spacious accommodation comprises an open plan dining room and ..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House on Robertville Road, Bucknall. Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac and being within walking distance of local schools/supermarkets this would be a perfect property for a family or first time buyer. The property itself is in..."
We are delighted to offer to market with no upward chain this well-appointed and much improved two bedroom mid-terrace property guaranteed to catch the eye of first time buyers and buy-to-let investors. Situated within a popular residential location and conveniently positioned for nearby Newcastle t
Butters John Bee are pleased to offer for sale this fantastic little gem as an ideal First Time buyers property
"Your Move Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market this Well Presented Three Bedroom Mature Mid Town House. Offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN, it is available for immediate occupation. Council Tax Band A. Epc Grade D."
"Here at Carters we are pleased to welcome to the market this lovely family home. Beautifully presented, this three bedroom home is is the perfect buy for any first time buyers and investors alike. Ready to move in and enjoy from day one, whilst maintaining the option for someone to come ..."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer For Sale a brilliant opportunity to acquire a two bedroom town house with no chain, comprising a spacious lounge and kitchen/dining room, utility, two double bedrooms, first floor bathroom with a separate shower. Potential to split bedroom one to form a thir..."
"Traditional semi detached house located in a popular residential area. Situated within walking distance to local amenities and schools. Benefits from two double bedrooms, gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. A driveway provides off road parking and there are gardens to the front and rear...."
Yopa are pleased to present to the market this spacious end town house on the edge of Hanley with planning permission granted for a side and rear extension
"*Fantastic Position*
A well presented & spacious town house with a garage to the rear aspect. The accommodation comprises: entrance porch, a large lounge-dining room, an inner hallway with ample storage and a staircase leading to the first floor and an attractive fitted breakfast kitchen.
The la..."
"Feeney estate agents are pleased to bring to market this spacious mid terraced home on High Lane in Burslem, Stoke On Trent. Tastefully decorated throughout, this two bedroom family home is a first ti..."
"A spacious double fronted two bedroom terrace house situated in the popular area of Hartshill, close to the Royal Stoke Hospital and all local amenities. The property benefits from gas fired central heating and UPVC double glazed windows. The accommodation comprises through lounge/dining room, fi..."
"A large three bedroomed end of terrace property, situated in the popular suburb of Penkhull close to the University Hospital. This large end terraced property benefits from electric heating and double glazing. Accommodation comprises hallway, living room, dining room, kitchen and bathroom at grou..."
"Shaw's & Co are delighted to offer For Sale a family semi detached house with a C rated EPC Some further potential to update, comprising porch, lounge, kitchen/dining room, three bedrooms, a first floor bathroom. Externally a 25' garage with potential for hobbies, work from home or conversion..."
"This property is currently under offer at £132,000. Anyone wishing to make an offer over and above this amount should contact the selling agents Leaders on prior to the exchange of contracts. **PERFECT OPPORTUNITY TO PERSONALISE** This spacious ..."
"Ideal for first time buyers, this modern, well presented two bed semi detached property is situated on the popular Heritage Park Development. The property offers excellent access to local schools, amenities, commuter and transport networks. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, separate w/c,..."
"Well maintained and spacious two DOUBLE bedroom property situated in Meir, A early viewing is recommended as this property won`t be on the market long!"
"SSSSHHHH! LISTEN!!! Class is now in session, please take notes as I am only going to say this once! I have a delightful mid terraced property in the popular area of Norton Green for the taking. Lovingly maintained throughout the accommodation on offer comprises a lounge, modern fitted breakfast k..."
"A fabulous ready-to-go first floor apartment, sold with no onward chain, and included beautiful furnishings! Achieve a possible rental yield of 7.8%.Both investors and first time buyers are invited to view this pristine two bedroom apartment, with a family bathr..."
"READY, AIM, FIRE. SET YOUR TARGETS ON A COURSE FOR A NEWLY REFURBISHED HOME. This THREE-BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE explodes onto the property market. Move-in ready, you certainly won't want to wait to book a viewing!"
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom Semi-Detached House located on Gemini Grove, Packmoor. This property would be a fantastic purchase for a first time buyer whilst benefiting from off road parking, two double bedrooms, open Kitchen/Diner, ample storage and low maintenance ga..."
"Here is a Semi detached Bungalow ideal for any couples, a young family or First time buyer with good off road parking and a rear garden. In need of modernisation throughout. No on going chain"
*** UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET*** *** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY*** NO ONWARD CHAIN*** VIEWING RECOMMENDED*** Your Move are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom end town house situated in a pleasant cul de sac location of similar properties within the area of Meir. The prope...
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented and up to date terraced home situated in this convenient Basford location. The property is well placed for both Hanley and Newcastle Town Centres as well as being near to Festival Park where shops and amenities ...
"Public Notice Address: 26 Poplar Drive, Blurton. Stoke on Trent Staffordshire, ST3 3AZ We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £142.500. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent befo..."
"** TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION ** Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Three Bedroom Detached House located on Courtway Drive, Sneyd Green. This large corner plot property offers a huge amount of potential and could be transformed into a stunning family home. The views are ..."
"** GREAT OPPORTUNITY ** This is a good size semi detached property in a popular location benefitting from upvc double glazed windows and a gas heating system and in brief offers a hall with guest cloakroom/wc, lounge, white fitted kitchen, and a useful lean to. The first floor offers three bedroo..."
"Elegant Second floor apartment situated in a delightful location over looking Longton Park. Well placed for the A50, giving access to the Pottery towns and the national road network. Lift leading to the private entrance porch, reception hall, lounge, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms , ensuite and bat..."
"In need of modernisation, this is a spacious three bedroom semi-detached home in a sought after location. Fantastic opportunity for those looking for a project with a blank canvas to make their very own. Briefly comprising, the property opens via an entrance hallway with large coat/stor..."
"A spacious traditional semi detached house offering family sized accommodation. Ideal for first time buyers but would equally suit investors. Situated in a popular residential locality close to local amenities and road links. Benefits from off road parking, gas central heating and Monarch alumini..."
*** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*** Your Move are pleased to bring to market this well kept spacious two bedroom semi detached property situated in Meir within an area of similar style properties. The property is being sold with tenants in situ who are currently paying £495 per month. <...
 * A MID TOWN HOUSE SITUATED CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & GOOD COMMUTING LINKS * OPEN VIEWS TO THE FRONT WITH FIELDS * THREE BEDROOMS * FIRST FLOOR SHOWER ROOM * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS C.H. SYSTEM * FITTED KITCHEN WITH DINING AREA * GOOD SIZED LOUNGE * GARD...
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, this fantastic two bedroom semi would be perfect for first time buyers, someone looking to downsize or investment. Internally the property has an entrance porch, lounge, modern kitchen and conservatory to the ground floor whilst to the first floor there are ..."
"Martin & Co would like to welcome to market this tantalizingly beautiful semi-detached property on Tiverton road. The property is located in the popular location of Berryhill. Briefly comprising of two double bedrooms, a modern bathroom and a kitchen diner making this ideal for a family. This..."
NO UPWARDS CHAIN- Three bedroom semi detached property. Excellent buy to let or first time buyer opportunity.
"IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY, MODERNISATION REQUIRED. This traditional semi detached family home is situated in a popular residential location, offering excellent access to local amenities, schools, commuter and transport networks. The accommodation comprises, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, side p..."
"Feeney Estate Agents are pleased to bring to market this mature, three bedroom semi detached home on a prime spot along Uplands Road in Abbey Hulton, Staffordshire. Offering an lounge with carpet floo..."
"We are pleased to bring to the sales market this stunning modern ground floor two bedroom apartment in a convenient location close to Hanley town centre. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, open plan living space comprising of kitchen, lounge and dining area, two double bedrooms mast..."
"New Listing, three bedroom, spacious property located on St Marys Road, Adderley Green.
Close to local amenities, schools with easy access to commuter and transport links"
"*** Three Bedroom Semi detached*** Located on Ryder Road Meir, Close to local amenities, schools and with great commuter links"
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Three Bedroom Semi-Detached House on Williamson Avenue, Ball Green. Benefiting from a downstairs W.C, Large Kitchen/Diner and well maintained front and rear gardens. The property sits within walking distance to local schools, shops and other amenitie..."
"You'll definitely like the size and potential of this traditional Town House which stands right at the top of Cornwall Street. The property is within comfortable walking distance of local schools, has off road parking space in the driveway at the front and three bedrooms together with a smal..."
"‘An empty room is a story waiting to happen and you’re the author’… So, pick up your paintbrush and with a bit of love and imagination, you can transform this property into your very own dream home."
WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN and ideal for FIRST TIME BUYERS or INVESTORS this is 2/3 bedroom semi detached home
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom End-Town House situated on Dilke Street. Located on the outskirts of Stoke-on-Trent's City Centre, with access to amenities, schools and direct routes to the surrounding areas. Not only that but down the road, you will find Hanley Forest Pa..."
"Martin and Co have a terrific opportunity for an investor to purchase this very well presented property with an existing tenant. Boasting a spacious floorplan throughout, the property is located in a quiet street in the popular family area of Bentilee. The ground floor offers a large lounge, gene..."
Call now to book a viewing before it goes!! This fantastic two bed semi detached property is ready for its next owner!
"With NO UPWARD CHAIN, this three bed semi-detached property is now on the market and looking for its next owner"
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this modern Three Bedroom Mid-terraced House on Bradford Terrace, Birches Head. Benefiting from a recently updated kitchen, Modern décor and first floor bathroom this would be a perfect property for any buyer looking for something ready to move int..."
UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET - Beautifully presented and improved two bedroom mid-townhouse with fields views to front and off road parking for one vehicle.
"Three bedroom semi-detached property located opposite open green space in Sneyd Green, Stoke on Trent. The property requires modernisation but has a newly block paved rear garden and detached garage."
"If PERFECTION is what you are searching for then look no more - This stunning home you will definitely adore! Beautiful and immaculate all the way through - There's certainly nothing here for you to do! With a stunning open-plan lounge/diner, beautiful kitchen, and bathroom too - "
"NOW LET TILL SUMMER 2024 AT £100 PER ROOM INC BILLS: Situated in the heart of Shelton and close to Staffordshire University this three bedroom to student property has been thoroughly modernised throughout. Accommodation comprises hallway, bedroom, living room, kitchen and bathroom at ground..."
"For sale by public auction on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm at the Double Tree by Hilton Stoke on Trent, Staffordshire, ST1 5BQ. Remote bidding is available via internet/telephone/proxy"
A two bed end town house currently tenanted but will be sold with vacant possession!
**New to the market with no upward chain in the popular and convenient location of Trent Vale!** This stunning fully modernised mid terraced property simply must be viewed in person to be fully appreciated. Making an ideal first time or investment purchase with ready to move into beautifully p...
"BRAND new to the market,  A fabulous two bedroom apartment located within walking distance of Hanley town centre & Staffs university. Perfect for a first time buyer who is looking at getting on to the property ladder or an investor looking for the next buy-to-let investment..."
"We are proud to offer this Modern Two Bedroom First Floor Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £120,000 - £125,000*"
 * A MATURE MID TOWN HOUSE SITUATED CLOSE TO CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & GREAT COMMUTING LINKS * THREE BEDROOMS - BEDROOM THREE HAVING EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOM OFF * DOWNSTAIRS W.C. * GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM * FITTED KITCHEN * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS C.H. SYSTEM * PLEASANT REAR GAR...
"*NO CHAIN* In Need of Modernisation*
An end town house with parking via the driveway and to the rear aspect there is a workshop and parking for several vehicles. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, a lounge and a fitted kitchen-diner with a pantry. There i..."
* IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT PROPERTY * TWO RECEPTIONS * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION * GOOD TRANSPORT & COMMUTING ROUTES
"This TWO BED TERRACE we have to sell, located in BADDELEY GREEN With TWO RECEPTION rooms and MODERNISED throughout, it definitely needs to be seen! FIRST TIME BUYERS come take a look, we are sure you'll be blown away Once you visit LEEK NEW ROAD you'll probably want to stay! So if..."
"TOP FLOOR APARTMENT NEAR THE ROYAL STOKE HOSPITAL- A modern and spacious two bedroom furnished apartment located in Trent Vale. The property, which boasts excellent commuting links and great local amenities, briefly comprises; Entrance Hallway, Two Bedrooms, Bathroom, Ensuite, Lounge/Diner and F..."
"*** SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI*** Located on Winchester Avenue, lots of potential to be turned into a great family home. Close to schools, amenities and Town Centres with great transport links!"
"*NO CHAIN*Ideal Investment Opportunity/First Time Buy*
A pleasantly positioned mid town house with two double bedrooms & first floor bathroom. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, a spacious lounge and a fitted kitchen-diner with a pantry and fitted storage...."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom Semi-Detached House on St. Nicholas Avenue, Norton. This property benefits from a Kitchen/Diner, large rear garden and Two Entrance halls allowing plenty of space on the ground floor. Situated within walking distance to local schools and am..."
Attention first time buyers!! Three bedroom semi detached property in need of a little TLC to reach its full potential.
"*Ideal Investment/First Time Buy*An attractive mid town house with pleasant block paved yard to the rear. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with stairs to the first floor, a spacious lounge and a large kitchen diner with under-stairs store/pantry.
The first floor has two double bedrooms..."
"NO CHAIN!!! TENANT IN SITU!! Located in a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC, in a popular residential area, this Semi-Detached property has long standing tenants who are eager to stay and happy to negoatiate on rent making this property ideal for Investors"
"Looking to get on the property ladder? Want an easy to maintain, spacious apartment? Then this is the property for you!"
"A three bedroom semi-detached house in Penkhull with a conservatory and useful loft room, For sale by Public Auction on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm at the Double Tree by Hilton, Festival Park, Stoke-on-Trent, ST1 5BQ - Remote bidding is also available via Telephone/Internet/Proxy bidding"
"Your Move Estate Agents are please to bring to the market this spacious and well presented THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM Mid Terraced House located in the popular residential area of Dresden. The property in brief comprises of:- Entrance Hall, Sitting room, Good Size Lounge, Fitted Kitchen and a Bathroom ..."
"Massive amounts of time and money have been spent by the present owners to create a unique home. Special features of the property include a beautiful landscaped rear garden with artificial grass lawn and paved patios as well as rear access to a detached garage. Internally, the property is be..."
The property is located within a popular suburb of Stoke On Trent. With many local amenities close by and all accessible on foot. The area also offers substantial options for public transport - with many regular bus services running to and from Hanley City Centre. The location is also suitable...
"This fantastic end of terrace home offers a spacious reception room, a fitted kitchen/diner, two large bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom. Externally, the property boasts front and rear gardens, with off road parking. This property presents a wonderful opportunity for any house hunter."
"Quote Ref: JS0070. A two bedroom townhouse which would be ideal for a FIRST TIME BUYER or as a BUY-T0-LET INVESTMENT. To the ground floor having; entrance porch, lounge with window to rear garden, SEPARATE DINING ROOM, well presented kitchen, lobby and downstairs bathroom. To the first floor a..."
Yopa are pleased to present to the market this spacious semi detached being offered For Sale with no upward chain!
"If you are seeking a straightforward project on the outskirts of Stoke-on-Trent, this property should be at the top of your list. The property offers a variety of benefits. From its good-sized garden to its three generous bedrooms, a three-piece family bathroom, cosy reception room and fantastic..."
"The Property briefly comprises of entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen diner with access to rear garden. Three bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property will need some redecoration and carpeting / re flooring - however it is an ideal property for first time buyers, single persons / families or i..."
"29 South Street is a wonderful home. Full of charm and character and very well presented and maintained by the current owner. Located in a quiet suburb of Stoke on Trent - Ball Green is very quiet and has excellent access and commuter links to the local areas of Leek, Biddulph, Norton, Hanley, B..."
"**INVESTORS ONLY** We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Semi-Detached Home – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £120,000 - £130,000*"
"WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. A Well presented two-bedroom semi-detached property, offered with no chain"
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY"" Point to Home are pleased to offer this NEWLY refurbished 3 bedroom property (WITH TENANTS IN SITU) in stoke on trent, quick easy access to the A50/ A500 and just a 5 minute drive from Hanley city centre. COUNCIL TAX BAND A (AVAILABLE FOR INVESTORS ONLY)"
Your Move Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this three bedroom Mid Town House that offers a spacious home for first time buyers or small family being situated in the popular and sought after residential area of Fenton. Offered For Sale with No Onward Chain. Awaiting EPC. Council Ta...
"*Convenient Position-An Ideal First Time Buy or Investment Opportunity*
An end terraced property with two double bedrooms and a through lounge-diner. The accommodation layout comprises: lounge-diner with staircase to the first floor and a gas fireplace, a fitted kitchen with tiled flooring, a Fr..."
OUT OF AUCTION OFFERS WILL BE CONSIDERED 
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! Offered for sale and to be sold with tenants in situ, Heywoods 1881 are pleased to market this two bedroom cottage, located in the popular and convenient area of Norton, close to nearby amenities, good local schools and within easy reach of good road links. Viewing is highly ..."
LARGE GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT - A fabulous two bedroom ground floor apartment located within walking distance of Hanley town centre & Staffs university. If you are a first time buyer who is looking at getting your foot on to the property ladder or an investor looking for your next buy-to-let inves...
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented and up to date town house situated in this popular and convenient Northwood location. This home offers the modern day comforts of Upvc double glazing along with combi central heating and in brief compris...
"When a great opportunity presents itself, you simply have to act fast… and that is certainly what you will need to do here with this superb two bedroom terraced property in Dresden! Plenty of shops and amenities right on the door step including Queens Park and great local schools too. The ..."
"***IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY***OR BUY TO LET*** Your Move are pleased to offer For Sale this well presented two bedroom semi detached property which is conveniently situated close to schools, local amenities, commuter and transport networks. Road links includingthe A50, A500 and M6. Council ..."
"STUNNING TWO BEDROOM REFURBISHED TERRACE IN FASHIONABLE PENKHULL Hunters are pleased to bring to market, this delightful TWO bedroom terraced property presented to a high standard and is available to purchase with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Situated within the highly sought after area of ..."
Spacious 2-bedroom semi-detached located in Norton. Ideal for first-time buyers or investors. 
"Lovely jubbly!!! In the words of Derek Trotter you would be a right plonker! If you let this stunning, mid terraced property on Chorlton Road pass you by. Beautifully presented throughout, this property comprises of two spacious reception rooms, modern fitted kitchen, contemporary ground floor ba..."
"Hunters are proud to present this traditional mid terraced property. With neutral decor throughout and conveniently located for Stoke town centre and the Royal Stoke Hospital. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen and bathroom on the ground floor and with two double bedrooms on the ..."
"***TRULY STUNNING TERRACE*** One which you'll never have seen before! Beautifully presented throughout, boasting an open plan living space, stunning Kitchen with Utility/W.C. First Floor Bathroom with Two double bedrooms. A move in ready property with on street permit parking. DON'T MISS OUT!"
"Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this desirable second floor apartment in Trent Vale which provides ease of access to the A34 along with being near to local shops, schools, amenities and the North Staffs NHS hospital. This desirable second floor apartment offers t..."
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS! Very Motivated Seller! A well presented and spacious, traditional two bedroom terrace property in a convenient location with great access to local amenities, shops, transport links and services. Only a short commute from the Royal Stoke Hospital. Excelle..."
"Have we got something special for you - THREE STOREY, TOWN HOUSE ready to view - TWO SPACIOUS BEDROOMS and bathroom to retreat- A LOUNGE and KITCHEN/DINER for all the friends to meet - GARAGE & parking for all your cars - a LOVELY HOME to chill and view the stars - "
"WALKING DISTANCE TO STAFFS UNI & HANLEY TOWN CENTRE - Stop and take a look at this impressive two bedroom property positioned in the fantastic location of Shelton, situated nearby to the town centre and transport links - great for commuting! Benefitting from a spacious lounge and low-maintenance ..."
 BUY TO LET INESTORS ONLY BEING SOLD WITH THE CURRENT TENANTS IN SITU CURRENTLY GENERATING £560 PCM WITH A POTENTIAL INCREASE TO £595 PCM.  A Three bedroom semi detached property situated in the popular Newstead location conveniently placed for local amenities and g...
* THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE * IDEAL INVESTOR OR FTB OPPORTUNITY * NICELY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT * WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF CITY CENTRE * READY TO MOVE INTO
"*Investors Only* These new apartments will be perfect for investors! Studios, 1beds and 2beds are available. To receive more information, please contact us directly. Comprising of modern fixtures and fittings, each apartment will feature state-of-the-art designs and fixtures..."
"This two bedroom apartment is conveniently situated for the North Staffs Hospital Complex, nearby Springfield Retail Park, and has commuting links to A34 & A500. The property enjoys well proportioned rooms including separate kitchen and lounge, the kitchen having integrated appliances, the master..."
"There's massive potential here to turn this property into a profitable Buy To Let investment rental or a cosy home! With a little bit of imagination and some detailed improvements to floor coverings, decoration and presentation the inside and outside of this house will be massively transform..."
* IDEAL FTB OR INVESTOR OPPORTUNITY * CENTRALLY LOCATED * EXCELLENT ROADS AND TRANSPORT LINKS * POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION
"This is an Ideal Investment buyer property. Martin & Co are pleased to welcome to the sales market this mid terraced home comprises of two reception rooms, kitchen and bathroom on the ground floor and two double bedrooms on the first floor. The property is double glazed and has gas central h..."
BRAMPTONS have for sale this lovely and well cared for mid terraced home located just a short distance away from the local shops and amenities of Hartshill and also with easy reach of neighbouring Newcastle town centre. Benefiting from full Upvc double glazing and gas central heating the ac (cont.)
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £115,000 plus Reservation Fees. Closing date 28th Feb at 1.30pm Three/ four bedroom student property in Shelton, close to Staffordshire University. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and a rear yard, with a..."
"Are you a first time buyer looking for your first home? Somewhere that's move in ready but that you can call your very own? We present to you this beauty on Bradford Terrace in Birches Head A lovely spacious TWO BEDROOM mid-terraced, it has to be said! With two reception rooms, ga..."
"Value for money is the theme of this terraced typed house featuring on street parking at the front, gas central heating from a combi boiler and UPVC double glazing throughout. It's ready to move into, conveniently close to local shops and it also has quick and easy to access the A50. See ..."
 * A MATURE TERRACED HOUSE SITUATED IN A POPULAR AREA & WITH GREAT OPEN VIEWS TO THE REAR * TWO BEDROOMS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * FITTED KITCHEN * GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING * GAS C.H. SYSTEM * REAR YARD * NO CHAIN * * PLEASE NOTE THAT THIS PROPERTY REQUIRES A SMALL ...
"Take a look at this ideal first time home on Laski Crescent, in Meir, Staffordshire. This two bedroom semi detached home is an investors dream! Being loved by its current owners for many years, Laski..."
Attention all investors!!!
"Presented with no upper chain with two excellent sie reception rooms, a modern fitted kitchen, a downstairs W/C and utility.  Upstairs boasts two double bedoroms and a modern bathroom. The exterior of the property also has a paved yard housing a brick storage building that can suit all..."
"Service Charges and Ground Maintenance Paid for 2023!This beautiful ground floor two bedroom, two bathroom apartment is a fantastic bolt hole, or first time buy; with an included parking space and modern kit..."
"Calling all investors and first time buyers! Here at Carters we are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom, mid-terrace home which is situated within the popular Village of Packmoor. Boasting two reception rooms, kitchen and a downstairs bathroom to the ground floor a..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Three Bedroom Mis-terraced House on Ludlow Street, Hanley. With three bedrooms and within walking distance to local primary schools as well many more amenities this would be ideal for a small family and first time buyer. Equally this is a fantastic ren..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to present for sale this three bedroom fore courted mid terraced property located in the popular residential area of Tunstall. The location offers access to local amenities, schools and commuter links. The property benefits from partial double glazing, gas central..."
"BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY BEING SOLD WITH THE CURRENT TENANTS IN SITU WHICH WE HAVE BEEN ADVISED IS CURRENTLY GENERATING £575 PCM.  An elevated two bedroom fore courted mid terraced property situated conveniently for the  UHNM   Hospital  Complex, Hanley City cen..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this STUNNING two bedroom Mid-Terraced house on Birches Head Road. The property currently has tenants in situ paying £595pcm. This property has undergone a complete transformation including a new stylish fitted kitchen with induction hob, integrated..."
"Ideal first time buy or buy to let investment! Well-proportioned two bedroom fore courted mid townhouse with enclosed rear yard with double access gates. Situated in Stoke, the property is ideally placed for access to a variety of local amenities, Stoke City football ground, excel..."
"Beautifully presented two double bedroom mid terraced property situated within the popular residential area of Adderley Green. The location offers ideal access to a number of local amenities, schools and excellent commuter links. The spacious and well-appointed accommodation compr..."
Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Stunning Two bedroom Mid-terraced House on Eastbourne Road. This property offers the perfect balance of both modern and original character throughout. Situated at the heart of the popular and sought after residential area of Northwood on the outskirts ...
"An end-terrace property with huge amounts of charm and endless opportunity for modernisation, this home will appeal to any house hunter on the lookout for a straightforward project. Located in the heart of Stoke-on-Trent, the property has a great deal to offer. In particular, its spacious rooms ..."
"A fabulously finished, modernised and upgraded two bedroom mid terraced property, complete with a new bathroom, boiler, front door and windows; plus a stunning newly landscaped garden!This top tier property is not to be missed, with an abundance of space throughout, plus no onward chain..."
" *In Need of Modernisation* NO CHAIN* A spacious end town house with plenty of potential. Large garden to the rear aspect which is not overlooked. The accommodation briefly comprises; porch and entrance hall, two reception rooms with bay windows and a kitchen. The first floor has a landing, two ..."
"This is an exciting project for any house hunter. A delightful end-of-terrace house, this highly promising property offers an exciting opportunity for the buyer to undertake a full modernisation in order to add value and to apply their own stamp. Located on the outskirts of Stoke-on-Trent, the h..."
"DRAFT DETAILS Quirky fore courted end terraced house having a small entrance, spacious lounge diner with stairs off, modern fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom W.C. To the first floor there are two good size bedrooms. Benefits from gas fired central heating, double glazing and no upward chai..."
DO NOT WASTE ANY TIME ON MISSING OUT ON THIS TREAT OF A PROPERTY…a lovely two bed terraced property in the highly popular and sought after area of Birches Head.
"Great investment opportunity, three bedroom semi detached house with off road parking and a garage at the rear. In need of modernisation this property is within walking distance of the Royal Stoke Hospital and the shopping amenities of Trent Vale in Newcastle under Lyme. In brief the property com..."
"A beautifully appointed, stylish and spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment that has a luxurious and contemporary feel yet is full character and history. Located on the ground floor of this historic converted former Victorian pottery factory, the building enjoys contemporary communal areas w..."
"DRAFT DETAILS. BEING SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU. Great opportunity to purchase a larger than average end of terraced house. Having two reception rooms, fitted kitchen with built in oven and hob. To the first floor there are two bedrooms and bathroom W.C. Outside there is an enclosed garden area...."
"104 Oxford Street is a superb, mature, mid terraced property in the heart of Penkhull. Penkhull is a popular suburb in Stoke On Trent and is very close to the Royal Stoke University hospital and the train station. Making this a superb opportunity for families, first time buyers and investors. ..."
**New Price** Ideal First Time Buyer/Investment Opportunity!This modern ground floor apartment is ideally located close to local amenities and Royal Stoke Hospital in the popular and highly regarded area of Penkhull. Well maintained and presented throughout the accommodation offers two ...
Three bedroom mid town house situated in the residential area of Blurton. Great first time buy or buy to let opportunity.
"Guide Price 104,000 For sale by unconditional online auction.
The property offers generous accommodation throughout to include lounge, utility area with good size kitchen/diner and conservatory to the ground floor with two double bedrooms and one good size single bedroom along with the fam..."
We are delighted to offer to market with no upward chain this well appointed two-bedroom purpose-built second floor apartment benefiting from re-decoration and newly fitted carpets. Tucked away at the top of a quiet cul-de-sac within the ever popular Norton Heights development the property is conven
"A three bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Northwood. Benefitting from modern accommodation, double glazing and good sized rear yard. An ideal first time buy or buy to let investment. Close to Hanley Town Centre, commuter links, schools and amenities. Viewing is highly advis..."
"For sale on 27 April 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00."
"This is a lovely family home in the Fenton, Stoke on Trent and with no upward chain. The property briefly comprises of two reception rooms, galley kitchen, downstairs family bathroom and two double bedrooms upstairs. To the rear there is a yard and garden area with a detached garage. Located ..."
"NO CHAIN!! TENANT IN SITU!! Mid town house property comprising of an entrance hallway, lounge, breakfast kitchen and additional storage areas to the ground floor with three bedrooms and a family bathroom to the first floor."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom Semi-Detached house on Newstead Road. Situated in the popular residential area of Abbey Hulton the property is ideally situated for local shops, schools and amenities. Accommodation comprising of Lounge , large Kitchen , downstairs WC, Cons..."
"Guide Price: £100,000 TO BE SOLD BY PUBLIC ONLINE AUCTION ON THE 22ND OF FEBRUARY 2023."
"Tucked away from the main road, stands Moorefields View, a highly sought after block of apartments. We are bringing to the market, a spacious, two double bedrooms,first floor property presented to the highest of standard Critchlow estate agents are thrilled to have the opportunity to offer for"
"WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN, this is an ideal home for a FIRST TIME BUYER or as a BUY TO LET investment"
"First time buyers only. Martin & Co are delighted to welcome to market this well presented two bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Longton. Close to the local schools, Longton town centre A50, A500 and M6 road Networks. Briefly the property comprises: Dining room, lounge, ..."
 * A MID TOWN HOUSE SITUATED CLOSE TO GREAT COMMUTER LINKS & ALL LOCAL AMENITIES * THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS * MAJORITY OF WINDOWS U.P.V.C. D.G. * GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM * KITCHEN WITH LEAN TO ROOM/PANTRY TO THE REAR * DRIVEWAY TO FRONT FOR APPROX TWO VEHICLES WITH SMALL FRONT GARDEN * GARA...
"* TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION* Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to market this 3 bedroom semi detached house on Bucknall New Road, Northwood. The ground floor briefly consists of an entrance hallway, spacious lounge, large kitchen / dining area and WC. The first floor has 3 generousl..."
"Traditional 2 bedroom terrace * Entrance hallway, 2 reception room, kitchen and guest WC * First floor bathroom * Conveniently close to Royal Stoke Hospital and highly regarded schools * Ideal First Time Buyer/Investment Purchase * No Upward Chain"
"70 Intake Road is a property that will require some modernisation. However it is a well built and spacious family home that is suitable for first time buyers or investment. The property briefly comprises of entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen diner , utility area, three bedrooms, family bathroom ..."
"Martin and co are delighted to offer for sale this superb two bedroom ground floor flat located in a sought after location close to Festival Park. The property which benefits from a separate kitchen also comprises lounge, two bedrooms, bathroom, parking to the rear of the property. An early inspe..."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £100,000. Buy it now option available Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"'Without leaps of imagination, or dreaming, we lose the excitement of possibilities'...And with this property on Crestway Road there are so many possibilities to make your dreams come true."
Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are pleased to offer to the market this conveniently placed terraced home which provides ease of access to both Newcastle & Hanley Town Centres. This home offers the benefits of Upvc double glazing along with partial central heating and in brief comprises of through l...
"Ideal BTL opportunity, available with sitting tenant paying £6,600pa giving 6.6% yield. Stunning two bedroom mid terrace in Jervison Street, Longton! This gorgeous family home consists of a spacious reception room, lounge, modern fitted kitchen and ground floor shower room, two..."
Located perfectly for the A500 and M6 motorway for the professional commuter as well as being within walking distance to Stoke-on-Trent's major employer. This is a modern two bedroom ground floor apartment
"*NO CHAIN* A bay fronted END of terraced property situated within popular Shelton, close to Staffordshire University complex-ideal for investors. The accommodation comprises: Lounge with a bay window to the front aspect, a fitted kitchen-diner and a modern bathroom with a white three-piece suite..."
*** THIS PROPERTY IS BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD AUCTION*** * Selling Via Modern Method Auction * Semi Deatched House * Two Bedrooms * First Floor Bathroom/Shower Room W/c * Double Glazed * Gas Central Heating * Gardens * No Onward Chain * Await...
"We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £100,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts takes place. The Energy Performance Certificate Rating is E."
"BRAND NEW TO THE MARKET, A spacious mid terrace property, ideal for both landlords and owner occupiers The property is located within close proximity to Hanley city centre.  To the ground floor there are two/three reception rooms and a kitchen, there is also a cellar with acc..."
A two bed mid terrace located in Birches Head
"Luck is when opportunity knocks and you answer the door! Well my happy home hunters the opportunity has just presented itself in the form of this beautiful, stylish two bedroom apartment so you best be ready to answer! Located in the popular Norton Heights development. This ground floor apartment..."
"A two bedroom fore courted mid terrace property situated in a much sought after residential location ideally placed for Stoke Town Centre, the UHNM Hospital Complex, local schools and giving easy access to excellent commuter road links.  Ideal for first time buyers and investors alike.&nb..."
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £99,950 plus Reservation Fees. A 2/3 bedroom student investment property situated close to Staffordshire University and in the heart of Shelton. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and a modern kitchen. Acc..."
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and perfect for first time buyers and investors! A two bedroom mid terraced property which is now in need of modernisation, located in the popular and convenient area of Newcastle, close to nearby amenities and within easy reach to useful commuter links such ..."
"Ideal PRE LET Investment Opportunity in a popular location. We are pleased to bring to the sales market this two bedroom, mid terrace house is in the sought after location of Shelton near to Hanley town centre. Close to all local amenities you'll never feel too far away from anything.. Briefly ..."
"This is a great investment opportunity but would equally suit first time buyers. Traditional mid terrace property in a sought after location. Benefits from two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. Viewing is strongly recommended!"
"BRAMPTONS are delighted to offer for sale this modern apartment which has NO CHAIN! This modern built first floor apartment accessed off a communal entrance offers its own an entrance hallway, open plan lounge/dining and kitchen room, bathroom and has two bedrooms. There is off-road parking (cont.)"
PLEASE NOTE ALL PHOTO IMAGES WERE TAKEN WHEN THE PROPERTY WAS EMPTY PRIOR TO THE TENANTS MOVING IN. PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. We would like to welcome to the sales market this traditional Three bedroom mid terrace house. Located in the ever popular town of Burslem close to local amenities ...
INVESTORS ONLY | Tenant in Situ Modern first-floor apartment for sale in Norton Heights. Curren
"A 2 Bedroom mid terraced property situated just a short walk to Stoke City Centre, Supermarkets, Shops, Pubs. Great transport links with buses and Stoke train station just a short walk away."
"A 2 bedroom mid terraced property which has recently been fully refurbished throughout. Right in the heart of Stoke, just 5 minutes walk to bars, supermarkets and shops. Easy access to main transport networks, bus routes and train station."
"*NO CHAIN* A stunning second/top floor apartment, well situated within a popular modern development with gated allocated parking. The well presented apartment comprises: Intercom secure communal entrance and stairs leading to the second floor. The entrance leads into the spacious hallway which ..."
Attention savvy investors! Great rental yields are attainable with a little bit of TLC. Come and take look...
"This practical 2 bed terrace located in the popular location of Etruria is sure to be popular with any buyer looking for the ideal investment property. Situated close to all local amenities, good schools, local transport, walking distance to both Festival Park & Hanley town centre,..."
"End terrace house with large established rear garden, situated in the popular residential location of Birches Head. The property requires updating and benefits from a first floor bathroom with an additional ground floor WC. Viewing of this spacious property is recommended."
"A well presented first floor apartment of modern construction, nestled in a very popular and convenient location for the Royal Stoke Hospital and commuting via the A500 and M6. The property hosts a large open plan living room diner with archway access through to the kitchen, which is fitted with ..."
"A forecourted Victorian terraced home situated in this pleasant cul de sac location in Stoke, the property already boasts Upvc double glazed windows along with combi central heating and offers spacious well maintained accommodation comprising of sitting room, lounge, modern fitted kitchen, white ..."
"If you're looking to invest in a buy2let property, look no further than this two bedroom terrace house located near the Mother Town of Burslem. This house is well presented and comes pre-let with a reliable tenant in situ, providing a rental income of £500 per calendar mont..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Heath Street, Goldenhill being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good stand..."
"A well presented town house with a loft conversion and attractive gardens to the front and rear aspects. The accommodation comprises: hallway with stairs leading to the first floor, a spacious lounge and a modern fitted kitchen-diner with under floor heating,and built-in storage. The first floor..."
"Are you looking for a two bedroom, mid terraced property in Meir? The property features two reception rooms to the ground floor and is well presented throughout"
"This well presented mid terraced home offers a fantastic location, adjacent to local Primary School Jackfields as well as being conveniently located for local amenities of Tunstall Retail Park, The Potteries & Burslem Park, which is also nearby. Internally the accommodation comprises two d..."
"An ideal first time buy or investment purchase! RODGER THAT I'M ON IT! Situated on Rodgers Street, Goldenhill, this WELL PRESENTED HOME,"
"A fantastic opportunity for first time buyers and buy-to-let investors. This Charming Cottage is in a prime position in the heart of Meir. It has had new carpets and been redecorated throughout. It is ready to move straight into! The well laid out accommodation comprises of: Lounge, Sitting Room,..."
"NO CHAIN!!! Calling all first time buyers!!! This warm and welcoming end-terrace property is located within the popular residential area of Packmoor, close to local schools, amenities, transport and commuter links."
"** TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION ** Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two bedroom Semi-Detached House situated on Broadfield Road, Sandyford. Benefitting from a large kitchen, conservatory and generous front and rear outside space this property would be perfect for a variety..."
" INVESTORS ONLY - TENANTS IN SITU Beautifully presented home, stunning condition, centrally located, 2 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, brand new stunning bathroom, newly fitted kitchen, with a garage. Overall stunning with a low price to sell."
"MODERN LIVING - This excellent one bedroom apartment is the perfect choice for any investor, couple or business professional looking for a place to call their own! With a well-presented and super modern internal layout, this property is positioned in a desirable and highly convenient location, wi..."
"Two bedroom end terrace property, located in Fenton, Stoke-on Trent, offering two reception rooms, cellar, two double bedrooms and first floor bathroom."
"Building plot with planning permission (App no 68310/FUL) for the demolition of existing garage and erection of a detached dwelling,  extending to approximately 337 square metres. Located in the popular location of Trent Vale close to the A34 and Royal Stoke University Hospital.Ful..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this purpose built modern 2 bedroom apartment on the popular Doulton Grange development in Baddeley Green. Accommodation comprises of Entrance hall, Lounge/diner. Kitchen. Two generously sized double bedrooms and Bathroom. Outside offers a allocated parking..."
"**Shared Ownership 50% (with option to buy other share)-No Upward Chain** New to the sales market in the popular village location of Penkhull,  this well presented semi-detached property is ideally located in a quiet cul-de-sac opposite grassed parkland and within easy reach of Royal Stok..."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £90,000. Buy it now option available Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. We are pleased to welcome to the sales market this well presented mid terraced home. Located in Hanley close to the Town Centre Hanley. Giving good connections to the A500 and M6 road networks and also Stoke railway station. The property comprises two reception roo...
"A quirky and modern build two bedroom duplex apartment, nestled away on a private pedestrian only street, with fantastic travel routes to the city. A fantastic bolt hole or first time buy, this beautiful apartment..."
"This prefabricated garage, storage building presents an amazing development opportunity in a serene semi-rural location. With the right planning permission, the building can be transformed into something really special. It could become a spacious workshop, an art studio, weekend holiday escape..."
PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Bright Street Meir being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 PCM offering an ideal opportunity for investors It is presented to a very good standard...
"22 Mulgrave Street is located in a really quiet and characterful terraced street in Stoke On Trent. There is a real charm and character to the road and it benefits from being very close to the nearby Hanley City centre and Festival Park. Those nearby areas offer a wide range of shops, supermark..."
***NO CHAIN*** 3 Bed end of terraced property with original features close to Longton Town Centre
"VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE*No Chain*An attractive terraced property with a large rear garden and 15ft store/workshop. The well presented accommodation briefly comprises; lounge with double doors into the dining room, a modern fitted kitchen and modern bathroom.
The first floor has two bedrooms, each w..."
"If you're looking to break into the buy2let investment market, this two-bedroom mid-terrace house could be the perfect opportunity. With tenants already living in the property, you could be seeing a rental income of £500 pcm right away. The prime residential location ensures you can ..."
 * A GOOD SIZED MATURE MID TERRACED PROPERTY SITUATED CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & GOOD COMMUTER LINKS * LARGE THROUGH LOUNGE/DINER * MODERN FITTED KITCHEN WITH FURTHER GOOD SIZED ADDITIONAL AREA OFF * TWO BEDROOMS WITH STAIRCASE ON THE LANDING LEADING TO A BOARDED USEABLE LOFT WITH VELUX W...
***EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*** Your Move Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this Forecourted Mid Terraced property being sold with a tenant in situ. The tenant is currently paying £500 per month which would give a yield of 6%. EPC Grade D. Council Tax Band A.
"For sale by public auction at The Double Tree Hilton Hotel Stoke-on-Trent, on Monday 27th February 2023 at 6.30pm. Remote bidding is also available via Telephone/Internet/Proxy"
"* NEWLY REDUCED!* An ideal FIRST TIME or INVESTMENT buy here for sale in Kidsgrove Road! Well presented throughout and with some further potential to make your own mark on it - Comprising a spacious through lounge/dining room, kitchen, rear hall and wet room, with two bedrooms to the first floor...."
"Ideal Investment or first time buyer Opportunity..
We are pleased to bring to market this two bedroomed, mid terrace house in a sought after location close to Hanley. with all of it's amenities you'll never feel too far away from anything.. This property briefly comprises of two double bedrooms,..."
"First Time Buyers or Owner Occupiers only. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Masterson Street, Fenton being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very..."
"Ideal for Investment or first time buyers. Martin & Co would like to welcome to the sales market this traditional mid terrace house. Located close to local amenities. including the Festival Park and Hanley town centre. The property comprises lounge, dining room, kitchen and family bathroom on..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity -
Martin and Co are pleased to welcome to the sales market this well presented Two Double bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Northwood The property boasts Two Reception Rooms, Fitted Kitchen, Family Bathroom, gas central heating, Externally the pr..."
"ATTENTION LANDLORDS Hunters Estate and Letting Agents are pleased to bring to market this tenanted two bedroom mid terraced property located on Knypersley Road in Norton. The property comprises on the ground floor, two reception rooms, fitted kitchen and family bathroom. To the first ..."
"A 2 bedroom mid terraced property, currently tenanted and achieving a rent of £400 per month with potential to achieve more. If you are looking to purchase to live in yourself notice could be served to the tenants in time for completion. "
"In the word of Derek Trotter, 'GORDON Bennett!' What a perfect first time buyer home or are you an investor looking to extend that portfolio? Well look no further than GORDON Street! I have a spacious traditional mid terraced sold with no upward chain and looking for a new owner. The accommodatio..."
"As the saying goes, if you wish for something hard enough you might just get it! First Time Buyers, downsizers and investors alike I’m looking in your direction! I have a traditional mid terraced property ready for you, chain free and waiting on a new owner! The accommodation on offer comprises a..."
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Wade Street Burslem being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good standard t...
"A second floor apartment in the popular location of Hanley. The property benefits from an open plan lounge/kitchen with balcony, en suite to the master bedroom and easy access into the town centre. An ideal first time buy or investment property. Close to amenities, commuter links and schools. ..."
BUY-TO-LET PROPERTY | STUDENT STUDIO APARTMENTS: The luxury student studios at Axiom in Stoke-on-Trent offer 8% returns guaranteed for 3 years. Axiom offers unparalleled student living in the heart of the city.
"**TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION** Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this Four Bedroom Mid-Terraced House on Ogden Road, Hanley. This property has been completely transformed by the current owner and now benefits from a loft conversion adding two further bedrooms and shower room..."
"DRAFT DETAILS. IDEAL INVESTMENT BEING SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU. This is a fore courted mid terraced house, with two reception rooms, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom W.C. To the first floor there are two double bedrooms. Outside to the rear is an enclosed yard. The property benefits from..."
"Your Move are delighted to bring to market this well presented two bedroom ground floor apartment in Stoke town centre which would make a excellent buy to let investment. In brief the property comprises of entrance hall, kitchen, bathroom, lounge and two good size bedrooms. Externally there..."
"Hyde Estates are pleased to offer this two-bedroom, ground floor apartment for sale which is currently let, producing £6,540 per annum. Located in the popular residential area of Penkhull and within walking distance of Stoke-On-Trent."
"Martin & Co are please to bring to market this Two bed mid-terrace property which will be of interest to first time buyers and investors alike. Complete with gas central heating, fitted kitchen and white 3-piece bathroom suite including shower over. Near to the local primary school (rated '..."
"Reeds Rains Hanley are delighted to offer this lovely two bedroom Mid-Terraced house on Williamson Avenue, Ball Green. Benefiting from a downstairs W.C, First floor bathroom and Driveway at the rear this property would be perfect for a variety of buyers including first time buyers as well as buy-..."
"PLEASE NOTE ALL PHOTO IMAGES WERE TAKEN WHEN THE PROPERTY WAS EMPTY PRIOR TO THE TENANTS MOVING IN. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Summerbank Road Tunstall. being sold with no upper chain. The property is presented to a very good standard throughout, al..."
"MOVE IN READY - Step on in to this wonderful first floor flat which has been decorated to a good standard throughout and is move in ready. With a great layout and a highly sought after location, this property would make a fantastic home for any first time buyer, business professional or investor ..."
"For sale with no onwards chain. This two bedroom semi detached is located close to Tunstall high street and has good commuter links. The property comprises: Lounge, Kirchen diner, two double bedrooms and family bathroom with seperate WC. Externally there is a front and rear garden."
"Attention all investors!! This property is being sold with a tenant in situ and offers a rental yield of 6%! The property offers spacious accommodation throughout and is well maintained by the current tenants. The internal accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, dining room, lounge, kitchen ..."
"For Sale by online auction with Royal Estates Tuesday 21st-23rd March 2023. Guide Price £85,000. A freehold two bedroom Terraced property. VIEWINGS VIA AGENT."
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Lower Mayor Street Hanley being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good stan...
"Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Three Bedroom Mid-Terrace House on Portland Street, Hanley. This property is located close to local schools, shops and within walking distance to the Town Centre. It would also be an ideal investment opportunity for any buy-to-let investor as their is ..."
"Beautifully presented Ground floor apartment. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, two bedrooms, open plan kitchen/lounge and bathroom. There is allocated parking within the communal grounds. The property enjoys gas central heating and double glazing. Situated in Penkhull/Stoke,..."
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. We are pleased to welcome to the sales market this well presented two bedroom end terraced property with double glazing and gas central heating. The property is located within walking distance from local shops and a short distance from Burslem town centre with a re...
ATTENTION INVESTORS - this mid-terrace property is available with a very established Tenant in place and has full compliance regarding electrical certificates. New combi boiler under warranty. Two reception rooms and two double bedrooms. Ground floor bathroom. Walking distance to Longton town cen...
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Morton Street Middleport being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good stand...
"A fore-courted mid terraced house in the popular location of Tunstall. This two bedroom property benefits from two reception rooms, double glazing and rear yard with gated access. An ideal first time buy or investment property. Located close to Tunstall town centre, amenities and commuter link..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity. We are please to bring to the sales market this Two bedroom mid-terrace property which will be of particular interest to investors as it is already tenanted. Complete with gas central heating, Fitted kitchen and a white 3-piece bathroom suite including shower over..."
"The Property 115 Eaton Street is situated in a lovely location - with a beautiful outlook onto the treelined street and the spacious Park. The property briefly comprises of forecourt to the front, small porch, entrance hallway and two downstairs reception rooms , galley kitchen and a downstairs..."
"OFFERED TO THE MARKET AS EITHER VACANT POSESSION OR WITH TENANT IN SITU CURRENTLY GENERATING £480 PCM WITH A POTENTIAL INCREASE TO £520PCM.   A one bedroom top floor apartment situated in a popular residential location ideally placed for local amenities, transport l..."
"***UNEXPECTEDLY BACK ON THE MARKET*** Your Move are delighted to bring to mark this well kept and presented two bedroom maisonette. In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall way to the ground floor with stairs leading to the first floor, where you will find a spacious lounge, do..."
"PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Martin & Co are delighted to welcome to market this well presented two bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Longton. Close to the local schools, Longton town centre A50, A500 and M6 road Networks. Briefly the property comprises: Dining room,..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Edge Street, Burslem being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good standard ..."
"NO CHAIN!! Situated in a popular and sought after residential location sits this well presented two bedroom mid terrace property offering a fantastic ideal affordable home for first time buyers. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, a stunning refitted modern style shower room with a well"
"PLEASE NOTE ALL PHOTO IMAGES WERE TAKEN WHEN THE PROPERTY WAS EMPTY PRIOR TO THE TENANTS MOVING IN. PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This is a spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Smith Child Street Tunstall, being sold with a sitting tenant. The property is..."
"PLEASE NOTE ALL PHOTO IMAGES WERE TAKEN WHEN THE PROPERTY WAS EMPTY PRIOR TO THE TENANTS MOVING IN. PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This is a spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Phoenix Street Tunstall, being sold with a sitting tenant. The property is pre..."
"**No Upward Chain** New to the sales market in the popular town of Stoke, ideally placed close to local amenities, commuting links and Stoke Railway Station. Well presented throughout this second floor apartment offers bright and airy open plan living space with an allocated parking space on t..."
"Two bed apartment now available at our popular Rowan Village retirement scheme at £84,000 for a 75% share. The village is for over 55s only and has plenty of facilities including a cafe, restaurant, gym and activities room."
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Derwent Street Cobridge being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good standa...
PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Duke Street Fenton being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 PCM offering an ideal opportunity for investors It is presented to a very good standard...
"ATTENTION ALL FIRST TIME BUYERS, NEXT TIME BUYERS & INVESTORS !!!!"
This two bedroom mid terrace is sure to be of interest to the canny investor looking to add to their portfolio or to a first time buyer looking for their first step on to the property ladder. Located in the popular area of Tunstall this property is walking distance to the town centre s...
PRE LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. A spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Cowper Street Fenton being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 PCM offering an ideal opportunity for investors It is presented to a very good standa...
"Are you looking for a two bedroom, mid terraced property in Longton. The property features two reception rooms to the ground floor and the family bathroom and is well presented throughout"
"* TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION* Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom Town House on Leek Road, Hanley. Benefiting from Front and Rear gardens as well as off road parking this is much more than your standard property. In need of some modernisation this is a perfect o..."
"A modern first floor apartment, in need of some decoration. Briefly comprising, the property opens via an entrance hallway with doors to all the principal rooms, an open plan living room diner kitchen with modern fixtures and Juliet balcony, two bedrooms with built in wardrobes for bedroom one, a..."
"This terraced home is Sold as Seen and briefly offers a reception room, a fitted kitchen/diner, two sizeable bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom. Externally, the property boasts a front yard and a rear garden."
"WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF HANLEY TOWN CENTRE - Fabulous two bedroom home that is located in a convenient position, close to local shops, amenities, schools and the town centre! This home is perfect for any first time buyer or an investor looking for something with a great return. Internally the ..."
NO CHAIN!!!!SELECT AND UNIQUE DEVELOPMENT NEXT TO CITY`S CENTRAL PARK. A stylish and superbly appointed apartment in unique new development with excellent city links and next to parkland. One spacious bedroom. Double glazing. Communal gardens and parking. Viewing essential
 * A FORECOURTED MATURE MID TOWN HOUSE SITUATED CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES & GREAT COMMUTER LINKS * THROUGH LOUNGE/DINER * TWO BEDROOMS WITH FURTHER ROOM OFF BEDROOM TWO * FITTED KITCHEN * GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM * U.P.V.C. DOUBLE GLAZING & SOLID FUEL CENTRAL HEATING SYSTEM * REAR YARD...
A PRE LET INVESTMENT CLOSE TO HANLEY TOWN CENTRE - Whether you're a first time landlord or looking to add to your portfolio this offers a great opportunity to acquire a property with a sitting tenant. The current tenancy began in 2020 so the rent is a little lower than you may achieve now on the ...
"Public Notice 2 Elworth Court, Fenton. Stoke on Trent. ST4 3JE We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of 84.000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts take..."
"This terraced house is being offered for sale with no onwards chain. The property is situated with walking distance of Tunstall town centre. The property comprises: Lounge, Dining room, fitted kitchen and ground floor bathroom. To the first floor there are two double bedrooms. Externally th..."
"For Sale By Online Auction. Starting Bids £80,000. Terms and Conditions Apply. Findahome are pleased to offer to the market this Well Presented Convenience Store situated in the prime central location of Fenton. The Convenience Store is currently tenanted at £500 per calendar month. Th..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in a popular residential location close to Tunstall Town Centre. The Property is presented to a good standard throughout. It offers easy access to a number of Town Centres, local amenities, public transport, local schools ..."
"Being offered for sale no upward chain. Two bedroom mid terraced property situated within the popular residential area of Shelton, Stoke-On-Trent. The property is ideally placed for access to a range of local amenities and commuter links, Staffordshire University is located ..."
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity. We are delighted to welcome to the sales market this very well presented two bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Fenton. Close to the local schools, Hanley town centre, A50, A500 and M6 road Networks. Briefly the property comprises: Dining Room,..."
"Your Move Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this Two Bedroom First Floor Apartment situated within a complex of similar style apartments on the outskirts of Longton. In brief the accommodation comprises of:- Entrance Hall with stairs to the First Floor, Lounge, Kitchen, Bathro..."
"Public Notice Address: Apartment 16, Ravensbourne Court, Burtree Drive, ST6 8FF We are acting in the dale of the above property and have received an offer of £82,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contr..."
"'Cause you are GOLD, I'm glad that you're bound to return, something I could have learned, you're indestructible! You will always want to return to this TWO BEDROOM TERRACED ON HEATH STREET, GOLDENHILL."
Pre Let Investment Opportunity. A spacious two bed terraced house situated in the residential location of Bond Street Tunstall being sold with no upper chain and currently tenanted with a income of £485 pcm offering an ideal opportunity for investors. It is presented to a very good standard ...
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £80,000. Buy it now option available Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"First Time Buyers or owner occupiers only. This is a spacious two bed mid terraced house situated in the residential location of Hollings Street Fenton. The property is presented to a good standard throughout, also offering easy access to a number of local amenities, public transport, local scho..."
"CASH BUYERS. Martin and co are delighted to offer for sale this superb two bedroom ground floor flat located in a sought after location close to Festival Park. The property which benefits from a separate kitchen also comprises lounge, bathroom and en suite to the master bedroom, allocated parking..."
A two bedroom mid terraced property in need of some cosmetic improvement but offering excellent potential making it and ideal purchase for first time buyers and investors alike with a potential rental income of £520 PCM once work completed. Situated in Goms Mill conveniently placed...
"Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this traditional end terraced home situated in Fenton which provides ease of access to local shops, schools and amenities. As you would expect the property offers the benefits of Upvc double glazing along with combi central heating..."
"We are pleased to present this 2-bed mid terrace in a quiet cul-de-sac on the outskirts of Cobridge. this property would be ideal for first time buyers or investors. The property is literally ready to go. Briefly comprising of: Dining room, Lounge, Kitchen, Inner hall, Bathroom, upstairs two Do..."
"Modernised two bedroom terraced property, situated in Birches Head close to Hanley, Town centre. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. Accommodation comprises living room, dining room, kitchen and bathroom at ground floor level with two bedrooms to the first floor. At..."
"FOR SALE VIA ONLINE UNCONDITIONAL AUCTION ON MONDAY 28TH NOVEMBER BIDDING OPENS 1PM AND CLOSES TUESDAY 29TH NOVEMBER AT 1PM Sold with tenants in situ (£600pcm) this 3-bedroom mid terraced house boasts one reception rooms & fitted kitchen, bathroom to the ground floor. Landing three bedrooms to..."
"A spacious one-bedroom apartment, in a quiet modern development within walking distance of Meir town centre. Large lounge open-plan to kitchen area, excellent double bedroom, bathroom and useful storage space. Rear garden and dedicated parking space. Excellent public transport in the immediate vi..."
"Martin & Co are pleased to offer this neatly appointed 1-bed ground floor flat. Suitable for Owner Occupiers Only
Briefly comprises: Hall, Bathroom, Kitchen, Bedroom, Lounge, 1 Parking Space. Viewing is highly recommended. No upward chain."
"Looking for a property that you can make your own - Somewhere to add your own stamp to and make your perfect home- With TWO bedrooms, could this be a good STARTER HOME for you - You need to be quick if you'd like to view - If this sounds like what you are looking for - ..."
"**No upward chain!** New to the sales market in the popular and convenient area of Shelton. This two bedroom mid terraced property is handily placed within easy reach of Staffordshire University, Stoke Railway Station, local amenities and A500 commuting link. The property would benefit from so..."
"Public Notice Address: Apartment 20, Ravensbourne Court, Burtree Drive, ST6 8FF We are acting in the dale of the above property and have received an offer of £75,500 Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contra..."
"For sale by public auction at The Double Tree Hilton Hotel Stoke-on-Trent, on Monday 23rd January 2023 at 6.30pm. Remote bidding is also available via Telephone/Internet/Proxy"
"This is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a spacious and well-presented executive style first-floor leasehold apartment situated in the sought after area of Middleport. It is close to local amenities, schools, and major road links, and is offered to the market with no onward chain. The..."
"Storage Land adjacent to Phoenix Ridge (You are advised to check and obtain necessary planning regards use)
"
"Calling all investors looking for a hands off investment, with tenant in situ and management in place through Belvoir! Stoke On Trent.No need to pay extra or find tenants with this perfect buy to let property, already producing an income of £4,500 annually..."
"For Sale By Online Auction. Starting Bids £75,000. Terms and Conditions Apply.
Findahome are pleased to welcome to the market this Well Presented Mixed Use Commercial Property situated in the heart of Tunstall Town Centre. To the ground floor there is a well established Restaurant/Takeaway a..."
"ONE BEDROOM | UNFURNISHED | FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT | LOCATED ON THE POPULAR LOCK 38 DEVELOPMENT | GREAT ROAD LINKS TO A500, A50 AND M6 | UPVC DOUBLE GLAZING | ELEXTRIC WALL HEATERS THROUGHOUT | LAMINATE FLOORING | FITTED KITCHEN | FITTED WARDROBES | EPC RATING B"
"Pre Let Investment Opportunity..
Purpose Built Flat Martin and Co are pleased to offer this lovely modern two bedroom apartment with en-suite shower to master bedroom located close to Hanley town centre. The flat comprises a lounge/kitchen area, family bathroom, two bedrooms the main having an en..."
"A GEM NEEDING SOME TLC! Martin & Co present this 2-bed mid terrace in a quiet cul-de-sac - in need of modernisation but will then make a lovely home or BTL. Empty and ready to go as a project.
Briefly comprising of: Dining room, Lounge, Kitchen, Inner hall, Bathroom, upstairs two Double Bed..."
We are delighted to offer to market with no upward chain this well presented and deceptively spacious one-bedroom purpose-built first floor apartment. Located in ever popular Birches Head within walking distance of Hanley town centre and convenient for all major commuter links across the city this p
"SHARED OWNERSHIP, MODERN THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME.
This well presented semi detached family home is being offered for sale on a 50% shared ownership basis. The property is conveniently situated within close proximity to local amenities, schools, commuter and transport networks. The..."
"Austerberry present this ideal investment opportunity at Joshua Court in Longton. This two bedroom, second floor flat provides a competitive presentation rivalling many flats in the area. The large kitchen and living arrangement is complete with integrated fridge freezer, electric hob, oven and e..."
Apartment 27 at Manchester Court is situated in Burslem Stoke On Trent - the home of of so many characterful buildings and with so much local history. The residence is superb and very modern with the potential to acquire many of the furnishings that you see in the marketing advert - which will b...
"Goodchilds estate agents are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £70,000 of 3 Hillary Street, ST6 2PG. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact (Goodchilds estate agents, 27 Piccadilly, Hanley, Stoke-on-Trent ST1 1EN & ) before exchange of contracts. "
"Ideal for investors. Second floor apartment. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall, two bedrooms, open plan kitchen/lounge and bathroom. There is allocated parking within the communal grounds. The property enjoys gas central heating and double glazing. Situated in Penkhull/Stoke, the lo..."
"DRAFT DETAILS. Ideal investment property in need of some updating. This is a mid terraced house, has lounge, dining kitchen, ground floor shower room W.C. To the first floor there are two double bedrooms. The property has gas fired central heating and double glazing and benefits from no upward..."
"WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN, This is a lovely two bedroom Duplex Apartment that needs to be viewed to appreciate just what's on offer to the buyer"
"BEING SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU. This is a good opportunity to purchase a top floor studio apartment, situated in the heart of Stoke Town Centre. Ideally placed for Stoke College, railway station, shopping facilities and local schools."
"NO CHAIN!!! TENANT IN SITU!!! This is a good opportunity to purchase a top floor studio apartment, situated in the heart of Stoke Town Centre. Ideally placed for Stoke College, railway station, shopping facilities and local schools."
"Modern first floor apartment, with allocated parking space. The property is located close to Burslem town centre and offers nearby access to the A500. Considered an ideal investment or first time buy and is offered with no chain involvement."
"*NO CHAIN* An attractive mid terraced property situated within popular Tunstall location. Within easy walking distance of many shops, amenities and transport links. An ideal investment opportunity/first time buy! The accommodation comprises:- through lounge-dining room with laminate flooring a..."
CALLING ALL INVESTORS!! A two bed terrace with ***TENANT IN SITU***
"75% SHARED OWNERSHIP - Baskeyfield House is a purpose-built retirement living community, providing apartments and communal facilities for over 55s.There are a range of facilities on site including a hairdressing and beauty salon, shop and restaurant. The apartment itself is immaculately presented..."
For sale by public auction on Monday 27th February 2023 at 6:30pm prompt at the Double Tree By Hilton Festival Park Stoke-on-Trent
ATTENTION INVESTORS - TENANTED INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY YIELDING ABOVE 5% NET! Spacious one double bedroom apartment in a popular residential development.
SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION Book your viewing now for this well presented two bedroom property in Stoke.
Shaw's & Co are pleased to offer an opportunity to acquire a two bedroom town house with NO CHAIN and located within easy access to the town centre & with some further potential to update and improve. An ideal investment to rent out or first time buy. The property has a flat roof and app...
"IDEAL BUY TO LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY, OFF ROAD PARKING.
This two bedroom end of terrace property is situated in a popular residential location, within close proximity to local amenities, schools, commuter and transport networks. The property requires selective updating/improvements throughout ..."
"Ssssshhhh we are trying to KEEP this one under LOCK and key! A perfect investment or first time buyer purchase, located with walking distance to Hanley City Centre with excellent commuter links. This spacious one bedroom terraced property is ready for a new owner and the accommodation comprises a..."
"* TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION * Reeds Rains Hanley are pleased to offer this two bedroom mid-terrace House on Dividy Road, Stoke-On-Trent. In need of some minor modernisation this property would be a fantastic purchase for any buy-to-let investor or landlord looking to extend their c..."
"Situated in the popular residential area of Birches Head this end terraced property is within walking distance to the city centre. The property comprises; front reception room, living room, kitchen and bathroom to the first floor. On the second floor you will find two double bedrooms. Outside ..."
"VIEWINGS AVAILABLE PRIOR TO AUCTION COMMENCING - PLEASE CONTACT THE AUCTION COMPANY FOR FURTHER DETAILS. - Two-bedroom mid-terrace
- Sold with vacant possession
- Ideal for first time buyers or BTL investors
- Rear enclosed courtyard
- Close to local amenities and schools
- Good transport links
-..."
"* TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION* The accommodation comprises; lounge, kitchen/dining room, rear lobby, ground floor bathroom, two bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing and rear yard. Viewing is essential to fully appreciate the size, condition and close proximity to Hanley town..."
"For sale by public auction at The Double Tree Hilton Hotel Stoke-on-Trent, on Monday 3rd April 2023 at 6.30pm. Remote bidding is also available via Telephone/Internet/Proxy"
"A two bedroom mid terraced house in the popular location of Tunstall, within walking distance to the town. An ideal first time buy or buy to let property. The property benefits from double glazing and two reception rooms. Close to local amenities, commuter links and schools. Viewing is highly ..."
"Bob Gutteridge Estate Agents welcome to the market this ideal investment opportunity situated in Fenton. The property is in need of modernisation however offers Upvc double glazing along with combi central heating. In brief the accommodation comprises of dining room, lounge, kitchen, bathroom and..."
"This two bedroom semi-detached bungalow is situated within a small development of homes, which have been purposely built for 55s and over.Conveniently located within Bethesda Road, which is within easy reach of Hanley town centre, major road links, bus routes and a short distance from Stoke Stati..."
"Residential Development Site
Full planning for 4 apartments"
"*Cash buyers only* An opportunity for all Investors, Currently tenanted two bedroom first floor apartment offers modern open plan accommodation close to Burslem town centre and other towns in The Potteries. Major road links are in close proximity as are popular schools and colleges. The property..."
"** TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION ** Reeds Rains are pleased to offer this Two Bedroom Mid-Terraced House on Whatmore Street, Smallthorne. In need of full refurbishment this would could be a great investment with a potential rental income of £550 PCM This property is fo..."
"**For Sale By Public Auction 15th March 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Vacant Two Bedroom Semi Detached House Freehold Guide Price = £60,000+ Location The property is situa..."
"Two bedroom mid terrace property in need of improvement Auctioneer Comments - This property is offered through Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid your data will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold Limited.This method requires both parties to complete the transaction within..."
A well presented property which has clearly been the subject of considerable expenditure and which is located just a short walk away from the centre of Hanley. The accommodation is arranged over a ground floor and two upper floors and there is a small patio/yard area to the rear. See ou...
"GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ELECTRIC, GAS & BUILDINGS INSURANCE INCLUDED WITHIN THE SERVICE CHARGE- A one bedroom ground floor apartment situated on this popular development in Hanley. The property in brief comprises of; Kitchen/Living Room, Double Bedroom & Shower Room. The property also benefi..."
Self contained one bedroom ground floor apartment. Martin & Co welcome to market this modern property. Whether you are looking for a first home or an investment property this low maintenance home may well prove of interest. Benefiting from central heating and double glazing and located close ...
Hunters are delighted to welcome to market this self contained two bedroom apartment. Benefiting from double glazing and central heating. In addition there is a car park providing off road parking for residents. Conveniently located for A50 and A500 road network. Auctioneer Comments ...
* TO BE SOLD VIA MODERN AUCTION * Two Bedroom Mid-terraced House in need of full refurbishment. located in a popular location of Bucknall and offering so much potential! Mid Terraced House Two Double Bedrooms New Combi Boiler Potential Rental Income £60...
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £55,000 with a 25% share! Nestled in beautiful North Staffordshire, Waterside is ideally located for all of county’s many world class attractions. These include theme parks, historic hous..."
"Hunters Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this first floor two bedroom apartment located on the popular Sadlers Park development in Burslem. Located in the heart Burslem's thriving town centre, this development boasts some of the most stylish rental accommodation available in the S..."
"Shared Ownership This brand new home is available to buy from as little as £53,750 with a 25% share! Nestled in beautiful North Staffordshire, Waterside is ideally located for all of county’s many world class attractions. These include theme parks, historic hous..."
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £50,000 plus Reservation Fees.A well-presented two bedroom apartment on the ground floor of a modern apartment building. The property benefits from electric heaters and double glazing, with living accommodation comprising hallway, ope..."
"A brilliant opportunity to acquire a plot which is approximately 0.2 acres in the popular residential location of Blurton. The plot is located on Charsley Place, surrounding a mixture of houses and bungalow. An ideal plot for surrounding properties to make use of as additional usage subject to..."
*** INVESTOR ALERT *** NO CHAIN Spacious Two Bedroom first floor flat located in Meir in need of some cosmetic improvements
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £45,000 plus Reservation Fees. Currently let rental investment with a passing rent of £375.00 pcm. The property is gas central heated and double glazed, with living accommodation comprising two reception rooms, kitchen and bathr..."
"AVAILABLE AT £45,000 - Long leasehold first floor flat,TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY IN OUR NEXT AUCTION CALL US NOW"
"For sale by Modern Method of Auction: Starting Bid Price £45,000 plus Reservation Fees. A two bedroom second-floor apartment, situated on a modern estate, a short drive from the amenities of Hanley city centre. The property is double glazed, with central heating and living accommodation com..."
"You can't get much better value for money than this ground floor flat at Tollgate Court, Blurton. This flat comprises of one bedroom, a living room, fully fitted kitchen and a shower room. The block also benefits from communal gardens and a carpark. If you're a Buy To Let investor or looki..."
Freehold House Vacant Possession
"This one bedroom first floor apartment is the ideal investment and buy to let opportunity. The property comprises a hallway, lounge/diner, kitchen, bathroom and a double bedroom. The property has off road parking, is close to amenities and a less than ten minutes drive to Trentham Gardens. If you..."
"For sale by public auction on Monday 27th February 2023 at 6.30pm at the DoubleTree by Hilton Stoke on Trent, Staffordshire, ST1 5BQ. Remote bidding is available via internet/telephone/proxy"
"For sale by public auction on Monday 23rd January 2023 at 6.30pm at the DoubleTree by Hilton Stoke on Trent, Staffordshire, ST1 5BQ. Remote bidding is available via internet/telephone/proxy"
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold End Terraced Property
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Semi Detached Property
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Vacant Freehold Mid Terraced Property
For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Mid Terraced Property
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Residential Investment Property
Current Gross Income: £5,400 pa."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Residential Investment Property
Current Gross Income: £3,720 pa."
"Freehold Two Bedroom House For Sale * No Forward Chain *
Starting on 15/03/2023 08:00"
"Guide Price £5,000.00 For sale by 27/03/2023 12:45 Online Bidding Pre-registration is required via our website bpauctions.co.uk A Two Bedroom Mid-Terrace Property. Vacant 28 Days Completion. Place a prior auction offer by sending an email to Administration..."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Development Opportunity, with the Benefit of Outline Planning Permission for Residential Development"
This quietly situated and surprisingly spacious three bedroom mid terrace home positioned in a favourable village setting close to Whitburn Village Centre with its superb amenities and highly regarded Secondary School. The property is tastefully appointed throughout and the internally comprises ...
"The subject property is a block of 23 two bedroom apartments situated over four floors in Alexander Court, Chester Oval. The block provides off street parking by way of electronic gate system, for pedestrians there is a fob gate system. Each apartment has an open plan kitchen living aspect with a..."
"A complete enterprise with extensive business and income potential, including large period farmhouse, two well appointed holiday cottages with ongoing bookings, livery facilities, operational riding school, office space, in whole extending to approximately 8.87 Ha (21.93Acres)"
A ONCE IN A LIFETIME OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE SUCH A ICONIC CITY CENTRE PROPERTY. 40 bedrooms & Restaurant Burdon House is a prestigious Grade II listed building in the heart of Sunderland City Centre with an established restaurant on the ground floor with long term lease along with parking for a...
"***BESPOKE ARCHITECT PROPERTY***We welcome to the market this impressive bespoke architect designed detached property located within the highly sought after village of Cleadon with excellent amenities close at hand including restaurants, shops and local schools. Accessibility throughout the regio..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this magnificent 5 bed Victorian Mansion House forming part of Undercliff Hall which is set within the highly regarded and much sought after Village of Cleadon, offering many well respected shops, schools and amenities, as well as boasting superb transport ..."
"Substantial Victorian Residence Situated within Large Grounds, Offering an Abundance of Period Charm with a Wonderful Full Width Drawing Room, Impressive Reception Hall with Original Stone Fireplace, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Five Bedrooms, Two Bathrooms, Cellar, Extensive South Facing Lawned Garde..."
"This is a beautiful detached home WITH 4 ACRES INCLUDING, STABLE BLOCK AND 3 PADDOCKS plus stunning views. Located within Cleadon Village, this type of property and opportunity for horse owners rarely comes to the market. Set in beautifully maintained south facing gardens, the property has 3 doub..."
"A substantial 4 bed extended detached house situated on Laburnum Grove in Cleadon Village that must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property is ideally located to provide easy access to Cleadon Village and its many shops, restaurants, amenities in addition to well respected schools and goo..."
"This substantial 6 bedroomed detached house commands an excellent location on West Meadows Road in Cleadon and offers a much sought after location with the village boasting easy access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as being within easy reach of Sunderland, South Shields and the re..."
This is a spacious and greatly extended semi detached property situated in this most sought after Seaburn location. The Lemonfield currently trades as a guesthouse with a lovely open aspect and sea views beyond. Would make an outstanding larger family home but could also appeal to investors. 
A rare opportunity to purchase this superb 6 bedroom detached property set in the exclusive development of Burdon Hall. Located in Burdon providing easy access to the A19 and superb transport links to the region and beyond. The property is accessed via electric gates and is one of only four pro...
"INVESTMENT SALE - 8 NO SELF CONTAINED FLATS, TELEPHONE MAST INCOME INVESTMENT, FREEHOLD OF BUILDING AND SMALL LOCK UP UNIT. - An exciting opportunity to purchase an income producing investment comprising of 8NO self contained flats set within one block situated on Durham Road which offers a popul..."
"A truly magnificent, double fronted, Grade II listed period property providing over 5000 square feet of accommodation.
This four storey early Victorian townhouse is situated in this prestigious gated development and provides a secure environment within easy reach of Sunderland city centre.
"
"A rare to the market 4 / 5 bed semi detached house situated on the much sought after and desirable West Park Road in Cleadon Village which commands easy access to the village providing many shops, amenities, restaurants in addition to being ideally placed to commute to the regions towns and citie..."
"The Sheepfold is a beautiful stone built barn conversion located in a pretty hamlet that enjoys a rural setting with sea views and has excellent access to three cities, that will have both regional and national appeal and where an internal inspection will be essential. Accommodation co..."
The premises / site is situated in a highly prominent position on the corner of Borough Road and Villiers Street South and its junction with at A1018 which is one of the main arterial routes around the City Centre of Sunderland making this a very accessible and visible site. The property is situa...
"An extremely rare opportunity to acquire one of the cities grandest gentlemans residences, occupying a fabulous 0.5acre site within the heart of Ashbrooke. The elegant external appearance is equally complimented by a most impressive interior which retains many of the original features and ben..."
"We are delighted to welcome to the market this stunning and substantial 5 bed extended semi detached house situated on Laburnum in Cleadon Village boasting convenient access to the village and its well respected bars, restaurants, cafes and amenities as well as offering superb transport links to ..."
"In this highly sought after situation in the centre of Cleadon Village, a quite superb semi detached house of considerable stature and character set in a lovely garden site. The property is located in one of the most desirable situations within the village with excellent amenities including local..."
Offerton is a beautiful traditional village centred around Offerton Grange farm and a range of luxury barn conversions together with a selection of high-value individually designed and built executive houses. The village occupies a superb elevated location with views over the River Wear and Pensh...
"Approached via a drive leading from West Park Road, this is an impressive, greatly extended semi detached house superbly positioned in one of Cleadon's most prestigious and sought after addresses. Occupying a lovely mature garden site affording a high degree of privacy and seclusion, the property..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * SIX BEDROOM MID TERRACE * ROKER SR6 * STUNNING FAMILY HOME * ARRANGED OVER THREE FLOORS * LOVELY FEATURES AND FINISH * EXCEPTIONAL AMOUNT OF LIVING SPACE * ONE OF THE FINEST PROPERTIES AVAILABLE IN THE SUNDERLAND AREA * COUNCIL TAX BAND - E * EPC - E * ...
SUBSTANTIAL 4 DOUBLE BEDROOM - 3 BATHROOM - DETACHED MANSION - ONE OF FINEST ADDRESSES IN CITY - VERY SPACIOUS INTERIOR - LARGE GARDEN PLOT - GREATLY EXTENDED - BAR/SOCIAL ROOM WITH GAMES ROOM LEADING OFF - SUPERB CENTRAL LOCATION. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a detached ...
"This is a unique opportunity to purchase this individually designed three storey four bedroom split level detached residence, boasting a commanding position within this fashionable coastal residential location. Occupying an imposing, elevated site and providing outstanding panoramic sea and c..."
"Early viewing is a must of this generously proportioned three bedroom mid terrace which boasts three reception rooms and is offered for sale with no upward chain. The flexible footprint is arranged over two floors and comprises: entrance hall, three reception rooms, kitchen, rear hall, ground flo..."
"Early viewing is strongly recommended as it is rare that a cottage becomes available which features a GARDEN, GARAGE and CONSERVATORY! Offering deceptively spacious accommodation, this three bedroom DOUBLE FRONTED mid terraced cottage is centrally located, enjoying good access to the picture..."
"An extremely rare opportunity to acquire a substantial 4-bedroom detached house occupying a prime central Ashbrooke location and set within private and secure walled grounds with electric gate access. The accommodation comprises: 4no. bedrooms, 2no. bathrooms, 2no. en-suite/dressing room..."
"Sandalwood is a striking example of 1970s modern house architecture, which now lends itself to the current in vogue renewal of Open Plan family living. The accommodation comprises; 3 substantial reception rooms at ground floor together with a large newly appointed family kitchen breakfa..."
"An exciting addition to the luxury housing market, this individually designed and built 6 double bedroom detached residence is both superbly located and impeccably presented creating an amazing home which must be viewed to be appreciated. Situated at the head of an executive cul-de-sac a..."
"An elegant and superbly presented six bedroom, mid Victorian, grade two listed, terraced family house benefiting carefully restored period features and a contemporary specification creating a luxury family home of real distinction. Internally the living space is both spacious and enjoys excellent..."
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION. This is a simply stunning 4 bedroom detached house situated on an exclusive modern development located on the edge of Cleadon, with excellent amenities available in the vicinity including highly regarded local schools, together with nearby shops and restaurants. Beau..."
"This stunning detached house is situated on the much sought after and highly desirable Sunniside Leigh in Cleadon Village which is a small executive development of houses situated just of Sunniside Lane in an enviable position offering easy assess to the Village and its many shops, cafes, restaur..."
"This stunning four bedroom property located on an exclusive development. This property boasts an ultra-modern design with floor to ceiling windows allowing fantastic views over the city landscape. Featuring two roof terraces, a patio and a large garden, there is a great opportunity to enjoy the ..."
"The Manning features a BRIGHT AND AIRY KITCHEN boasting breakfast, family and utility areas and a glazed bay that opens onto the garden. The lounge also features its own set of FRENCH DOORS. A STUDY and a BAY FRONTED DINING ROOM complete the ground floor.
Upstairs, the main and bedroom two featur..."
"Set in a quiet CUL-DE-SAC, a Prestigious Detached Family Home located on a popular private residential estate, with picturesque coastal walks just minutes away which lead to Whitburn Beach and beyond. This prestigious property benefits from an extended kitchen, two reception rooms, a useful Grann..."
"Situated prominently at the entrance to this beautiful enclave of stylish homes, and benefitting from a larger plot with area of lawn and extensive landscaped gardens, this property offers stylish accommodation throughout."
"This four bedroom detached bungalow is one of the finest examples of it's kind, occupying a tucked away position on a private road in the leafy suburb of Ashbrooke. The property has been refurbished to an exceptional standard throughout at considerable expense and truly is a credit to the current..."
"Located at the entrance of a quiet cul de sac on the exclusive Sunniside Leigh development in Cleadon Village, we have pleasure in introducing this deceptively spacious 4 bedroom detached house. Conveniently located close to the village centre and perfectly placed for access to Cleadon's excellen..."
PRICE REDUCED AS EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. This is a beautifully presented detached house situated in this sought after Cleadon location. Decorated with great taste and featuring an extended re fitted kitchen/breakfast room overlooking the good sized garden and Boldon Flats beyond. It has 3 bedroom...
Spacious Detached Family Home located on this private residential development and in a cul de sac location. Within a short walk to the picturesque coastal cliff tops walks. The property is in the catchment area for well regarded schools and has good transport links close b...
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * SIX BEDROOM MID TERRACE * ROKER SR6 * BEAUTIFUL VICTORIAN TERRACE * PRESTIGIOUS PRIVATE ROAD * OVERLOOKING ROKER PARK * EXCEPTIONAL AMOUNT OF LIVING SPACE * MOMENTS FROM SEA FRONT * SUPERB GAMES ROOM * COUNCIL TAX BAND - E * EPC - Rating Occup...
"Signature North East are proud to introduce this delightful detached home, offering five bedrooms, spacious living, and modern décor and styling throughout. Situated on Silksworth Hall Drive, Sunderland, the property benefits from being in a brilliant location, with a variety of shops and superma..."
"This substantial and individual 8 Bedroom Detached Residence, currently arranged as FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE WITH AN ADDITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SELF CONTAINED ANNEXE, is perfect for extended familes requiring a Granny annexe and commands a highly sought after position within the well established..."
"A stunning four bedroom detached house with an upgraded, stylish interior, situated within this sought after modern development, constructed by Miller Homes. Internally the immaculately presented accommodation is accessed via a reception hall with staircase to the first floor and a cloakroom/wc...."
"A most impressive, larger style four bedroom semi-detached house providing delightful sea views to the front within this sought after and highly regarded location. Internally the immaculately presented accommodation is accessed via an entrance porch, leading through to an imposing reception hall..."
"PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN Sandbrook Meadows is an exclusive development located on South Bents in Seaburn. Built over the last couple of years by Miller Homes, the properties are all detached executive homes and this is a rare opportunity to purchase a superb example. "
"A Prestigious Detached Four Bedroom Family Home located on a quiet cul-de-sac on this popular residential Estate at Whitburn, having access to many amenities including picturesque coastal walks and well regarded Schools. Well appointed throughout to t..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this deceptively spacious 4 bed detached bungalow that commands a superb location within the Ashbrooke which is considered to be a highly desirable location offering an array of shops, schools and amenities as well as being within easy reach of Sunderland C..."
"This spacious home starts with an IMPRESSIVE ENTRANCE HALL leading to an airy lounge, and an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN with a utility room. A separate DINING ROOM and a STUDY complete the ground floor.  Upstairs you'll find a large EN SUITE MAIN BEDROOM and three further double bedrooms. A family bathroo..."
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. In this highly regarded village location, in a lovely cul-de-sac position with an impressive open aspect over farmland to the rear this is a simply stunning, recently extended semi detached house providing spacious and versatile family ac..."
"Impressive Period Property In A Highly Sought After Location! Situated on the well regarded Roker Park Road boasting stunning views overlooking Roker Park, the property is ideally placed for those who enjoy walks as you also have the award winning coastline and the mar..."
*** Burdon Rise *** Four bedrooms *** Detached *** Garage *** Off street parking for three cars *** Open plan kitchen dining/family room *** EPC grade B *** Freehold *** Executive development *** Stunning interior *** Upgraded Kitchens and Bathrooms *** Gardens *** Must view *** Stunning fou...
"A wonderful detached house situated on Loughborough Avenue being within 250m of Backhouse Park and the Ashbrooke conservation area. Boasting large private gardens with an open aspect, this 4-bedroom family home has been immaculately maintained, tastefully decorated and professionally extended wit..."
RARE INDIVIDUALLY DESIGNED & CONSTRUCTED LARGE 4 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH IMPRESSIVE SOUTH FACING OUTLOOK TO THE REAR OVER OPEN COUNTRYSIDE - DOUBLE GARAGE - QUALITY KITCHEN - MASTER BEDROOM WITH DRESSING ROOM & FULL BATHROOM LEADING OFF - SOLAR PV PANELS CONSIDERABLY REDUCING NET ENERG...
"The Chelworth has a traditional look that disguises the modern design of an exceptionally spacious family home inside. The OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, flowing into breakfast and family areas, and the SEPARATE DINING ROOM both lead to the garden via French doors. The attractive lounge is perfect for relaxi..."
"Ideally located close to the centre of Cleadon Village with excellent amenities in the vicinity including shops, restaurants and highly regarded local schools, this is a superbly improved detached house providing beautifully presented and spacious family accommodation. With the benefit of an impr..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market a superb 4 bed extended semi detached house situated on Elmsleigh Gardens in Cleadon Village that boasts convenient access to shops, schools, amenities as well as excellent transport links. The property itself has been meticulously improved and extended by ..."
"This spacious four bedroom home starts with an impressive entrance hall leading to an airy lounge, and an open plan kitchen with a utility room. A separate dining room and a study complete the ground floor. 
 
Upstairs you'll find a large en suite main bedroom and three further double bedrooms. A..."
"An exceptional, larger style double fronted FREEHOLD detached home situated within this highly sought-after executive development. Internally the immaculately presented accommodation is accessed via an impressive reception hall with staircase to the first floor and a cloakroom/wc. There is a sp..."
"A magnificent three storey mid terrace Victorian Townhouse with great character and a wealth of charm, featuring decorative plasterwork, tall ceilings, deep skirting boards and sash windows, situated on the highly regarded Thornhill Terrace. Internally the beautifully appointed accommodation is ..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this impressive 5-bedroom, detached family home, situated on one of Story Homes newest developments “The Birches”. The Charlton has been designed with flexible living in mind, perfect for families who need living spaces tha..."
West Lawn is one of the most impressive terraces within the region and reflects the wealth and opulence experienced at by the city at the turn of the 19th century when it was a leading ship builder and coal mining centre. The impressive period 4 storey property offers a wonderful aspect ...
"Tenure: Freehold COUNCIL TAX: Band E EPC: ?C?Situated in Middle Herrington, a popular location on the western outskirts of Sunderland, this attractive detached bungalow, improved to the highest standards, provides generously proportioned three or four-bedroom accommodation. Th..."
"Having a peaceful location within a cul de sac close to the amenities of Cleadon Village, this extended link detached home offers a high level of specification! The property is sure to impress and requires immediate viewing to truly appreciate the contemporary styling and flexibility of the l..."
"Located close to the amenities of Cleadon Village with its thriving social scene, well regarded primary schools and ease of distance for recreational time, presented and maintained to a high standard and offering discerning buyers a level of specification and design that is currently en-trend. T..."
"Reeds Rains are extremely proud to bring to the market this exclusive three bedroom detached home set in the highly sought after location of Cleadon. All amenities are close by to include established local schooling, village shops and excellent transport links into local town centres and fabulou..."
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Pine with THREE DOUBLE bedrooms and TWO EN SUITES is a beautiful family home. Large OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining room with adjoining FAMILY ROOM and UTILITY ROOM. FRENCH DOORS into the garden, dedicated DINING ROOM "
"We are delighted to offer to the market this 4 bedroom, freehold, detached house, located in the heart of Cleadon Village which is an idyllic residential area and one of the most attractive villages South of the Tyne. The main shopping area is home to a selection of shops, pubs and restaurants, ..."
"Large open-plan FOUR BEDROOM home. Experience DESIGN-LED living today with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, designer kitchen and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN-SUITE SHOWER ROOM."
"The Avondale is a wonderful FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM home that offers a STYLISH KITCHEN with DINING AREA, UTILITY AREA and a GLAZED BAY to the front. The generous lounge features a bay window and French doors that lead to the fenced, turfed rear garden. Plus, there is a spacious study, ideal for worki..."
"Available with NO ONWARD CHAIN! Situated within the well regarded estate close to the many amenities of Cleadon Village and Cleadon Church of England Academy. This Detached Home offers: Entrance hall with guest w.c., lounge and kitchen/dining ro..."
"*** Rare to the Market *** Exceptional Living Space *** Well Maintained Gardens *** Turn Key Accommodation *** Not to be Missed! Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this lovely family home occupying a generous plot on the exclusive development of Burdon Rise, Sunder..."
Superb individually designed four bedroom detached house with far reaching views! Generous living space. Tucked away position. Viewing a must. No upward chain!
"This architect designed four bedroom detached home occupies a wonderful, mature plot at the head of this small cul-de-sac. The current owners have comprehensively upgraded and modernised the property to a most impressive standard, providing a fabulous, stylish and contemporary interior. Interna..."
DOUBLE FRONTED 2 BED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH ADDITIONAL LOFT ROOM – OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LOUNGE – GARAGE & DOUBLE DRIVEWAY – AMAZING & VERY GENEROUS GARDEN PLOT. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this wonderful 2 double bedroom semi-detached bungalow loca...
A fantastic opportunity to acquire one of the finest sites within the highly sought after Middle Herrington. Occupying a prime corner and enclosed site with electric gate access this substantial two bedroomed detached bungalow offers immense scope for redevelopment or extension if required. <...
"*** Detached Family Home *** 5 Double Bedrooms *** Extensive Gardens *** Ten Man Hot tub *** No Chain Pattinson Estate Agents are excited to offer a once in a lifetime opportunity to purchase a unique family home, nestled in its own grounds with mature trees and extensive gardens. Situated in ..."
"This charming double fronted bay windowed three bedroom, three bathroom and three reception room semi detached bungalow with well proportioned gardens to the rear, offers a comfortable living space ideal for those who wish to live in the ever fashionable and picturesque village of Cleadon. ..."
"In this highly regarded village location, in a sought after cul-de-sac position with excellent amenities available including very good local schools, restaurants and the Metro system, an opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented, greatly extended semi detached bungalow providing impressivel..."
"This beautiful home has no shortage of space. The OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with DINING AREA has plenty of room for the whole family and boasts a GLAZED BAY that opens out onto the garden through French doors, while the airy lounge benefits from a feature bay window.
Upstairs the generous main bedroom be..."
"**SAVE £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^** The Alder features an OPEN-PLAN kitchen, dining and family area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, FRENCH DOORS into the garden, a UTILITY ROOM, cloakroom, separate living room, FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS and an EN SUITE to the master bedroom. Integral garage."
"This is a beautifully presented, greatly extended semi detached house providing exceptionally spacious and attractively appointed family accommodation, situated in this sought after village location with excellent amenities in the immediate area including schools, shops, restaurants and the Metro..."
"Offering Immense Potential and benefitting from an extensive rear garden, this Semi Detached Bungalow has been extended to the rear to enlarge the original footprint. Offering accommodation of: Entrance hall, lounge opening to conservatory, dining room, large kitchen/breakf..."
"The Drummond - An impressive home ideal for families. On the ground floor you'll find a LARGE LOUNGE, an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN family diner with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden and a spacious UTILITY ROOM. Head upstairs and there are FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, an EN SUITE to the main bedroom and..."
*STUNNING DEVELOPMENT OF HIGH CALIBRE HOMES* *GATED COMMUNITY* *EXTREMELY SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME* *HIGH QUALITY FINISH* *BEAUTIFUL ENTERTAINING KITCHEN/DINER* Dowen Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this 4 bedroom family townhouse. The floor plan briefly comprises over no less than 4 f...
"£19,000 TOWARDS YOUR MOVE plus FLOORING or FITTED WARDROBES | The Drummond is a spacious home offering a fantastic living space for your family with a LARGE LOUNGE, open-plan fitted kitchen/dining room and spacious UTILITY ROOM. The kitchen has FRENCH DOORS leading out to the rear SOUTH FACING ga..."
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Terraced House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £375,000 - £415,000*"
"UNIQUE FREEHOLD THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED | CLEADON VILLAGE | OPEN PLAN LOUNGE / DINING ROOM | LARGE CONSERVATORY | ENCLOSED GARDENS | OFF STREET PARKING | GARAGE | SPECTACULAR VIEWS Pattinson Estate Agents welcome to the market this unique, well presented Three Bedroom Semi Detached family ..."
"This spacious and well-maintained 4-bedroom detached house is positioned on arguably the best plot within the private grounds and parkland setting of Corby Hall, being within the heart of the Ashbrooke conservation area The house is characterised by its wonderful dual aspect over well m..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACE * ROKER SR6 * ABSOLUTELY STUNNING FAMILY HOME * EXCEPTIONAL PRESENTATION * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * KITCHEN DINING * MASTER WITH EN SUITE * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - D * A rare opportunity to purchase a truly stunning...
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACE * STUNNING PERIOD PROPERTY * OUTSTANDING OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM * UTILITY ROOM * GROUND FLOOR WC * OFF ROAD PARKING * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - C * If you’re looking for a four bedroom family home in t...
"We are delighted to present this extremely spacious mid-terraced house ideally situated just off the seafront in Roker, Sunderland. The property offers an ideal family home with ample living space. The property comprises: Five bedrooms, family bathroom with bath, modern e..."
"£18,600 TOWARDS YOUR MOVE | The hub of the house will surely be the EXPANSIVE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, which has dining and family areas with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH FACING garden and a separate UTILITY ROOM. The lounge has an attractive front-aspect bay window, making it a pleasant place to relax.  ..."
"A magnificent six bedroom, four storey mid terrace house, enjoying many wonderful period features with ornate fireplaces, deep skirting boards, sash windows and tall ceilings with decorative plasterwork. Internally the attractive accommodation is accessed at raised ground floor level via an entr..."
"COMING SOON - CURRENTLY UNDER DEVELOPMENT -An impressive 5 bed terraced 4 storey town house situated on Carton Terrace on Mowbray Road which offers a superb location on the fringe of the Ashbrooke Conservation Area commanding easy access to Sunderland City Centre, excellent transport links as wel..."
"The Holden is a stylish four bedroom home with no shortage of space and light. The bright, modern kitchen has been designed with INTEGRATED DINING AND FAMILY AREAS and FRENCH DOORS that lead out on to the garden and an adjoining utility. There is also an elegant BAY FRONTED LOUNGE and STUDY.
Upst..."
"A stunning 3 bed extended semi detached house situated in an enviable position on Barnes View boasting superb views over Barnes Park and providing convenient access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as excellent transport links. The property itself has been meticulously improved and ..."
"An impressive and deceptively spacious 3 / 4 bed detached bungalow situated on Durham Road in East Herrington which commands a much sought after location providing convenient access to local shops, well respected schools in addition to being only a short journey to Doxford International Business ..."
"This superb 4 bedroom, freehold, link-detached house is located in the heart of Cleadon Village, close to good local shops, pubs and restaurants as well the excellent schools. Deceptively larger than it appears outside, this property offers an abundance of features, including a hot tub in the rea..."
"This extended and recently updated four bedroom semi-detached house, occupies an attractive cul-de-sac position within this sought after area of Silksworth. The immaculately appointed accommodation includes an entrance porch, spacious lounge / diner and a kitchen whilst to the first floor there ..."
"An imposing four storey, seven-bedroom mid terrace, period Town House, retaining great character and wonderful period features with tall ceilings, decorative plasterwork, grand staircase and impressive fireplaces. The internal accommodation is accessed at raised ground floor level via a fabulous..."
"Bradley Hall are delighted to the market this modern and uniquely designed split level 4/5 bedroom detached family residence situated in Cavalier Way. The property occupies an extremely private position on this exclusive quiet cul de sac development, which contains six individually designed prop..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are excited to list this outstanding period residence, ideally located in the prestigious Ashbrooke on the outskirts of the city of Sunderland. The amenities of a vibrant city are within walking distance, the beautiful coastline is close by and, good local state and privat..."
"A splendid six bedroom, three storey mid terrace period house, enjoying great character and charm, with stunning fireplaces, decorative plasterwork, tall ceilings and deep skirting boards within this highly regarded area. The current owners have carried out significant, yet sympathetic works to ..."
"The hub of the house will surely be the EXPANSIVE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, which has dining and family areas with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH FACING garden and a separate UTILITY ROOM. The lounge has an attractive front-aspect bay window, making it a pleasant place to relax. Upstairs, FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this impressive 4-bedroom, detached family home, situated on one of Storey Homes newest developments “The Birches”. The feature room in the Hewson is the open plan kitchen/dining/family area, which has a peninsula kitchen i..."
"Occupying one of the finest locations on the highly sought-after Burdon Rise development, this outstanding 4-bedroom detached house provides an upgraded and stylish interior. Benefits include French polished oak staircase, luxury kitchen, and very well appointed bathrooms. The ground fl..."
"The Drummond is a spacious home offering a FANTASTIC LIVING SPACE for your family with a large lounge, OPEN-PLAN FITTED KITCHEN/dining room and SPACIOUS UTILITY ROOM. The kitchen has FRENCH DOORS leading out to the rear garden. Upstairs there are FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, with EN SUITE to the main be..."
"This FOUR BEDROOM HOME has an airy interior. The HALLWAY leads directly to a STYLISH KITCHEN with DINING, FAMILY and UTILITY AREAS, and a GLAZED BAY opens to the rear garden. Downstairs also offers a bay fronted lounge.
Upstairs, the main bedroom has an en suite shower room, with three more doubl..."
"A beautiful, traditional detached home. The ground floor features a SPACIOUS SITTING ROOM, a smart kitchen/dining room with FRENCH DOORS opening on to the garden giving a light and airy feel, UTILITY ROOM and WC. The main bedroom benefits from a modern EN SUITE and there are three further bedroom..."
"Enjoy the SPACIOUS OPEN-PLAN kitchen, dining & family area as well as SEPARATE LIVING ROOM, four DOUBLE BEDROOMS & convenient INTEGRAL GARAGE. Features FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, BAY WINDOW, master bedroom EN-SUITE & BUILT-IN WARDROBES."
"NO CHAIN INVOLVED AND REALISTICALLY PRICED TO REFLECT WORKS REQUIRED! Rare to the market a six bed period style property which offers a fantastic opportunity for improvement! Situated in a highly sought after location, the property boasts pleasant aspect views ove..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this immaculately presented 4 bed detached house situated on the cul-de-sac of Corbiere Close on the popular residential estate Northfield Green which offers easy access to Doxford International Business Park, the A19 in addition to local shops and amenities. T..."
"This extended four bedroom three bathroom semi detached bungalow is arguably the finest example of it's kind and is truly a credit to the owners. The generous and flexible living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, reception hall, lounge, open plan living/dining kitche..."
"STUNNING RARE HOME SITUATED OFF DESIRABLE SEA VIEW ROAD - GREATLY EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PLUS EN SUITE - EXTENDED TO FRONT, SIDE & REAR TO CREATE FABULOUS ADDITIONAL SPACE & WONDERFUL OPEN PLAN LIVING TO REAR WITH ADDITIONAL BENEFIT OF SOUTH WEST FACING REAR GARDEN!Good Life Homes a..."
"Bradley Hall Sunderland are delighted to welcome to the market this extended 4-bedroom, detached family home situated on a good-sized plot on a quiet cul de sac located to the south of the city of Sunderland. The ground floor accommodation comprises of an entrance hallway, living room,..."
"A spacious and beautifully presented four bedroom detached house, occupying a superb cul-de-sac position within the sought-after Cherry Tree Park development. Internally the attractive accommodation is accessed via an impressive reception hall with a staircase to the first floor and a cloakroom/..."
"Ideally located in a corner position with open, green space adjacent to the home, the Kingham is built with families in mind, with 4 bedrooms offers the perfect solution for families looking for extra space."
"Property located in South Drive, Cleadon Village"
"The Millford is a popular home with INTEGRAL GARAGE providing PLENTY OF SPACE for a growing family. The hallway leads directly into a stylish kitchen family diner with glazed FRENCH DOORS opening onto the SOUTH FACING garden. Downstairs also offers a bay fronted lounge, a HANDY UTILITY ROOM and a..."
"£17,250 TOWARDS YOUR MOVE plus choose from FLOORING OR WARDROBES | The hallway leads directly into a STYLISH KITCHEN family diner with GLAZED FRENCH DOORS opening onto the SOUTH FACING garden. Downstairs also offers a bay fronted lounge, a HANDY UTILITY ROOM and a useful WC. Upstairs, bedroom 1 e..."
"SAVINGS WORTH £21,700 | An attractive GLAZED BAY leading to the SOUTH FACING garden creates a light atmosphere in the OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with flexible dining and family space. The kitchen also has an adjacent UTILITY ROOM. The dual-aspect lounge provides the perfect place for the whole family to r..."
"Bradley Hall are delighted to welcome several plots of The Edlingham specification on the popular new Hillfield Meadows development. The Edlingham, built by Persimmon Homes, takes care of happy family life with five bedrooms, two bathrooms, two entertaining and living room options and an integrat..."
"***Recentlly Reduced for a quick Sale - Serious Sellers*** New to the market this totally renovated and extended stunning large family home in a sought after popular residential location, great catchment area for outstanding local schools. To the ground floor the property briefly ..."
"This well presented three bedroom semi detached house is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, wash house, first floor landing, three bedrooms a..."
"The Edlingham is an impressive five-bedroom detached home. An open-plan kitchen/dining/family room has double French doors to the garden. There’s a lovely living room, utility room, storage cupboard, downstairs WC and integral garage. Upstairs are five good-sized bedrooms - bedroom one is en suite."
"WITH A £20,000 PRICE REDUCTION AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. This is a beautifully presented, greatly extended semi detached house providing exceptionally spacious and attractively appointed family sized accommodation, situated in this sought after village location with excellent amenities i..."
"**BEAUTIFUL PERIOD PROPERTY** If you're looking for a spacious family home close to Roker Park and Roker Beach with a range of amenities, transport links, and schools close by, then this tastefully decorated four-bedroom terraced house certainly fits the bill! The ground floor..."
"This immaculately presented four bedroom detached home occupies one of the larger plots on this sought after development and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall lounge, dining kitchen, utility cloakroom,..."
STUNNING COASTAL LOCATION! We are thrilled to welcome to the market this four bedroom DETACHED family home which is sure to impress all who view! Situated on this ever popular residential estate with excellent access to all local amenities including the breathtakin...
A visually attractive and beautifully presented 4 bedroom detached home most favourably positioned within one of the city's most sought after executive housing developments being within Central Tunstall. The property occupies a prime corner site and benefits from enclosed rear gardens and offers ...
"Avondale Cottage is an impressive four bedroom detached property believed to date back to the mid-19th century, providing immaculate and deceptively spacious accommodation. Internally on the ground floor there is an entrance lobby, spacious lounge and a modern kitchen / diner fitted with a good ..."
"Discover AMPLE LIVING SPACE in this 4-bed home, including an EXTENSIVE OPEN-PLAN kitchen, dining and family area across the rear and a LARGE SEPARATE LIVING ROOM. Upstairs features FOUR GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS including a master with EN-SUITE."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED * STUNNING FAMILY HOME * SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION * MASTER WITH EN SUITE * UTILITY ROOM & WC * GARAGE & DRIVEWAY * COUNCIL TAX BAND - D * EPC - D * This is a simply outstanding family home on the sought after Fulford Grange d...
This former show home comprises of a superior 4 bedroom detached house which occupies a prominent corner garden plot at the entrance to the highly regarded Aylesford Mews Estate. The home provides wonderful free-flowing family living space with features such as an impressive family kitc...
"A deceptively spacious 4 bed end terraced town house that is arranged over 3 floors that will not fail to impress all who view. The property is ideally located within Ryhope offering convenient access to shops, schools and amenities as well as excellent transport links. The generous yet versati..."
"Having a location close to Cleadon Village Shopping and road and bus links, this well maintained, extended semi detached home has a spacious accommodation layout comprising of: entrance hall with dog leg staircase and guest cloakroom/WC, lounge with feature fireplace and opening via bi fold doors..."
"The detached Coltham with integral garage features three double bedrooms and another smaller bedroom that could be used as a home office, nursery or play room."
"The Coltham is a spacious home built with growing families in mind. With 4 double bedrooms, plus an integral garage with private driveway"
"A lovely CORNER PLOT 4-bedroom home with SINGLE GARAGE. Has a LARGE LIGHT-FILLED LIVING ROOM in addition to a multi-use OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, DINING and FAMILY AREA. Upstairs you'll find a family bathroom and FOUR GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS including a master bedroom with BUILT-IN WARDROBES and an EN-SUITE."
"A charming, individual four bedroom stone built property, enjoying a wonderful mature garden within this leafy Conservation area of Ashbrooke. Internally the deceptively spacious and versatile accommodation is accessed via double timber doors to an impressive reception hall with staircase to the..."
"Great layout with fantastic FAMILY SPACE including a LARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN, DINING & FAMILY AREA, a SEPARATE LIVING ROOM, four GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS and a master bedroom with EN-SUITE & DRESSING AREA. Externally it has a SOUTH-FACING REAR GARDEN with GREAT VIEWS. A great choice for GROWING FAMILIES."
"In the Ripon you'll find a SPACIOUS LOUNGE, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with DINING AREA including FRENCH DOORS leading to the back garden and a downstairs WC and utility room. On the first floor you'll find the main bedroom with an en suite shower room, along with a further 2 double bedrooms and a single..."
"This neatly presented 3/4 bedroom detached bungalow is situated on Greenback Drive in South Hylton commanding convenient access to the A19, local shops, schools and amenities as well as South Hylton Metro Station and Sunderland City Centre. The property itself briefly comprises of Entrance Hall,..."
"A beautifully presented, four bedroom detached occupying a pleasant position within this sought-after development. The well-appointed accommodation includes a hall, superb lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, utility and a downstairs WC. On the first floor there is an impressive master bedroom ..."
*** Stunning Home *** Detached bungalow *** Three bedrooms *** Two reception rooms *** Modern throughout *** Landscaped gardens *** Garage *** Double drive *** Summer House ** Move in ready *** Must view *** Close to local amenities *** Close to local transport links *** Stunning three bedro...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 *** A well-appointed three storey home situated on a popular development close to several local amenities and transport links. Briefly comprising of a lounge and WC on the ground floor. The first floor offers the kitchen/dining space, with int..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * ROKER SR6 * SUPERB PROPERTY * ONE LEVEL LIVING IF REQUIRED * LARGE CORNER PLOT * STUNNING GARDENS * DRIVEWAY & GARAGE * COUNCIL TAX BAND - D * EPC - D * Superb four bedroom semi detached Dutch bungalow in the sough...
LARGE 4 DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME OF CONSIDERABLE QUALITY & OCCUPYING ONE OF THE BEST PLOTS WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT SET-BACK AT THE HEAD OF A CUL DE SAC WITH VISUAL PRESENCE & KERB APPEAL. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an impressive large family home of considerable propo...
"This semi-detached bungalow is arguably one of the finest examples of it's kind in the popular Windsor Drive located in the affluent and sought after area of Cleadon Village. Having a range of amenities within walking distance to include Cleadon Church of England Academy, bars, restaurants, p..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 4 bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. What a lot of choice you have for the family with this five-bedroom home. The Belmont even incorporates a garage for the family car a..."
"This is a stunning house comprehensively refurbished by the current vendors. Situated on the popular marina development with easy access to the seafront and local shops and restaurants. Featuring a newly fitted kitchen, a refitted bathroom suite with a separate shower and stylish modern decor thr..."
"This neatly presented 5 bedroomed extended detached house is situated on Englemann Way on the highly sought after Burdon Vale boasting an excellent location for Sunderland City Centre, Doxford International Business Park, the A19 and the region beyond. The property itself briefly comprises of: E..."
"The Belmont is a beautiful five-bedroom detached home that is ideal for a growing family. The open-plan kitchen/dining room is spacious and bright and has French doors leading into the garden. It comes complete with an integral single garage, a downstairs WC and a useful en suite to bedroom one."
"EXTENDED FAMILY HOME! Ideal for those who enjoy coastal walks, the property is only a short stroll to the picturesque coastline, Roker and Seaburn Beaches are always a popular choice for families. Boasting EXTENDED family sized accommodation with three well proportio..."
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE * ROKER SR6 * SUPERB FAMILY HOME * IDEAL LOCATION FOR THE COAST AND PARK * THREE RECEPTION ROOMS * STUNNING BATHROOM * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - TBC * St Andrews Terrace is a lovely street, tucked away just off..."
ONE OF THE FINEST PROPERTIES OF ITS TYPE ON THE MARKET - 4 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME - SUPERB OPEN PLAN HUGE REAR EXTENSION - BI-FOLD DOORS OPENING ONTO FABULOUS LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN - SOUTH & EAST SUNNY ASPECT TO REAR - LONG DRIVEWAY - DETACHED GARAGE WITH ELECTRIC DOOR - SUPERB DESIG...
"***SAVE UP TO £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Cutler features 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to the master. An OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining and family area ideal for entertaining, and a separate living room plus French doors in the family area."
"With an impressive garden and plenty of living space this extended four bedroom home is the perfect opportunity for growing families.  The entrance leads into the bright hallway, with the lounge to the immediate left. Straight ahead is the second reception room, overlo..."
TO BE SOLD AS ONE - A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE TWO HOMES LINKED BY A SHARED PRIVATE COURTYARD WHICH WOULD BE PERFECT FOR CLOSE RELATIVE SHARED OCCUPATION. COMPRISING AN IMPOSING 3 BED VICTORIAN TERRACE WITH LARGE COURTYARD PLUS A MODERNISED 2 BEDROOM DETACHED COACH HOUSE. Good Life Homes are d...
"This beautifully presented, larger style Pre-War three bedroom bay window semi detached home with an extension at ground floor level, offers an excellent opportunity to those space hungry families who wish to live in this highly desirable, convenient situation close to all the wonderful amenities..."
"** Stunning Family Home ** Three Double Bedrooms ** En Suite Shower Room ** Landscaped Gardens ** Garage ** Driveway ** Modern Development ** Ground Floor W/C ** Tastefully decorated three bedroom detached home located on Adriana Close, Cherry Tree Park."
"A beautifully appointed mid terrace period home, providing spacious and impressive accommodation, occupying a delightful position within this highly sought after location, close to Roker Park. Internally the accommodation includes a reception hall, lounge to the front with a bay window and decor..."
"Looking for a home with the ready to move into feel - then look no further than this immaculate detached property  The property is presented to a high standard of decor and fitment having an en-suite to the principal bedroom, a well appointed family bathroom and a ground..."
"This superb four bedroom ""Esk"" design home occupies an enviable position on a corner plot on the sought after Potters Hill development and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The accommodation has a superb finish throughout and comprises reception hallway, lounge, dining kitchen, c..."
"PurpleBricks are delighted to welcome to the market this impressive 4 bed detached property nestled in a prominent corner position on the exclusive executive Potters Hill development that will not fail to impress all who view. The house which is built to the ""The Esk ""design boasts gas central..."
"HIGH DEMAND ANTICIPATED! We welcome to the market this EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED home which would be an ideal purchase for any growing family or for those looking for versatile living accommodation. Boasting a modern, open plan kitchen/diner/family room, the property als..."
PRICE REDUCED FOR AN EARLY SALE REQUIRED. A rare opportunity to purchase a semi detached house in this popular location ideally placed for amenities and the sea front. This is an extended property with a good sized garden with a west facing sunny aspect. The accommodation features 3 bedrooms and ...
This is a most impressive semi detached Dutch style bungalow with the benefit of a pleasant aspect towards the mill. The property features generously proportioned and versatile accommodation ideally suited to the needs of a variety of potential purchasers. There are 3 good sized ground floor room...
GREATLY EXTENDED TO SIDE & REAR - A SUBSTANTIAL 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH LARGE EN-SUITE BATHROOM TO MASTER BEDROOM - SUPERB LARGE KITCHEN/DINING ROOM - DOUBLE DRIVEWAY - SEPARATE UTILITY/LAUNDRY ROOM - WONDERFUL PROPORTIONS THROUGHOUT - GREAT LOCATION.Good Life Homes are delighted to bri...
"This immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached home is arguably one of the finest examples of its kind and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The generous living space is arranged over two floors and comprises reception hall, two reception rooms, kitchen, ground floor bathroom firs..."
*** New Build *** Part Exchange available *** Upgraded kitchen *** Popular location *** Ryhope *** Four bedrooms detached *** Open plan kitchen dining room *** Integral garage *** Must view *** Call to arrange your viewing *** 
"Three Bedroom Spacious Semi Detached Home ! Situated within a Cul-De-Sac in the sought after location of Whitburn, where you can find Seaburn Coast just a short walk away, a range of shops, Whitburn Academy and School and Cornthwaite Park. Both South Shields Town Centre and Sunderland City Ce..."
"An immaculately presented four bedroom, three storey semi-detached town house within this modern and highly sought-after development, known as Potters Hill. The superb accommodation is accessed via a reception hall with a cloakroom/wc and staircase to the first floor. There is a spacious lounge..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to market this impressive 5-bedroom, detached home situated on one of Persimmon Homes newest developments ""Hillfield Meadows"". The Belmont even incorporates a garage for the family car and the children’s bikes and boots. With five bedrooms, you..."
"The Coniston's kitchen/family room is perfect for spending time as a family and for entertaining. There’s also a well-proportioned living room, a separate dining room, a downstairs WC and a handy utility room. Upstairs are four bedrooms - bedroom one has an en-suite - and the family bathroom."
"Reduced to reflect works of modernisation required> Semi Detached Home offers potential for conversion to reinstate a fourth bedroom if required. To the ground floor there are two reception areas with the lounge opening to a sunny courtyard style garden, The compact kitchen open..."
SUPERB GREATLY EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME ON PRIVATE & SECLUDED LARGE CORNER PLOT - EN SUITE - LONG DRIVEWAY - FABULOUS REAR GARDEN WITH PRIVATE SUNNY ASPECT - HOME OFFICE - LARGE ADDITIONAL FAMILY ROOM - POTENTIAL TO CREATE A MODERN OPEN PLAN DINING/KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM TO REAR! Good Life H...
"A DETACHED 3-bed with GOOD FAMILY SPACE and INTEGRAL GARAGE. Ground floor offers a modern OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the garden, as well as a SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with BAY WINDOW. Upstairs are 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS including master with EN-SUITE & DRESSING AREA."
STUNNING EXTENDED 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME - SUPERB OPEN PLAN EXTENDED REAR FAMILY/DINING/KITCHEN WITH BI-FOLD DOORS - GORGEOUS REAR LANDSCAPED GARDEN WITH GARDEN ROOM - HIGHLY REGARDED LOCATION. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional home of the highest qu...
"A perfectly-proportioned detached home, The Coniston Corner is a popular choice with families. The modern and stylish open plan kitchen/breakfast/dining room is perfect for spending time as a family and entertaining. There's also a bright front-aspect living room, separate dining room, downstairs..."
"ONE OF THE FINEST FRONT LINE PENTHOUSE APARTMENTS ON ROKER SEA FRONT WITH FABULOUS UNOBSTRUCTED VIEWS OF ROKER PIER, BEACHES AND JUST MINUTES WALK FROM THE MARINA. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional opportunity to acquire one of the finest apartments on the sea fr..."
*** AN ABSOLUTE CREDIT TO THE CURRENT OWNERS - IMPRESSIVE - FOUR BEDROOM VICTORIAN TERRACE - LOFT ROOM - STUNNING DECO THROUGHOUT - ORIGINAL FEATURES - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS - EXTENDED KITCHEN WITH BAR AREA - OFF STREET PARKING - ENCLOSED REAR YARD - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - VIEWING HIGHLY ADVISED ***
"Excellent four bedroom modern detached executive family residence situated in a popular residential estate and presented to a superb level ideal for use as a luxury family home. Internally, the décor is presented to an excellent standard & there is an integrated single garage and ex..."
"A larger style 5 bedroomed modern terraced house situated on Aylesford Mews which is a much sought after location commanding easy access to local shops, schools and amenities in addition to Sunderland City Centre being a short car journey away. The property benefits from spacious yet versatile l..."
"A three bed detached bungalow offering accommodation all on one level, located in a cul-de-sac in this popular residential Estate at Whitburn having easy access to many amenities which include the picturesque Coastline for walks, Whitburn Village amenities, Schools and transport links into Sunder..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - SPACIOUS - 4 DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME - TRIPLE LENGTH DRIVEWAY - DETACHED GARAGE - SOUTH WEST FACING REAR GARDEN - EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM - LARGE PROPORTIONS THROUGHOUT - NO CHAIN.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional home beautifully...
"This beautifully maintained four bedroom detached house boasts a generous south facing rear garden and four good sized bedrooms. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, conservatory, cloakroom first floor landing master bed..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 4-bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. This is a contemporary home with a traditional layout. Separate living and dining rooms complement the open-plan kitchen/breakfast ro..."
Superb double fronted extended four bed semi in sought after location. Viewing an absolute must! 
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * FULWELL SR5 * LOVELY FAMILY HOME * OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER * TWO BATHROOMS * OFF ROAD PARKING * BAR IN GARDEN * CLOSE TO FULWELL MILL * 1390 SQ FT APPROX * COUNCIL TAX BAND - B * EPC - C * Located just next to Fulwe...
PROBABLY THE FINEST PROPERTY OF ITS TYPE TO COME ONTO THE MARKET ON THIS SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT - A STUNNING MODERN TOWN HOUSE WITH 4 BEDROOMS - 2 EN SUITE - BEAUTIFUL INTERIOR DESIGN FEATURES IN A CLEAN MINIMALIST STYLE - FREEHOLD RECENTLY PURCHASED - ABSOLUTELY STUNNING!Good Life Homes are de...
"Stylish family home with three bedrooms set in an attractive layout. With a spacious DUAL ASPECT LOUNGE and a LARGE FAMILY KITCHEN-DINER, this home offers a great space for the whole family.
Upstairs, there are TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a SINGLE BEDROOM complete with a FAMILY BATHROOM and EN SUITE ..."
"This significantly extended five bedroom semi-detached house, enjoys a delightful mature garden and is situated on Victoria Avenue, one of the most sought after roads in the area. The property is accessed via an entrance porch leading through to an attractive hall with staircase to the first flo..."
"This is a contemporary home with a traditional layout. Separate living and dining rooms complement the open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and make a great mix and match for family life, entertaining and home-working – if creating a home office is your plan. Alternatively, you can take a flexi..."
" Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! Next level living over 3 STOREYS. Detached home boasting SPACIOUS BEDROOMS, internal garage and CONTEMPORARY LIVING spaces"
An attractive two bedroom semi detached property which boasts a recently refitted bathroom with a shower over the bath and a recently refitted kitchen with integrated appliances! To the rear is a generous sized lawned garden with a sunny aspect ideal for children to play or enjoying summer e...
ARGUABLY ONE OF THE FINEST HOMES OF ITS TYPE IN THE CITY - A FOUR BEDROOM PERIOD MAISONETTE-STYLE MID-TERRACED HOME OF CONSIDERABLE STYLE & QUALITY & PAINSTAKINGLY UPDATED BY THE CURRENT OWNERS WITH REMOTE SHUTTERS TO REAR PROVIDING EXCLUSIVE MULTIPLE VEHICLE PARKING.Rarely does a property of suc...
This semi detached bungalow is situated in this popular and pleasant residential location. Featuring a large lounge and an extended dining/sitting room overlooking the lovely low maintenance garden. There are 3 bedrooms including a spacious attic bedroom and a large garage with garden access. Ava...
"This double fronted house has been greatly extended to provide a superb stylish home ideal for the needs of a family occupier. There are three bedrooms, two excellent sized reception rooms a modern fitted kitchen and a luxury bathroom suite. There is also a useful 4th bedroom or games room/home o..."
"A lovely 4 bed semi detached house that will not fail to impress all who view situated on Highside Drive in Humbledon commanding a much sought after location offering an excellent commuting location providing easy access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as being within easy reach of ..."
"A charming MID TERRACED COTTAGE with many traditional features married with modern styling to the re-fitted kitchen/diner and shower room. The cosy lounge has an attractive fireplace with gas stove, a secondary reception room offers alternative seating area or dining room provision and the comp..."
"LAST REMAINING PLOTS - AVAILABLE FOR VIEWINGS - St. Lawrence Place is a flagship development designed for contemporary yet affordable everyday living. Nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular suburb of Doxford Park, on the outskirts of Sunderland. The area has undergone a massive re-developm..."
OPPORTUNITY NOT TO BE MISSED! THIS IS A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE A SUPERBLY APPOINTED PROPERTY IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION AT AN EXTREMELY COMPETETIVE PRICE. ULTRA FAST FIBRE OPTIC BROADBAND NETWORK. NEWLY CONSTRUCTED AND READY FOR IMMEDIATE OCCUPATION
FABULOUS 3 BED DETACHED HOME – SOUGHT AFTER POTTERS HILL DEVELOPMENT BY MILLER HOMES – FANTASTIC OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER – EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM – 10 YEAR NHBC BUILD WARRANTY. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this spacious and thoughtfully designed...
"A SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME! We welcome to the market, an EXTENDED four bedroom semi detached home which is sure to impress all who view! Being bright and airy throughout and decorated in modern, neutral tones, the property boasts a well appointed extended kitchen with ..."
"PRICE REDUCED FOR AN EARLY SALE REQUIRED. In this popular and highly regarded location this is an outstanding, extended semi detached house that offers spacious family sized accommodation. It is extended to the side and the rear with a large kitchen/family room, 2 other reception rooms and 4 bedr..."
Experience exceptional. This extraordinary 4 bedroom detached home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE.
"** Family Home ** Modern Throughout ** Open Plan Kitchen/Dining/Family Room ** Ground Floor W/C ** Four Bedrooms ** Garage ** Gardens ** Desirable Location ** EPC Rating D ** Beautiful family home located on Deansfield Close, Chapelgarth."
 Modern living over 3 STOREYS in a stunning detached home. Extra LARGE PRIMARY SUITE & modern kitchen w/ INTEGRATED appliances
"Prices start from £256,950 to £264,950 Family life comes first in this new home. There’s space for everyone, even the family car. One living space flows into another and then into the garden, and with four bedrooms and two bathrooms, there’s space for your chil..."
"Elite Estates are delighted to offer to the market this beautiful four-bedroom DETACHED family home, complete with high specification and immaculately presented, also benefitting from a re-fitted high gloss kitchen, impressive brick built shed/workshop to rear garden, ensuite to master bedroom, d..."
"A charming and traditional Dutch style Bungalow offering spacious and versatile accommodation that can be used as either three bedrooms with an added benefit of a study / nursery or four bedrooms. Boasting a desirable location, just off Newlands Avenue and sitting at side of a peaceful cul-de-sa..."
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. In this highly regarded location, in a sought after position with excellent amenities available including shops, schools and the Metro system, an opportunity to purchase a tastefully presented, greatly extended semi detached house providi..."
STUNNING 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED LARGE BUNGALOW - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED INTERNALLY TO HIGHEST OF STANDARDS - EXCELLENT RESIDENTIAL LOCATION - CLOSE TO BARNES PARK.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional spacious detached home which has benefitted from significant rec...
"A stylish and much improved three bedroom home, located within this sought after marina development. The immaculately presented internal accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance lobby, spacious open plan lounge / dining room, enjoying a dual aspect, a fabulous contemporary kitchen ..."
"*NEW RELEASE* The Sawyer has THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN SUITE to the master. An OPEN PLAN kitchen, dining, and family area with elegant FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden ideal for socialising and a separate living room for relaxing. An INTEGRAL GARAGE completes this brand new chain free home"
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION FOR EARLY SALE. In this sought after cul-de-sac location within easy walking distance of the sea front, local beaches and Roker Park and conveniently placed for a range of additional amenities, an opportunity to purchase a traditional semi detached bungalow, a style o..."
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. This is a beautifully updated and improved semi detached house situated in a sought after position on the highly regarded Seaburn Dene development ideally placed for access to an excellent range of amenities including local schools, shops..."
"The Hornsea is a detached home with the bonus of an integral garage. It's got a good-sized living room with double doors leading into a bright open-plan kitchen/diner - perfect for family life and for entertaining. It's practical too with a utility, downstairs cloakroom and three storage cupboards."
" A VIEWING IS STRONGLY ADVISED ON THIS TRADITIONAL 4 BEDROOM END OF TERRACE FAMILY HOME SITUATED WITHIN CLOSE PROXIMITY OF AMENITIES INCLUDING SCHOOLS, SHOPS AND TRANSPORT LINKS. The impressive accommodation comprises: Entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, breakfasting kitchen, ut..."
An opportunity to purchase a greatly extended semi detached house situated in this popular and convenient residential location ideally placed for access to the amenities of Fulwell including shopping and Metro facilities. The property benefits from 4 bedrooms and a corner site. Available immediat...
"The subject premises is a three floor, mid terrace, comrising of an office and flat to the ground floor, a flat to the first floor and a flat to the second floor. The whole property is currently let with an annual rent of £24,200 this reflects a NIY of 9.43% based on asking price. "
*STUNNING PRESENTATION* *A MUST FOR VIEWING* *GORGEOUS REAR GARDEN* An attractive double fronted semi detached bungalow occupying superb gardens and grounds and positioned within a lovely quiet location which is very convenient for City Centre amenities and access to Durham and Newcastle...
"Perfect for those space hungry families searching for a coastal home with generous living accommodation, this well proportioned three bedroom end terrace home is well presented throughout and available with no upward chain. The ample living accommodation comprises reception hall, lounge, dini..."
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * WHITBURN SR6 * SUPERB FAMILY HOME * LARGE CORNER PLOT * KITCHEN DINER * UTILITY ROOM * TWO BATHROOMS * PARKING FOR SEVERAL VEHICLES * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - TBC * Occupying a generous corner plot, this three ..."
"A SPACIOUS AND IMPRESSIVE PERIOD PROPERTY which maintains many charming ORIGINAL FEATURES including sash windows to the front, and feature stain glass. Set in a sought after conservation area on Rowlandson Terrace in Grangetown, which forms part of Ryhope Road being situate..."
"This generously proportioned four bedroom end terrace house has been refurbished to a high standard throughout and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The generous and flexible living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance vestibule, reception hall, two reception rooms, kit..."
ATTRACTIVE 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME ON THE BROADWAY GRANGE DEVELOPMENT WITH LARGE REAR CONSERVATORY OVERLOOKING PRIVATE REAR GARDENS & POTENTIAL TO CONVERT INTO 5 BEDROOMS BY DIVIDING EXISTING LARGE EXTENDED BEDROOM INTO TWO. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this attractive and...
"This is a stylishly updated and improved larger style semi-detached house which has been extended to provide a spacious and versatile family home. Situated on the sought after Seaburn Dene estate with an excellent range of amenities in the vicinity including local primary and secondary schools, s..."
"Occupying a highly sought after position along this desirable tree lined avenue is this wonderful, traditional semi-detached home with a generous mature garden to the rear. The internal accommodation on the ground floor includes reception hall, lounge, dining room and kitchen whilst to the first..."
"Enjoying a prominent and convenient position on a corner plot with pleasant outlook to the front, this well presented double fronted bay window semi detached bungalow offers a wonderful flexible stair free living space perfect for those who wish to be in walking distance of the outstanding amenit..."
"Spacious detached family home located on a popular residential estate within a Cul-De-Sac. Local within close proximity to many amenities including, local shops, schools, transport links, Doxford international business park, A19 for commuting. The property has gardens to fr..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase one of these highly sought after sea front apartments with beautiful panoramic coastal views, this delightful top floor (second floor) two bedroom apartment offers a comfortable living space which is easy to maintain and economic to run. Internal accommodation..."
"A recently refurbished and beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached home boasting an impressive open plan living space and contemporary feel on a quite cul-de-sac, set within the highly fashionable suburb of Fulwell. Available with no upward chain, the property internally comprises e..."
"Fashionably situated along this highly desirable coastal avenue set within easy walking distance of the sea front with its award winning Blue Flag beaches. This delightful four bedroom bay window semi with south facing gardens to the rear, offers comfortable living space perfect for families and ..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this superb greatly extended 4 bed semi detached house situated on The Broadway commanding an excellent location in a much sought after and highly desirable location offering convenient access to Sunderland City Centre, the A19, local schools, amenities and..."
SURE TO IMPRESS ALL WHO VIEW! A spacious EIGHT BEDROOM property which would be an ideal investment opportunity subject to a HMO licence. Being well presented throughout with neutral décor & each bedroom having its own en suite. Located in a desirable area whic...
"A rare opportunity to purchase a rather impressive property boasting charm and character situated on an extensive plot, beautifully presented and maintained to a high standard offering spacious family accommodation comprising three reception rooms, three bedrooms, superb family bathroom..."
"This is an attractively presented semi-detached house in a sought after location within easy walking distance of East Boldon village centre, local schools, shops, restaurants and the Metro system. Tastefully decorated throughout in neutral tones,"
"An immaculately presented modern 4 bed, detached house situated on the popular Tunstall Grange development near Ryhope offering an excellent location providing easy access to the City Centre, local shops, schools and amenities as well as transport links to the A19. The property itself benefits fr..."
A substantial 1920’s four bedroom semi-detached home with a wonderful mature garden and two garages within this sought-after area. Internally the property retains many appealing period features and is accessed via an entrance vestibule leading through an impressive reception hall with a staircas...
"***OPEN EVENT*** CALL AGENT FOR DETAILS***Elite Estates present to the market this EXTENDED 2 bedroom bungalow situated in the highly regarded area East Boldon Road, Cleadon. Complete with detached garage and garden to rear with a great degree of privacy. The property briefly comprises: Entrance ..."
"A rare and promising find for any house hunter, this elegant detached property which is fully modernised, meaning it is ready for its new owner to simply move in. With superb features apparent throughout, the property features four well-appointed bedrooms, two three-piece bathrooms and a generou..."
3 BED SEMI DETACHED HOME PLUS LOFT ROOM – LARGE CORNER PLOT SITUATED AT THE TOP OF ASHBROOKE RANGE - POTENTIAL TO EXTEND BUILDING OR CREATE DRIVEWAY/GARAGE. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this fabulous 3 bed semi-detached home with loft room in sought after location si...
THREE bedroom DETACHED home featuring a DESIGNER kitchen with INTEGRATED appliances. Main bedroom includes ENSUITE.
"Light fills this attractive home through the oversized windows, there is a DUAL-ASPECT LOUNGE and a bright fully fitted kitchen with dining area and FRENCH DOORS opening onto the garden. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the master with EN SUITE, a single bedroom and a family bathroom."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 3-bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. From the entrance hall to the living room to the garden – this new home has a great flow and aims to be a great family home. Th..."
"A fantastic 3-BED DETACHED home. Offering true OPEN-PLAN living with plenty of FAMILY SPACE. Includes a LARGE KITCHEN-DINER, a zoned LIVING ROOM with FRENCH DOORS out to the garden, and a master bedroom with EN-SUITE and DRESSING AREA. Ideal for GROWING FAMILIES."
"The Lockwood Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner and an impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard make it practical as well as stylish. Upstairs are three bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom and more storage."
"This fabulous bungalow has recently undergone a significant programme of upgrading, refurbishment and remodelling to provide an outstanding standard of accommodation. In addition to a complete ‘back to brick’ internal refurbishment the bungalow has benefitted from external rendering, re-wiring, ..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * SPACIOUS THROUGHOUT * SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION * OPEN PLAN LIVING/DINING * GARAGE & DRIVEWAY * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - D * NO ONWARD CHAIN !!!!!! We are delighted to offer to the market this fabulous four bedr...
"This immaculately presented extended three bedroom detached house occupies an enviable position on a popular cul-de-sac. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, open plan living kitchen, utility cloakroom, first floor landing, three bedroo..."
"Boasting character and original period features, this large four-bedroom family home would make a great purchase for a range of buyers. The entrance leads into the hallway, with the lounge to the left, benefiting from a log-burning fire. There is a dining room with a feature fireplace and pati..."
"Set over three floors, this contemporary four-bedroom detached family home is close to a range of amenities and transport links, perfect for a family looking to up-size! The ground floor benefits from a spacious lounge and dining area with an electric fire and double doors leading to the ..."
"Light fills this attractive home through the oversized windows, there is a DUAL-ASPECT LOUNGE and a bright fully fitted kitchen with DINING AREA and French doors opening onto the garden. Upstairs there are TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, the MASTER WITH EN SUITE, a SINGLE BEDROOM and a FAMILY BATHROOM."
This is a very rare opportunity to purchase an individually designed detached bungalow with the benefit of a most attractive elevated garden site with very pleasant distant views of Cleadon Hills and the coast. Situated on the edge of Fulwell but within convenient reach of a wide range of local a...
" OFFERED WITH NO UPPER CHAIN - a spacious extended four bed detached family home. Sitting at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac on a corner plot having gardens to front, side and rear, the rear enjoying a sunny aspect. There is ample parking provided on a block paved drive t..."
"A fabulous home significant remodelled and improved, to provide a superb standard of flexible accommodation within this sought-after area. Internally the immaculate accommodation includes a hall with staircase to the first floor, lounge to the front opening through to a dining room with French d..."
"The Lockwood features a stunning open-plan kitchen diner and impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard make it practical as well as stylish. Upstairs are three bedrooms - bedroom one is en suite - a family bathroom and another cupboard."
"Property located in Neale Street, Fulwell"
"We are excited to list an attractive and immaculately presented semi-detached bungalow situated in Wavendon Crescent, just off The Broadway in this highly regarded area of High Barnes. The location is convenient for local amenities as well as providing access to Sunderland Royal Hospital, Sunderl..."
"Paul Airey welcome to market a luxury two bed third floor apartment with impressive views along our stunning coastline. Accessed via a communal entrance, where it is evident of the character and charm which has been retained within this beautiful apartment. Well appointed accommodation briefl..."
This is a greatly extended semi detached house ideally placed for access to the Metro and amenities of Fulwell. The property provides spacious family accommodation that has been well cared for but would benefit from some general upgrading. There is a conservatory and a pleasant garden to the rear...
"Bungalows are in high demand right now. This Freehold, 2 double bedroom semi-detached example is superbly located in popular Cleadon Village, with great nearby schools as well as local shops, pubs and restaurants. Not far from East Boldon Metro Station for commuting. A bathroom, living room, dini..."
Situated in this extremely prominent position an opportunity to purchase a property with potential for an excellent rate of return. There is a ground floor flat which is self contained with first and second floor residential accommodation above.
"An immaculate beach front, first floor, luxury two bedroom apartment enjoying stunning panoramic views across the adjacent north pier, Roker beach and north sea seascape. Local amenities are provided by an ever widening selection of local restaurants, sporting pursuits and nearby marina. "
"Attention investors! Horizon House is a development of self contained studios which have the use of a communal gym, cinema room, games room, kitchen area and laundry. The studio is situated in the city centre and comprises of lounge/bedroom and shower room. Ideally placed for all that th..."
OPPORTUNITY NOT TO BE MISSED! THIS IS A FANTASTIC OPPERTUNITY TO ACQUIRE A SUPERBLY APPOINTED PROPERTY IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION AT AN EXTREMELY COMPETETIVE PRICE. ULTRA FAST FIBRE OPTIC BROADBAND NETWORK. NEWLY CONSTRUCTED AND READY FOR IMMEDIATE OCCUPATION.
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 3 bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. If you like the idea of three views for the price of two, the Derwent Corner has the answer. This new home gives you an outlook to th..."
A well presented semi detached home within Fulwell allowing easy access to Sunderland City Centre and close to the Metro Station providing excellent public transport links. A spacious lounge/dining room access a conservatory which overlooks a well tended courtyard garden. The kitchen is well ap...
THREE bedroom DETACHED home featuring a DESIGNER kitchen with INTEGRATED appliances. MAIN BEDROOM includes ENSUITE. FRENCH DOORS open into the rear garden.
"Enjoy the best of modern living in this popular three-bedroom home which has a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden, a bright front aspect living room and a separate utility room. Upstairs, bedroom one has an en suite and there's a good-sized family bathroom."
"*** Four bedrooms *** Detached house *** Freehold *** Conservatory *** Driveway *** Three reception rooms *** Popular residential decision *** Gardens with decked area to rear *** Freehold *** EPC grade C ** Council tax band C *** Spacious family home located on Trevarren Drive, Leechmere."
"An immaculate modern three bedroom semi detached luxury family house set in this super new estate within close proximity of local amenities including both Sainsbury’s and Lidl.Modern features include double glazing , gas central heating fitted contemporary kitchen and luxury bathr..."
"SIMPLY STUNNING! Take a look at this IMMACULATE, THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM, EXTENDED SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY which is PERFECT for FIRST TIME BUYERS, FAMILY PURCHASERS or PROFESSIONAL COUPLES and is READY TO WALK STRAIGHT IN. Don't delay, VIEW NOW!"
*** Three bedrooms *** Detached *** Freehold *** Council tax band C *** EPC grade awaited *** Neutral décor throughout *** Gardens to front and rear *** Off street parking for multiple cars *** Cul de sac location *** Garage *** Move in ready *** Three bedroom detached home located w...
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom home featuring an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and DINING AREA with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden. The ground floor also has a SPACIOUS LOUNGE and cloakroom. On the first floor you will find two double bedrooms with an en suite to the main bedroom, a single bedro..."
"This recently refurbished and surprisingly spacious extended three bedroom detached bungalow sits within this hugely popular Tunstall development comprising of modern homes always held in high regard due to their convenient access to the City centre and A19, offering ""Turnkey"" living accommodatio..."
"Bradley Hall are delighted to welcome to market this impressive 3-bedroom, detached family home situated on one of Persimmon Homes newest developments ""Hillfield Meadows"". The Derwent corner gives three views for the price of two, the Derwent Corner has the answer. This new home gives y..."
"WITH A LARGE PRICE REDUCTION AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. In this sought after location at the head of a cul-de-sac, an opportunity to purchase an extended larger style semi-detached house providing spacious and versatile family accommodation. Situated within convenient reach of an excellent ra..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the marekt this stunning 3 bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. A big kitchen/diner, French doors to the garden and a large living room all add up to make a family-friendly home for a gr..."
"An extended and beautifully presented three double bedroom semi-detached home within the highly sought after Seaburn Dene Estate. Internally the immaculate accommodation includes an entrance porch, superb lounge with bay window and feature fireplace, opening through to a dining room with French ..."
"This popular three-bedroom home has a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading outside. The Derwent Corner's bright front aspect living room, separate utility room, handy storage cupboard and downstairs WC complete the ground floor. Upstairs, bedroom one has an en suite bathroom."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome this stunning three-bedroom semi-detached property in the sought-after area of Fulwell. Available with no upward chain, this lovely home offers a comfortable living space throughout and has improved substantially by the current owner. Ideally locate..."
"A big kitchen/diner, French doors to the garden and a large living room all add up to make a family-friendly home for a growing family. Three bedrooms and two bathrooms mean that everyone has their own space here – great features for happy family life as well as great features of the Derwen..."
Three-storey living with a beautiful PENTHOUSE MASTER BEDROOM with EN-SUITE & DRESSING AREA and a LARGE OPEN-PLAN ground floor family space. This 3-bed home is great for MODERN LIVING and has PARKING FOR 2 CARS.
"A rare 3-bed home with modern conveniences such as a UTILITY room, DOWNSTAIRS WC and a master bedroom EN-SUITE. You'll also enjoy a SPACIOUS LIVING ROOM, an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN DINER and PARKING FOR 2 CARS. This makes an IDEAL STARTER HOME. "
"This bright and practical home is ideal for modern family living. The LARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with ample dining space has FRENCH DOORS leading out to the garden. The home also features a SPACIOUS LOUNGE for all of the family to relax in.
Upstairs the main bedroom has an EN SUITE shower room and t..."
"We are delighted to list this period residence of grandeur occupying a prime spot in the leafy suburb of Ashbrooke, Sunderland. A family sized home with such curb appeal, a viewing is the only way to appreciate what this home has to offer and we are certain it is going to command much..."
BEAUTIFUL 3 BED DETACHED HOME WITH EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM - GORGEOUS KITCHEN/DINER/BREAKFASTING AREA WITH FRENCH DOORS - LANDSCAPED LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT - DRIVEWAY & GARAGE. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this 3 bed detached property situated on a popular development. ...
Offered with no onward chain and a significant reduction in price Riverside Residential welcome to he sales market with no onward chain this immaculately presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached home with excellent room sizes and modern décor.
DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME AT ROKER MARINA - SUPERB LOCATION - CONSERVATORY - DOUBLE DRIVEWAY TO FRONT - DOUBLE GARAGE - 1 MINUTE WALK TO BEACH - JUST A SUPERB LOCATION WITH NO CHAIN! Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a superb deceptively spacious two double bed...
"An exceptionally well presented and tastefully extended 3 bedroomed Stewart built semi-detached home occupying a superb private cul-de-sac position within this highly regarded location. Benefits include 8.8m living room, open plan dining kitchen, 3 double bedrooms fitted with bedroom fu..."
"Occupying a highly sought after position on this well established street located in the ever popular coastal suburb of Fulwell, this delightful bay window semi detached home with west facing gardens to the rear offers a rare opportunity to those who wish to live within this hugely fashionable str..."
"Bradley Hall are delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 3 bedroom detached home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. If a detached three-bedroom house that includes a garage for the family car and the family bikes, is on your new home shopping list,..."
"The Grasmere is a three-bedroom family home that’s ideal for modern living. The open-plan kitchen/dining room has French doors leading into the garden. The front porch, downstairs WC and two cupboards take care of everyday storage. Bedroom one has an en suite. This home also has an integral garage."
"We are proud to offer this Five Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*GUIDE PRICE - £220,000-240,000*"
SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW IN A QUIET CUL DE SAC OFFERING EXCELLENT ACCESS TO THE WONDERFUL SUNDERLAND COASTLINE AND BEYOND
"An extended four / five bedroom semi-detached house, occupying a generous plot within this ever popular residential area. Internally the accommodation is accessed via an entrance lobby with access to a ‘Jack & Jill’ washroom/wc and through to the hall with staircase to the first floor. There is..."
"*** Three double bedrooms *** Detached *** Garage *** Neutral décor throughout *** Kitchen dining room *** En suite shower room *** Driveway *** Move in ready *** Must view *** Stunning three bedroom detached home located on Windbrook, Ryhope."
"Viewing is ESSENTIAL to appreciate the accommodation available! A beautifully appointed three bedroom semi detached family which is a credit to the current owner. Located in the desirable residential area of Whitburn, which is always a popular choice for buyers, espec..."
"Purple Bricks are delighted to welcome to the market an attractively presented two bedroomed bungalow on a large prominent plot in this sought after residential area and rarely available. Internally the accommodation includes an entrance vestibule through to a spacious lounge , an airy well app..."
"This wonderful four-bedroom home, built in the style of a rural cottage, occupies a lovely location in the village of Ryhope. Having been individually designed and built about 20 years ago, this charming home with flexible accommodation allows bungalow living at ground floor if required. "
*** New Build *** Part Exchange available *** Upgraded kitchen *** Popular location *** Ryhope *** Three bedroom detached *** Open plan kitchen dining room *** Must view *** Call to arrange your viewing *** 
"Superb four bedroom semi-detached family home enjoying immediate views across the adjacent arable farm land and located in this most attractive courtyard development on the northern fringe of Whitburn Village with easy access to Sunderland, South Shields and North East region. Internally, the ..."
"Situated in a highly desirable head of cul-de-sac position, this well presented three bedroom semi detached home with generous, secluded, west facing rear gardens which would allow a wrap around extension, subject to the appropriate planning permission, offers a comfortable living space ideal for..."
"Impressive semi-detached home with MODERN KITCHEN, flexible living spaces, INTERNAL GARAGE and large main bedroom w/ ENSUITE"
"Early viewing is a must of this well presented extended three bedroom semi detached house. The well proportioned living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge/dining room, family room, dining kitchen, cloakroom, first floor landing, three bedrooms an..."
"**DETACHED FAMILY HOME**THREE BEDROOMS**OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM**GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY**NO UPPER CHAIN** Pattinson Estate Agents are excited to welcome to the market this immaculate detached, three bed family home, situated in the popular estate 17 Perrycrofts, Sunderland. Ideally located ..."
WONDERFUL 3 BED DETACHED HOUSE WITH CONSERVATORY – OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER – EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM – LARGE REAR GARDEN – DOUBLE DRIVEWAY & GARAGE – SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this gorgeous 3 bed detached home in p...
"*** Three bedrooms *** Semi detached *** Gardens to front side and rear *** Original features *** Two reception rooms **** Spacious entrance hallway *** Close to South Moor and Hill View Schools *** No onward chain *** Period family home located on Ryhope Road, Grangetown."
"Situated in this popular residential area ideally located for access to Fulwell's excellent amenities and the Metro system, an opportunity to purchase an extended 3 bedroomed semi detached house of a style always in particular demand. Featuring a wider than average site and a good sized rear gard..."
TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW ON LARGE CORNER PLOT WITH DOUBLE CONSERVATORY TO REAR - GARAGE & DRIVEWAY - REAR GARDEN - NO CHAIN - LOVELY DEVELOPMENT. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional opportunity to acquire a spacious 2 bedroom detached bungalow on a large corne...
"Occupying a popular position within this highly desirable estate set close to Venerable Bede Academy, this well modernised and tastefully appointed three bedroom detached home with Freehold Tenure, offers the perfect family size living accommodation. Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining r..."
"Spacious lounge and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and FRENCH DOORS. TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with ENSUITE SHOWER, stylish FAMILY BATHROOM."
"A stylish and superbly appointed three/four bedroom mid terraced, luxury modern home. Benefiting gas central heating, double glazing, alarm system and contemporary kitchen and bathroom fittings. Internally, the accommodation comprises, ground floor: reception lobby, entrance hallway, guest toi..."
*** New Build *** Part Exchange available *** Popular location *** Ryhope *** Three bedroom semi detached *** Open plan kitchen dining room *** Must view *** Call to arrange your viewing ***
"Occupying a delightful cul-de-sac position off Crosslea Avenue within this highly sought after location is this attractive two bedroom semi detached bungalow. Internally the accommodation is arranged all on one level and includes an entrance hall, living room, recently fitted kitchen with separa..."
"DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS! Viewing is essential to appreciate this two double bedroom semi detached family home which boasts a generous sized CONSERVATORY with views overlooking the rear garden. The well tended, enclosed rear garden offers a pleasant seating area and is co..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this spacious 2 double bedroom, first floor apartment located within the heart of Cleadon Village, close to local shops, churches, delis, pubs and restaurants. A delightful home which offers stylish ready to move into accommodation with a neutral colour sc..."
"This bright and practical home is ideal for modern family living. The large open-plan kitchen with ample dining space has French doors leading out to the garden. The home also features a spacious lounge for all of the family to relax in.
Upstairs the main bedroom has an en suite shower room and t..."
"Extended at ground floor level and offering a comfortable, well appointed living space and boasting generous south facing gardens to the rear and an open aspect overlooking playing fields, this popular style bay windowed semi detached property which was a built as a two bedroom but could be easil..."
"An extended, larger style three bedroom semi-detached home, situated within this highly sought after area of High Barnes. Internally the well-presented accommodation includes an entrance vestibule, impressive reception hall with a staircase to the first floor. To the front there is a spacious l..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home with a stunning kitchen and superb rear garden within this ever popular area. Internally the stylish accommodation includes a hall with staircase to the first floor, an attractive lounge and a fabulous dining kitchen, fitted with an excell..."
"This extended and beautifully appointed three bedroom semi-detached enjoys a superb corner plot within this ever popular residential area. Internally the impressive accommodation includes an entrance vestibule, hall with staircase to the first floor and an attractive lounge to the front, opening..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** The Harper is a 3-bedroom home that features an OPEN PLAN kitchen and dining area with some INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. FRENCH DOORS into the rear garden and separate living room plus TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS with EN SUITE."
"The Maidstone features an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN AND DINING AREA with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden. The ground floor also has a SPACIOUS LOUNGE and cloakroom. On the first floor you will find two double bedrooms with an EN SUITE to the main bedroom, a single bedroom and FAMILY BATHROOM ca..."
"This property's price is reduced for over 60s as a lifetime lease purchase under our Home for Life Plan. Discounts range from 8.5% to 59% depending on age, personal circumstances and property criteria. The price shown is based on our average discount."
"Bradley Hall are delighted to welcome to market this impressive 3-bedroom, detached family home situated on one of Persimmon Homes newest developments ""Hillfield Meadows"". The Grasmere is a detached three-bedroom house that includes a garage for the family car and the family bikes is on..."
Tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac you will locate this fabulous semi-detached home. It ticks off every wish on a house hunters wish list and in our opinion is turn key! Neutrally and tastefully decorated throughout this home boasts spacious accommodation over three floors. To the ground floor...
"62.5% Shared Ownership Enjoying a sought after position on the ever fashionable North Haven Development set within the coastal suburb of Roker, we offer a rare opportunity to purchase a 62.5% share of a three bedroom semi detached home, situated within a highly desirable street just a short s..."
"This beautifully presented and well modernised two bedroom mid terraced cottage situated on a quite street in the heart of Fulwell, offers comfortable stair free living accommodation which is sure to impress all who view. Internally the property comprises entrance portico, reception hall, liv..."
"This well loved three bedroom semi detached house boasts a generous rear garden and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge/dining room, breakfast room, kitchen, first floor landing, three ..."
** Floorplan Available ** INTERNAL PICTURES TO FOLLOW ** Semi Detached Bungalow ** Two Bedrooms ** Open Plan Living Area ** Modern Kitchen ** Extensive Garden ** Garage ** Driveway ** Desirable Location ** EPC Rating Awaited ** Porch ** A delightful semi detached bungalow positioned at the h...
READY TO MOVE INTO 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED ONE-LEVEL BUNGALOW – EXCELLENT CUL DE SAC LOCATION SITUATED JUST OFF QUEEN ALEXANDRA ROAD – FABULOUS LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT – NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this wonderful 2 double bedroom semi-det...
"*** Two bedrooms *** Detached bungalow *** Popular estate *** EPC grade C*** Freehold *** Council tax band C *** Gardens to rear *** Conservatory *** Neutral décor throughout *** Must view *** Well presented two bedroom detached bungalow located on Conyers Close, Castletown."
"Safe and Secure are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious Two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment in the sought after location of Ravine Court, Roker.
This rare property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, private yard to rear and beautiful sea views!
Close to local amenities..."
 Exceptional living over 3 STOREYS. Discover this bright and MODERN home with 3 double bedrooms and plenty of STORAGE space
" This MODERN end-terrace home boasts a GENEROUS LIVING room, kitchen/diner w/ INTEGRATED APPLIANCES & 2 contemporary bathrooms"
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^***The Chandler TWO double bedrooms, one of which has an EN SUITE - a modern family bathroom, OPEN-PLAN kitchen and dining area, French doors to the garden and a separate living room with BAY WINDOW. "
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom home featuring an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden. The ground floor also has a SPACIOUS LOUNGE and cloakroom. On the first floor you will find two double bedrooms with an EN SUITE to the main bedroom, a single bedro..."
"With a modern layout which would suit couples and families alike, the Flatford is a well-proportioned 3 bedroom home"
"This 4 bed end terraced house is situated on Ashmore Street in Ashbrooke that offers a superb location offering easy access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as being within walking distance of Sunderland City Centre and its many offerings. The property itself offers a discerning pur..."
"A larger than average, extended 2 bed semi-dethatched home, with west facing gardens to the rear and a double drive to the front. Popularly situated on this desirable avenue just a short walk from excellent schools, superb amenities along Sea Road, Seaburn Metro station and the sea front. Th..."
"An impressive semi-detached home with an attractive interior and a superb generous rear garden, occupying a pleasant cul-de-sac position within this sought after residential area. Internally the well-presented accommodation is accessed via an entrance porch that leads through to a hall with stai..."
"Occupying a highly sought after position close to Whitburn Village, this popular style three bedroom semi detached home offers a rare opportunity to those first time buyers and families who wish to live within this highly sought after street. The property internally has accommodation comprising ..."
"An outstanding three bedroom mid terrace home with a beautiful stylish interior, impressively upgraded and modernised whilst retaining many appealing character features within this sought-after area of High Barnes. Internally the immaculate and deceptively spacious accommodation is accessed via ..."
"We offer to the market this stunning 2 bedroom second floor apartment situated in the highly regarded Station Apartments on Sea Road in Fulwell. The apartment provides and lovely open-plan living space with kitchen / diner, bedroom with en suite shower room, second bedroom, bathroom with above ..."
"This recently refurbished and spacious three bedroom end terraced home is finished to a very good standard throughout and is available with no upward chain, perfect for families. Siting within this extremely popular suburb with all amenities close to hand and is particularly convenient for the S..."
"This two bedroom bungalow occupies a superb, generous plot at the head of this delightful cul-de-sac within the highly sought after area of Middle Herrington. Internally the accommodation is all on one level and requires general updating and modernisation, providing an excellent opportunity for ..."
"This superb 4 bedroom semi-detached property is situated on a corner plot within a quiet cul de sac in the popular and highly regarded area of High Barnes. The property is ideally placed for shops and schools as well as providing easy access to Sunderland City Centre, Doxford International Park, ..."
"An impressive and deceptively spacious four bedroom, three storey town house, occupying a delightful cul-se-sac position, tucked away off Sea View Road within this highly sought after area. Internally the well-appointed accommodation is accessed via reception hall with cloakroom/wc. There is an..."
"A well presented, extended four bedroom detached home with generous rear gardens; this superb home is perfect for families who wish to live on this fashionable Castlemede development. Internal accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, four first floor bedrooms, one boastin..."
"An exciting opportunity to purchase a 3 bed detached house situated on Bowood Close on the much sought after Tunstall Grange development which offers an excellent location providing easy access to well respected schools, amenities, shop as well as being within easy reach of the A19, Sunderland Ci..."
This 3 bed semi detached house is offered For Sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and offers huge potential to a discerning purchaser. The property is situated in the much sought after and highly desirable cul-de-sac of Tunstall Park in leafy Ashbrooke commanding a superb location providing easy access to...
"Boasting a beautiful aspect to the front with uninterrupted views across Greenbelt, this desirably situated three bedroom semi detached home offers a rare opportunity for those families who wish to live in a semi rural location. Internal accommodation comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, ..."
"Occupying a delightful cul-de-sac position off Bainbridge Holme Road is this attractive three bedroom semi-detached house. Internally on the ground floor there is an entrance porch, lounge / diner enjoying a dual aspect and a fitted kitchen whilst to the first floor there are three well-proport..."
SUBSTANTIAL EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH LARGE 2 STOREY SIDE & REAR EXTENSION SITUATED IN A NICE POSITION WITHIN A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT WITH LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT & SUNNY ASPECT.Good Life Homes are delighted to be marketing this hugely extended semi-detached home. Benefitting fr...
"This is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a well maintained, extended 3 bedroom semi-detached house occupying a prime corner plot, in the highly desirable location of Seaburn Dene."
"This 3 bed semi detached dormer bungalow is situated in a much sought after and highly regarded location on Woodville Crescent in High Barnes offering convenient access to Chester Road, the A19, shops, schools and amenities. The property offers spacious yet versatile living accommodation briefly..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * FULWELL SR6 * OPEN PLAN LIVING * GROUND FLOOR WC * WEST FACING GARDEN * OFF ROAD PARKING * BAR IN GARDEN * COUNCIL TAX BAND - B * EPC - D * This two bedroom semi detached property on Alston Crescent is so well...
"Representing a unique opportunity to acquire a move-in ready semi-detached property in Whitburn in the city of Sunderland, this home is ideal for any house hunter looking for a stress-free move into a highly desirable location. With no modernisation required, this attractive home will provide a ..."
Spacious three bed semi detached family home offering accommodation set over three floors being well appointed throughout and benefiting from having upvc double glazing and gas combi central heating. The property comes with a block paved drive for up to two cars and is situated in a great locati...
END/CORNER PLOT SUBSTANTIAL SEMI-DETACHED HOME ON LARGE PLOT - WELL PRESENTED & MODERNISED - SUPERB LARGE REAR GARDEN - AMPLE SPACE TO SIDE FOR FUTURE EXTENSION OR SIGNIFICANT PARKING/GARAGE OPTIONS. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a substantial 3 bedroom semi-detached home i...
"SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION! Tastefully decorated in warm, neutral tones, this THREE BEDROOM semi detached home offers SPACIOUS family accommodation. The internal floor plan consists of: Entrance porch, entrance hallway with stairs up, lounge which opens to the dining room ..."
"An impressive three bedroom semi-detached home occupying a superb position within this attractive and conveniently located development. Internally the accommodation includes an entrance hall with a cloakroom/wc and staircase to the first floor, lounge, modern dining kitchen and a utility. On th..."
"The Barton is a lovely three-bedroom family home with a bright and modern open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The downstairs WC, three handy storage cupboards and an en suite to bedroom one mean it ticks the boxes for practical family living."
EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME - LARGE SINGLE STOREY EXTENSION TO THE SIDE CREATING SEPARATE LOUNGE - OR DINING ROOM - OR LARGE HOME OFFICE - EXTENDED UTILITY ROOM - CORNER PLOT WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN.Good Life Homes are delighted to market a substantial extended semi-detached home in the Mo...
"*** Four to Five bedroom *** Modern kitchen and bathroom *** Gardens to side and rear *** Conservatory *** Off street parking *** Garage *** EPC grade D*** Freehold *** Council tax band B *** Versatile accommodation *** Stunning terraced property located on High Street, in the heart of South..."
"Early viewing is a must of this immaculately presented double fronted extended three bedroom semi detached house, which boasts the distinction of three reception rooms and a generous conservatory. The living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, lounge..."
*** Extended Semi *** Three bedrooms *** Two reception Rooms *** Kitchen dining room *** Off street parking *** Garage *** Gardens to front rear and side *** Four piece bathroom suite *** Popular location *** Must view *** EPC Grade D*** Well presented three bedroom semi detached home locate...
*** Close to Seaburn beach *** Desirable location *** Corner plot *** Two bedrooms *** Freehold *** EPC grade D *** Council tax band B *** Neutral décor throughout *** Move in ready *** Fitted wardrobes to master bedroom *** Gardens to front side and rear *** Off street parking *** Must V...
"An impressive three bedroom semi-detached house enjoying a stylish contemporary interior and generous rear garden within the sought after area of East Herrington. Internally the well-appointed accommodation on the ground floor includes a hall with staircase to the first floor, lounge and a fabul..."
*** Three bedrooms *** Freehold *** Council tax band C *** EPC grade C *** Garage *** Gardens to rear *** Neutral décor throughout *** Modern kitchen and bathroom *** Popular residential estate *** Close to local amenities *** Well presented three bedroom semi detached home located o...
"MODERN FAMILY ACCOMMODATION! A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED three bedroom semi detached home in a sought after, private residential estate with convenient access to an excellent range of amenities including well regarded schools and local shops. The property is conveniently p..."
"An attractive, three bedroom semi-detached house situated on Nursery Road within this highly sought after area. Internally the property briefly comprises to the ground floor of an entrance porch leading through to a hall with staircase to the first floor, lounge to the front with a bay window, o..."
"This superb 3 bedroomed semi detached house must be viewed to be fully appreciated and is likely to appeal to a wide variety of purchasers situated on Greetlands Road in Tunstall the property boasts a much sought after and highly desirable location offering easy access to local shop, schools and ..."
"We welcome to the market this lovely 3 bed semi detached house situated on Highside Drive in Humbledon commanding a superb commuting location providing easy access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as being within easy reach of Sunderland City Centre and the A19. The property benefit..."
"Originally a three bed, this home has been altered to a two bedroom property but which could easily be converted back which offers versatile living accommodation dependant on individual need. Well appointed and comes with a storage garage and driveway parking with pleasant garden to the rear. B..."
"Available with no upward chain, this popular style bay window three bedroom pre-war semi detached home with generous gardens to the rear is in need of general updating and modernising but carries huge potential and a competitive asking price to reflect the work required. Internal accommodatio..."
"A rare instruction indeed, this popular style two bedroom semi detached bungalow which sits upon the generous corner site with gardens to the front, side and rear and boasting off street parking from numerous cars, has been finished to a very high standard throughout and is literally ready to mov..."
"A beautiful, extended three bedroom semi-detached, occupying a pleasant position within this popular and sought after area. Internally the ground floor property comprises of an entrance porch, hallway, a spacious lounge/dining room, conservatory overlooking the garden and kitchen whilst to the f..."
"This superb three bedroom family sized detached house with FREEHOLD TITLE is situated within this popular residential area. Internally the accommodation is very well presented throughout and internally comprises entrance porch, lounge, garden room, modern kitchen, three good sized first floor be..."
"INVESTMENT SALE - An exciting opportunity to acquire a fully let investment situated on Worcester Terrace which is located within walking distance of Sunderland City Centre, Park Lane Bus and Metro Interchange, local shops and amenities and is a sought after residential location within the City. ..."
"The Windermere has a modern open-plan kitchen/diner, well-proportioned living room and three good-sized bedrooms. The top floor bedroom has the bonus of a spacious en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs cloakroom, two storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
"**OVER 55's ONLY** Located on a popular residential estate built in 2015, this contemporary bungalow is within walking distance of local amenities and transport links. There is a range of supermarkets, independent shops, restaurants, and parks close by.  The entrance leads int..."
"SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED!!  Situated in a sought after location, giving easy access to many local amenities which include: well regarded schools, transport links, A19 for commuting, Doxford international business p..."
"LAST REMAINING PLOTS - NEW BUILD - CURRENTLY UNDER CONSTRUCTION - The property when completed will comprise of a 3 bedroom end link house situated on Rotherfield Square in Rehouse offering a superb location providing convenient access to shops, amenities as well as excellent transport links via t..."
"Available with immediate vacant possession and no upward chain, this three bedroomed bay windowed semi is need of general updating and modernising and occupies a highly sought after position in the heart of Barnes. Accommodation is arranged over two floors and includes entrance porch, recepti..."
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * FULFORD GRANGE * OPEN PLAN LIVING/DINING * EXTENDED KITCHEN * NO ONWARD CHAIN * REAR GARDEN * 1047 sq ft * COUNCIL TAX BAND - B * EPC -D * Offered to the market with no onward chain, this three bedroom semi detache..."
LARGER STYLE 2 BEDROOM + CONVERTED LOFT SPACE - MID TERRACE HOME ON LARGE PLOT - GARAGE/WORKSHOP TO REAR + ADDITIONAL CAR ACCESS - LARGE KITCHEN/DINING EXTENSION - MODERNISED & WELL PRESENTED INTERNALLY - GREAT FULWELL LOCATION CLOSE TO SEA ROAD SHOPPING & SEAFRONT.Good Life Homes are delight...
"LAST REMAINING PLOTS - AVAILABLE FOR VIEWINGS - St. Lawrence Place is a flagship development designed for contemporary yet affordable everyday living. Nestled in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular suburb of Doxford Park, on the outskirts of Sunderland. The area has undergone a massive re-develop..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this stunning 3 bedroom Terraced home, situated on Persimmon's new St Michael's Way development in South Ryhope. The Windermere is such a flexible home. If you have a growing family, you’ll enjoy your own ensuite bedroom up on the second fl..."
"WITH A £15,000 PRICE REDUCTION FROM THE ORIGINAL ASKING PRICE. This is a deceptively spacious mid terraced bungalow ideally located for the amenities of Fulwell. With well presented accommodation that includes a large lounge through to dining room, 2 good sized bedrooms and a pleasant yard w..."
LAST REMAINING PLOT - READY NOW - SHARED OWNERSHIP - BUYERS HAVE THE OPTION TO PURCHASE ANYTHING BETWEEN 25% - 75% DEPENDENT UPON THEIR AFFORDABILITY. - PLEASE GET IN TOUCH TO DISCUSS ELIGIBILITY - THERE IS STRICT ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA TO PURCHASE THIS PROPERTY. Lowry Park is perfectly located i...
"Attention investors! This is a perfect investment opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom ground floor flat and 4 bedroom first floor maisonette to be sold as one unit. The ground floor comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom all benefiting form gas cen..."
AN AMAZING DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY - This large detached house already has a substantial ground floor extension and therefore an internal contemporary refit is required. We can envisage a roof lantern above the kitchen flat roof to compliment the already existing patio doors. A ...
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE * FULWELL SR6 * LOVELY FAMILY HOME * MANY RECENT IMPROVEMENTS * TWO RECEPTION ROOMS * CLOSE TO SEA ROAD * WELL PLACED FOR METRO & COAST * COUNCIL TAX BAND - B * EPC - TBC * This is a lovely family home on Moran S...
"An extended three bedroom semi-detached house with a garage, situated within this ever popular area of Silksworth, available with no upper chain involved. Internally the accommodation includes an entrance porch, hall with staircase to the first floor, spacious lounge through dining room, conserv..."
"This mid-terrace house is a charming and well-maintained property located in the desirable Barnes area of Sunderland. Boasting three bedrooms and two reception rooms, it provides ample space for families or individuals looking for a comfortable and stylish home."
"BUNGALOW WITH DESIRABLE EAST HERRINGTON LOCATION CLOSE TO EAST HERRINGTON PRIMARY SCHOOL - GREATLY EXTENDED TO REAR ACROSS FULL WIDTH - EXTENDED LENGTH TO GARAGE ALSO - REQUIRES SOME COSMETIC UPDATING.They say the 3 priorities you should be considering when considering a new home are Location, Lo..."
"An immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached home with a stylish, contemporary interior within this sought after location. Internally the impressive accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance porch, lounge, dining room and a superb kitchen whilst to the first floor there are..."
"This 2 double bedroom, first floor, Leasehold apartment is one of the two largest within this secure living development for the over 60's. A highly sought after property with a corner location overlooking the beautiful landscaped gardens. Situated within close proximity of Cleadon Village centre..."
"A beautifully presented three storey, mid link town house ideally located within the popular Alexandra Park development. The stunning internal accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance hallway, superb kitchen/dining room with access to the rear garden, bedroom 4/living room,..."
"A superb three bedroom, two reception room mid terrace house, providing spacious and attractive accommodation. Internally the accommodation has recently been upgraded and modernised (some rooms still being completed – extra photographs to follow) includes an entrance vestibule, hall with stairca..."
"A superbly presented and beautifully located 3-bedroom detached house offering exceptionally well-maintained gardens, extensive driveway and garage. Internally to ground floor there are twin reception rooms, large conservatory, luxury kitchen, and spacious breakfast room / utility. At f..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! NOT TO BE MISSED - A SPACIOUS, two bedroom link detached bungalow offering accommodation ALL ON ONE LEVEL! A short walk to the river if you like to walk a scenic route, located within easy access to South Hylton Village amenities which include loca..."
"Occupying a fabulous position at the popular Shields Road end of Alston Crescent and boasting well proportioned west facing gardens to the rear, this popular style two bedroom bay window semi detached home with a drive providing off street parking for two cars at the front together with a garage,..."
"*** Two bedrooms *** Garage *** Enclosed Patio area *** Neutral décor throughout *** EPC grade E *** Council tax band B *** Freehold *** No onward chain *** Popular residential location *** Well located two bedroom bungalow located on Mayfield Road, South Hylton."
"In this sought after village location with an excellent range of amenities in the vicinity including high performing local schools, shops, restaurants, the sea front and nearby beaches, an opportunity to purchase a spacious semi detached house providing ideal family accommodation. Neutrally decor..."
"This attractive three bedroom mid terrace home is neatly presented throughout and occupies an enviable position in the sought after coastal village of Whitburn. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, ground floor washroom, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three b..."
"ATTENTION BUYERS! A SPACIOUS three bedroom mid terraced period style property located in this sought after location on the outskirts of the City Centre, giving access to well regarded Schools, transport links and local shops and amenities. Inte..."
"This truly stunning family home will not fail to impress. The current owners have worked sensitively and with a refined palette to furnish and decorate the property, creating a tasteful and modern aesthetic. The well proportioned and versatile accommodation comprises reception hall, liv..."
GREATLY EXTENDED & WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH 2 BATHROOMS INCLUDING ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM ON GROUND FLOOR WITH ADJACENT BATHROOM ORIGINALLY BUILT TO SUPPORT A DISABLED RELATIVE.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a well presented and greatly extended 3 bedroom ...
SUBSTANTIALLY EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM HOME CLOSE TO HOSPITAL - TWO STOREY EXTENSION TO SIDE + KITCHEN EXTENSION TO REAR WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN! Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a well presented 3 double bedroom family home with attractive bay windows situated in a popular residential...
"NO CHAIN. 1930'2 SEMI DETACHED HOUSE. PERIOD FEATURES. IN NEED OF MODERNISATION. RECENTLY REWIRED. DOUBLE GARAGE OFFERED CHAIN FREE, this spacious 1930's 3 bedroom semi detached family home offers a range of original features. In need of modernisation, however the property has been rewired in 2..."
"This three bedroom end link occupies a generous plot and offers potential to extended subject to the necessary consents. The accommodation is arranged over two floor and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, ground floor bathroom, first floor landing and three bedrooms all having the b..."
"A well cared for, nicely proportioned three bedroom semi-detached home located on the well-established Moorside estate. An unfortunate change of circumstances forced a regrettable sale by the current owners. Perfect for a first time buyer or a young family, with a choice of schools all wi..."
"A well maintained family home, benefitting from pleasant gardens to front and rear, together with well presented interior comprising living room, fitted kitchen (with French doors to gardens, three good sized bedrooms, and a house bathroom. It also provides off-street parking and garage. "
"This three bedroom semi-detached Dutch bungalow, occupies a delightful cul-de-sac position within this sought-after area of East Herrington. Internally the flexible accommodation includes to the ground floor of a hall, lounge with staircase to the first floor, separate dining room, kitchen, bath..."
"A superb semi-detached home, providing attractive and spacious accommodation within the sought after area of East Herrington. Internally the well-appointed accommodation includes a hall with staircase to the first floor, lounge, a modern breakfasting kitchen and a downstairs wc whilst to the fir..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED! A DETACHED family home set on a popular and private housing estate sitting at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac, the property boasts a front garden with gravel drive for multiple car standage and an enclosed garden to rear which offers a pleasant spa..."
This is a split level ground floor apartment situated in a sought after sea front position with an outstanding aspect and a commanding view of the sea and pier. The sea front benefits from excellent access to the beach and a range of restaurants and cafes. It benefits from 2 bedrooms and 2 bathro...
*** Three bedrooms *** EPC grade D *** Council tax band C *** Freehold *** Two reception rooms *** Off street parking for multiple cars *** Neutral décor throughout *** Enclosed rear garden *** Cul de sac location *** Well presented three bedroom link detached family home
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - EARN INSTANT INCOME ON THIS EXCELLENT HMO! A fully-licensed and tenanted five bedroom HMO close to Sunderland city centre, University and hospital - don't miss out and enquire today."
"RETIREMENT APARTMENTS FOR SALE.......HERRIOT GARDENS IN SUNDERLAND..... One bed Apartment, second floor is available for £171,999.00 A McCARTHY & STONE RETIREMENT COMMUNITY IS DESIGNED TO GIVE YOU MORE - MORE SUPPORT, MORE CONVENIENCE AND MORE PEACE OF MIND.....SERVICE CHAR..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi detached family home, set on a desirable residential estate occupying a good plot. There is easy access to many amenities including: A19 for commuting, transport links, well regarded schools and many local shops. Internally this home benefits from an internal porc..."
ATTENTION INVESTORS - GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THIS SUPERB TENANTED HMO PROPERTY! Immaculately presented 4/5 bedroom property ideally situated close to Sunderland city centre. Enquire today!
"SUPERB 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM ATTRACTIVE SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM & SUNNY ASPECT REAR GARDEN - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT - NICE CUL DE SAC POSITION WITHIN SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a lovely modern, stylish family home,..."
"Within a popular residential area providing an ideal family home is this well presented three bedroom semi detached house with a kitchen extension. Being offered with no further chain, garage and south west facing garden making it sure to appeal. The property comprises; entrance hall, spacious l..."
SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - LARGE 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH DRIVEWAY & GARAGE - REAR GARDEN WITH OPEN VIEWS OVER FIELDS WITH SEA VIEWS BEYOND - SOME GENERAL UPDATING REQUIRED - NO CHAIN.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a spacious semi-detached home offering terrific potent...
"GREATLY EXTENDED 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME - DOUBLE STOREY EXTENSION TO FRONT & SIDE - SINGLE STOREY EXTENSION ACROSS FULL WIDTH OF REAR - WEST FACING SUNNY ASPECT REAR GARDEN!Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional home, greatly extended, creating a complete..."
 Perfect FIRST HOME for a modern lifestyle. Two DOUBLE bedrooms and OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining with integrated appliances
STUNNING 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WHICH HAS BEEN FULLY MODERNISED WITH HUGE EXPENDITURE OVER RECENT YEARS IN THIS EXCELLENT SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this exceptional family home in a sought after location. The owners have painstakingly updated the ...
"3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME WITH DRIVEWAY, GARAGE & LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT ON POPULAR HAVELOCK PARK ESTATE. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this well presented 3 bedroom detached home situated on this popular, well established Havelock Park development close to City Centre, local..."
"A beautiful and well presented semi-detached house, occupying a pleasant position within the popular North Farm estate, enjoying an open aspect to the rear. Internally the accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance porch, hallway, living room, superb contemporary kitchen, conservator..."
Offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED! Boasting a desirable location near the coast and the amenities of Whitburn Village which include highly regarded schools. This THREE BEDROOM semi detached family home is sure to appeal to a range of buyers and features gardens to the fr...
"A stunning semi-detached Dutch bungalow with a spacious and beautifully appointed interior within the popular North Farm estate. Internally the impressive accommodation on the ground floor includes a spacious reception hall, lounge with multi fuel burning stove and double doors to the dining ar..."
"THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME  Located on a popular residential estate giving access to many surrounding amenities which include: Sunderland Royal Hospital, local shops and schools. Boasting excellent transport links to Sunderland city centre, A1..."
** Great Views ** Private Garden ** Three Bedrooms ** Kitchen Diner ** Contemporary Throughout ** Ground Floor W/C ** Garage ** EPC Rating B ** Beautifully presented three bedroom detached family home located on Foxton Close.
MODERN FAMILY HOME! We welcome to the market a STUNNING property which still has a valid builders guarantee. This three bedroom semi detached offers ideal accommodation for the growing family and features a well tended enclosed garden to the rear. Benefits from havin...
"** Immaculate Throughout ** Three Bedrooms ** Kitchen Diner ** Ground Floor W/C ** En Suite Shower Room ** Garden to Rear ** Driveway ** Freehold ** Move in ready three bedroom family home located on Mayapple Close, Hillfield Meadows."
"3 BED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE – GARAGE & DRIVEWAY – POPULAR GRANGETOWN LOCATION – REAR GARDEN – NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this 3 bed semi-detached home in popular location set bet back on Ryhope Road, close to local schools, Grangetown amen..."
"Occupying an enviable location, we welcome to the market this immaculately presented three bedroom mid terraced house. The property boasts spacious rooms and a well appointed rear garden. The internal accommodation includes a hall, lounge, breakfasting kitchen and a superb modern bathroom/wc whi..."
"An exciting opportunity to purchase a superb 2 bed semi detached bungalow is likely to appeal to a variety of purchasers situated in a cul-de-sac position on Newstead Square in the sough after area of Mill Hill which is close to local amenities, Doxford Shopping Centre, Doxford International Busi..."
ABSOLUTELY GORGEOUS 3 FIRST FLOOR DOUBLE BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOME MINUTES WALK FROM ROKER PARK WITH 2 LARGE RECEPTION ROOMS ON GROUND FLOOR & JUST FULLY REFURBISHED CREATING A READY TO MOVE INTO HOME !Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market possibly the best property of its type cur...
LARGER STYLE 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACED PERIOD HOME (FORMERLY 4 BEDROOMS) - MODERNISED & WELL PRESENTED - CLOSE TO HOSPITAL - 2 BATHROOMS - ELECTRIC ROLLER SHUTTER VEHICLE ACCESS TO REAR - BEAUTIFUL GRAND ENTRANCE HALL WITH ORIGINAL STAIRCASE & RECEPTION ROOMS WITH HIGH CEILINGS & ORIGINAL PLASTERWOR...
PRICE REDUCED AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. This is an immaculately presented larger style cottage which has been extended to include three additional bedrooms and a separate shower-room at first floor level and provides impressively spacious and stylishly appointed accommodation 
"** FLOORPLAN AVAILABLE ** Detached ** Three Bedrooms ** En Suite ** Ground Floor W/C ** Garage ** Modern Kitchen and Bathroom ** EPC Rating B ** Council Tax Band C ** Freehold ** Well presented three bedroom detached home located on Felixstowe Road, Highfield Park."
"A stunning detached family home offering ample living space for the growing family and having the additional benefit of a Summer House which can be used as a home office/study or a sociable and entertainment space. Offering modern accommodation which is decorated to a good standard throughout, t..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi-detached home, ideally located within this popular and convenient location. Internally there is a reception hall with staircase to the first floor and an attractive lounge to the front with bay window whilst to the rear there is an open plan dining kitchen with Fren..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom, two reception room, semi detached house in Farrow Drive, Whitburn. Benefiting from gas central heating and double glazing, the property is sold with no upper chain and early viewing is essential.... Comprising :- Upvc door to the entr..."
"** Period Property ** Private Road ** Three Bedrooms ** Loft Room ** Two Reception Rooms ** No Chain ** Kitchen Diner ** Off Road Parking ** Spacious three bedroom family home located on Broxbourne Terrace, Millfield."
*** Modern method of auction *** Four bedrooms *** Three reception rooms *** Modern kitchen and bathroom *** Gardens to side and rear *** Conservatory *** Off street parking *** Garage *** EPC grade awaited *** Freehold *** Council tax band B *** Versatile accommodation *** Stunning terrace...
THE FINEST EXAMPLE OF ITS TYPE IN THE CITY! SIMPLY STUNNING 3 BEDROOM DOUBLE FRONTED HOME WITH 2 FURTHER LOFT ROOMS ON THE FIRST FLOOR. FABULOUS KITCHEN & BATHROOM & MODERN INTERIOR WITH RE-MODELLED LAYOUT CREATING A WONDERFUL OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/KITCHEN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to t...
"RARE 3 BEDROOM SEMI + GARAGE & DRIVEWAY + LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT ON HURSTWOOD ROAD CLOSE TO RICHARD AVENUE PRIMARY SCHOOL - WELL PRESENTED INTERNALLY! Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a lovely example of a rare property type on Hurstwood Road. Mostly terraced homes, this parti..."
"RARE - SOUGHT AFTER - SPACIOUS 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM APARTMENT - CORBY GATE - 2ND FLOOR - FABULOUS LOCATION - LOVELY VIEWS FROM ALL WINDOWS.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market one of the most desirable apartments in one of the most desirable locations within the city at Corby Gate, bu..."
"REDUCED FOR A QUICK SALE & Offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED! A beautifully presented and spacious semi detached home with three bedrooms, making this property an ideal choice for a family home. Being well appointed throughout and offering READY TO MOVE INTO accommoda..."
"Situated in a sought after location within convenient reach of Fulwell's excellent amenities including local shops, schools, the Metro system and within walking distance of the the sea front and local beaches, an opportunity to purchase a two bedroomed semi detached house offering well proportion..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom end cottage really must be viewed to appreciated the amount and standard of accommodation on offer. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, bedroom, lounge, dining kitchen, bathroom and two bedrooms to the first floor al..."
"A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached home, occupying a delightful cul-de-sac position within this ever popular and convenient location. Internally the accommodation includes an entrance porch, hall, spacious lounge opening through to a dining room with doors to the conservatory and rear ..."
"This is a stylishly presented mid terraced double fronted cottage situated in this established and popular location in the Roker area of the City, with an excellent range of amenities in the vicinity including convenient access to the sea front and local beaches. Beautifully updated and greatly i..."
SITUATED ON THE CORNER OF QUEEN ALEXANDRA ROAD & WOODSTOCK AVENUE - A LOVELY 3 BED SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH SECLUDED CORNER-PLOT GARDENS AND DRIVEWAY + EXTENDED KITCHEN.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a lovely corner plot 3 bedroom semi with driveway on Queen Alexandra Road an...
"*LARGER THAN AVERAGE 2 BEDROOM SEMI* *SPACIOU SREAR GARDEN* *READY TO MOVE INTO* Dowen Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this recently constructed and beautifully presented two bedroomed, semi detached home with ample gardens to the rear occupies a convenient position in this..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. LOVELY 2 BEDROOM MODERN APARTMENT, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG COUPLE, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED, g..."
** Upper Floor Apartment ** Far Reaching Views ** Immaculate Throughout ** Secure Intercom System ** Lift ** Communal Gardens **City Centre Location ** Two Bedrooms ** En Suite ** Balcony ** Allocated Parking ** EPC Rating C ** Leasehold ** Stunning two bedroom apartment located in River Qua...
"PUBLIC NOTICE Andrew Craig are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £65,000 for 134 Hastings Street, Hendon, Sunderland. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Andrew craig Estate Agent, 9 Frederick Street, Sunderland SR1 1NA before excha..."
"An impressive, extended semi-detached home with three spacious bedrooms, occupying a superb cul-de-sac position within this ever popular area. Internally the well-appointed accommodation comprises entrance porch, attractive lounge and a contemporary fitted kitchen with access through to a deligh..."
Jan Mitchell Properties are delighted to offer for sale this recently renovated well proportioned double fronted two bedroom semi detached bungalow with garage and drive in a popular residential area of Sunderland all offered with No Onward Chain.
"In this sought after location within Fulwell close to an excellent range of amenities including nearby shops, schools, the sea front and local beaches, an opportunity to purchase a mid terraced house providing deceptively spacious accommodation ideally suited to a range of potential purchasers. F..."
"An extended Edwardian mid terraced home available with no upward chain and a competitive asking price. In need of some updating and modernising but carrying huge potential, this pleasant period property features internal accommodation comprising reception hall, lounge, dining room, extended kitc..."
"*** Spacious Home ** NO CHAIN ** Vacant Possession ** Three Bedrooms ** Kitchen Diner ** Enclosed Yard ** EPC Grade D ** Modern Kitchen and Bathroom *** Freehold ** Council Tax Band B *** Spacious three bedroom home located on Cleveland Road, High Barnes."
PRICE REDUCED AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED. Located in this ever popular residential location this 3 bedroom terraced house is conveniently positioned for access to the Sea Road shopping area and the Sea Front. The property offers well cared for family accommodation featuring uPVC double glazing ...
"Jan Mitchell Properties are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented and deceptively spacious four bedroom mid terraced home with versatile accommodation that should appeal to a range of buyers, located on with easy access to a wealth of local amenities. "
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: 2 x Two Bedroom Flats on One T...
"Purplebricks is delighted to welcome this upgraded and converted three-storey, three bedroom semi-detached house to the market, situated in the sought after residential area of Rosemount, South Hylton, Tyne and Wear It's clear to see that the current owners have invested a lot into making the p..."
*** Modern method of auction *** Separated in to three flats *** Modern Throughout *** Two flats currently tenanted *** One title *** Investment opportunity *** Popular residential area *** Close to local transport links *** EPC's available for all three properties *** Fantastic investment ...
"This stunning home is well presented and finished to a high standard with plenty of natural light throughout. The home benefits from a spacious living room, perfect for spending quality time with friends and family or enjoying individual pursuits.The kitchen is modern and highly functional with p..."
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT * FIRST FLOOR * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * SECURE ENTRY SYSTEM * ALLOCATED PARKING * RIVER VIEWS * IDEAL FOR COASTAL WALKS * COUNCIL TAX BAND - C * EPC - B * Located on the sought after Roker Marina development, this two b..."
2 DOUBLE BED MID LINK HOUSE – READY TO MOVE INTO HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION SET BACK FROM SILKSWORTH LANE - UTILITY AREA & DOWNSTAIRS WC – LOW MAINTENANCE REAR COURTYARD – PARKING TO THE FRONT – NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this 2 doubl...
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * TWO/THREE BEDROOM COTTAGE * FULWELL SR6 * SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION * FLEXIBLE LIVING OPTIONS * NO ONWARD CHAIN * REAR YARD * COUNCIL TAX BAND - A * EPC - D * Offered to the market with no onward chain, this two/three bedroom cottage offers spacio..."
"Occupying a highly favoured position on the third floor of this well established apartment block, directly overlooking the marina and with extended views across the river and out to sea, this lovely two bedroomed apartment, featuring the added bonus of having a garage, is available with no upward..."
"This superb 3 bed semi detached house is likely to appeal to a wide variety of purchaser and must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property is ideally located on St Aidans Avenue in Grangetown providing convenient access to to Sunderland City Centre, the A19 in addition to local shops and ..."
"TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED! Benefits of this property include: garage, driveway providing off street parking, gardens to the front and rear, UPVC double glazing, gas central heating. Located in the ever popul..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this spacious 2 double bedroom, maisonette located in Cleadon Village with spacious accommodation spread over two floors. A delightful home which offers stylish ready to move into accommodation with a neutral colour scheme and close to East Boldon Metro s..."
Offering POTENTIAL FOR IMPROVEMENT! A two bedroom semi detached bungalow which is available with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property provides single level accommodation which is sure to appeal to a range of buyers from young families to those looking to downsize. Located in a...
*** STUNNING - TWO BEDROOMS - SEMI-DETACHED HOME - NO UPPER CHAIN - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - TRIPLE DRIVEWAY - MODERN - CONSERVATORY - RECENTLY REFURBISHED KITCHEN - SPACIOUS ROOMS - A CREDIT TO THE CURRENT OWNER - VIEWING HIGHLY ADVISED ***
"This 3 bedroom terraced house is available with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Situated on Ormonde Street being close to local schools, Chester Road shops, Sunderland Royal Hospital, Barnes Park and road links into Sunderland City Centre. The property itself briefly comprises of Entrance Vestibule, Entrance ..."
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this spacious 2 bedroom ground floor apartment in the Ashbrooke area of Sunderland.
With no onward chain viewings are highly recommended!"
"A delightful, well presented modern two bedroom semi sat within this popular Riverside Residential Development and available with no upward chain. Perfect for first time buyers and those looking to downsize, the property offers comfortable living accommodation finished to a very good standard th..."
"This stunning home has recently undergone a significant programme of updating and modernisation to provide a fabulous, remodelled interior. The impressive, contemporary accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance lobby and a spacious lounge, opening though to a dining room. There is ..."
"SPACIOUS PERIOD PROPERTY available with NO CHAIN INVOLVED! The property that bursts with potential, an ideal purchase for an investor or someone looking for a blank canvas to create their perfect family home. Located in the residential area of Roker which is a popular..."
"We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in thesum of £147,500. Any persons wishing to increase on this offer shouldnotify the agents of their best offer prior to exchange of contracts."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** If you're looking for an affordable family home, that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this four-bedroom terraced certainly fits the bill.  The entrance leads into the hallway, with a large lounge to the right. There is also a second reception room f..."
"A popularly situate two bedroom mid terrace cottage sitting along a convenient street set close to all the superb amenities that the wonderful suburb of Fulwell has to offer. Available with no upward chain, the property is tastefully appointed throughout and features reception hall, living room..."
"3 BED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE – WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT – SOUGHT AFTER HALL FARM LOCATION – CLOSE TO SCHOOLS, AMENITIES, DOXFORD INTERNATIONAL, A19 & A690 – REAR PARKING. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, well presented 3 bedroom semi-detached..."
ATTRACTIVE EXTENDED 3 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI - DURHAM ROAD LOCATION JUST UP/OPPOSITE FROM BEDE COLLEGE - LOVELY REAR GARDEN PLOT WITH SUNNY ASPECT - EXTENDED SUN/GARDEN ROOM TO REAR - NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional opportunity to acquire an attractive 3...
Impressive three bedroom semi detached home which should appeal to a range of buyers. Council Tax Band B. EPC Rating G.
Two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated within a Cul-De-Sac! Located within easy access to amenities including shops and transport links. The property will appeal to a range of buyers including someone looking to downsize for one level living. The property benefits from double glazing and...
"In this popular position, in consistently high demand over the years and with the benefit of a traffic free frontage and a very pleasant west facing front garden, an opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious mid terraced house providing well proportioned family accommodation "
"SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION! Situated in the ever popular Whitburn location, which is always a popular choice for buyers as you are just short walk away from the coastal walks along the beautiful Seaburn and Roker beaches which have numerous restaurants and coffee shops to ch..."
WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOME ON THIS POPULAR STREET CLOSE TO RICHARD AVENUE SCHOOL - OPEN PLAN DINING KITCHEN AREA TO REAR CREATING A LOVELY SPACIOUS FAMILY AREA IN ADDITION TO GENEROUS SEPARATE FRONT LOUNGE -LOVELY REAR GARDEN WITH LAWN & PATIO AND SUNNY ASPECT - CONSERVATORY. Good...
A larger than average purpose built 3 bedroom house occupying one of the finest sites on this quiet low density development being within an excellent location and offering great local facilities to include Morrison’s and a range of schools. The property was purpose built with 3 double b...
*LARGE PLOT TO THE SIDE AND REAR* *POPULAR LOCATION* *NO CHAIN* Sitting at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac is this well appointed semi detached family home which occupies a generously sized plot with a larger than average size garden to the side and rear. The property does require interna...
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this modern two-bedroom semi-detached, on a corner plot with ample outside space. The entrance leads into the hallway, with the large lounge to the right, benefiting from a feature fireplace and two windows providing plenty of natural light. The well-equipped fi..."
"Within a popular residential area providing an ideal family home is this refurbished three bedroom semi detached house. Being offered with no further chain, garage and enclosed garden making it sure to appeal. The property comprises; entrance hallway, spacious lounge, well equipped kitchen, cloa..."
"Keith Pattinson Estate agents are pleased to welcome to the market this very spacious and well presented three bedroomed home, offered with no upward chain. The property has been completely refurbished by its current owner and offers a wonderful living space, with two reception rooms and a large ..."
STUNNING 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM ATTRACTIVE SEMI - JUST FULLY REFURBISHED - DESIGNER STANDARD KITCHEN & BATHROOM - FABULOUS LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN - UPGRADED ELECTRICS - DRIVEWAY TO FRONT - LOVELY QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION - WALKING DISTANCE TO HOSPITAL - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & READY TO MOVE INTO WITH ...
"VIRTUAL VIEWING AVAILABLE!! This spacious semi detached home has been converted into 2 flats ideal for investment landlords. The first floor flat comprises of a living room, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom, the ground flat comprises of a living room, kitchen, 2 bedrooms and a bathroom. Externally..."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom mid terrace, dormer cottage, featuring a delightful garden within this sought after area. Internally the immaculate and flexible accommodation includes to the ground floor of a hall, a lounge, superb modern fitted kitchen, bathroom/wc and a double bedroom (c..."
"Situated within this fashionable location of Castletown set close to the A19 and being perfect for commuting to Nissan, Doxford International Business Park and Amazon, this pleasant 2 bedroom semi detached home with a very useful loft space, offers well proportioned living accommodation perfect f..."
"INVESTMENT BUY TO LET - PRESENTLY TENANTEDA spacious former HMO, five bedroom terraced house with tenants in occupancy.The house requires certain refurbishments both internally and externally and is located on a residential street with easy access to local shops, amenities and St..."
"A unique home! We welcome this double fronted detached cottage in the ever popular Millfield, Sunderland. It is located within easy access to Sunderland Hospital, Sunderland City Centre and has excellent road links to all major road routes and to the coast. This home would be perfect for a fam..."
"FOR SALE VIA I AM SOLD AUCTION T&C's apply. Early viewing is must of this generously proportioned three bedroom mid terrace. The well presented accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, breakfast kitchen, utility, first fl..."
Early viewing is a must of this generously proportioned four bedroom house which is offered for sale as tenanted investment or with vacant possession. Currently let on an assured shorthold tenancy at £750 per calendar month. The flexible living space is arranged over three floors and comprises di...
"LAST REMAINING PLOTS - NEW BUILD - CURRENTLY UNDER CONSTRUCTION - The property when completed will comprise of a 2 bedroom mid link house situated on Rotherfiled Square in Rehouse offering a superb location providing convenient access to shops, amenities as well as excellent transport links via t..."
*** SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETAHCED *** DOUBLE GLAZED/GAS CENTRAL HEATING *** PRIVATE FRONT AND REAR GARDEN *** OFF STREET PARKING *** POPULAR LOCATION *** Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this spacious two bedroom semi detached family home situated on Maple Aven...
A spacious two reception/two bed mid terraced cottage which is sure to appeal to a range of buyers! Situated in the highly regarded residential location of Fulwell you have an excellent range of amenities nearby including the Stadium Of Light Metro Station with the Stadium slightly further a...
SOUGHT AFTER ABC STREET LOCATION - LARGER STYLE 3 BEDROOM DOUBLE FRONTED HOME ALL ON ONE LEVEL - NEW ROOF AND ATTRACTIVE RENDER - RECENT MODERN KITCHEN - PLEASANT GENEROUS OUTDOOR SPACE TO REAR ALSO WITH VEHICLE ACCESS.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a larger style double fr...
"A period style mid terraced home offering spacious family accommodation which must be viewed to be fully appreciated! Boasting a sought after location, the property is ideally located for access to an excellent range of local amenities including Sunderland Royal Hospital, well regarded school..."
"A spacious three bedroom, two reception room mid terrace dormer cottage within this sought after residential location. Internally the accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance vestibule, hall, two generous reception rooms, modern fitted kitchen, sun porch and a shower room/wc. On t..."
"This well presented double fronted two bedroom cottage is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed. The generous living space is arranged over one level and comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, two bedrooms, lounge, dining room, kitchen, rear hall, and bathroom all ..."
"INVESTOR OR FIRST-TIME BUYER POTENTIAL- 4 BEDROOM MODERNISED AND SPACIOUS HOME WITH LARGE EXTENSION TO REAR PROVIDING AMPLE LIVING ACCOMMODATION WITH SUPERB KITCHEN/DINING AREA PLUS MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN SUITE. GOOD AREA CLOSE TO NEWCASTLE ROAD AND TRANSPORT LINKS INTO CITY CENTRE, FULWELL OR SO..."
PROBABLY THE FINEST EXAMPLE OF ITS TYPE ON THE MARKET - A TWO BEDROOM IMMACULATELY PRESENTED MODERN HOME - DESIGNER KITCHEN & FABULOUS BATHROOM - HARD LANDSCAPED LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN - DOUBLE DRIVEWAY TO FRONT - PROFESSIONALLY FITTED WARDROBES TO BOTH ROOMS.Good Life Homes are delighted to...
"Property located in Stansfield Street, Roker"
"A rare addition to the market, this extended 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow provides a great retirement home being spacious yet easy to manage, well maintained, and nicely positioned within a quiet cul-de-sac of similar age and style property. The accommodation comprises: entrance hal..."
"2 BED FIRST FLOOR FLAT OFFERING LOVELY, VERY SPACIOUS, QUALITY ACCOMMODATION OF A TYPE RARELY FOUND. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this stylish conversion offering space and quality. Positioned on the entire first floor of this period semi, the apartment briefly comprises; ..."
"PurpleBricks are pleased to welcome to the market this immaculate semi detached home situated on this ever popular development close to local amenities ,schooling and transport links . This property has been maintained to a high standard and is modern throughout. with an extensive rear garden wi..."
VERY WELL PRESENTED & MAINTAINED 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE DOUBLE FRONTED COTTAGE ON ONE LEVEL OFFERING 4 VERSATILE ROOMS (3 BEDROOMS & 1 LOUNGE or 2 BEDROOMS & 2 LOUNGE) - RECENT ROOF - ATTRACTIVE RENDER - GARAGE TO REAR - MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION.Good Life Home...
*** Rare to the market *** Stunning view to the sea *** Three bedrooms *** No onward chain *** Resident parking *** Enclosed paved garden with mature shrubs *** EPC grade awaited *** Neutral décor throughout *** Council Tax Band B *** Rare to the market this wonderful three bedroom home.
2 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION BENEFITTING FROM MODERNISED OPEN PLAN LAYOUT TO GROUND FLOOR - LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT – POTENTIAL TO CREATE 3rd BEDROOM – NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this two double bedroom spacious home which has bee...
"*** Beautifully presented*** Two bedrooms *** Loft Room *** Conservatory *** Modern décor throughout *** Corner plot *** Log burner *** Utility room *** Well presented two bedroom semi detached home located on Rosyth Square, Redhouse."
"*NO CHAIN* *DRIVEWAY & GARAGE* *This two bedroom semi detached house is offered for sale with no upward chain and is not to be missed. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, rear hall, w.c. first floor la..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to the market and situated in the ever popular ABC streets this spacious double fronted , end terraced cottage benefitting from upvc double glazing and gas central heating.
Comprising of entrance porch into hallway leading into generous living room & bedroom 3..."
Offering huge potential this 3 bed mid terrace property is situated on Cuba Street in Grangetown being close to local amenities and schools and is approximately 1 miles away from Sunderland City Centre. The property itself is likely to appeal to a wide variety of purchasers with the living accom...
"*** Move in ready *** Three bedrooms *** Two reception rooms *** Enclosed rear yard *** Close to local amenities *** En suite bathroom *** Spacious accommodation *** Must view *** EPC Grade E** Well presented three bedroom terraced home located on Gladstone Street, Roker."
"Purplebricks welcomes this Two-Bedroom Mid-Terrace House to the market, situated in the residential area of Maling Park, South Hylton, Sunderland. The current owner has lived here for over 10 years, and has invested a lot time and money into making the property into a cosy family home, which is..."
This deceptively spacious two bedroomed ground floor flat offers good sized living space and is ideal for those who require a stair free home. Also perfect for investor landlords the property should prove to be perfect for tenants who wish to live in a central location within walking distance o...
"A fabulous first floor apartment with two double bedrooms and a fabulous contemporary interior within this attractive small modern development. Internally the private accommodation includes a hall with useful built in storage cupboards, open plan lounge/dining and kitchen area. The impressive k..."
A well appointed spacious semi detached family home located on a popular Residential Estate having access to many amenities. The property benefits from having upvc double glazing and gas combi central heating and has gardens to front and rear together with driveway. Offers ideal accommodation f...
"Available with immediate vacant possession and no upward chain, this popular style Edwardian bay window terraced home boasting many original features including staircase, skirtings, corbels, coved cornicing and architraving together with beautiful cast iron fireplaces in two of the bedrooms, offe..."
** PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE** **ZERO GROUND RENT** A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT ON THE SECOND FLOOR A delightful development of one and two bedroom purpose built retirement apartments designed specifically to meet the needs of the older homeowner. Pinfold Court is ideally located within 2...
"This 3 bedroom semi detached house is situated on Pontop Square in Pennywell being close to local school, shops and amenities. The property itself briefly comprises of Entrance Hall, Living room, Dining Room, Kitchen and to the First Floor 3 Bedrooms and Wet Room. Externally the property has a ..."
"This delightful modern three bedroom semi set within this popular development walking distant from the centre of Grangetown offers an exciting opportunity to both families and first time buyers who wish to live within this thriving suburb. The property features an entrance porch, large living..."
"Enjoying a quiet situation on this coastal street within short walking distance of the Sea Front, this two bedroom mid terraced cottage available with no upward chain is perfect for first time buyers and those looking to downsize to a stair free living space. Comprising entrance hall, living ..."
"This popularly situated mid terrace two bedroom cottage sits along a highly desirable street set close to Sea Road and Fulwell Road within easy reach of an excellent range of amenities. Available with no upward chain, the property internally comprises entrance lobby, reception hall, living ro..."
"** Immaculate Throughout ** Three Bedrooms ** Off Road Parking ** Two Reception Rooms ** Great Size Garden ** Popular Location ** EPC Rating D ** Beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached home located on Phoenix Road, Pennywell."
"STUNNING 2 DOUBLE BED RIVERSIDE APARTMENT WITHIN THIS SUPERB BUILDING WHICH HOUSES SOME OF THE REGIONS ONLY NEW YORK LOFT STYLE APARTMENTS PROVIDING A STYLISH LIVING EXPERIENCE. NEXT TO ST PETERS CAMPUS, RIVERSIDE WALKS & MARINA. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this superb 2 ..."
"A stylish mid terraced, three bedroom townhouse situated in a leafy residential back water within easy reach of the nearby city centre, City University Campus and excellent transport links provided by the local Park lane bus terminus and Metro station.Internally the house has neutral de..."
RECENTLY REFURBISHED AND READY TO MOVE INTO - SUPERB 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME - DRIVEWAY & GARAGE - LARGE LOUNGE - SUPERB KITCHEN - STUNNING LARGE BATHROOM WITH SEPARATE SHOWER & BATH - NO CHAIN !Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a very well presented and recently renovated 3 ...
"NO CHAIN INVOLVED! A two bedroom semi detached family home, located at the head of a quiet cul de sac on this popular residential estate. Having a corner plot which provides ample garden space to the side and rear. Comes with the additional benefit of a conservatory,..."
"An immaculately presented 2 bedroom top floor apartment situated in The Croft on Thornholme Road which is a sought after development constructed by Charles Church providing easy access to Sunderland City Centre, local amenities and transport links. The apartment benefits from spacious living spa..."
THREE BEDROOM SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - SOME COSMETIC UPDATING REQUIRED - LARGE LOUNGE/DINING ROOM - LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT - NO ONGOING CHAIN - SOUGHT AFTER SPRINGWELLLOCATION.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a good example of a larger style 3 bedroom family home in sought after...
Looking to step onto the property ladder? This family home is situated perfectly for those who love a coastal walk. Available under the shared ownership scheme or 100% leasehold you will not want to miss this one!
"* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * HYLTON CASTLE SR5 * CORNER PLOT * GENEROUS BEDROOM SIZES * KITCHEN DINER * OFF ROAD PARKING * LOFT SPACE * COUNCIL TAX BAND - A * EPC - C * Occupying a generous corner plot, this three bedroom semi detached is..."
"This attractive three bedroom semi detached is situated within this ever popular residential area. The property internally comprises entrance hall, lounge through to dining room, kitchen, sun room, utility, three first floor bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is a drive to the fro..."
"Bradley Hall Sunderland are pleased to offer for sale, a ready made investment opportunity on Edward Burdis Street in Southwick, Sunderland. This property briefly comprises a range of one and two bedroom flats within a singular block on a single unbroken freehold title. The purchase is to include..."
"We are delighted to welcome to the market this attractive two bedroom semi-detached property located within the ever popular Wear View Estate. The property is situated within close proximity to Sunderland City Centre, A19, transport links, coastal routes and Nissan. The internal accommodation of..."
"House Sales Direct are delighted to present to the market this spacious two bedroom mid terrace house in Sunderland. This property is well presented and in a popular location. The property comprises of a living room with a new electric fire place, Dining area at the back of the living area and ..."
"A deceptively spacious 3 bedroom mid terraced house, positioned within the centre of the Ashbrooke conservation area and offering an excellent range of every day amenities including local schools, public houses, restaurants, pharmacies, transport links local bus services and the Metro train servi..."
*** Two bedrooms *** EPC grade awaited *** Council tax band A *** Freehold *** Conservatory *** Off street parking *** Enclosed rear garden with patio *** Well presented two bedrooms semi detached home located in Ryhope
"This well appointed two bedroom bay window terraced cottage is perfect for first time buyers and those who require a stair free living space. Internally the property comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom and features of note include gas central heating, UPVC doub..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! We welcome to the market this two bedroom semi detached home which offers ideal accommodation for the growing family! Situated in a popular location where there are shops, schools and bus links to Sunderland City centre, this property is sure to b..."
"Superbly located and extended, two bedroom, semi detached house with large loft room. This excellent house lies close to the local park and is also within close proximity of schools and shops.Modern features include a gas central heating system run from a combination boiler, UPVC window..."
"WITH A £10,000 PRICE REDUCTION FROM THE ORIGINAL ASKING PRICE AS AN EARLY SALE IS REQUIRED.
This is a rare opportunity to purchase a double fronted end terraced cottage in this sought after location well placed for access to Fulwell's excellent amenities including the Metro system. Providing..."
Situated in this popular residential location conveniently placed for access to the amenities of Fulwell. The property comprises a mid terraced cottage with the added attraction of a separate dining area between the lounge and the kitchen. There is a west facing yard with a sunny aspect to the re...
"This stunning home is well presented and finished to a high standard with plenty of natural light throughout. The home benefits from a spacious living room, perfect for spending quality time with friends and family or enjoying individual pursuits. The dining area provides a great space for e..."
**SOLD AS SEEN** A very interesting house that will provide an exciting project to create a spacious open plan home with little extra work and more a project for a person with flair and imagination. The ground floor has been remodelled and extended into the rear yard to offer a light-fi...
"*PUBLIC NOTICE Hackett Property are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £123,000 for 10 Colchester Terrace.Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Hackett Property, Lynas House, 12a Frederick Street, Sunderland SR1 1NA *<..."
"A deceptively spacious, three bedroom mid terrace dormer cottage with well-appointed accommodation, located within the popular area of High Barnes. Internally the accommodation on the ground floor includes a hall, generous lounge, contemporary fitted kitchen, modern bathroom/wc and a double bedr..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT! This STUNNING semi detached family home offers spacious accommodation that is sure to impress all who view! Immaculately presented in modern tones the internal accommodation consists of: Entrance hall with stairs to the first flo...
"A large, immaculately presented, three bedroom mid terrace, offered to the market in a popular residential area on the outskirts of Sunderland. This fantastic home is finished to a beautiful standard and will undoubtedly appeal to a wide range of buyers. The layout briefly comprises UPV..."
"An impressive two bedroom first flat, occupying a superb position within this conversion building on this private road, enjoying delightful communal gardens to the front. Internally the private accommodation includes a hall, generous lounge / diner, modern fitted kitchen, two bedrooms and a spac..."
"Early viewing is a must of this well presented two bedroom bungalow which is offered for sale with no upward chain. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over one level and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom all having the benefit of ..."
*** SEMI DETACHED TWO BEDROOM HOUSE *** PROMINENT POSITION SITUATED AT HEAD OF QUIET CUL-DE-SAC***DOUBLE GLAZED/GAS CENTRAL HEATING *** FRONT AND REAR GARDEN *** IMMACULATELY PRESENTED *** POPULAR LOCATION*** OFF ROAD PARKING . We are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented...
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * HYLTON CASTLE SR5 * LARGE CORNER PLOT * IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY * OPEN PLAN LIVING * OFF ROAD PARKING FOR SEVERAL VEHICLES * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * CLOSE TO TRANSPORT LINKS * COUNCIL TAX BAND - A * EPC - D * This t...
"This three bedroom double fronted Georgian style home occupies an enviable position overlooking a green area. The well maintained accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, two reception rooms, kitchen, rear hall, w.c. utility, first floor landing three bedrooms, showe..."
"Arranged as Four self-contained Flats and a Detached Lock-up Garage, Each Flat provides One Bedroom Accommodation, Includes a Garage and a rear Yard, Sunderland city centre and its rail & metro station are within walking distance, The University of Sunderland's City Campus and Sunderland Roya..."
UNIQUE 2 BEDROOM/2 BATHROOM APARTMENT IN BEAUTIFUL LANDMARK BUILDING SITUATED PROMINENTLY ON QUEEN ALEXANDRA ROAD OFFERING A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO LIVE IN ONE OF THE BEST LOCATIONS WITHIN THE CITY.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a spacious first floor 2 bedroom apartment conve...
"Occupying a generous corner plot with superb spacious gardens to the side and rear and enjoying a quiet set back position fronting onto a small green, this well proportioned three bedroom end link with the added bonus of a conservatory is available with no upward chain and is perfect for families..."
"Sitting on a generous corner plot, this larger style three bedroom semi detached home occupies a wonderful position on the periphery of Town End Farm and boast wonderful views towards Herrington and also taking in the Northern Spire Bridge, the property is set close to the A19 and is perfect for ..."
"An attractive three bedroom semi-detached home, providing great potential, situated with the ever popular St. Aidan’s Estate. The accommodation includes an entrance porch, hall with staircase to the first floor, lounge with bay window, dining room and kitchen. To the first floor there are three..."
"A delightful three bedroom mid terrace cottage, situated on Abingdon Street, one of the ever popular ‘ABC Streets’ in High Barnes. Internally the well-presented accommodation is all on one level and includes an entrance vestibule, hall, attractive lounge, modern fitted kitchen, contemporary bath..."
"In this popular and convenient location just off the Sea Road shopping centre and perfectly placed for access to Fulwell's excellent amenities including bus and Metro services and the sea front, an opportunity to purchase a well presented mid terraced cottage providing manageable accommodation id..."
VERY SPACIOUS WELL PRESENTED 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME PLUS DOUBLE LOFT ROOM - SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT - CONSERVATORY - GARAGE - LARGE LOUNGE - SENSIBLY PRICED. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a very spacious mid-link home on this popular development. Benefitting from a double l...
"This well presented 2 bedroom semi detached house located off Leechmere Road on Helvellyn Road, close to local school and amenities. The property briefly comprises of; Entrance Porch, Inner Hall, Living Room, Kitchen / Dining Room and to the First Floor, Landing, 2 Bedrooms and Bathroom. Externa..."
"A beautiful semi-detached property set within a generous corner plot. This property has been extremely well cared for and is immaculately presented both inside and out. With generous rear garden, two double bedrooms as well as an open plan lounge dining room, conservatory and breakfasting kitchen."
To be sold with tenant in situ currently paying £650 per calendar month. This is a deceptively spacious three bedroom mid terrace home with many original features. Boasting three reception rooms and two bathrooms. Within walking distance of local amenities. The property benefits from gas cent...
"Rare to the market! This well presented double fronted cottage boasts a garden to the side and really must be viewed to be appreciated The generous living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms, first floor landing, bedroom and ba..."
"Lovely 3 bedroomed property - the result of many high quality refurbishments including stunning kitchen ,bathroom and rear gardens . Located in popular area close to local amenities, transport links and schooling.Off road parking ."
"This well maintained two bedroom semi detached house is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises lounge, kitchen, dining room, wash house, first floor landing, two bedrooms, bathroom and separate w.c. all having t..."
*** NO UPPER CHAIN - IMPRESSIVE & SPACIOUS - DOUBLE FRONTED BUNGALOW - THREE BEDROOMS - RECENTLY REFURBISHED SHOWER ROOM - ENCLOSED & PRIVATE REAR YARD - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - VIEWING HIGHLY ADVISED ***
"Three Bedroom End Terrace Period Property. Situated within close proximity to Park Lane Metro Station for commuting across the North East, together with a great range of shops found in Sunderland City Centre, main bus links and Sunderland University. The property will appeal to a range of buyers..."
"This three bedroom mid terrace is offered for sale with no upward chain and has excellent potential. The accommodation retains a wealth of period features including fireplaces, coving & mouldings ceiling roses and original floorboards throughout. The accommodation is in need of some cosmetic ..."
"NO CHAIN - SOUGHT AFTER NOOKSIDE LOCATION - 3 BED SEMI-DETACHED - MODERNISED - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN PLOT. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a good opportunity to acquire a 3 bedroom family home in a sought after Nookside location which benefits from recent decor, modern kitchen..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this spacious three bedroom double fronted cottage in High Barnes. Offering many benefits which include gas central heating, part double glazing, modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, shower room and enclosed rear yard. Viewing a must to appreci..."
"Situated within a popular complex in the centre of Cleadon Village, with its selection of vibrant shops, cafes pubs and restaurants, this retirement apartment offers excellent access to all the local amenities. This smaller and more discrete than the average retirement complex, boasts well maint..."
"A modern and stylish first floor apartment situated in a much sought after location set within the gated development of The Croft on Thornholme Road in Thornhill. The property offers generous living accommodation benefiting from timber framed double glazing, a security door security entry system..."
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Three Bedroom Semi Detached House in the popular area of Crossby Court, Hendon.
This spacious home benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and gardens front and rear.
Close to local amenities and transport links, the property would suit a wide ..."
VERY WELL PRESENTED 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME ON LARGE GARDEN PLOT TO REAR & SIDE - READY TO MOVE INTO - OFFERING EXCEPTIONAL VALUE. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional example of a lovely 2 double bedroom semi-detached home which benefits from an extra l...
*** Lovely views *** First floor apartment *** Two bedrooms *** Balcony *** En suite shower room *** Modern throughout *** EPC grade C *** Desirable location *** Easy access to Sunderland City Centre *** A beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment in the sough after location of...
"OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN! This well appointed two bedroom cottage, located in this popular residential area giving access to many amenities including well regarded schools, transport links, local parks and Sunderland Royal Hospital. Benefiting from UPVC double glazing, com..."
"An immaculately presented semi-detached house with a conservatory and garage within this popular development. The internal accommodation includes an entrance lobby, lounge, breakfasting kitchen and a conservatory whilst to the first floor there are two bedrooms and a modern bathroom/wc. Externa..."
"DESIRABLE LOCATION! A beautifully presented FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT centrally located in sought after location of Ashbrooke which is on the outskirts of Sunderland City Centre. Well placed for access to a range of local shops, well regarded schools, bars and restaurant..."
"A much improved and deceptively spacious, three bedroom mid terrace, double fronted cottage with accommodation, pleasantly located on this pedestrianised street within this popular area of St Gabriel’s. Internally the accommodation includes an entrance vestibule, hall, lounge, breakfast room lea..."
"Presented with no upper chain, a brilliant opportunity to purchase this three-bedroom home. The property is conveniently situated for all local amenities including shops and schools with the City Centre and A19 nearby. The internal accommodation comprises of a spacious living room and a w..."
THIS PROPERTY IS AVAILABLE ON HOME REACH. Here you can buy the 50% share price shown and pay a low monthly rent on the 50% you don’t buy. The Maidstone is a three bedroom home featuring an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden. The ground floor also has ...
"*** Three bedrooms *** Off street parking *** EPC grade D *** Freehold *** Council tax band A *** Large enclosed rear garden *** Downstairs WC *** Neutral decor throughout *** Must view *** No onward chain *** Well presented three bedroom end terrace property located on Premier Road, Plains ..."
"Moving Homes welcomes to the sales market this two bedroom lower ground floor garden apartment situated in Ashbrooke, Sunderland within easy reach of the City Centre and its transport links. The accommodation briefly comprises; entrance lobby with storage leading into the spacious living room wit..."
"Safe and Secure are delighted to welcome to the market this IMMACULATE, Three Bedroom End Terraced House in the popular area of Lord Street, Silksworth.
This NEW REFURBISHED home benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and private yard to rear.
Close to local amenities and transport lin..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** If you're looking for an affordable family home that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this three-bedroom semi-detached, close to a range of amenities, transport links, and schools certainly fits the bill! The entrance porch leads into the hallway, with th..."
"For Sale by Modern Method of Auction; Starting Bid Price £110,000 plus reservation Fee. An attractive Dutch style semi-detached property, occupying a pleasant position within the ever popular area of Wear View Estate. Internal accommodation includes a hall with staircase to the first floor..."
"This well maintained three bedroom mid link occupies a tucked away position and boasts lovely views. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, inner hall, lounge, dining kitchen, rear hall, outhouse, first floor landing, three bedrooms and shower room all having t..."
"This well maintained three bedroom semi detached house occupies an enviable tucked away position overlooking a green area. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises lounge, dining kitchen, conservatory, first floor landing, three bedrooms and bathroom all having the ben..."
"This two bedroom semi detached house is offered for sale with no upward chain and is not to be missed. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, rear hall, w.c. first floor landing, two bedrooms and shower room all having th..."
"*** Three bedrooms *** Freehold *** Two reception rooms *** Move in ready *** Neutral décor throughout *** Enclosed rear yard *** Modern kitchen and bathroom *** EPC grade E *** Council tax band A *** Beautifully presented three bedroom cottage located on Grange Street South, Grangetown."
"An attractive semi-detached house, favourably located at the head of a quiet cul-de-sac and having the benefit of a corner garden plot, together with a substantial kitchen extension. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, living room, dining room, breakfasting room, and kitchen, tog..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this well presented two bedroom, semi detached house on the popular Orr Avenue, New Silksworth. Benefiting from gas central heating and double glazing, the property would make a fantastic first time buy. Comprising :- Upvc door to the entrance hallway w..."
"Dowen Estate Agent welcome to the sale market this spacious and well presented two bedroom upper floor apartment. The property is decorated and refurbished throughout benefitting double glazing , gas central heating and offers a property that you can move straight into with a fully fitted interg..."
"Reduced price! Dowen present for sale well presented two bedroom mid link, which has potential to convert to a three bed plus possible extention for prospective dream home. The property boasts ample off street parking with a block paved driveway and a generous rear garden. The accommodation is a..."
STUNNING 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME WITH CONSERVATORY - EXCEPTIONALLY LARGE REAR GARDEN PLOT - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED INTERNALLY. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional home offering some unique qualities for a family purchase or someone looking for a large outdoor garden s...
2 DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE ON CORNER PLOT – WELL PRESENTED - POPULAR SILSKWORTH LOCATION – LARGE REAR GARDEN WITH SUNNY ASPECT – FIRST TIME BUYER OPPORTUNITY. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this 2 double bedroom property situated in very popular Silksworth location...
"AN IDEAL PURCHASE FOR A RANGE OF BUYERS! A SPACIOUS three bedroom end link family home, offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED! Features double glazing and combi gas central heating, the property is the subject of refurbishment to incorporate new flooring throughout and an..."
"In this established residential location, well placed for access to a range of amenities including the nearby Metro station and the regional road network with the A19 close at hand, an opportunity to purchase an end terraced house offering accommodation which is significantly more spacious than t..."
THIS PROPERTY IS AVAILABLE ON HOME REACH. Here you can buy the 50% share price shown and pay a low monthly rent on the 50% you don’t buy. The Maidstone features an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area with FRENCH DOORS opening onto the rear garden. The ground floor also has a SPACIOUS LOUNGE and clo...
***OVER 55'S ONLY ** **70% SHARED OWNERSHIP** A purpose built retirement bungalow conveniently situated within a small private cul de sac development adjoining the Morrisons shopping centre at Doxford Park and therefore being within easy walking distance of everyday amenities and local ...
BEAUTIFUL 2 BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT IN CENTRAL ASHBROOKE WITH GORGEOUS MODERN STYLISH INTERIOR - PARKING TO REAR - WALKING DISTANCE INTO CITY CENTRE & TRANSPORT LINKS - NO CHAIN Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional 2 bedroom first floor apartment offering read...
"This three bedroom semi detached house occupies an enviable position at the head of a cul-de-sac and is offered for sale with no upward chain. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, lounge, dining kitchen, first floor landing, three bedrooms and bathroom all h..."
"*** Three bedrooms *** Kitchen dining room *** Garage *** Enclosed rear garden *** Close to local amenities *** Priced to sell *** No onward chain *** Neutral décor throughout **** Must view *** Well presented three bedroom terraced home located on Burlawn Close, Ryhope."
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - TENANTED CURRENT RENT: £480pcm POTENTIAL RENTAL VALUE: £550pcm Selling with tenant in situ, currently paying £480 per calendar month. Ideally located to local shops and schools. This two bedroom BUNGALOW offers a excellent..."
"This stunning mid terrace dormer cottage has been the subject of a major refurbishment and modernisation programme to provide a beautiful standard of accommodation. The immaculate internal accommodation on the ground floor includes an entrance vestibule, hall, two spacious reception rooms, a fab..."
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Semi Detached House in the popular area of Avonmouth Road, Farringdon.
This spacious home benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and gardens front and rear.
This home would be a good purchase for all, first time buyers and property..."
"Pattinson Auction are pleased to welcome to the market this well presented two bed Mid Link home currently generating £500 PCM. A pleasant, grassed area to the front elevation leads to a Porch, leading to front room with opening staircase, at the rear is a homely Kitchen with built in Coo..."
"Pattinson are pleased to welcome to the market this well presented 5 bedroom property. The subject property briefly comprises three flats, two of which are situated on the ground floor and one to the first floor. Each flat has a spacious open plan lounge/kitchen area, bedroom and bathroom whilst ..."
"Investment Opportunity With Long Standing Tenants In Occupation. Having Lived There For 12 Years, The Tenants Are Happy To Remain Indefinitely. Potential To Achieve Up To £695pcm With Some Improvements/Upgrades. The Current Tenancy Is Periodic With The Landlord Receiving £550pcm. Harper ..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND A We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 3-bedroom semi-detached house in Oswald Terrace West, Sunderland. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array of individual ..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents Welcome This semi detached 3 bedroom home. situated on a corner plot within this sought after area of Sunderland. Investment Purchase, The property to be sold with sitting tenants, paying £550pcm / £7150pa. The property comprises of:- lounge with period sty..."
"Guide Price £100,000 + Offered For Sale by Unconditional Online Auction on the 28th March 2023. Auction Fees Apply. A double fronted shop unit, in immediate proximity to Sunderland City centre. With shop frontage onto Borough Road. The unit is currently let at £8320 per annum o..."
CENTRAL GRANGETOWN LOCATION - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM LARGE END OF TERRACE HOME - WELL PRESENTED WITH HUGE GROUND FLOOR OFFERING POTENTIAL TO CREATE ADDITIONAL DOUBLE BEDROOM USING TRADITIONAL LAYOUT - MODERN KITCHEN & BESPOKE BATHROOM WITH SUNKEN BATH & SEPARATE SHOWER.Good Life Homes are delighted...
"Looking to take your first step on the property ladder? Look no further.....we are excited to list this delightful mid terraced home on the ever popular Holborn Road, Hylton Lane Estate, Sunderland. Pleasantly presented but in need of a little TLC this home provides the new purchaser the oppo..."
"A superb, two bedroom top floor apartment within this attractive development in this leafy area of Ashbrooke. Internally the well-appointed private accommodation includes a hall, spacious lounge featuring French doors with Juliet balcony and a modern fitted kitchen with integrated appliances. T..."
"This 2 bedroomed modern ground floor apartment situated in Pear Tree Mews in leafy Ashbrooke which offers a much sought after location providing easy access to local shops, schools and amenities as well as transport links to Sunderland City Centre and beyond. The property itself is likely to appe..."
"Occupying a highly sought after position on this desirable stretch of Kingsway Road which fronts onto a lovely small green, this splendid larger style, six person, three bedroom mid terraced home offers a well proportioned living space perfect for families and is available with no upward chain."
"This ground floor 2 bedroom RETIREMENT apartment is situated in Strawberry Court in Ashbrooke which is convenient for easy access to local shops and amenities and transport links. The property briefly comprises of Entrance Hall, Living Room, Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms and a Shower Room. Externally there..."
"An attractive two bedroom first floor apartment within this small, modern, purpose built development in Ashbrooke. Internally the private accommodation includes a hall, attractive lounge, contemporary kitchen, two bedrooms and a modern bathroom. Features of the apartment include an allocated pa..."
"A well presented end terraced home offered with VACANT POSSESSION presented to a high standard and being easily maintained. The property comprises of an entrance hall, lounge with picture window which ensures that the room is light and airy. A well planned kitchen opening to the dining area. ..."
"An attractive mid terraced home boasting spacious south facing courtyard to the rear and drive to the front, situated within this ever popular area of Grindon. Internally the accommodation comprises entrance hall, living room with door to rear courtyard, contemporary kitchen, two good sized bedr..."
* PLEASE VIEW VIRTUAL TOUR AND FLOOR PLAN * TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED * REDHOUSE SR5 * ESTABLISHED RESIDENTIAL AREA * WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. * CONSERVATORY * OFF ROAD PARKING * COUNCIL TAX BAND - A * EPC - D * Located in the well established residential are...
Dowen Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this well positioned two/three bedroom end terraced cottage located on Henderson Street just off Chester road . Close to all local amenities and transport links leading to Sunderland City Centre and The Coast. All accommodation i...
"This two bedroom end link boasts the distinction of a garage and generous rear gardens. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, lounge, dining kitchen, first floor landing, two bedrooms and bathroom all having the benefit of double glazing and ga..."
"Available with No Onward Chain. This 3 bedroom mid link house is situated on Allendale Road in Farringdon being close to local schools, shops, amenities and transport link to Sunderland City Centre and the A19. The property itself briefly comprises of Entrance Porch, Inner Hall, Living Room, Ki..."
"ATTENTION BUYERS! A spacious three bed semi detached home which provides ideal family accommodation and being on a corner plot boasts gardens to front, side and rear. Located in a popular residential area giving access to a range of amenities which include local shops..."
"This attractive two bedroom semi-detached home, enjoys a pleasant open aspect to the front over a green within this ever popular area. The well presented internal accommodation includes a hall, lounge and a kitchen/diner whilst to the first floor there are two well-proportioned bedrooms and a mo..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN! We are proud to market this TWO BEDROOM mid terraced cottage which offers accommodation ALL ON ONE LEVEL! The Fulwell area is always popular as it is well placed for access to the sea front for coastal walks, local shops including the shopping cent..."
"Property located in Sandringham Road, Fulwell"
"This well maintained three bedroom semi detached house boasts a generous garden to the rear and is offered for sale with no upward chain. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining area, conservatory and spacious side store with WC,..."
"A riverside, seventh floor, two bedroom apartment enjoying panoramic views across the river, Roker and North Sea seascape. Internally the accommodation briefly comprises; communal entrance with 24 hour concierge and lift access to seventh floor, reception hallway, open plan living room ideal f..."
"Pattinsons Estate Agenrts are pleased to welcome to the market this well maintained two bedroom ground floor flat in Moorside, Sunderland. Situated close to local shops and transport links, this property would be ideal for a first time buyer, someone looking to downsize or as an investment to ..."
"BOASTING MODERN, NEUTRAL DECOR THROUGHOUT! Ideal for first time buyers and young families alike, this two bedroom end terrace home is located within a Cul-De-Sac on a popular residential estate. Positioned within close proximity to local amenities including transport li..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE Andrew Craig are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £94,000 for 29 Kildare Square, Downhill, Sunderland SR5 4AZ. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Andrew Craig estate agents, 44 Sea Road, Sunderland SR6 9BX before ex..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR A delightful development of one and two bedroom purpose built retirement apartments designed specifically to meet the needs of the older homeowner. Pinfold Court is ideally located within 280 yards of the local shops. Cleadon has a ...
"This 2 bedroom city centre ground floor apartment is available with no onward chain. Located on the corner of Borough Road and Foyle Street being close to the city centre shops and amenities, local schools, Sunderland Train Station as well as Park Lane Interchange. The property itself briefly c..."
*** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - TWO BEDROOM - DOUBLE FRONTED COTTAGE - RECENTLY REFURBISHED BATHROOM - ENCLOSED REAR YARD - OFF STREET PARKING - FRONT GARDEN - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - VIEWING HIGHLY ADVISED ***
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Semi Detached House in the centrally located area of Hollinside Road, Pennywell.
This spacious property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and garden to rear.
Close to local amenities and transport links, the property would sui..."
"VIEWING IS RECOMMENDED ON THIS WELL PRESENTED FAMILY HOME Located in a popular residential area having access to amenities which include local shops, Schools and transport links. Offering light, bright and airy accommodation, early viewing strongly advised!The inter..."
"Offered with No Chain Involved, A spacious two bedroomed dormer cottage, located in Millfield for easy access to a wide range of amenities including Sunderland Royal Hospital, University, local shops and schools. Millfield Metro station is nearby and there are bus links o..."
"Property located in Malvern Court, Cleadon"
"EXECUTIVE DEVELOPMENT** MODERN OPEN PLAN LOUNGE**IDEAL LOCATION. This two bedroom ground floor apartment offers spacious accommodation with a designated front door, allocated parking space and courtyard area just to the left of the main entrance. The location is ideal for local schools and amenit..."
FOR SALE BY WAY OF ONLINE AUCTION - TUESDAY 28TH OF FEBRUARY 2023 - Terms and Conditions apply. Please see the Agents Property Auction website for details  Offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED a THREE BEDROOM First Floor Flat locate...
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** This recently remodernised ground floor flat is in an ideal location, within close proximity to an array of amenities and transport links, a great first-time or investment buy! The property comprises a spacious lounge with three large windows allowing a lot of natural li..."
*** Three bedrooms *** Semi detached house *** Popular location *** Close to local amenities *** Kitchen dining room *** EPC grade awaited *** Freehold *** Council tax band A *** Utility room / WC *** No onward chain *** Well situated three bedroom semi detached home.
"A second floor 2 bed apartment situated on Azelea Terrace South that is likely appeal to a variety of purchasers including investors, first time buyer. The property has recently undergone a scheme of modernisation and improvements to a high standard throughout including a rewire, new central hea..."
"IDEAL INVESTMENT EPC RATING ""C"" LEASEHOLD This larger style modern 2 bedroom apartment is ideal for someone wanting to buy their first home , downsize or to use as a buy to let investment. There is a spacious lounge, kitchen/diner, family bathroom and two doub..."
An immaculate newly refurbished two or possibly three bedroom Edwardian terraced house finished with tastefully considered decor and high quality specification.This excellent house represents an ideal opportunity for those wanting a fully finished home.Modern features include a g...
PROBABLY THE FINEST APARTMENT OF ITS TYPE AVAILABLE - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - RECENT BATHROOM & KITCHEN - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED INTERNALLY - ALLOCATED PARKING - LOVELY VIEWS - SOUGHT AFTER PRIVATE DEVELOPMENT. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an exceptional example of its type whi...
"To be sold with tenant in situ currently paying £575 per calendar month. This a modern two bedroom semi-detached home tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac and would be an ideal investment opportunity. The internal layout comprising of: Entrance, lounge and fitted kitchen. To the first floor are ..."
" A fantastic opportunity to purchase a new three bedroom semi detached house under the shared ownership scheme. This property is advertised at a 40% share. 
"
"** End of Terrace ** Three Bedrooms ** Wet Room ** No Chain ** Vacant Possession ** Great First Time Buy or Investment ** Spacious Home ** Freehold ** EPC Grade Awaited ** Well maintained two bedroom end of terrace home located on Smith Street, Ryhope."
"*** Two bedrooms *** No onward chain *** Two reception rooms *** Popular residential location *** Close to local amenities *** Small town garden *** Cellar *** On street parking available *** EPC grade awaited *** Two bedroom terraced home located on Frederick Street, South Hylton."
"** Ground Floor ** Two Bedrooms ** Close to City Centre ** Neutrally decorated throughout ** Secure Entry System ** Allocated Parking ** Desirable Location ** Lifts ** EPC Rating C ** Well presented first floor apartment located on The Cloisters, Ashbrooke."
"A well presented and contemporary two-bedroom garden apartment, situated on a quiet and mature tree lined street, on the fringes of the city centre."
** Three Bedrooms ** Two reception rooms ** Modern method of auction ** Great investment ** Popular Location ** Gardens to Front and Rear ** EPC Grade awaited *** Reservation fee payable *** Three bedroom semi detached home in Ryhope.
"This well maintained three bedroom mid link is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The well appointed accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, rear hall, w.c. first floor landing, three bedrooms a..."
For sale via I Am Sold property auction. Buyers Premium Applies 
We are delighted to receive instructions to sell this deceptively spacious three bedroomed semi-detached home. FOR SALE BY CONDITIONAL AUCTION - Please visit our web site for full terms and conditions. In need of some updating and modernising but price...
"A superb 1 bed second floor flat offering contemporary living accommodation set within a period residence that offers modern living space boasting an excellent location for Sunderland City Centre, Sunderland University, Sunderland Royal Hospital, local schools and amenities. The property situate..."
"*FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION* *OFFERED AT BIDS FROM £90,000 PLUS BUYERS PREMIUM* *IN NEED OF FULL REFURBISHMENT* This deceptively spacious property is ideally positioned for Whitburn village centre and an excellent range of amenities including shops, schools and the nearby beaches. The a..."
"SPACIOUS GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT | TWO BEDROOMS | TWO BATHROOMS | OPEN PLAN LOUNGE / DINING ROOM | COMMUNAL GARDENS | ALLOCATED PARKING | WELL PRESENTED | NO ONWARD CHAIN Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this Ground Floor Two Bedroom, Two Bathroom Apartment with Allo..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this attractively priced end of terrace home ideally located within Sea View Street, Grangetown. The property offers a range of amenties on the doorstep including good local schools and the shopping area of Grangetown. It has excellent ..."
Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the sale market this two bedroom apartment. Located within walking distance to the City Centre in the highly sought after area of Ashbrooke. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing throughout. The apartment itself briefly...
TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM & ELECTRIC GATED ENTRY WITH ALLOCATED PARKING PLUS RARE 360 DEGREE DINING ROOM WITH ELEVATED VIEWS! Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a two double bedroom apartment located on the second floor of this popular de...
TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM WITH EN SUITE PLUS MAIN BATHROOM - WELL REGARDED - WELL MAINTAINED APARTMENT DEVELOPMENT -WALKING DISTANCE TO CITY CENTRE & TRANSPORT LINKS - 3RD FLOOR - ELEVATED SOUTH FACING VIEWS - SPACIOUS INTERIOR - NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a spacious ...
A split level spacious top floor apartment in this modern block offering accommodation set over two floors and offered to the market with NO CHAIN involved. The property provides outstanding River views whilst being within a short walk to the City Centre where a host of sh...
"IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND YOUNG FAMILIES! A well presented semi detached home benefitting from off street parking, refitted kitchen and recently renewed double glazed windows. Comprising of: entrance lobby, lounge, refitted kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom. A..."
"A SPACIOUS bungalow in Castletown, available CHAIN FREE with TENANT in situ for INVESTORS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are delighted to welcome to the market this charming three bedroom end terrace bungalow in Castletown, available with no forward chain. The property be..."
"Deceptively spacious two bedroom first floor flat which is located on the outskirts of Sunderland City Centre and the excellent range of shops, restaurants and banking facilities within as well as Sunderland University. For those who use public transport, the University Metro Station can be foun..."
"Located in central Ashbrooke within a quite cul-de-sac, this large ground floor period flat conversion provides a wonderful first-time buy for young professionals wanting to enjoy the conservation area with its excellent local facilities and the rapidly improving city centre with good transport r..."
"*Cash Investors Only* An extremely rare opportunity to purchase a property with a guranteed 7.6% Yield. For these 2beds, you will recieve £6,490 PA which is £540 PCM NET after all costs! This rent will be reviewed every year inline with CPI. How it Works: The proper..."
"Located in the Ashbrooke Conservation area just off Ryhope Road this modern purpose built apartment complex is set back from the road and surrounded by greenery, creating a great environment to live. The property comes with allocated parking and access to the communal gardens. It is ideal for s..."
"If you are seeking a straightforward project on the outskirts of Sunderland, this property should be at the top of your list. Featuring three good-sized bedrooms, a three-piece family bathroom and an open-plan lounge/dining room, along with a lovely garden, this terraced home has a great deal to..."
" To be sold with tenant in situ currently paying £550 per calendar month. This a modern two bedroom semi-detached home tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac and would be an ideal investment opportunity. The internal layout comprising of: Entrance, lounge and fitted kitchen. To the first ..."
"This 3 bedroom semi detached house is situated in the popular area of Redhouse on Rutherglen Road being close to local schools, shops and amenities. The property itself is likely to appeal to a wide variety of purchasers and is offered For Sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN INVOLVED. Internally the livi..."
PurpleBricks welcomes to the market a well presented two bedroom split level spacious apartment situated in Mayfair Buildings close to the town centre. The apartment offers an ideal base for city centre living whilst providing a community environment. The first floor apartment offers spacious ...
"*NO CHAIN* *EXTENDED DORMA* *3 BEDROOMS* *2 RECEPTION ROOMS* This spacious three bedroomed cottage is located in the popular area of Millfield, offering easy access to many local amenities including Millfield Metro station, Aldi supermarket and Sunderland City Centre. Briefly comprising ..."
"This deceptively spacious two bedroom end terrace house boasts' a generous and flexible footprint. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance porch, two reception rooms, kitchen, rear hall, ground floor bathroom, first floor landing and two bedrooms all having the benefi..."
"This well presented three bedroom mid terrace is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed to be appreciated. The generously proportioned accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, first floor l..."
Looking for the perfect first time buy or investment? Look no further as this immaculately presented mid terraced home is sure to impress. Offered with no onward chain and realistically priced this delightful home offers spacious accommodation and attractive neutral decor. To the ground floor...
** First floor flat ** Overlooking garden ** En suite shower room ** Allocated parking space ** Close to Sunderland University ** Close to transport links ** A lovely well maintained two bedroom ground floor flat located in Albert Courts with fantastic access to a wide range of local ameniti...
"PurpleBricks are pleased to bring to the market this spacious two bedroom first floor apartment located in this popular development in South Hylton .
The internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance door into communal entrance, hallway, open plan living diner kitchen space, master bedroom ..."
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Third Floor Apartment in the sought after location of Echo Building, West Wear Street.
This modern accommodation benefits from electric storage heating, double glazing and beautiful riverside views.
The property is currently tenanted so would..."
"This two bedroom mid terrace house is offered for sale with no upward chain and has excellent potential. The generous living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, two reception rooms, kitchen, rear hall, ground floor shower room, first floor landing and two bedrooms all h..."
"Situated in Mayfair Buildings close to Sunderland City Centre is this spacious third floor, two bedroom apartment. Internally the accommodation is presented to an excellent standard throughout, the apartment benefits from entrance hallway, living room leading to outside balcony area, fitted kitch..."
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Semi Detached House in the popular area of Riddings Road, Redhill.
This spacious home is currently tenanted so would make an ideal investment opportunity for property landlords and investors.
With gas central heating, double glazing and garde..."
"In this established residential location with a range of amenities in the vicinity and offering convenient access to the local road network, a well presented mid link house ideally suited to a range of purchasers including first time buyers and investors. Available immediately."
Dowen Estate Agent welcomes to the sale market a two bedroom apartment situated in Mayfair Buildings close to the town centre. The apartment offers an ideal base for city centre living and is currently rented out receiving an income of £495. per month. The third floor apartment offers spacious ac...
"NO CHAIN INVOLVED! An ideal purchase for a range of buyers including first time buyers, buy to let investors or young families, this two bedroom semi detached property is boasts gardens to the front and rear. Benefitting from having a driveway, double glazing and combi..."
"A Two Bedroom Semi Detached House offered with a tenant in situ in the popular area of Redhouse. This Property would make an ideal investment opportunity for property landlords and investors alike. Benefits include: gas central heating, double glazing..."
"CAN BE SOLD WITH VACANT POSSESION. Early viewing is recommended of this well presented two bedroom first floor flat. The well presented accommodation comprises communal entrance hall, entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, two bedrooms master with en-suite shower room nd bathroom all having the b..."
"A SPACIOUS end of terrace house in Sunderland, available TENANTED for IMMEDIATE investment. Call to enquire! Bettermove are proud to present this 2 bedroom end of terrace house in Sunderland. The property is currently tenanted and it will be sold with tenants in situ fo..."
THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY HOME | SPACIOUS RECEPTION | MODERN FITTED FAMILY BATHROOM | DOUBLE GLAZED | GAS CENTRAL HEATING | PRIVATE REAR COURT YARDS | POPULAR LOCATION Pattinson Estate Agents warmly welcome to the market this spacious three bedroom family home located on Cirencester Str...
"Guide Price £80,000 + Moovd welcome to the market ‘For Sale’ via Unconditional Online Auction on 31st March 2023, this superbly presented two-bedroom mid terrace. This ‘Buy to Let’ is currently ‘Let’ on an AST at £595 PCM, returning an impressive 8.92% yield. Auction Fees Apply. "
"PurpleBricks are delighted to welcome to the market this Riverside larger style two bedroom, two bathroom luxury purpose built City Centre apartment at the desirable Echo24 Development affording superb elevated views across the adjacent River Wear and stretching out towards the North Sea seascape..."
"This three bedroom mid cottage is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed. The flexible living space is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, ground floor bedroom, lounge, kitchen, rear hall, ground floor bathroom, first floor l..."
"*** Great Investment or First Time Buy *** Two Bedrooms *** Upper Floor Apartment *** Fully Fitted Kitchen *** En Suite to Master Bedroom *** Immaculate Throughout ** EPC Grade B *** Well presented wo bedroom apartment located on Ford Lodge, South Hylton."
Bright and airy 2 bedroom property that will suit a range of buyers. Recently renovated and benefitting from a new kitchen and bathroom this property is ready to move into!
"ATTENTION LANDLORDS!!!!!!! This two bedroom mid link is offered for sale as a going concern. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, conservatory, dining kitchen, first floor landing, two bedrooms and bathroom. Outside there are gardens to the front and ..."
National Residential are delighted to offer this 3-bedroom semi-detached property located in the popular residential area of Ford Estate which is well placed for easy access to all local amenities and local transport links. 
"** No Chain ** Vacant Possession ** One Bedroom ** Two Loft Rooms ** Large Reception Rooms ** Modern Throughout ** Off Road Parking ** Close to Sunderland Hospital ** EPC Rating E ** Spacious home located on Mafeking Street, Pallion."
"Bradley Hall Sunderland are delighted to welcome to the market this three-bedroom, mid terraced bungalow located in Millfield, within the City of Sunderland. Hawthorn Street is a popular location with investors and first time buyers alike, due to its close proximity to Sunderland University City ..."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FTB- THREE BEDROOM (ONE LARGE DOUBLE TWO SMALL SINGLE BEDROOMS) GROUND FLOOR FLAT. NO ONWARD CHAIN!Good Life are pleased to bring to the market this 3 bedroom ground floor flat which until recently has been let out by the current owner to a long term tenant. This propert...
"An attractive 3 bedroom first floor flat providing spacious and well appointed accommodation throughout, available with no upward chain. Internally the accommodation includes a light and airy lounge sharing an open plan arrangement with a dining room (formerly Bed 3), modern kitchen, two/three b..."
"Enjoying a quiet cul-de-sac position, this superb two bedroomed first floor apartment offers a contemporary living space, perfect for first time buyers and those wishing to downsize. The internal accommodation comprises:- ground floor entrance lobby, stairs to apartment, open plan living room, th..."
"An attractive double fronted mid terrace cottage, having recently undergone many notable improvements, providing spacious accommodation all on one level. Internally the accommodation includes a hall, generous lounge / diner, a stylish contemporary kitchen, wet room/wc and two bedrooms. Benefits..."
SOUGHT AFTER OPPORTUNITY - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM MID TERRACE HOUSE WITH POTENTIAL TO CREATE 3 BEDROOMS - LARGE DOUBLE DRIVE/CAR STANDING TO REAR - CLOSE TO LOCAL PRIMARY & SECONDARY SCHOOLS - A MINUTES WALK TO GRANGETOWN SHOPPING & TRANSPORT INTO TOWN - NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring...
"Spacious 3rd floor apartment for over 60s. Extremely well positioned within the building with commanding views over the surrounding area. Constructed by Mcarthy and Stone, the apartment block consists of 43 properties situated over three floors with lift access. "
A delightful 2 bedroom first floor apartment offering a well modernised and tastefully appointed living space perfect for professional couples and those looking to downsize. The property has a lovely fresh feel throughout and offers comfortable living accommodation that is easy to maintain and ec...
"*** SUBSTANCIALLY REDUCED***A 2 bed third floor RETIREMENT apartment situated in Strawberry Court in Ashbrooke which is convenient for easy access to local shops and amenities and transport links. This modern flat benefits from modern décor, double glazing, electric Fischer (future heating) radia..."
"A spacious cottage located in Millfield, close to many amenities including the Hospital, the University, local shops and access into the City Centre. This property offers versatile living accommodation as could be used as a three bed/two reception or as a four bed/one reception. The property ha..."
"*FOR SALE VIA THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION * GUIDE PRICE £78,000 * BIDDING CLOSES 3 APRIL AT 3PM * RESERVATION FEE APPLIES * A spacious terraced property in need of some updating. Previously an HMO, this would be ideal for investors. Well placed for easy access to a host of..."
"This fantastic ground floor flat is arguably the finest example of its type. The accommodation is arranged over one level and comprises open plan breakfast kitchen, lounge, two bedrooms and bathroom all having the benefit of double glazing and gas central heating. Outside there is a generous encl..."
"A modern third floor 1 bedroomed apartment with communal lift situated in The Mowbray Building which is located on Borough Road in the city centre of Sunderland offering a superb location for easy access to the many bars, shops, restaurants and cafes within the city. The apartment benefits from t..."
"This is a highly promising terraced property offering huge potential for any buyer seeking a refurbishment project in order to increase their new home’s value or to add their own stamp. Boasting generously-sized rooms, the home is situated on the outskirts of Sunderland. Its three bedrooms, lar..."
"LEASEHOLD ** VACANT PROPERTY ** Council Tax band B We are delighted to offer to the market this modern, two-bedroom ground floor flat located on Ford Lodge, South Hylton, Sutherland. The property is ideal for a couple or single occupier but also the id..."
"Early viewing is a must of this generously proportioned two bedroom first floor flat which is offered for sale with no upward chain. The accommodation comprises entrance hall with stairs leading to the first floor landing, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom all having the benefit of doubl..."
"This superb modern second floor 1 bedroomed apartment with communal lift is situated in The Mowbray Building which is located on Borough Road in the city centre of Sunderland offering a superb location for easy access to the many bars, shops, restaurants and cafes within the city. The apartment b..."
INVESTOR OPPORTUNITY - A LARGE 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACED HOME CURRENTLY LET ON AN AST AT £400pcm BUT WITH A RENTAL POTENTIAL OF £550pcm FOR A WELL PRESENTED VERSION. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a property which will be of interest to buy to let investors. Owned f...
"** Investment Opportunity ** Three Bedrooms ** Refurbishment Required ** Kitchen Diner ** Great Location ** Pedestrianised Street ** EPC Rating E ** Council Tax Band A ** Freehold ** Spacious three bedroom terraced home located on Bellamy Crescent, Town End Farm."
TOP FLOOR 2 BEDROOM PERIOD ATTIC APARTMENT WITHIN AN IMPRESSIVE ASHBROOKE VICTORIAN TERRACE OFFERING GORGEOUS SLOPING CEILINGS AND SPACIOUS INTERIOR LIVING. LONG LEASE - 999 YEARS. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market a 2 bedroom top floor attic apartment within this gorgeous per...
TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT | SPACIOUS LOUNGE | TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS | PRIVATE FRONT GARDEN | GARAGE (ADJACENT BLOCK) | POPULAR LOCATION | INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom first floor flat with garage situated on Morval Clos...
"A two bedroom mid terraced home located close to local transport links to Sunderland City Centre and the Stadium of Light Metro station. Benefitting from double glazing and gas central heating, the property briefly comprises of entrance lobby area, living room, open plan kitchen and dining area. ..."
"AVAILABLE NOW We welcome to the market this ground floor one bedroom, unfurnished apartment which has many benefits, which include a modern specification, gas central heating, mains shower, halogen downlighting, entrance phone for security. This accommodation briefly compri..."
"This double bedroom, leasehold apartment offers direct access to the communal side garden via a door from the Living Room. Located within close proximity of Cleadon Village centre, with local shops, churches, delis, pubs and restaurants. This delightful property also offers double glazing, secur..."
"SUPERB 2 BED FIRST FLOOR MODERN TWO BED APARTMENT - EN SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM - FABULOUS OPEN PLAN KITCHEN – INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY CURRENTLY LET AT £499pcm TO SITTING TENANT – NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market this modern, well presented 2 bed apar..."
"An ideal opportunity has arisen to the market to acquire this two bedroom terraced house, situated within the popular residential area of Sunderland. This property is currently tenanted and therefore available to investors only. The property is briefly comprised of a living room and kitc..."
"A great opportunity has arisen to the market to acquire this two bedroom terraced house, currently tenanted and therefore available to investors only. The property briefly comprises of a living room and kitchen on the ground floor, with two double bedrooms and a bathroom on the first flo..."
"***** TENANTED INVESTMENT******
This fifth floor apartment offers spacious accommodation with an open plan living room / breakfast kitchen, generous size bedrooms, en-suite shower room and bathroom. The building offers a concierge service in the main reception and is within walking distance to th..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** If you're looking for an affordable family home that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this two-bedroom terraced certainly fits the bill.  The entrance leads into the hallway, with the master bedroom to the immediate left, with a bay window allowing p..."
"A spacious two bedroom home located within this ever popular area benefitting from an elevated position.
Internal accommodation includes an entrance hall, lounge, generous kitchen / diner. First floor with two bedrooms and family bathroom. Outbuildings with possible extension opportunity."
A ONE BEDROOM PURPOSE BUILT GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH DIRECT ACCESS TO COMMUNAL GARDENS. Sanford Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 43 properties arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. Sanford Court is in an ideal location with a ...
"GUIDE PRICE £70,000 - A mid-terrace bungalow sold with a tenant in situ.Ready-made investment with an annual yield of £5,700."
"Keith Pattinson Estate Agents are happy to bring to the market this spacious two bedroom cottage situated on Guildford Street, Sunderland. Ideally located for an array of schools, walking distance to local amenities likewise Sunderland City Centre, Excellent local transport links to neighbouri..."
"*** Close to Sunderland Hospital *** One Bedroom + Three Loft Rooms *** Two Bathrooms *** No Onward Chain *** Move in Ready *** Close to Local Amenities *** Enclosed Rear Yard *** EPC Grade D *** Freehold *** Council Tax Band A *** Immaculate one bedroom cottage located on Duncan Street, Pal..."
RARE TO THE MARKET IN ARGUABLY THE MOST SOUGHT AFTER BLOCK - SPACIOUS 2 BEDROOM 7TH FLOOR APARTMENT - SPACIOUS ROOMS WITH FABULOUS VIEWS FROM EACH WINDOW - VERY WELL MAINTAINED BLOCK WITH TWIN LIFTS TO ALL FLOORS & IMPRESSIVE ENTRANCE WITH COMMUNAL ROOM.Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to t...
"Keith Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom flat on Gladstone Street, Roker. This property is well presented and spacious, also benefits from a private yard. The property briefly comprises of; stairway to hallway, kitchen, lounge and two bedrooms. Of the lo..."
**To be sold via online auction on Thursday 23rd March at 10:00am. The auction will run for 30 minutes. Register to bid today. ** Please note that the Auction will be an online auction via our website with remote bidding.  You must preregister to bid. Reservation Fee Applies. All the inf...
"A well presented 2 bedroom dormer cottage that would be ideal for a first time buyer or investor. The property is ideally located to provide easy access to shops, schools and amenities as well as excellent transport links. Internally the property benefits from gas central heating, doubl..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase a one bedroom top floor apartment in the sough after Royal Court development. The accommodation has been recently redecorated throughout and comprises communal entrance hall with secure entry system, entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom..."
"Excellent two bedroom purpose built first floor Riverside apartment enjoying panoramic views to both Easterly and Westerly aspects of the River Wear. Internally the accommodation briefly comprises; communal entrance with lift to first floor, reception hallway, 'L' shaped living room ideal for bo..."
"Notably spacious, top floor riverside luxury modern apartment enjoying panoramic views across the River Wear and over to North Sea. The accommodation briefly comprises; lift access to fifth floor, reception hall, living room ideal for lounge and dining purposes, fully fitted kitchen, two double ..."
"Riverside spacious fifth floor two bedroom modern luxury apartment situated on Sunderland Fish Quay, within easy reach of City Centre. Internally featuring fully equipped kitchen, night storage heating, laminate floors, double glazing and entrance phone. The accommodation briefly comprises; lif..."
SUPERB ASHBROOKE LOCATION IN ATTRACTIVE PERIOD BUILDING - A ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT - WITH REMOTE PARKING TO REAR - WELL PRESENTED & READY TO MOVE INTO - AVAILABLE WITH ALL APPLIANCES & FURNITURE IF REQUIRED - PERFECT LOW COST SECOND HOME OR INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME BUYER APA...
"We are delighted to bring to the market this smart property, located in Moorside, on the outskirts of Sunderland. A ready made flat with lots of space and storage, this superb property will appeal to many and in particular a first time buyer or BTL investor. The layout briefly comprises,..."
A superb 1 bed ground floor apartment offering contemporary living accommodation set within a period residence that offers modern living space boasting an excellent location for Sunderland City Centre and amenities. The property situated on the ground floor and is likely to appeal to a wide range...
"Offers invited between £65,000 to £75,000 Three Bedroom Terraced Home | Current Tenanted at £410 PCM | Long Term Tenant |Viewing Highly Recommended"
"Early viewing is a must of this well proportioned two bedroom mid terrace which is offered for sale with no upward chain. The property would be perfect for first time buyers and investors. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance, reception, hall, lounge, dini..."
"This generously proportioned two bedroom mid cottage is offered for sale with no upward chain. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, first floor landing and two bedrooms all having the benefit of double glaz..."
SPACIOUS MID TERRACE FAMILY HOME | TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS | TWO LARGE RECEPTIONS | MODERN SPACIOUS KITCHEN | PRIVATE FRONT AND REAR COURT YARD | OFF STREET PARKING | POPULAR LOCATION Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious mid terrace two bedroom family home s...
"FOR SALE BY WAY OF ONLINE AUCTION ON - THURSDAY THE 30TH MARCH, 2023. - Terms and Conditions apply. See Agents Property Auctions Website for full details.  SURE TO BE AN ATTRACTIVE PROSPECT FOR BUY TO LET INVESTORS! Loc..."
"DOUBLE BEDROOM MID TERRACED COTTAGE OFFERING ONE-LEVEL LIVING – POPULAR CENTRAL GRANGETOWN LOCATION - OF PARTICULAR INTEREST TO FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTMENT OPPORTINUTY WITH POTENTIAL RENTAL INCOME OF £500 WHEN MODERNISED - NEW ROOF, BATHROOM & BOILER IN RECENT YEARS – NO CHA..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION ON 30th March at 12:00 £65,000 PLUS FREEHOLD VACANT HOUSE
WITH PLANNING PERMISSION FOR FOUR FLATS"
"Stylish top floor one bedroom converted City Centre apartment with excellent access to City Centre, transport links and both university campuses. Modern features include integrated appliances, spotlighting, video entrance phone system, shower, double glazing (part) and gas fired central heatin..."
**NO CHAIN** Well presented one bedroom apartment in the heart of Sunderland City Centre. Must be viewed to be fully appreciated.
"ATTENTION BUYERS! Two Bedroom Mid Terrace Cottage located on Darwin Street where you can find local shops, transport links and many amenities within close proximity. Property benefits from UPVC double glazed, gas central heating and yard to rear. The property is ideal f..."
"*** Apartment with Lovely Views *** Communal Service/Gas Charge *** Excellent Spot *** Over 35's Only *** No Children Allowed *** Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this good size apartment situated within Altrincham Tower, Gilley Law, Sunderland. With neutral decor througho..."
Looking for an opportunity to invest? Look no further this well presented mid terraced cottage could be just what you are looking for!! Ideally placed for access to Sunderland city centre this home benefits from local schools and amenities with good transport links. Well maintained with neu...
Safe and Secure welcome to the market this One Bedroom Basement Flat situated on Park Place West in Sunderland. This property boasts a spacious open plan living area with modern fitted kitchen. There is a good sized bedroom and a modern three piece bathroom suite. This property also benefits from...
"Newly renovated, spacious one bedroom apartment located on the top floor of magnificent Victorian conversion in a superb residential location. The property has fantastic southerly aspects. Modern features include, gas central heating from combination boiler, fitted kitchen with appliances and ..."
LAST REMAINING PLOT - READY NOW - SHARED OWNERSHIP - BUYERS HAVE THE OPTION TO PURCHASE ANYTHING BETWEEN 25% - 75% DEPENDENT UPON THEIR AFFORDABILITY. - PLEASE GET IN TOUCH TO DISCUSS ELIGIBILITY - THERE IS STRICT ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA TO PURCHASE THIS PROPERTY. Lowry Park is perfectly located ...
"GUIDE PRICE BETWEEN £60,000 - £70,000 *** AVAILABLE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN ***
A well presents two bedroom apartment is welcome to the market. Ideal for first time buyers as a starter home and investment. Early inspection is highly recommended. Located in close proximity to Sunderland City Centr..."
Two-Bedroom Fourth Floor Apartment
"The subject property is a two storey mid terrace brick built building located in Mainsforth Terrace West, Hendon. Conveniently located within a close commute to Sunderland City Centre and Grangetown, this is ideal investment. "
"The subject property is a two storey mid terrace brick built building located in Mainsforth Terrace West, Hendon. Conveniently located within a close commute to Sunderland City Centre and Grangetown, this is ideal investment. The property is currently sold with vacant possession."
Two-Bedroom Fifth Floor Apartment
Two Bedroom Fifth Floor Apartment
"Early viewing is a must of this generously proportioned three bedroom mid cottage. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall, ground floor bedroom, lounge, inner hall, dining kitchen, ground floor bathroom, landing and two bedrooms to the first floor all having th..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic studio apartment occupying a pleasant position on this prestigious development of Malvern Court, Cleadon. Having excellent access to road links to Sunderland, Newcastle, South Shields and within a short drive to the coa..."
"DESIRABLE ASHBROOKE LOCATION! ........... This one bedroom second floor apartment is well placed for access to Sunderland City Centre and the excellent range of shops and amenities within, including Park Lane Interchange for bus and metro links. The property is sure to..."
"Stylish first floor, purpose built Manhattan style luxury studio apartment providing excellent access to the City Centre with high quality specification throughout briefly comprising: double glazing, contemporary kitchen with appliances, rain forest shower facility, extensive use of halogen light..."
"EXCEPTIONALLY PRICED 1 DOUBLE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT FOR OVER 55’s - IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH LIFT, LANDSCAPED GARDENS & PARKING - LOW MAINTENANCE CHARGES COMPARED TO OTHER RETIREMENT APARTMENTS (APPROX £1700pa) - AND ON SITE MANAGER FOR SECURITY, SUPPORT & ASSISTANCE!..."
TO BE SOLD VIA Online Auction until 16/03/2023 12:00. Fees apply *** FREEHOLD *** LESS THAN 0.5 MILE AWAY FROM SUNDERLAND ROYAL HOSPITAL *** GOOD ROAD LINKS TO THE CITY CENTRE *** IDEAL BUY TO LET OR FIRST TIME BUY *** TWO BEDROOM COTTAGE *** REAR YARD *** Pattinson are delighted to welcom...
"Two bedrooms, Great local amenities, Close to the train station, No chain, Searches available upfront, Good rental property"
This contemporary and stylishly appointed third floor open plan apartment benefiting high quality specification throughout. The apartment is rear facing with double aspect windows to the living area maximising nautral light. The accommodation briefly comprises; communal entrance with lift to thi...
A fully furnished managed investment opportunity located in the heart of Sunderland. Horizon is a collection of 154 high specification self-contained studio apartments spread over ten storeys. These studio apartments offer investors a fully furnished investment that is ready to go. Multi use options
"Quote Ref: JS0070. A MODERN & WELL PRESENTED Studio Apartment in a great location for both professional and student tenants. TENANTED INVESTMENT PROPERTY. Offering open plan studio apartment with En-suite shower room, communal facilities including cinema room and gym. There is also an on-s..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a first floor flat with a garden which would be perfect for  investors. The well presented accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises entrance hall with stairs to the first floor landing, lounge, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom all having the ben..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £55,000+. Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom, spacious terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £422.24 PCM with a gross yield of 9.21% on the Advertised..."
"SUPERB 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR OVER 55's - IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH LIFT, LANDSCAPED GARDENS & PARKING - LOW MAINTENANCE CHARGES COMPARED TO OTHER RETIREMENT APARTMENTS (APPROX £1700pa) - AND ON SITE MANAGER FOR SECURITY, SUPPORT & ASSISTANCE! Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to ..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR. Sanford Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 43 properties arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. There is a Development Manager who may be contacted from various points within each prope...
" ***Calling all Investors*** 2 bedroom apartment with a tenant in situ until Dec 2022 achieving £500 pcm representing a 12% Yield. Located at Quayside House, opposite the Quayside Exchange building on H..."
*** City Apartment *** Allocated Parking *** Two Bedrooms *** Great Location ***Tenanted Investment Pattinsons are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented first floor apartment situated on the outskirts of the city centre of Sunderland. Boasting lovely river views this propert...
"Sitting within this attractive courtyard on the ever popular Lakeside development, this delightful two bedroom second floor apartment comprises reception hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom. Benefiting from double glazing, central heating, communal gardens and parking ..."
"A lovely, bright one-bedroom retirement apartment situated within a first-class location with local shops on the door step, together with bus stop, pub with restaurant, and local park. The development offers well maintained grounds, secure car parking, lift access, laundry, and comfortab..."
"Centrally located in Sunderland, Horizon will provide contemporary high specification living for Sunderland's large number of students and young working professionals.Horizon is made up of 154 self-contained studio apartments, carefully designed to maximize the rental potential of its tenants."
"Centrally located in Sunderland, Horizon will provide contemporary high specification living for Sunderland's large number of students and young working professionals. Horizon is made up of 154 self-contained studio apartments, carefully designed to maximize the rental potential of its tenants."
"*** THREE BEDROOMS *** TERRACED BUNGALOW*** GAS CENTRAL HEATING *** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** We would like to introduce to the market, this three bed terraced bungalow location on Duncan Street, Sunderland. This ideal investment opportunity is located close to local shops, schools and amenit..."
"BEING SOLD BY ONLINE AUCTION - This 1 bed ground floor flat is offered FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN INVOLVED and is likely to appeal to a wide variety of purchasers. The property is located within walking distance of Sunderland City Centre, University and a range of shops and amenities as well ..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE LOWER GROUND FLOOR WITH PATIO DOORS TO CAR PARK Sanford Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 43 properties arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. Sanford Court is in an ideal location with a shor...
"FOR SALE VIA I AM SOLD AUCTION T&C's apply. This generously proportioned two bedroom first floor flat is offered for sale with no upward chain and really must be viewed. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and comprises communal entrance hall, entrance hall with stairs leading t..."
"Located in a prime position in the heart of Sunderland City Centre and only a few minutes walk to the Bridges Shopping Centre, close to many excellent amenities and transport links. This well presented two bedroom flat enjoys great views across the City and beyond to the coast. Internally the ac..."
"Early viewing is a must of this beautifully presented one bedroom first floor retirement apartment. The well appointed accommodation comprises entrance hall and residents lounge, lift to the first floor, entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom all with the benefit of elec..."
Springbok Properties offers this attractively priced two bedroom first floor flat on the outskirts of Sunderland City Centre. Viewing Advised 
"Guide Price £50,000 + Offered For Sale by Unconditional Online Auction on the 28th March 2023. Auction Fees Apply. A double fronted shop unit, in immediate proximity to Sunderland City centre. With shop frontage onto Borough Road. The unit is currently let at £4,160 per annum, ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £50,000+ FOR SALE BY LIVESTREAMED ONLINE AUCTION ON TUESDAY 28TH MARCH 2023. For bidding registration, please visit auctionhouse.co.uk/northeast"
"This two bedroom mid cottage is offered for sale with no upward chain and offers excellent potential. The accommodation is arranged over one level and comprises entrance hall, lounge, two bedrooms, kitchen and shower room. Outside there is an enclosed yard to the rear with double gates providing ..."
MODERNISED & WELL PRESENTED ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT IN EXCELLENT LOCATION – OF PARTICULAR INTEREST TO FIRST TIME BUYERS OR AN INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY – POTENTIAL RENT OF £400pcm & GOOD ANNUAL YEILD OF AROUND 10%pa WITH THE BENEFIT OF NO CHAIN! Good Life Homes are delighted to br...
"FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! This three bedroom mid-terrace bungalow is located close to beach, just off the coast road. It is also close to local shops and amenities, and the open spaces of Hendon Beach & Backhouse Park nearby. Reception, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, bathroom, the property als..."
"BEST AND FINAL OFFERS ARE INVITED BY 4PM ON FRIDAY 17TH MARCH 2023. This three bedroom end terrace home situated in a convenient locality walking distance from urban amenities, offers an excellent opportunity to both first time buyers and investor landlords. Internal accommodation compri..."
"This first floor, two bedroom retirement apartment is offering 50% ownership! Benefits include: very popular location, secure entry system, spacious living accommodation, communal lounge, communal gardens which are mature and well maintained, ..."
"An opportunity to purchase a superb retirement apartment in this popular retirement development. Springtide Cove development features lovely private communal gardens, a restaurant and on site hairdresser. The accommodation itself is surprisingly spacious with the living accommodation briefly comp..."
Pattinson Estate Agents welcome to the market this delightful apartment ideally situated in a superb location of Roker with the city of Sunderland and coast just a short stroll and excellent transport links. Springtide Cove is retirement accommodation and this apartment is offered on a 50% sha...
Online Auction 22nd-23rd March 2023
22nd-23rd March Online Auction
Available with No Onward Chain. This 2 bedroom First Floor apartment located on Doxford Rise which is a retirement development managed by Home Group and offers a purchaser shared ownership based upon 70% with the purchaser and 30% retained by Home Group Limited. The property itself briefly comp...
"This one bedroom third floor apartment is offered for sale as a going concern and is currently let at £595 per calendar month. The accommodation comprises communal entry hall with lifts to all floors, entrance vestibule, entrance hall, open plan lounge and kitchen, bedroom and shower ro..."
Features and descriptionLeaseholdSpacious Upper Flat - Sold via AuctionTwo Double BedroomsRecently fitted kitchenLeasehold with 963 years on leaseCouncil Tax Band ATenant in SituPotential 9% YieldClose to local amenitiesA19 commuter linkSale by Modern AuctionPleasantly situated in a cul-
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £45,000+ Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £393PCM with a gross yield of 10.48% on the Advertised Guide Price. "
"EXTENDED LEASE BY A FUTHER 40 YEARS... Well presented two bed roomed upper floor apartment situated on the first floor, the apartment is situated within a very well established area of Farringdon. Close to good schools, excellent amenities and good bus links. The property is within easy access to..."
"An attractive two bedroom top floor flat, recently decorated and available with immediate vacant possession and no upper chain involved. Internally the private accommodation includes an entrance hall with door leading to covered balcony, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom. Benefiting ..."
"Keith Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this lovely one bedroom end of terrace flat. The property boasts excellent transport links to Sunderland City Centre, and is within walking distance to local amenities. The property in brief comprises of entrance hallway, open..."
" The service charge for next year is £70 per calender month and includes annual ground rent **NO ONWARD CHAIN** This well-presented first-floor flat is conveniently located in a popular area of Sunderland, within close proximity to an array of amenities, transport links, and road l..."
"Two Bedroom First Floor Flat offered with No Chain Involved.  Ideally located in a popular residential area, with convenient access to transport links including local bus links to Sunderland City Centre and road links such as the A19 for commuters. T..."
"***SHARED OWNERSHIP*** Stonebridge Shaw is pleased to bring to the market, on behalf of Gentoo Group, this beautiful, contemporary, two bedroom home due for completion June 2023. The property is part of the new build development at Crosstree Park, Sunderland Available on shared ownership wi..."
"A SPACIOUS flat in Sunderland, sold with TENANTS in situ for IMMEDIATE investment, welcoming INVESTORS only. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to present this charming one bedroom ground floor studio apartment in Sunderland city centre - welcoming investors only.The pr..."
** Timed Online Auction - 23 March 2023 ** Terraced THREE bedroom house in popular residential area of Sunderland. Currently vacant and in need of full internal refurbishment. Easy Access to the City Centre and transport links..
"This two bedroom mid cottage really must be viewed. The accommodation is arranged over one level and comprises entrance vestibule, entrance hall, two bedrooms, lounge, inner hall, kitchen and bathroom all having the benefit of double glazing and gas central heating. Outside there is a co..."
"* STUDIO APARTMENT * CITY CENTRE LOCATION * CLOSE TO SHOPS, BARS, EATERIES AND METRO/TRAIN STATION * GREAT LOCATION FOR EITHER UNIVERSITY CAMPUS * LAUNDRY FACILITY PRIVATE TO THE STUDIO *CURRENTLY LET AT £115 PER WEEK"
"NGU Homesales are delighted to bring to the market this lovely two bed end-terrace house in the area of Hendon, Sunderland. This attractive property is located close to local amenities and has excellent transport links. This property would be ideal for investment purchase. "
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - VACANT RENTAL VALUE: £450pcm RENTAL YIELD: 14.4% Selling with as vacant, valued at £450 per calendar month. Ideally located to local shops and schools. This 2 bedroom house offers a excellent investment opportunity. • ..."
***AUCTION ENDING 30.03.2023 AT 12;00** Modern method of auction *** Two bedroom cottage *** Modern kitchen *** Neutral décor throughout *** Enclosed rear yard with artificial grass *** On street parking *** Freehold *** Council tax band A *** EPC grade awaited *** Well presented two ...
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £35,000+. Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £359 PCM with a gross yield of 12.31% on the Advertised Guide Price. ..."
"*** RETIREMENT APARTMENT *** SECURE INTERCOM ACCESS AND EMERGENCY PULL CORDS *** COMMUNAL PARKING *** BEAUTIFUL COMMUNAL GARDENS *** ***THERE ARE AGE RESTRICTIONS ON THIS PROPERTY, PLEASE GET IN TOUCH FOR MORE INFORMATION*** We are delighted to welcome to the sales market this ground floor ..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £35,000+ Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom end terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £440 PCM with a gross yield of 15.09% on the Advertised Guide Pric..."
"Via modern method of auction. Starting bids £35,000. Buyer's premium of £5,000 + VAT applies. A three-bedroom, unmodernised, two-storey cottage which has the benefit of a large kitchen/bathroom extension to rear and replacement roofs. The property is situated within a popular residentia..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £35,000. Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £422.32 PCM with a gross yield of 14.48% on the Advertised Guide Price..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £35,000+ Attention Investors! Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £402 PCM with a gross yield of 13.78% on the Adve..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £35,000+ Attention Investors! Welcoming to the market this two bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area, on the outskirts of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £440PCM with a gross yield of 15.08% on the Advert..."
**AUCTION ENDING ON 14/03/23 at 11am** Modern method of auction *** City Centre Location *** Aparthotel Living *** EPC grade C *** Council tax band A *** Furnished *** Leasehold *** Concierge Service *** Communal areas ***
"A mid terraced cottage located within close distance to the City Centre, local schools and shops. With upvc double glazing and gas central heating this property would be ideal for investors and first time buyers. The property has two additional loft rooms and externally there is a private rear ya..."
"* ONE BED 2ND FLOOR FLAT * PERFECT INVESTMENT * CASH ONLY SALE * PLEASANT SETTING * SINGLE GARAGE * CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES * LEASEHOLD - 47 YEARS * COUNCIL TAX A * EPC D * GR £150 SC £699
ROOM DIMENSIONS:
LIVING ROOM 4.97 X 3.14M BEDROOM 4.11 X 2.97M
KIITCHEN 2.35 X2.39M
BATHROOM 1.66 X 2.09M"
"*FOR SALE VIA THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION * GUIDE PRICE £33,000 * BIDDING CLOSES 30 MARCH AT 3PM * RESERVATION FEE APPLIES * One bedroom cottage in the popular residential area of Castletown. In need of a bit of TLC but plenty of potential to turn around. The property has potential to e..."
"Offered via Online Unconditional Auction, Guide £33,000. Fees apply. Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom, ground floor property situated on the outskirts of Sunderland City Centre. Located in a quiet residential area, this flat is Sold Tenanted and presents as an ..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £32,500+ Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £400 PCM with a gross yield of 14.77% on the Advertised Guide Price...."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £32,500+. Welcoming to the market this two bedroom mid terrace property in Hendon, on the outskirt of Sunderland. Offered to the market with a realistic Guide Price, the potential of this spacious home is massive and will un..."
"For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction with a Guide Price of £32,500+ Moovd are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom terraced property in the Hendon area of Sunderland. Currently tenanted and returning £389.99PCM with a gross yield of 14.40% on the Advertised Guide Pric..."
"FOR SALE VIA I AM SOLD AUCTION T&C's apply. Attention investors! Horizon House is a development of self contained studios which have the use of a communal gym, cinema room, games room, kitchen area and laundry. The studio is situated in the city centre and comprises of lounge/bedroom and show..."
"Dunn House is an existing halls of residence in the heart of Sunderland. This studio apartment is is ideally located in the heart of Sunderland, within walking distance of both campuses and all local facilities and amenities including, transport, restaurants, shops and clubs. The property include..."
"*FANTASTIC CASH INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* CIRCA 6% NET YIELD & TENANTED FOR 2022/23! Mr Investa are delighted to offer this studio apartment on the 1st floor of All Saints House with tenant in situ, generating immediate income and making this a perfect addition to any investment portfolio. Call tod..."
INVESTOR POTENTIAL ONE BEDROOM MID TERRACE HOUSE WITH POTENTIAL TO CREATE A SECOND BEDROOM - UPDATING REQUIRED - FUTURE RENTAL INCOME ON COMPLETION OF REFURBISHMENT APPROX £425pcm - NO CHAIN. Good Life Homes are delighted to bring to the market an opportunity to acquire a low cost home in a...
"FOR SALE VIA I AM SOLD AUCTION T&C's apply. This well presented one bed ground floor flat really must be viewed. The accommodation is arranged over one level and comprises communal entrance hall, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, bathroom and bedroom which have the benefit of double glazing and..."
Freehold House Arranged as Two Flats Vacant Possession
"Guide Price £4,000 + We offer For Sale via Unconditional Online Auction. The Freehold includes leases for four properties in The Hawthorns in the Ashbrooke area of Sunderland. For further information on the legal pack, please refer to our website: https://ww..."
